The Librarians' Internet Index is a searchable, annotated subject directory of more than 8,200 Internet resources selected and evaluated by librarians for their usefulness to users of public libraries.

Directories will help you identify manufacturers of a particular product, the addresses and phone numbers of specific companies, and the names of key executives. Some directories provide additional information such as sales, number of employees, or ranking of companies by sales within industry.

The Chalmer Davee Library subscribes to a wide variety of business journals and full text business databases. Use the following databases to locate full text articles or citations to printed journals.

ABI/INFORMis one of the oldest and largest electronic sources of business information containing complete bibliographic information, indexing and abstracts and selected full text for more than 1,000 business journals including 350+ international journals for business news and analysis from around the world.

Business includes: business news, company financial, compare companies, sec filings industry & market, accounting literature, business reference.  News includes: General news, state and regional papers, world news, wires and international news.

You can find introductions to career-related topics in a variety of reference books. Reference books are great for several reasons: you can quickly learn professional terminology, read short articles about your topic, or find valuable secondary sources (other books or journal articles on topic, or relevant organizations and websites). The following titles are located in the Reference Collection (next to the Research Help Desk). They cannot be checked out, but you can take notes, or make photocopies of relevant pages. If your topic is not covered in the texts listed below, feel free to contact the Research Help Desk to see if there is a reference work that would be helpful to you.

Please find below a list of recommended online journal article databases. They contain (mostly) scholarly journal articles. As a student, you can use these databases from any computer in the world that has Internet access (when off-campus, enter Falcon Account information when prompted). If you need help selecting or searching the databases, please see the Research Help Desk.

ABI/INFORM Global offers the latest business and financial information for researchers at all levels, including information about business conditions, management techniques, business trends, management practice and theory, corporate strategy and tactics, and competitive landscape.

You can find introductions to education-related topics in a variety of reference books. Reference books are great for several reasons: you can quickly learn professional terminology, read short articles about your topic, or find valuable secondary sources (other books or journal articles on topic, or relevant organizations and websites). The following titles are located in the Reference Collection (next to the Research Help Desk). They cannot be checked out, but you can take notes, or make photocopies of relevant pages. If your topic is not covered in the texts listed below, feel free to contact the Research Help Desk to see if there is a reference work that would be helpful to you.

You can search the library's online catalog to retrieve material on your topic, most of which can be checked out. If you need help locating the materials, please contact the Research Help desk in the Library.

The library maintains a substantial collection of educational reference materials, curriculum guides,tests, fiction and nonfiction books for children and young adults as well as selected children’s periodicals. These materials are located on the 2nd floor of the library, unless otherwise noted. Use the the online catalog to locate specific materials in this collection.

Please find below a list of recommended journal databases. They contain (mostly) scholarly journal articles. As a student, you can use these databases from any computer in the world that has Internet access (when off-campus, enter Falcon Account information when prompted). If you need help selecting or searching the databases, please see the Research Help Desk.

Designed for professional educators, provides a highly specialized collection of more than 750 full text journals, including more than 350 peer-reviewed titles. In addition to full text, indexing and abstracts are provided for more than 900 journals. Full text information dates as far back as 1965.

Maintained by ERIC and sponsored by the U.S. Department of Education, this site provides educators with easy access to the collections of educational materials, including lesson plans, found on various federal, state, university, non-profit, and commercial Internet sites.

The National Council on Measurement in Education (NCME) is a professional organization for individuals involved in assessment, evaluation, testing, and other aspects of educational measurement. Members are involved in the construction and use of standardized tests; new forms of assessment, including performance-based assessment; program design; and program evaluation.

When composing an academic research paper, it's necessary to follow the correct citation rules both in your text, and on your work cited/references page. There are several different citation styles: MLA, APA, and Turabian to name a few. Your professor will most likely require a particular one. To view online help sheets, click here. I recommend the link titled "Citation Style for Research Papers (APA, Turabian, MLA, Chicago, AMA)." Paper manuals are also available for most styles; go to the Research Help Desk in the library if you need help locating one.

This database provides extensive indexing of agriculture related journals; it also provides access to conference proceedings, books, pamphlets, federal and state documents, and extension publications.

Equine reproduction topics covered in this site include artificial insemination (A.I.); managing the mare for breeding (including hormonal manipulation and the use of other drugs such as Oxytocin); and some articles relative to foals and foaling.

This publication is designed to help you find materials in the library on the topic of horticulture. If you have any problems locating the resources or using them, please ask a Reference staff member for assistance.

Catalog to locate books in the library. You may search with general subject terms such as gardening, horticulture, plants, vegetable gardening, landscape, etc., or you may choose to conduct precise keyword searches that combine more than one subject.

Provides citations, abstracts, and selected full-text of articles from 3000 magazines and journals in all subject areas. In the area of horticulture, primarily covers popular magazines. The Biological and Agricultural Index and Agricola cover horticulture journals more comprehensively.

Below is a partial list of journals that may be of interest of horticulturists available in the library. Articles in these journals and many others can be located by browsing the paper journals, or by electronic searching via the databases detailed above.

Documents are materials that are printed under the authority of governmental agencies. Our library receives a portion of these publications. The Documents collection contain booklets, reports, and books dealing with horticulture.

Most of these materials are published by the Department of Agriculture and are housed in the A 17 through A 77 area of the Government Documents stacks. Current documents that the library receives can be identified in the Voyager Online Catalog.

AgDB is a database directory of quality agriculture related databases, datasets, and information systems. It describes and links to more than 1,100 information resources. Informative resource descriptions guide users directly to relevant, quality information resources ranging from "technical" to "practical." AgDB is maintained by the National Agriculture Library.

Hosts the directory of land grant universities which are state partners of the Cooperative State Research,Education, and Extension Service. Use for easy access to extension services from all 50 states.

Each issue of CQ Researcher offers in-depth, non-biased coverage of political and social issues, with regular reports on topics in health, international affairs, education, the environment, technology and the U.S. economy.

A full text database of unique and diverse publications that focus on how gender impacts a broad spectrum of subject areas. With its archival material, dating back to 1970 in some cases, GenderWatch is a repository of an important historical perspective on the evolution of the women's movement and the changes in gender roles. Publications include scholarly journals, magazines, newspapers, newsletters, regional publications, books, and NGO, government and special reports.

The Country Studies Services presents a description and analysis of the historical setting and the social, economic, political and national security systems and institutions of countries throughout the world.

An excellent site that received the 2001 Multicultural Media Award. Maintained by the University of Virginia this site has a section for teachers with facts sheets and historic collections on native American history, the Holocaust, Japanese Internment, and Womens history.

NOTE: The library has the 1st and the 3rd through the most current yearbooks. These volumes provide descriptive information, references and critical reviews of commercially published English-language tests.

Journal coverage for most academic areas of study, including full text of many important psychology journals. Features selected full-text for over 4,650 journals,including more than 3,600 peer-reviewed publications; abstracts and indexing for nearly 8,200 scholarly journals with many dating back to 1975; and coverage of major national newspapers.

This database provides nearly 600 scholarly full text journals focusing on many medical disciplines, as well as abstracts and indexing for nearly 650 additional journals. This database is updated on a daily basis.

A bibliographic database that indexes and abstracts articles of at least one column in length from English-language periodicals published in the United States and elsewhere, plus the full text of selected periodicals. Indexing coverage begins in 1983; abstracting coverage begins with periodicals published in January 1994; full text coverage begins in January 1995.

Abstracts and indexes the international literature in sociology and related disciplines in the social and behavioral sciences. The database provides abstracts of journal articles and citations to book reviews drawn from over 1,700 serials publications, and also provides abstracts of books, book chapters, dissertations, and conference papers. Records added after 1974 contain in-depth and non-evaluative abstracts of journal articles.

It fully indexes (no full text) more than 1,725 journals across 50 social sciences disciplines, and it indexes individually selected, relevant items from over 3,300 of the world's leading scientific and technical journals.

This is the official site of the major professional organization of social workers in the United States. It has, among other things, information about the association, publications, continuing educations, and resources for students.

It contains useful Internet resources such as databases, electronic journals, electronic books, bulletin boards, mailing lists, online library card catalogs, articles, directories of researchers, and many other types of information.

A UWRF icon  means you must be a University of Wisconsin-River Falls user to access the resource from off-campus. Members of the public are welcome to use the UW-River Falls Libraries' electronic resources "on-site". All other resources are publicly available on the Internet.

Selected full-text from nearly 930 journals covering business, management, economics, banking, finance, accounting and much more. In addition to the full text, this database offers indexing and abstracts for nearly 1,570 journals. Full text backfiles go back to January of 1990, while indexing and abstract backfiles go back to January of 1984.

The Public Broadcasting Station has developed a rich educational site with many lesson plans that are correlated to educational standards. The plans are searchable by keyword, grade level, subject or topic.

From the Super Search front page, click on " Custom Search." Look on the bar on the left; where it says " Identify database," click arrow and change to "categories." Then, click on " category" arrow and find the category that best fits your topic. Click on it. This will bring up a box with a list of the related databases. Above the search box, click on " Advanced" tab. Put your search terms in the search boxes and hit "Go." It may take a minute or so for the final results to appear. Click on an article title that you are interested in. Scroll down to see if the full-text is available. If it's not, click on the big " Find It" button to see other delivery options.

When searching electronic journal databases, truncation and wildcard symbols allow you to expand your search. This guide is designed to allow you to easily determine the correct truncation and wildcard symbols used in the Library's databases. Please see a Reference Librarian if you need additional help.

Truncation allows a searcher to place a symbol at the end of a term's root. The search will then retrieve all words sharing the same root. For example, a search such as child* will retrieve entries that contain the words child, childhood, children, childlike, etc.

Electronic databases differ in their use of truncation and wildcard symbols, making it time consuming to search their help screens for the correct symbols. This guide is designed to help you quickly and easily determine the correct symbols.

Search engines, like Google, send search bots, also called crawlers, spiders, or robots, out onto the Internet to read websites and return with key information including: important terms, website images, & an analysis of the site’s links. This information is stored in large computer databases and indexed. Your searches are run in these computers rather than out on the Internet. The results are usually ranked to bring the strongest answers to the top.

Librarians' Internet Index (LII), which is  publicly-funded,  has a weekly newsletter. You can also search and browse the website for some of the best reserach sites on the Internet. It has tens of thousands of librarian  maintained entries organized into 14 main topics and nearly 300 related catagories.

INFOMINE  is a virtual library of Internet resources relevant to faculty, students, and research staff at the university level. It contains useful Internet resources such as databases, electronic journals, electronic books, bulletin boards, mailing lists, online library catalogs, articles, directories of researchers, and many other types of information.

Academic Info is a  commercial source designed to “improve access to online educational resources by developing an easy to use subject directory covering each academic discipline”. It sells online advertising and page sponsorship.

The Google Directory indexes about 1.5 million web pages, selected by the Open Directory Project and enhanced by Google searching and ranking. The Open Directory Project is a large public directory managed by Netscape and maintained by a group of volunteer editors from around the world who evaluate sites for inclusion in the directory. The web pages selected by these editors are organized into a number of broad categories under which there are many more specific subcategories. Google uses this hierarchy.

The Yahoo! Directory is a human-created and maintained library of web sites organized into categories and subcategories. Yahoo! editors developed the list's structure and review websites for potential inclusion.

To search for books in the library, I suggest using our Universal Borrowing option. This allows you to simultaneously search several University of Wisconsin campus libraries (including UW-RF). UW-Madison's Steenbock Library has a lot of agricultural material.

You should be able to find a wealth of information on anaerobic digesters in the following agricultural- and science-related databases. These databases provide citations and some abstracts and full-text from scholarly and popular journals. The databases are available at the Library’s web page from any computer that has internet access.  If you need help selecting or searching the databases, please call or stop by the Research Help Desk in the Library .

Tip: if you find a useful journal article, make sure to check its  References page  (or Work Cited  page) for  relevant articles and books. If you need help finding material cited, please call or stop by the Research Help Desk.

Agricola http://www.uwrf.edu/library/db/#a This is an enormous database of agriculture journals, conference proceedings, books, government documents, etc. No full text, but use "Find It" button to: locate any available full-text, search library catalog for journal title availability, or place an interlibrary loan.

Environmental Sciences & Pollution Management http://www.uwrf.edu/library/db/#e Indexes and abstracts more than 4000 journals and thousands of additional sources, including conference proceedings, reports, books and government publications.

The following databases contain mostly newspaper  and trade journal articles. If you're looking for trade publication articles, Proquest had tabs that sort the newspaper articles from the trade journal articles.

Provides comprehensive coverage of major newspapers, including The New York Times, Wall Street Journal and Washington Post, plus other important U.S., international and minority interest papers. Includes trade publications. If results include any trade publications, a "trade publications" tab will appear; click on tab to extract all trade publication results.

There are several ways to find relevant books  in the Chalmer Davee Library using our online catalog. I suggest using our Quick Search, as it is very similar to conducting a Google search. If you need help locating the materials, please contact  the Research Help desk in the Library.

CQ Researcher is noted for its in-depth, unbiased coverage of health, social trends, criminal justice, international affairs, education, the environment, technology, and the economy. Reports are published weekly in print and online 44 times a year by CQ Press, a division of Congressional Quarterly Inc. Each single-themed, 12,000-word report is researched and written by a seasoned journalist. Each issue includes an introductory overview; background and chronology on the topic; an assessment of the current situation; tables and maps; pro/con statements from representatives of opposing positions; and bibliographies of key sources. Reports date back to 1991.  PDF files are available for reports from January 1996; color PDFs are available for reports published after January 2001.

Google is one of the best general internet search engines. Searches execute quickly and return relevant results. The connector AND is implied in searches, so just type in keywords to describe your topic; for example: egypt lesson plans.

You can find introductions to educational psychology-related topics in a variety of reference books. Reference books are great for several reasons: you can quickly learn professional terminology, read short articles about your topic, or find valuable secondary sources (other books or journal articles on topic, or relevant organizations and websites). The following titles are located in the Reference Collection (next to the Research Help Desk). They cannot be checked out, but you can take notes, or make photocopies of relevant pages. If your topic is not covered in the texts listed below, feel free to stop  by the Research Help Desk (or find/contact me!), and we'll see if there is a reference work that would be helpful to you.

You can search the library's online  catalog to retrieve material on your topic, most of which can be checked out. If you need help locating the materials, please go to the Research Help desk in the Library.

When searching by "Advanced Search,"  use AND, OR, NOT to combine the keywords that you are searching for. For example, a search for "patents" AND "trademarks" will only get you items that have both "patents" and "trademarks" anywhere in their catalog descriptions.

GenderWatch. Full-text database that includes articles from over 100 journals and magazines devoted to women’s issues, plus newsletters, regional materials, reports and conference proceedings. Includes some coverage back to the mid-1970’s.

JSTOR. A not-for-profit organization with a dual mission to create and maintain a trusted archive of important scholarly journals, and to provide access to these journals as widely as possible. Because of JSTOR's archival mission, there is a gap, typically from 1 to 5 years, between the most recently published journal issue and the available back issues.

Project Muse. A unique collaboration between libraries and publishers providing 100% full-text, affordable and user-friendly online access to over 300 high quality humanities, arts, and social sciences journals from 60 scholarly publishers.

Sociological Abstracts.  1963-present. Provides access to the worldwide findings in theoretical and applied sociology, social science, and policy science. Features journal citations and abstracts; book, chapter, and association paper abstracts; and book, film, and software review citations.

To search multiple databases grouped around one main topic, chose "Custom Search" from the Super Search front page tool bar. Look at the bar on the left; where it says " Identify database," and "Catagory", click on the "category" arrow and find the category that best fits your topic. Click on it. This will bring up a box with a list of the related databases. Above the search box, click on " Advanced" tab. Put your search terms in the search boxes and hit "Go." It may take a minute or so for the final results to appear. Click on an article title that you are interested in. Scroll down to see if the full-text is available. If it's not, click on the big " Find It" button to see other delivery options.

INFOMINE.   Maintained by a group of university librarians from arround the U.S., it is a virtual library of Internet resources relevant to faculty, students, and research staff at the university level. It contains useful Internet resources such as databases, electronic journals, electronic books, bulletin boards, mailing lists, online library card catalogs, articles, directories of researchers, and many other types of information.

When searching by "Advanced Keyword," you have to use a Boolean Operator. A Boolean Operator just means that you have to use AND, OR, NOT to combine the keywords that you are searching for. For example, an advanced keyword search for cats AND dogs will get you item that have both cats and dogs anywhere in the item's record.

Academic Search Premier – Academic Search Premier provides full text for more than 2,000 serials, including more than 1,500 peer-reviewed journals. In addition to the full text, indexing and abstracts are provided for all 3,466 journals in the collection. This database offers information in nearly every area of academic study including: computer sciences, engineering, physics, chemistry, language and linguistics, arts & literature, medical sciences, ethnic studies and more. Full text information in this database dates as far back as 1985.

CQ Researcher – CQ Researcher offers in-depth reports on topics in health, social trends, criminal justice, international affairs, education, the environment, technology and the economy. Each single themed, 12,000 word report is researched and written by a seasoned journalist. The consistent, reader-friendly organization provides researchers with an introductory overview; background and chronology on the topic; an assessment of the current situation; tables and maps; pro/con statements from representatives of opposing positions; and bibliographies of key sources. CQ Researcher offers access to CQ Researcher reports dating back to 1991. PDF files are available for reports from January 1996; color PDFs are available for reports published after January 2001.

SuperSearch is a search tool that combines several different journal databases with the Library's catalog. For example, a Quick Search using General Resources will combine the Library’s catalog with Academic Search Premier. So when you do a Quick Search, you are searching 2 separate databases at one time instead of searching the databases individually. Furthermore, if you do a Custom Search, you can combine various databases together that cover history, criminal justice, biology, and agriculture (just to name a few). With SuperSearch, you can even customize your search to combine your own personalized set of journal databases. For assistance with this feature or if you have any questions on how to use SuperSearch, ask at the Research Help Desk or call ext. 3343.

INFOMINE – INFOMINE is a virtual library of Internet resources relevant to faculty, students, and research staff at the university level. It contains useful Internet resources such as databases, electronic journals, electronic books, bulletin boards, mailing lists, online library card catalogs, articles, directories of researchers, and many other types of information. INFOMINE is created and managed by librarians from the University of California, Wake Forest University, California State University, the University of Detroit-Mercy and other places. The librarians at these institutions have searched the Internet for scholarly materials that are viewed as useful for university level students and faculty.

The Federal Trade Commission was created in 1914 with the purpose of preventing unfair methods of competition in commerce. The FTC oversees the Bureau of Consumer Protection, protecting consumers against unfair, deceptive or fraudulent practices. Additionally, the FTC oversees issues related to consumer privacy, credit reporting, identity theft, and information security. The FTC has a page on ratings in the entertainment industry. This site also has links to resources and reports such as the 2000 report Marketing violent entertainment to children: A review of self-regulation and industry practices in the motion picture, music recording and electronic game industries.

United States Department of the Interior (DOI) - The United States Department of the Interior  is the nation's principal conservation agency. Their mission is to protect America's treasures for future generations, provide access to our nation's natural and cultural heritage, offer recreation opportunities, honor our trust responsibilities to American Indians and Alaska Natives and our responsibilities to island communities, conduct scientific research, provide wise stewardship of energy and mineral resources, foster sound use of land and water resources, and conserve and protect fish and wildlife. The DOI includes a variety of agencies such as the Bureau of Land Management (BLM), an agency of the U.S. Department of the Interior, that is responsible for carrying out a variety of programs for the management and conservation, of resources on 258 million surface acres, as well as 700 million acres of subsurface mineral estate and the National Park Service, which cares for national parks, a network of nearly 400 natural, cultural and recreational sites across the nation.

The library has a helpful table that shows the differences between a scholarly journal, a trade publication or a popular magazine. If you need more help, stop by the Research Help Desk and talk to a librarian.

UC Berkeley has a wonderful page designed to help you evaluate web pages. It is called: Evaluating Web Pages: Techniques to Apply & Questions to Ask. If you need more help or information, stop by the Research Help Desk and talk to a librarian.

Searching electronic databases maybe something new for you. Even if you have some experience, I thought I'd offer a few tips that I hope will make your searches more successful. You can use these tips in all the databases listed above.

Google Scholar is a special version of Google specially designed for searching scholarly literature. It covers peer-reviewed papers, theses, books, preprints, abstracts and technical reports from all broad areas of research. Some articles are free, others are not.  For those that are not free at Google Scholar, UWRF may subscribe to some of these articles. You can see if we have the full text online, or order them them for free, by using our Find It software. Please contact the Research Help Desk if you need help with this.

This is a list of keywords that relate to the topics found in the book Fast Food Nation.  It is by no means a comprehensive list, but it will help you to find a topic or area that you are interested in researching and will assist you in searching for library materials.  The keywords listed are not mandatory topics – you do not have to pick a topic from the list.  The bibliography and footnotes/endnotes in your book is another good place to find topics or keywords to help you search for additional materials.

Since the library is a Government Repository, both the Federal Governement and the State of Wisconsin provide the library with reports, hearings, regulations, etc. from a variety of governmental agencies like the Department of Agriculture, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Labor, the Senate, the House of Representitives, the Supreme Court, the President, the Wisconsin Governors' office, the Wisconsin Legislature, and more. These items are located in the Government Documents section of the library. Within the collection are 2 reference sections (Government Documents Federal Reference or Government Documents Reference). Here are some of the documents in the reference sections. Please ask for assistance if you need help in locating these materials or any other government documents.

WorldCat is a database that is similar to the Library’s catalog and is another place to search for books, videos, DVDs, CDs, maps, government documents, and more.  WorldCat, however, doesn’t just cover the items found in our Library, but it shows items found in libraries across the United States.  Coverage goes back to 1000 B.C. and allows one to search for items in over 400 different languages.  There are about 1 billion items found in this database.  The Library can order materials for you from any library in the United States through our Interlibrary Loan service.

BadgerCat is a new database that is similar to WorldCat, but this database provides the ability to specifically search the collections of nearly 500 Wisconsin libraries. You can search for books, videos, DVDs, CDs, maps, government documents and more, and you can limit your search to Wisconsin libraries or the University of Wisconsin libraries.

Academic Search Premier – A great general journal database, Academic Search Premier provides full text for more than 2,000 serials, including more than 1,500 peer-reviewed journals. In addition to the full text, indexing and abstracts are provided for all 3,466 journals in the collection. This database offers information in nearly every area of academic study including: computer sciences, engineering, physics, chemistry, language and linguistics, arts & literature, medical sciences, ethnic studies and more. Full text information in this database dates as far back as 1985.

CQ Researcher - CQ Researcher offers in-depth reports on topics in health, social trends, criminal justice, international affairs, education, the environment, technology and the economy. Each single themed, 12,000 word report is researched and written by a seasoned journalist. The consistent, reader-friendly organization provides researchers with an introductory overview; background and chronology on the topic; an assessment of the current situation; tables and maps; pro/con statements from representatives of opposing positions; and bibliographies of key sources. CQ Researcher offers access to CQ Researcher reports dating back to 1991. PDF files are available for reports from January 1996; color PDFs are available for reports published after January 2001.

Health Source Nursing/Academic Edition – Health Source Nursing/Academic Edition provides more than 550 scholarly full text journals including nearly 450 peer-reviewed journals focusing on many medical disciplines. Also featured are abstracts and indexing for nearly 850 journals. Coverage of nursing and allied health is particularly strong.  Full text information in this database dates as far back as 1975.

United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) – The home page for the United States Department of Agriculture offers a variety of information on not only farming and agriculture, but the page also covers such topics as food safety, food distribution, food labeling and packaging, food recalls, food security, food quality, and food technology.

Food Safety and Inspection Service (FSIS) – The Food Safety and Inspection Service is the public health agency in the U.S. Department of Agriculture responsible for ensuring that the nation's commercial supply of meat, poultry, and egg products is safe, wholesome, and correctly labeled and packaged.  You can find information here on food safety, food recalls, food security and more.

Food and Drug Administration (FDA) – The Food and Drug Administration oversees the safety, labeling, and effectiveness of items such as food, drugs and vaccines, blood, medical devices, transplanted tissues, equipment that uses radiant energy (x-rays and microwave ovens) and cosmetics.  The FDA is responsible for assuring the safety of 80 percent of the U.S. food supply and annually monitors 4 million food import entries into the United States.

United States Department of Labor (DOL) – The Department of Labor fosters and promotes the welfare of the job seekers, wage earners, and retirees of the United States by improving their working conditions, advancing their opportunities for profitable employment, protecting their retirement and health care benefits, helping employers find workers, strengthening free collective bargaining, and tracking changes in employment, prices, and other national economic measurements. In carrying out this mission, the Department administers a variety of Federal labor laws including those that guarantee workers’ rights to safe and healthful working conditions; a minimum hourly wage and overtime pay; freedom from employment discrimination; unemployment insurance; and other income support.

There is more to research than Google or Yahoo. These are great tools but they not search everything! Google and Yahoo do not in most cases search within proprietary databases and the full text content within them. The owner's of these proprietary databases do not permit outside search engines crawl and index within them. These database owner wants to SELL their content. The library purchases licenses to a number of specialized databases for your use. Squeeze every dollar out of your tuition and try them.

Google and Yahoo are easy to use, but what are the implications  of only searching them? The library buys software that can perform simple searches in many, but not all, proprietary databases at once. Supersearch  is a good place to start, but for in-depth searches try individual databases.

Publications, formerly the Monthly Catalog of U.S. Government Publications, indexes print and electronic Government information products created by Federal agencies. The Catalog's data set contains authoritative bibliographic records generated since 1976 and is updated monthly.

Here is a list of online journal databases that will help you find the professional journal articles you need for your project. If you need help choose or using any of them, please contact me (715/425-3343; anne.tuveson@uwrf.edu) or contact the Research Help Desk at the same phone number.

Here is a list of online journal databases that will help you find the articles you need. If you are using them from off-campus, you will be prompted to enter your Falcon Account "W Number" and password.

Full text for more than 4,500 journals, including full text to more than more than 3,600 peer-reviewed titles. This multi-disciplinary database covers virtually every area of academic study. PDF backfiles to 1975 or further are available for well over one hundred journals, and searchable cited references are provided for 1,000 titles. This database is updated on a daily basis.

A database that cites articles from English-language periodicals, plus the full text of selected periodicals. Periodical coverage includes some of the best-known scholarly journals and numerous lesser-known but important specialized magazines. Full-text coverage begins in January 1995.

Indexes and abstracts articles of at least one column in length from English-language periodicals published in the United States and Great Britain plus the full text of selected periodicals. Periodical coverage includes popular science magazines as well as professional journals. Also covers The New York Times Science Section (published weekly on Tuesday). Abstracting coverage begins with periodicals published in March 1993. Abstracts range from 50 to 300 words and describe the content and scope of the source articles. Full text coverage begins in January 1995.

Here is a list of online journal databases that will help you find the eight articles you need for sharing and for your literature review. If you need help choose or using any of them, please contact me (715/425-3343; anne.tuveson@uwrf.edu) or contact the Research Help Desk at the same phone number.

Here is a list of online journal databases that will help you find the  articles you need. If you are using them from off-campus, you will be prompted to enter your Falcon Account "W Number" and password.

TIP: Use truncation when using terms that have multiple endings, such as "children" (child, childhood, childlike, etc.). Truncation allows you to search all forms of a word with one search by chopping off the word at its base (usually...) and then adding a question mark. This is a great way to expand your search. In the example below, "homeless?" tells the computer to search for records with the terms homeless and homelessness; "child?" tells the computer to search for records with the terms child, children, childhood, childlike; "educat?" tells the computer to search for records with the terms educate, education, educated, etc.

After entering search terms, click on the Search button. Notice results are in date order. Your next job is to look through the results (though 1998) and seek out those that look relevant to your research. See the Research Help Desk if you need help doing this.

What does "peer reviewed" mean? It is a designation given to an article that has passed the scrutiny of reviewers who are experts in the field or on the research topic of the article. It's like the academic "stamp of approval."

Provides bibliographic coverage of current research focused on social work, human services, and related areas, including social welfare, social policy, and community development. The database abstracts and indexes (no full text) over 1,500 serials publications and includes abstracts of journal articles and dissertations, and citations to book reviews. Although it does not contain full-text, we do have "Find It" software that will tell you if there is any full text available in ANY of the databases we own, or in our paper collection. I will demonstrate this in class.

A multidisciplinary index to the journal literature of the social sciences, covering 1956-present. It fully indexes (no full text) more than 1,725 journals across 50 social sciences disciplines, and it indexes individually selected, relevant items from over 3,300 of the world's leading scientific and technical journals.

When composing an academic research paper, it is necessary to follow the correct citation rules both in your text, and on your work cited/references page. There are several different citation styles: MLA, APA, and Turabian to name a few. Your professor will most likely require a particular one. For this class, you must use the APA style. Here is a link that will help you cite your sources using APA style. Paper manuals are also available at the Research Help Desk in the Library; please go there if you need help.

There are several ways to find relevant books  in the Chalmer Davee Library. The two you may find most useful are: (1) search the library's entire collection using our online catalog, (2) search only the Curriculum Materials Center.

You can also search the catalogs of other libraries in the UW system. Look for the button marked "Universal Borrowing from Other UW Campuses." When you click on this button, you will have the option to search one or all of the other UW campuses. You search for materials just like you would search our UWRF catalog. Additionally, you can borrow materials from any UW campus by clicking on "Place Request" and entering the 16 digit number on the bottom of your ID card. Moreover, you don't have to drive to the other campuses to retrieve the materials. The library has a courier service where materials are sent to us from the other campuses - all you have to do is place a request.

BadgerCat is a subset of WorldCat that provides the ability to specifically search the collections of nearly 500 Wisconsin libraries, plus the Academic and Research Libraries of the Twin Cities. You can search for books, videos, DVDs, CDs, maps, government documents and more, and you can limit your search to Wisconsin libraries, the Twin Cities, or just the University of Wisconsin libraries.

Journal Databases  - The following databases are just a sample of the variety of journal databases that the Library has to offer. For a complete list, please click on "Journal Articles" on the Library's homepage to view the various databases.

When you are searching the various journal databases, look for the FIND IT button  or the SFX button . These buttons will assist you in determining whether or not the library owns or has access to a specific journal title. It will tell you if the library has online full text access to a specific title or it will tell you if the library owns the title in print (located in the journal stacks). If the library does not own or have access to a title, you can order a full text copy of the article through our Interlibrary loan service. Look for the section marked "ILL" and "Request via Interlibrary Loan" to order a copy.

Additionally, if you would like to limit your search to only peer-reviewed journals, look for an option or limiter marked "Scholarly (Peer Reviewed) Journals." If you click on the box next to this option, your search will be limited to only those journals that are peer-reviewed.

Check out the links on the Library's Citation, Style and Writing Guide page to find helpful citation guides like the Research and Documentation Online by Diana Hacker or a link to the APA Style page for citing electronic resources. You can also stop by the Research Help Desk to see the 5th edition of the APA Publication Manual.

The Library has a helpful table that shows the differences between a scholarly journal, a trade publication or a popular magazine. If you need more assistance, stop by the Research Help Desk and talk to a librarian.

If you are off-campus, you can use our Universal Borrowing function to request books that are in the UW system. The books are then mailed to  the UW campus nearest you, where you can pick them up. For more information about Universal Borrowing, click here.

Our Library also houses The Chancellor's Leadership Collection. This is a collection of books designed to motivate and education those interested in leadership. Check it out! Click here to browse materials in the collection. This collection is also a part of our online catalog, as well.

We all love Google, but there is a better place to conduct scholarly research. Most libraries pay lots of money to subscribe to magazine and newspaper databases. These are huge collections of electronic magazine articles that you can search using a topic or keyword. Sometimes this is called the "hidden web" because it's on the web, but you can't access it through search engines such as Google or Yahoo--you have to access them through (usually) library web pages. If you are using them from off-campus, you will be prompted to enter your Falcon Account "W number" and password.

Google U.S. Government Search offers a single location for   searching across U.S. government information, and for keeping up to date on   government news. You can choose to search for content located on either U.S.   federal, state and local government web sites or the entire Web -- from the same   search box. Below the search box, the homepage includes government-specific news   content from both government agencies and press outlets.

Instead of relying on your favorite internet search engine (e.g., Google or Yahoo), try using an internet gateway. These are collections of pre-selected web sites plus a search interface. A great place to go for scholarly web sites. Here is a list of our favorites: Web search tools. My favorites are Infomine and the Librarians' Internet Index.

The assumption behind related record searching is that articles whose reference lists include some of the same sources have a subject relationship, regardless of whether their titles, abstracts, or keywords contain the same terms. The more cited references two articles have in common, the closer this subject relationship is. Related Records are sorted from most relevant to least relevant.

This is a different and complementary approach to literature searching. Traditional index searching, which is based on keywords and author names, by contrast looks backwards in the literature from the present time.

For example, if you have an excellent paper on a particular topic that was published in 1992, you can use Web of Science to find papers published after 1992 that cited that paper. Citation implies a direct subject relationship between the papers. So, you can find more papers on the same or similar topic without using keywords or subject terms at all.

UW-River Falls Faculty, Staff, and Students: The Reference staff can find addresses, facts, or statistics, answer questions about materials in our collections, and give suggestions for materials and subject headings you might try for a particular topic.

UW-River Falls faculty and staff may arrange to have an individual consultation with a reference librarian in their office to address unique research needs or get assistance selecting and searching electronic resources.   "Librarians to Go" is available Monday through Friday from 8:00 a.m. to 4:00 p.m.

Reference librarians meet frequently with classes to introduce students to library research. The main goal of the program is to provide instruction in developing and applying library research strategies, including the use of basic or specialized research tools in print and non-print formats. Sessions focus on the online catalog, print resources, online indexes and full-text databases, and the Internet.

You may check out books, most government documents, cassettes, compact discs, records, videorecordings, and DVDs. Reference materials and periodicals must be used in the library. The checkout period for most materials is 28 days. When faculty place materials on reserve, those materials will be available for limited use, usually for 2 hours or overnight.

If the item cannot be located or requested in steps one and two, then place an interlibrary loan request for the item. Library staff will locate and request the item for you. You will be notified via email when items arrive.

The center does not have a research fee at this time. Donations to the center are always appreciated and can be sent directly to the River Falls Area Research Center or made through the University Foundation. Small fees do apply to printing and photocopying.

Image duplication must not violate donor agreements or copyright laws nor may duplicated images be used for commercial purposes. The researcher assumes full responsibility for conforming with laws of libel, privacy, and copyright which may be involved in his/her use of photographs as well as manuscripts and all other records. Read Copyright & Use Statement.

University Archives is open to the university community as well as the general public. An archives staff member is always present to aid you with your research free of charge during public hours. Appointments are unnecessary.

The archives staff will do limited research for patrons who are unable to visit the center. Please visit the UW-River Falls Area Research Center and University Archives Collections pages before completing a request form to ensure that the center houses records that correspond to your request. To request research please fill out a request form. Be very specific  with the information you provide on the form for better and faster results.

To check out circulating materials you will need to have a valid University I.D. or Community Borrower Card. Community users may purchase a card for a $20 annual fee. The checkout period for most materials is 28 days for students and community users.  The checkout period for most materials for faculty and staff is one semester. You may check out books, government documents, cassettes, compact discs, records, and videorecordings. Reference materials and periodicals must be used in the library.

A valid University I.D. is also required to use reserve materials. When faculty place materials on reserve, those materials will be available for limited use, usually for 2 hours or overnight. Faculty are asked to send materials to the Circulation/Reserve Desk at least two weeks before they are to be used by students.

Generally classes are held in the Library Instruction classroom (Room 331). Instructors are required to accompany classes to maximize the session's effectiveness, and are asked to provide librarians with a copy of class assignments or research topics ahead of time.

We provide tours and instructional sessions for groups of college-bound students from area schools. Please contact the library at least two weeks before arriving on campus and describe the grade, the size of the class, and the time the students will need in the library. If formal instruction is preferred, please provide information about the group's specific research assignments. Priority is given to campus classes, so it is advisable to plan such visits for the second half of the academic semester. Please ask about borrowing privileges ahead of time. Local teachers who bring their class to the library may check out material for the students in their class. The instructor must have a valid Community Borrower's Card. They must also accept full responsibility for any charges imposed due to late returns, loss or damage to any item charged to the card. To schedule a visit contact Brad Gee (715-425-3312).

Working cooperatively with Disability Services to provide textbooks for taping and for sign language interpreters, and in obtaining large print reproductions.  These arrangements shall conform to Textbook Services Policies.

Please submit this form to give us advance description of those assignments that will bring your students to the library.  With firsthand knowledge of your assignments, we will be better prepared to 1) identify available resources 2) anticipate increases in demand for certain materials and provide security for essential items 3) direct students to resources more effectively 4) assess the collection's needs for new titles and multiple copies, and 5) refer to a copy of the assigment when clarification of requirements is needed.

A UWRF icon  means you must be a University of Wisconsin-River Falls user to access the resource from off-campus. Members of the public are welcome to use the UW-River Falls Libraries' electronic resources "on-site". All other resources are publicly available on the Internet.

The Chalmer Davee Library continues a 130 year old tradition of supporting academic excellence at the University of Wisconsin - River Falls.  Maintaining the level of excellence expected in our academic community is an ongoing challenge for the library.  As costs increase, the library has sought to supplement university support by establishing the Chalmer Davee Library Endowment Fund.

The Chalmer Davee Library Endowment Fund Committee administers the fund while the UW-River Falls Foundation, a tax-exempt charitable agency, manages accounting and investing of the endowment.  Emphasis is placed on principle safety and long-term income, and earnings are used for the fund's purposes or returned to the principal.

E-Reserves is an on-line Web based service designed to enhance access to Reserve materials by providing access to some of the items on Reserve and by eliminating access constraints of time and place. It offers Reserve materials over the Internet as an extension of the Chalmer Davee Library traditional hard copy Reserve Service.

E-Reserve course related materials can be found using the traditional online Course Reserve search system.  Meanwhile most materials on E-Reserves will continue to be available in hard copy at the Library Reserve Desk.

Library Program the library serves the federal government information needs of the students, staff and faculty of the University of Wisconsin- River Falls, the 3rd Congressional District of Wisconsin, residents of Wisconsin and the surrounding St.

EIS: Digests of Enviromental Impact Statements    Extracts  key issues from federal government environmental impact statements (EIS), converting these documents into concise abstracts. Each entry includes a clear description of the project, sections on positive impact and negative consequences, and legal mandates. This database covers EIS from 1985 on.

Historical Statistics of the United States Millennial Edition Online  provides access to access data on social, behavioral, humanistic, and natural sciences including history, economics, government, finance, sociology, demography, education, law, natural resources, climate, religion, international migration, and trade - quantitative facts of American History.

Homeland Security Digital Library (HSDL) is the nation's premier repository of policy related documents on homeland security. It is organized to support local, state and federal decision-making and analysis and structured to assist scholars and academics in homeland security research.

Academic is the Web based version of the LexisNexis database tailored for academic use which covers over 5,000 publications. The service covers news, legal research, medical, business, reference and a complete content list is available that includes the dates of coverage.

Gray literature is foreign or domestic open source material that usually is available through specialized channels and may not enter usual systems of publication, distribution, bibliographic control, or acquisition by booksellers or subscription agents, or agencies.

Cornell University. Contains nearly 300 reports and data sets from the economics agencies of the U.S. Department of Agriculture. These materials cover U.S. and international agriculture and related topics. Most reports are text files that contain time sensitive information. Most data sets are in spreadsheet format and include time series data that are updated yearly.

Memory: Historical Collection for the National Digital Library, Library of Congress American Memory Collections are multimedia collections of digitized documents, photographs, recorded sound, moving pictures, and text from the Library's Americana collections.

Book is published eight times per year by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve. Each Federal Reserve Bank gathers anecdotal information on current economic conditions in its District through reports from Bank and Branch directors and interviews with key businessmen, economists, market experts, and other sources.

EIS: Digests of Environmental Impact Statements  extracts the key issues from federal government-released environmental impact statements (EIS), converting these documents into concise abstracts. Each entry includes a clear description of the project, sections on positive impact and negative consequences, and legal mandates. This database covers EIS from 1985 on.

Bridge (DOE) provides the open source to full-text and bibliographic records of Department of Energy (DOE)  research and development reports in physics, chemistry, materials, biology, environmental sciences, energy technologies, engineering, computer and information science, renewable energy, and other topics. The Information Bridge consists of full-text documents produced and made available by the Department of Energy National Laboratories and grantees from 1995 forward.

TESS is intended to provide the general public the means to search and retrieve trademark application and registration information via an Internet browser. TESS provides access to the same text and image database of trademarks as currently provided to examining attorneys at the US Patent and Trademark Office via the X-Search system.

Agenda, also known as the Semi-Annual Regulatory Agenda, summarizes pending regulatory actions by Federal agencies. The database is updated semi-annually (usually April and October) when the Unified Agenda is published in the Federal Register.

The international film collection is housed in the Chalmer Davee Library at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls. The collection was established with a grant form the University of Wisconsin System Institute for Global Studies in order to promote the study of international issues and cultures through the medium of film.

Wisconsin-River Falls, and to the students and faculty of the University of Wisconsin System through interlibrary loan. If you are faculty or a student in the UW-System, you can order the films through the interlibrary loan office at your campus library.

The library retains the right to refuse materials that do not meet the library's selection criteria or have processing costs that exceed their worth. The library maintains unconditional ownership of donations and makes the final decision as to their disposition. The library reserves the right to decide the conditions of display, location and means of access to the gift materials. Items not added to the collection are offered to other libraries, sold at library book sales, or are treated as weeded items. Donors may request that the library return materials the library does not utilize. Delivery of gifts is the responsibility of the donor.

Room 328 is equipped with a computer and projection equipment.  Available on the computer are a web browser, Microsoft Office 2000, and various course application programs.  The room may be used by students who need to do group work on a computer or by an individual student or group of students who need to practice a presentation using the computer projection equipment.  The room can be reserved for two-hour time slots at the Circulation/Reserve Desk.  Students must present a University I.D. card to check out the key to the room.

The library offers the Online Search Service on an equal access basis to students, faculty, and staff in the UW-RF community. The purpose of this service is to provide access to fee-based library resources not available on the Library's Web Page. One example is Food Science and Technology Abstracts, a database that is searched through the DIALOG Information Service. The Online Search Service may also be a way to obtain bibliographic information on older materials, as many online back files begin in the mid-1970's or later.

Most users are not charged for their online search, but there are several instances when charges will be incurred such as; abstract prints, full text prints and comprehensive searches. The cost of an online search is based on the combination of the connect rate and a print citation royalty. Charges vary depending on the database.

Not all citations retrieved in an online search will be available in the Chalmer Davee Library, but the Interlibrary Loan Service may be used to obtain such publications. The Interlibrary Loan Service and the Online Search Service are available only to students, staff and faculty of the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

I also understand the UW-RF and its employees are providing a service of an advisory nature with no expressed or implied warranty for results and assume no obligation or liability for damage arising out of the use, or inability	to use, the information resulting from this search.

BOOKS - Reserve staff will retrieve books from the circulating collection for you. Complete the form, supplying the location, author, title and call number. If a particular edition is needed, note the number after the title. Reference books may not be placed on reserve. The library will assign call numbers and place labels on personal books.

EXAMS and other course-related material - You may submit an electronic or paper copy of these materials. All faculty-produced course related material will be placed on electronic reserve; one paper copy will be made available for 2-hr. in library use only.

It is the faculty member's responsibility to determine whether the use made of a work in any particular case is fair use and in compliance with the law. Please contact Valerie Malzacher (425-3552 or valerie.i.malzacher@uwrf.edu) with questions about copyright.

Designate a pickup library.  Home library default (UW-RF) is supplied.  Click on the arrow to see other options. You may arrange to order material from one library to be delivered to a library other than UW-River Falls.

Click on the "My Library Account" button and log in with your university ID number and last name. If an item cannot be supplied by the lending library, this is where you will receive that notice. Other notice of non-availability will not be provided.   If not supplied you may start another UB request to other owning UB libraries.  If not owned by any other UB library, please submit an Interlibrary Loan request.

Picking up MaterialWhen your requested material is available to be picked up, you will receive a notice via an email sent to your campus email address.   Be prompt in picking up items, as they are retained only 7 DAYS at the library's Circulation Desk.

In fall 2002, Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT) Libraries and the Hewlett-Packard Company launched DSpace™, an open source digital repository software system. Designed to capture, store, index, preserve and redistribute scholarly research material in digital formats, DSpace™ and institutional repositories have revolutionized how scholars and researchers think about publication and scholarship. Institutional repositories have also sparked a debate as to the production, distribution and interchange of scholarly communication in a digital age. In response to these discussions, in 2003, the University of Wisconsin-Madison Libraries and the Division of Information Technology (DoIT) in conjunction with participants drawn from the campus community began a project to evaluate the need for a digital institutional repository service. The result of this project was the creation of MINDS@UW, a DSpace™ collection for the colleges and universities in the University of Wisconsin system.

MINDS@UW is intended to provide a “safe haven” for published and unpublished electronic content of any discipline. Content may include research papers, pre-prints, teaching materials, datasets, photographs, videos, learning objects, theses, student projects, posters, conference papers, or other intellectual property in digital form. These items are indexed and described using Dublin Core Metadata standards and are then distributed through a searchable web interface. The project is organized into five levels: the community, the sub-community, the collections, the items, and the bitstreams. The community acts as the host organization and is responsible for overseeing the project and governing the policies and procedures for the sub-communities and collections. The sub-communities can consist of individual departments, research units or offices within the community’s organization. The collections are groups or sets of individual items that share a common theme, such as Master’s theses or Dissertations, Department newsletters or reports, etc. The items consist of the individual papers, reports, and etc. that make up the collection. Finally, the bitstreams are the individual files (pdf files, doc files, power point slides, jpg files) that make up the digital content of the item.

A university-based institutional repository is a set of services that a university offers to the members of its community for the management and dissemination of digital materials created by the institution and its community members. It is most essentially an organizational commitment to the stewardship of these digital materials, including long-term preservation where appropriate, as well as organization and access or distribution.

Libraries have a long tradition of being the storehouses and providers of information and Chalmer Davee Library is no exception. The Library prides itself on providing everyone with current, relevant information and research. Currently, however, there is a wealth of scholarly research and information that is lost or hidden from view. This information appears in electronic format or exists only on the computers of the University's students, staff and faculty. The information is comprised of a variety of formats and topics from power point presentations at a regional conference to research posters or senior research papers or scholarly articles posted on a department's web page and more. The Library's Institutional Repository is designed to fill the void by providing one place to gather the intellectual output of the University. In this manner, the Library can provide the students, staff and faculty and the world with new information and research that is being conducted here at our University.

Posting research papers, theses, posters, or any other work in the University of Wisconsin-River Falls' Institutional Repository (MINDS@UW project) does not mean that you give up your copyright. Authors who submit work to the project retain the copyright, unless they explicitly give it away to a third party. Chalmer Davee Library seeks permission from all authors of a given work before making the item available in the Institutional Repository by sending the author(s) a non-exclusive grant of permissions form. This form asks the author for permission to digitize and distribute the author’s work for nonprofit, educational purposes via the Internet or successive technologies. Authors have the right to refuse inclusion of a work in the repository. The Library retains all copyright permission forms. Additionally, attached to the item in the repository is a Creative Commons License  which warns the viewer of the copyright rights of the author in that the viewer cannot copy, alter, transform, or build upon the work nor can the viewer use the work for commercial purposes.

Authors may be concerned that depositing their work in the repository might violate copyright agreements that they have with a commercial publisher. While some publishers deny the rights of authors to post articles on personal pages or non-commercial web sites, there are some who allow authors to post articles online. Visit the SHERPA site at http://www.sherpa.ac.uk/romeo.php to find out if your publisher allows articles to be posted online.

The following provides information for faculty, staff and students who wish to submit an item for inclusion in the MINDS@UW project. For those interested parties, please read the following in addition to the Introductory Letters and Grant of Permissions Form.

Chalmer Davee Library at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls is a nonprofit institution of higher education and is responsible, in part, for the collection and preservation of digitial resources of interest. The University, on behalf of the University of Wisconsin Board of Regents, respectfully requests permission to digitize your work(s) for Internet distribution in image and text formats for an unlimited term. Digitized versions will be made available via the Internet, for on-line and off-line educational use, with a copyright statement identifying your rights as copyright holder and the terms of the grant of permissions.

Please review the following introductory letter and the grant of permissions form. Please complete the grant of permissions form, then use your browser to print it for a physical signature and return the form to Heidi Southworth, 245 Chalmer Davee Library or drop the permission form off at the Circulation Desk in the Library. If you wish to include more than one work in the repository, please fill out one grant of permissions form and include all the titles and the original place and year that the items were submitted to or presented at. Moreover, if you wish for your work(s) to be included in the repository, the Library will need an electronic copy of your work(s) (PDF, Power Point, Word or other file) sent to Heidi Southworth at heidi.southworth@uwrf.edu.  All electronic copies will be converted to PDF format to ensure that the original composition will be retained, thus allowing no one to alter or change a person's work.

The Library asks permission of all people, whether faculty, staff, or student, who participated in the creation of work. If the Library does not receive permission from all parties involved, the work will not be included in the repository. Additionally, any individual involved in a work's creation has the right to deny or limit the inclusion of a work in the repository.  If you or any one else does not wish to include a work in the repository, please fill out the name and title of the work and return the grant of permission form unsigned with the words "Permission Denied" typed in the signature area.

After room assignments are made, you will receive a letter letting you know of your room assignment. This letter also includes your roommate contact information. It would be best to contact your roommate in order to find out a bit about each other and determine who is going to bring what.Take a look at our last minute checklist of items to bring, and what not to bring!For any computer, television, or phone support questions contact FredNet. FredNet also has a store for cables and other accessories you may need and forgot to bring with you.To give yourself more space in your room on campus, consider renting a loft.If you plan on bringing a car to campus, Public Safety and Parking Office has the parking rules and regulations.

Welcome to the University of Wisconsin-River Falls! The following is what happens regarding Student Services and Programs when you are accepted to the University for the Spring term. If your first term will be Fall, J-Term, or Summer, things happen a little differently.Starting the previous November and soon after you are admitted to UWRF, you will receive through the mail a brochure that tells you about housing opportunities on campus and lets you know how to sign a housing contract. Signing a contract is an online process.

If you would like to live on campus (and we hope you do!), go online to sign the housing contract and pay the housing deposit. The sooner you do this the better since your room assignment is based on the received date of the contract and deposit. You can also give us your vaccination datesat the same time.If you decide not to live on campus, make sure you meet the exemption requirements.If you would like to commute and you meet the requirements for commuting, you will need to complete a commuter application. This can be done online.If you will be living on campus, you can tell us your housing preferences. You can also request a roommate. These services start during the preceding November time frame and end when the actual room assignments are made in January.Part of university life is to broaden your experience and one way to do this is to be a member of a student organization. You can tell us which organizations interest you at the same time you tell us your housing preferences.If you would like to participate in one of our meal plans, tell us which meal plan you would like to be on. Freshmen and sophomores living in the residence halls are required to participate in a meal plan; many others find our meal plans valuable and participate in them.

After room assignments are made in January, you will receive a letter letting you know of your room assignment. This letter also includes your roommate contact information. It would be best to contact your roommate in order to find out a bit about each other and determine who is going to bring what. If you didn't get your preferred side of campus or requested roommate, it was because when housing assignments were made in the order that the housing contract and deposit were received, and your preferred areas were already filled before your assignment.Take a look at our last minute checklist of items to bring, and what not to bring!For any computer, television, or phone support questions contact FredNet. FredNet also has a store for cables and other accessories you may need and forgot to bring with you.To give yourself more space in your room on campus, consider renting a loft.If you plan on bringing a car to campus, Public Safety and Parking Office has the parking rules and regulations.

Summer housing is billed at a weekly rate; Summer 2007 rates are $112/week for a single room and $85/week per person in a double room. Work through the Residence Life Office in paying for your summer housing.If you are a UWRF student taking summer classes, summer housing is available only during the summer session that you are taking classes. Summer housing is not available (unless you are working full-time for a University Department) if you are not taking summer classes.

Kim is a Biotechnology major from Marathon, WI.  She lived in Grimm Hall last year and served as the Hall Council Secretary and was involved in planning hall events such as Haunted Hall.  Kim enjoys being involved on campus in a variety of ways.

She is a member of the UWRF Track Team and throws shot, hammer, and discus.  Kim also likes to participate in a variety of intramural sports including ultimate frisbee, dodgeball, volleyball, and broomball.  Kim's interests include sports, playing guitar, cooking, watching movies, and spending time with friends.

She also loves to watch movies and just talk to people.  Becky was very involved in her hall last year.  She helped with movie nights, dances, and showboat.  She is also involved in campus organizations.  When meeting her, be prepared for her smile and high energy.

Even though crazy at times, she is still pretty laid back.  Becky is also known for being an incredible listener.  Becky's door is always open and she has candy, so come get some, chat, and be ready to have a fantastic time.

East in McMillan.  Last year she was a resident assistant in May Hall. In the past Becky has also been involved as a desk assistant and a recycling representative.  In her spare time Becky is involved on campus in Alpha Sigma Alpha.  She also enjoys meeting new people, watching movies, and spending quality time with her friends and family.  When people meet her they can expect her to welcome them with open arms and for her to be friendly and respectful.

Erick transferred to River Falls from Century College in White Bear Lake, MN.  Since being here at UWRF he has joined the swim team and become active in Art Society.  In the past Erick has been a counselor at a couple of summer camps in both Minnesota and Wisconsin.  When you first meet Erick the first thing you will notice is his loud and vibrate personality.  Some other things you should know about Erick is that he has a "PhD" in Superman logy and likes to play the guitar, baseball, bowling, being around people and being active playing sports.

Angela has a passion for being outdoors, hiking, and experiencing nature first hand.  On campus, Angela is involved with the Geology club and the Newman Center. She also played intramural broomball. This year she is the treasurer of the Geology Club.  Angela loves spending time with her family, friends, and her German Shepard, Tasha.

While Dan was in high school he was involved in activities/organizations such as: theatre, choir, drama club, and speech team. Before Dan became a Resident Assistant he worked as a shift supervisor at Panera Bread. Last year he got involved in Hall Council as the Vice President, and became a member of Student Senate. Dan is now the Director of Student Affairs and Academic Services this year for Senate. Dan is an all organized level headed man.

You don't need to back up every single thing on your hard disk, just the things that are important to you . Windows system files and other programs can always be reinstalled from their original installation discs or downloadable installers. As long as you have your computer documentation and recovery discs, you shouldn't have to worry.

The summer heat of another August has just ridden off in the proverbial sunset while the dawn of a new September rises.  Yes, it is that time again; a time for a new school year, new students and perhaps, a new start.  The change of the summer to fall also signifies the start of a new Intramural season.  The tireless exchange of sweat for glory, muscle for might and time spent away from studying for the chance to win the infamous Intramural t-shirt echoes the campus of the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.  The nightly activities will soon return to the atmosphere of scheduling games around classes, scheduling meals around games and spending more time at the Knowles Center than the Kleinpell Fine Arts building (the site of your Wednesday afternoon class).  But of course, at an institution where academics claim king, the aura of UWRF Intramurals has a following that makes most cults real in jealousy.

So what can Intramurals do for the average student that two hundred other student organizations cannot?  Being an Intramural participant can make you popular among certain social circles.  Being an Intramural champion can make you a legend on campus, if only for one year.  Holding your head high the next day despite a tough Intramural activity defeat is a life lesson that no book can teach.  Intramurals can be more than just recreation; these activities become part of one's education.

Although it is true that campus recreation does not hold a candle to the competition that varsity athletics can offer, the competition that does exist is still staggering.  Why else do students travel in herds to Hunt Arena to don sweaty helmets used by previous competitors to play Broomball at midnight on a Tuesday?  The ice may be slippery and the bruises many, but the camaraderie of playing with buddies and campus neighbors far outweigh the physical abuse one's body might endure.  Also, Dodgeball gives students an excuse to throw objects as hard as humanly possible at other fellow classmates, with pain not being an option.Although it is true that campus recreation does not hold a candle to the competition that varsity athletics can offer, the competition that does exist is still staggering.  Why else do students travel in herds to Hunt Arena to don sweaty helmets used by previous competitors to play Broomball at midnight on a Tuesday?  The ice may be slippery and the bruises many, but the camaraderie of playing with buddies and campus neighbors far outweigh the physical abuse one's body might endure.  Also, Dodgeball gives students an excuse to throw objects as hard as humanly possible at other fellow classmates, with pain not being an option.

Professional sports dynasties are built from championships, MVPs and ESPN Classic Sports' moments. Intramural dynasties, though often short-lived, are comprised of intense competition, unparalleled team spirit and a standout overall record. Typically this honor is allotted for veteran teams that have accumulated a surplus of Intramural champion t-shirts and that have garnered a nomination for the renowned title of "Team of the Year."

Usually professional sports dynasties, like the NY Yankees, rank high in the preseason polls. Maybe it's the multi-million dollar contracts, the highly touted athletes or the diehard fans, but sports analysts must realize that it not the money and the fame that defines champions at the end of the season. It is heart and pride-the heart and pride of an underdog.

I may have just recently caught Minnesota Twins fever or am brazenly optimistic that the Falcon Football team will have a winning record come the end of the season, but I am certain that this is the year of the underdog. The dynasties will fall; they will be destroyed, both in the professional sports world and in UWRF Intramurals.

The UWRF Intramurals 2005-06 "Team of the Year," Team Greeting Card, is the early favorite to reclaim the title this year. Though the team has been ranked number one in the Competitive Football League during the first three weeks of the season, arrogance will soon be the demise of their dynasty.

Just as the Yankees have the most premier major league names like Randy Johnson and Derek Jeter on their roster, Team Greeting Card consists of a handful of UWRF's most talented current and former varsity athletes. But this faction will not prevail on athletic prowess and experience alone. To survive, both the NY Yankees and Team Greeting Card will need to something more powerful than pure ability and muscle; they must drop the overconfident attitude and reevaluate what UWRF Intramurals is all about-heart and passion.

The Minnesota Twins came back from a 12-game deficit to win the division. It took an entire season of hard work and fighting through adversity. For all you underdogs out there, a word of advice: your team may not be the most recognized name in the league this early in the year, but remember, it is an entire year of commitment and desire that characterizes champions.

Team Greeting Card is the team to beat thus far into the Intramural season. For all you underdogs out there, this is your opportunity to put your game face on and show what true Intramural champions are made of.

With basketball season starting up there are more opportunities to listen to Mr. Owens, the pick and roll, meant for cooperation and teamwork to score an easy two points, not for a selfish 3 pointer that only results in bricks and bad dreams. The pick; a method used for ages to give a lending body to your teammate in trouble. These are only a few ways to share with your teammates on the Intramural Battle Ground.

Terrorism comes out of the blue, or green. It is a satanic way of life to do an evil act and hurt the people who have done nothing but great things to the world, nay, the solar system. A forfeit is just that, there is one side of the warriors just going through their everyday life, believing that they will go home and be safe, but between going home and being safe there is an intramural game, and that is where the terrorists are likely to strike.

With teams sitting on the man made speed bump outside on the intramural field, they are aware that time is winding down. That is where they hear of the news. (Usually the news happens at about 4:05 or 5:05) Sometimes it may even happen later in the evening and with the new season, terror might strike indoors, we are not safe no matter where we are and we need to take action.

The news is announced, and it is written on the paper. The headline, "Team So & So forfeits, team Cared Enough to Show Up wins" It becomes the talk of the campus and people start to forget who to trust. Forfeit's are the solely cause to formation of cliques on campus and the vary reason for 24/7 boycott forfeit's picketing. After many years of studying forfeits and conversing with the forfeitiers I have come up with two and only two answers.

One is the easiest to do for the every day man/woman, just show up. It is hard for the regular forfeitiers to do solution one for many reasons, the phrase "game day" to them means automatic cramp, and the forfeitiers translate the English word "cramp" into two definitions: illness, and possible ER visit.

The second reason they do not submit to solution number one is because forfeitiers have a diagnosis called procrastination (pro-crast-en-a-shun) and their weekly PA (procrastination anonymous) meetings are on "Game Day".  The other alternative to avoid forfeits is to call the intramural office and tell them that you will not be playing.  With the studying of the forfeitiers I have come to a surprising outcome. The only phone number that "these people" have memorized is 867-5309. Only Darwin can explain that theory of relativity, so I'll leave that alone.

Passionate and Heart-filled athletes there is one team that stands out amongst the rest, a Jeff Parker led squad that is full of soccer fanatics, Team Shower.  This is a group of athletes that looks competition and challenges in the eye every time they set foot on the field.  They are already bulls eyed this year coming off of there tremendous Intramural Championship in last year's Soccer league.They went into the tourney as a 4 seed, with no one really giving them a chance to win their first game of the tournament let alone come out as intramural champions.  They fought through the vigorous and punishing soccer playoffs match by match finally reaching the championship contest. In this contest they were heavily out matched but Parker and Company fought through the doubters and emerged victorious.If this doesn't spell out heart, passion, and determination I don't have any idea what does.  This is a playoff tested team that will be an exciting team to not only watch but experience in the soccer tournament.  This year will be a little more difficult but with the confident leader in Parker, Team Shower will be a force in this year's Soccer Championships.

They have the total package when it comes to every sport that we offer here at UWRF.  Led by the incomparable Taylor Germain, TGC is full of savvy, experience, and most of all the will to win.  The returning team of the year is truly a dynasty, and as one rec staff member puts it, comparable to the New York Yankees in greatness and prestige.Bottom line, no one will beat this team, and if they do it is a fluke.

Looking at the schedule for upcoming sports I would think the only other team that might challenge Team Greeting Card for levels of greatness would have to be the Toe Jammers in intramural soccer.  This team is unstoppable, simply outstanding.

The intramural season is so incredibly long that it is nearly impossible to for me to make all of my predictions for the year.  My one guarantee for the upcoming seasons is the simple fact that the 'Cool Kids' are going to be a force to wreckin' with in the Women's Broomball.  They are full of mind-boggling ability; their squad consist mostly of the Women's Varsity Soccer team.  This team would be the Women's Broomball Champs if the games where played on paper, they are a sight to be seen on ice.  They are led by the WIAC conference favorite for Player of the Year, Ashley Peterson, who not only dominates on the soccer field but is also a remarkable intramural athlete.Which brings me to by second prediction, Peterson is hands down the best Dodgeball player in the history of the school.  She has the ability to dodge, dip, dive, duck and dodge.  That alone makes you solid player but her ability to rifle a dodgeball across the court is what sets her apart from the rest.  Currently she is an unsigned free agent; many teams are in the hunt for her experience and capability of disappearing on the court.  The team that gives her the big contract will defiantly be in the running for a championship in the Dodgeball tournament on October 31, 2006.

The Kite Flyers Club furthers the educational opportunities of students interested in the kite flying industry. Activities include flying kites, building kites, studying the science behind kite building as well as other educational and social activities. We welcome new members anytime.

Ensure that the content is identified as UW-River Falls content where appropriate UW-River Falls Web page content requirement: All UW-RF department and office Web pages of the university must have the official wordmark at the absolute top of the page and appropriate footer at the bottom.

Not all browsers can activate every application. Let the user decide to activate applications. If a visitor can not access video or audio from your site an alternative web page featuring a text version of the content must be made available on-line and readily accessible.

Not all browsers support tables. Make certain your content is understood without them. (This rule does not necessarily pertain to layout. This rule pertains mostly to statistical information placed in a table that depends on rows and columns to make sense i.e. a spreadsheet) HTML Example: Use the table header tag <TH> to name the columns of your table. Use the table body tag <TBODY> to denote table content. Dreamweaver Developers will need to consult the help section.

Because UW-System requires an alternative to frames it may be better to simply place the same navigation bar on each page. You may use server side includes (SSI) as an alternative. This is an advanced development feature. Contact the web development office for further details.

Restrict the use of PDF (Acrobat) documents to the following instances: when the audience is small but the content is essential when the content is intended to be printed If the content is going to be viewed by a large or frequent audience and the content is not likely to be printed, all attempts to turn the content into an HTML document should be made.

The wordmark graphic is specific in its design and must be used as is. It is designed as a link that returns the visitor to the University home page. Wordmarks must be positioned at the top of the page, flush left or centered, with no other elements on the same line.

The footer graphic (or trailer) is also specific in its design and must be used as is. It is designed as a link to the visitor to the University home page, the search page, and the general information page.

Dreamweaver users: You will NOT see the header in the display view. The included code will be represented by a "gold nugget" icon.  When the page is viewed in a browser the header and footer will automatically appear.

Understand file structure and how files are addressed to form the layout and content of a Web Page 80% of the people visiting your site are probably interested in perhaps 4 or 5 popular functions or topics related to your organization.

Refrain from creating a calendar of events if it is not going to be updated at least weekly. Old content will discredit your site. Be honest with yourself about how often you or someone else will be maintaining the site.

People don't regularly read web pages from top to bottom. They scan them for keywords related to the information they seek. Summarize long sections of text with headlines every two or three paragraphs. Bullet points and making keywords bold will help guide the visitor through the page as well.

Images should appear on the page as their actual height and width. Do not allow web development software to resize the image smaller. Download time is still the same. If visitors are going to wait for the download they might as well see the image at its full size.

Test your pages. Be a visitor to your site as you develop it. View the page as it looks through a conventional browser like Mozilla, Netscape or MS Internet Explorer. Don't trust the web development software to give you an accurate picture of what your site will look like.

Visitors will not return to your pages if they don't work. If you want several links from a page but haven't developed those pages yet, don't make the links active to nonexistent files or pages that say "under construction."

Pixels are displayed slightly smaller on a Macintosh computer than a Windows computer. Therefore if Web page text is assigned a relatively small point size on a Windows computer it is even smaller on a Macintosh.

You may just want to compile all the information needed to create your web site and then designate an experienced designer to turn your ideas into a site. The campus Web development office can help. Contact webmaster@uwrf.edu Master of the web If you want to be an avid web developer or create a site from scratch then you should learn some basic HTML tags. HTML is easier than you think.

If you simply update text on a current web page then HTML knowledge may not be required. Use web development software such as Dreamweaver as you would a word processor. However, you should know how to retrieve a document from the server and know how links work.

Dial-up users matter. Many images that appear on campus Web pages are too large to download in a reasonable time. In addition many images do little to compliment the Web site. Rainbow rules, busy backgrounds and winky-blinky animation now appear amateurish. Following are considerations for Web graphic development.

With permission, web graphics can be acquired or addressed from another web page. They can be acquired from a clip art resource or they can be scanned from a hard copy. Images may be manipulated or created using a program such as Adobe Photo Shop, MS Photo Draw or LView. After preparation, images should be placed on the server in an organized matter. It is suggested that images be placed in a separate directory (folder) on the Web server within your web directory.

GIF: 256 color image that can be rendered on-line in less time by eliminating unnecessary colors JPG: A color image that can be rendered on-line in less time by using "lossy compression" (something you don't need to thoroughly understand). Images can be compressed on a scale of 1 to 12. 1 is the lowest quality. Low quality images load rapidly but appear to be "blotchy." Medium compression of 4 or 5 works well. See Adobe Photo Shop or MS Photo Draw Help.

This is a 25K JPG image with medium compression rate. It will load in less than 8 seconds with 28.8 modem. Windows users can check the size properties of an image by right clicking on the image and then choosing properties.

This means the image resides in a folder, relative to this web page, called "graphics_html". Files are relative to each other by their location on the server. Images may appear broken on a web page if they are addressed relatively and then the Web page or image is moved to another directory (folder) on the server.

The image has a width of 300 pixels and a height of 225. For those visitors using web browsers that do not render images, this image is described as "South Hall". The alt= attribute describes the image and is required for all images.

This means the image is being addressed globally. Notice the http://www.uwrf.edu portion of the address. If the page is moved to another location on the server this image will still render properly. This image could just as easily be addressed relative to the web page as it is in the above example.

If you want to use graphical images for navigation create and place links around individual buttons. Don't let your web development software allow you to create image maps for navigation. Image maps work well when sections of a composite photo or graphic need to be explained, for example the image of a human skeleton could contain "clickable" areas that would lead the visitor to information about various parts of the body. Redundant text based links are still required elsewhere on the page.

Roll-over buttons that slide out to reveal additional navigation while covering up page content is mostly bothersome. Content must be accessible without the use of JavaScript. Redundant text based navigation is required on all campus department and office pages. Roll-over buttons may be more trouble than they are worth.

Frontpage, and Photo Draw appear to make placing web graphics on a web page simple but many times it's the wrong way. Certain segments of your audience will not stick around to view your pages because the images were made the "Microsoft way" or the "Macromedia way." Learning web graphics the right way is only a bit more difficult than letting your software package force you to do it their way.

To aid in the design of Web pages, the following templates have been created for your use. These templates were developed to provide a variety of options for Web page design. It is intended that these templates provide a basis from which to design your own pages.

Before using these templates, you should understand the basic funtions of Dreamweaver or MS Front Page. This includes formating Web page text, creating links, and saving documents to the campus Web server.

Side Includes (SSI): "SSI" navigation is incorporated into a template to make modifying the navigation of a web site easier as more pages are added to your site. SSI pages include, or address, another page that contains the sites navigation links.

SSI template users should create the nav.html web page in the same folder as the pages that are including the nav.html file. Edits made to nav.html will appear on all the pages in your site that are addressing nav.html.

PDF (Portable Document Format) is a file format created by Adobe, initially to provide a standard form for storing and editing printed publishable documents. PDF format can easily be seen and printed by users. To view files of this type, download the Adobe Acrobat Reader, which is available free from Adobe's Web site When should I use a PDF online?

Most of the time because PDF documents are cumbersome to navigate and are really intended for printing. If you want your audience to be able to navigate easily through the web content you are providing post standard HTML pages instead.

Yes but beware. There are better options. The Web development office recommends that this type of form be created if it is intended for a mostly off-campus audience using Mac and Windows platforms. To create such a document requires Acrobat Writer.

Prologue is the University of Wisconsin-River Falls student literary and art publication. Each issue contains the writing and artwork of UW-River Falls undergraduate students, graduate students, and recent graduates. Literary submissions range from poems to short stories to creative essays. Original works of art, such as drawings, photographs, and images of metal and glasswork, are found throughout the publication.

Submissions are accepted from January through the end of February, during Spring semester. Prologue is edited by graduating English and Art majors. Prologue is distributed campus-wide, before the end of Spring semester, and is free to students and faculty.

This chapter provides members with opportunities to find out more about graduate school and careers in psychology and related fields, engage in and present research, and get to know other students with similar academic interests and goals.

During the course of the academic year, Psi Chi members are engaged in a number of interesting and informative activities. These activities include promoting research, discussion of potential career paths, and local community service projects.

We fight for the rights of everyday working people against the inequality and injustice perpetuated by the capitalist system. We advocate the building of a mass workers party to represent the needs of real people.

We campaign for issues such as: free high-quality public education from pre-school through college, socialized medicine under democratic control, safe and affordable publicly owned transportation, massive investment in environmental clean up, and taking into public ownership, under democratic working class control and management, the top 500 corporations, banks, insurance and finance houses that dominate the economy.

Non-profit accounting focuses on the study of accounting procedures and financial statement presentation for the federal, state and local governments and on organizations who have been specifically created to be nonprofit, i.e., colleges and universities, health and welfare agencies, and churches.  Prerequisite: ACCT 232.

Students will study the principles of federal income taxation with emphasis on individuals. Gross income, exclusions,deductions, exemptions, capital gains and property transactions are covered. Problems and legal research included.

Theory and practice of financial accounting pertaining to business combinations and corporate consolidations using the cost and equity methods, partnerships, multinational enterprises, segment and interim reports, and not for profit accounting.

This course is an introduction to biotechnology laboratory techniques for students outside of the biotechnology major. The laboratory will include applications from the animal, plant, food, and environmental sciences. Teaching these techniques to others will also be addressed. Laboratory binder and safety goggles required.

Students obtain professional work experience with a cooperating employer. Individualized learning objectives are established for each participant. The completion of a special project at the internship site is an integral part of the experience.

An international work experience at a professional level. Participants will attend 6-8 scheduled orientation meetings during the semester prior to the work experience. Special course fees required. Prerequisites: 30 semester credits.

A study of accounting systems and methods appropriate for farms and agricultural businesses including the use of basic information-recording skills to allow for the construction of financial statements and filing of income tax forms.

A survey course that includes the sources of laws affecting agricultural businesses and markets; the creation and enforcement of contracts; provisions controlling inheritance, trespass, and other specific laws of particular interest to agriculture.

The course is divided between the survey of financial institutions and analytical methods useful in financial planning and evaluation. Topics include financial analysis of balance sheets; income statements; cash flow; financial budgeting, including present value methods; risk models; and agricultural lending institutions.

A study of methods of analyzing farm records and farm financial statements including methods of income tax preparation for sole proprietorships, partnerships and corporations. Accounting procedures to minimize income tax liability are examined.

This is a writing intensive course. Economic analysis of adopted and proposed government policies regarding agriculture are covered, including consideration of the significance of the institutional environment on agricultural policy.

Emphasis is on the six contexts of communication, from intrapersonal to organizational agricultural communications. Students have the opportunity to write and be published in print and broadcast media. Opportunity to focus on an area of interest and to develop oral communication skills through small group activities, speeches, guest presentations and a student-designed agricultural communications plan.

This course provides both the first-time and returning students with the specific skills and strategies to accomplish their academic goals with success. Students are introduced to a variety of topics critical to this process: time management, setting priorities, learning styles, campus resources, critical thinking, diversity, motivation, and test taking skills. Students will demonstrate understanding of these topics through small group discussions, class activities, quizzes, homework assignments, oral presentations, exams, and by attending guest presentations.

The purpose of this course is to prepare students to advise agricultural youth organizations and to coordinate agricultural work-based learning, including supervised agricultural experience programs. Emphasis will be placed on legal aspects, maintaining student records, and completing award applications. This is a writing intensive course. Prerequisites: AGED 369 or consent of instructor.

Fundamental concepts of welding and metal machines and forming processes. Set up of common welding and cutting processes. Metallurgical effects of welding on metals and tests for welds. Basic machine tool and metal forming processes.

Construction techniques related to the installation of structural components in commercial and residential landscapes. Topics include retaining walls, decks and steps, patios, planters, shade structures, fountains, and swimming pools.

The design and management of systems for pollution control and waste management through prevention, pollutant removal and destruction are investigated. Topics include water treatment, waste water treatment, air pollution control, indoor air quality and solid waste management. Prerequisites: AGEN 365 and SOIL 210.

Physical and chemical characteristics of feeds, effects of storage and processing methods, quality control, feed additives, feeding standards, ration formulation for farm animals, and reviews of research literature. Prerequisite: ANSC 231.

This course investigates the art and science of shoeing the horse, including anatomy and diseases of the foot, trimming, making and fitting shoes, and corrective and pathological shoeing. Prerequisite: consent of instructor. Accelerated course.

The course explores the relationships between lifestyle, health, and disease, emphasizing the importance of culture and social structure. Global and national social epidemiology (the study of disease and health in various populations), re-emergent and emergent infectious disease, indigenous healing, and health care delivery systems are a major focus of this course. Co-listed as SOCI 338.

The course is designed for sociology majors or minors and anthropology minors who wish to pursue an anthropological topic of special interest. Students must complete an application and receive departmental approval before registering.

An introduction to the material and techniques for using glass as a means of personal expression. Processes include glass blowing, stained glass, carving, fusing and casting. Historical and cultural perspectives including personal expression in the arts will be introduced in this course. Materials fee is required.

The course is an introduction to painting concepts and techniques. Students learn to work with line, form, texture, and composition, while working with color and experimenting with various painting techniques. Short lectures will explore the historical and cultural context of painting. Materials fee is required.

Preparation to teach art at the middle/secondary level including: history of art education, aesthetic development of the transadolescent and adolescent, state and national art standards, art curriculum and assesment development, approaches to 6-12 art media instruction, creative process and management in the classroom.

The course gives students the opportunity to study a specialized topic in visual arts in-depth. The specific course topics will be announce when the course is offered. Contact the Art Department for topics.

This will cover the requirement for BFA students and is optional for all other students installing a senior show. Students will learn theories and practices employed in planning, designing, and preparing museum and gallery exhibitions.

Students work from live models using traditional and mixed drawing media. Class lecture and discussion examines the use of the figure in art, anatomy, space, and linear, value and gestural studies. Emphasis is on both skill and expression.

An advanced investigation of fiber arts including weaving, dyeing, surface design, felt-making, mixed media and sculptural forms. Emphasis is on technical development, creative expression and aesthetic judgement. Materials fee is required.

Advanced investigation of non-ferrous metal working processes as they apply to jewelry, hollow-ware and flatware with emphasis on the creative use of the medium. Materials fee is required. Prerequisites: ART 228 and consent of instructor.

Continued investigation of photography as a creative medium for self-expression through the introduction of additional darkroom and/or digital techniques. Emphasis on preparation of personal work for portfolio, competition, and exhibition.

Students participating in the Greece Tour receive 1-3 cr. of general elective credit in either English, art or geography. Participating in the Greece Tour Orientation Seminar (10 hours), offered during the spring semester, is required.

This international study program will provide an opportunity for students to study Egyptian art, archaeology, architecture and history. Modern culture, religion, politics, society, economy and environment will also be examined. Two pre-trip seminars will be held in the fall, and a post-trip interview will be conducted.

The course gives students the opportunity to study a specialized topic in the visual arts in-depth. The specific course topics will be announced when the course is offered. Contact the Art Department for topics.

This course surveys the protozoan protists and traditional animals in a phylogenetic format. Emphasis is on taxonomy, morphology, physiology, ecology, and evolution of these organisms. Special course fee is required. Prerequisite: BIOL 150.

This course provides an overview of human biology for nonscience majors. Coverage is focused on the human life cycle to include reproduction and development, genetics, and aging. Aspects of human disease such as cancer, AIDS, and addiction are considered. Biological topics are placed in a social and ethical context.

The course will be an investigation of principles of transmission and expression of genetic information in humans. Role of hereditary factors in development of normal and pathologic human traits will be examined along with discussion of recent and potential advances in genetics research, their implication for the future of the human species and ethical considerations regarding their implementation.

This course incorporates the basic principles of plant systematics: the study of the diversity of plants and their identification, naming, classification and evolution. Included in this course are plant groups-algae to flowering plants.

This course covers a variety of topics important to wildlife professionals, with emphasis on the management of wetlands, grassland birds, and white-tailed deer in western Wisconsin. Additional topics include habitat design, hunting, predation, and law enforcement. Students are required to participate in regular class discussion of popular and scientific articles relating to current wildlife issues. Working in teams, students will formulate and present management plans published as World Wide Web pages. Guest lectures will be presented by wildlife professionals from the Wisconsin Department of Natural Resources. Special course fee is required. Prerequisites: BIOL150; at least one course in statistics is recommended.

This course covers the basic features of the mammalian immune system, including antigen-antibody interactions, cellular immunity, immunogenetics and immune disorders. The lab provides experience in immunological techniques and data analysis used in research and clinical diagnosis. Special course fee is required.

This is a writing intensive course. Principles of Mendelian, quantitative and population genetics in sexually reproducing organisms will be studied along with molecular genetics of prokaryotes and eukaryotes, genetic mechanisms of evolution and chromosome structure and organization. Prerequisite: BIOL 240.

In this course students will be intoduced to the microscopic anatomy of the four primary tissue types and how they are organized into organ systems. The course will emphasize the structural and functional relationships of tissues and present histology in relation to principles of physiology, biochemistry and molecular biology. In addition to the traditional microscopy-based lab, a computer-based interactive program for microscopic anatomy will be employed.

The course contains an overview of public and private regulations affecting the environment, including policy considerations behind environmental legislation and the resulting legislative and administrative acts which implement that policy.

This course includes information on the anatomy, physiology, behavior, and status of midwestern birds, with emphasis on field identification by visual sightings and song. Students will conduct independent field studies and analyze their data using appropriate statistical techniques, then publish and present their results as world wide web pages. Students are expected to participate in class discussion of popular and scientific articles relating to current avian issues.

Students will examine the theory and practice of animal cell culture and will develop laboratory skills in isolating and growing cultured animal cells, as well as microscopic observation and biochemical and cytological analysis of cultured cells. Special course fee is required. Prerequisites: BIOL 240, 324.

Students will perform individual study of a topic or problem involving laboratory, field or library research under supervision of faculty member; a written report is required. Prerequisite: approval of supervising faculty member prior to registration.

The study of topical issues in business law. Sample topics include corporate crime, sexual harassment, international legal environment of business, and practical applications of business law. Prerequisite: BLAW 265 or consent or instructor.

This introductory course in the sequence CHEM 121 and 122 is designed for students desiring one or more years of chemistry. Topics covered include chemical formulas and equations, chemical reactions and energy, atomic and molecular structure, safe handling of chemicals and synthetic analytical technique.

A citizen's guide to chemical problems in preserving a clean air, water and land environment. Sources, harmful effects, and abatement procedures are studied for chemical contaminants which result from commercial, industrial, agricultural, and energy production processes. Designed to meet liberal arts requirements.

A chemistry course for students of business, the arts, humanities, and social sciences that emphasizes the application of chemical principles to the choice and use of household chemicals, over the counter drugs and cosmetics.

Basic principles of atomic orbital hybridization, bonding, acid-base definitions and mechanistic drawings are reviewed. Naming of different functional groups and their infrared spectroscopic characteristics are introduced. Other topics include stereochemistry, conformations of cyclic alkanes, ionic substitution and elimination reactions of alkyl halides and addition reactions to alkenes.

Maximum of one credit per semester. Safety goggles, scientific calculator and lab notebook required. Prerequisite: consent of instructor. No more than one credit of CHEM 295 can be counted toward a major or minor in Chemistry.

This is a writing intensive course. This course is for chemistry majors or other students requiring advanced experimentation in integrated laboratory experiments requiring physical measurement, analysis, synthetic methods, spectroscopy, kinetics and computer data analysis. Techniques primarily illustrate principles of physical chemistry. Safety goggles and laboratory notebook are required.

Investigation of the properties of macromolecules with special emphasis on elasticity, viscosity, the semi-crystalline and glassy states, mechanical and thermodynamic properties, methods of characterization and the use of mathematical models to predict behavior. Prerequisite: CHEM 341/541 or consent of instructor.

This course is designed to familiarize the student with standard laboratory procedures for the synthesis of the major types of polymers, the measurement of molecular weight for high polymers and the experimental methods unique to the characterization and physical property determination for macromolecules.

This course provides an opportunity to study a selected topic in Criminology and/or Criminal Justice. Sample topics include white collar crime, capital punishment, racial and gender issues in crime and justice, etc; Prerequisite: CJ 202 or consent of instruct CJ 430 3 cr.

An examination of the development and implementation of correctional programs designed to allow offenders to remain in the community while completing their sentence. The role of offenders, supervisory agencies, and society will be explored.

This course will introduce students to normal phonological development and phonological disorders. Emphasis will be placed on informal and formal assessment strategies, program planning, and intervention strategies. Prerequisites: COMD 262 and 263.

This course is designed as a brief introduction to the etiology of aphasia and the evaluative and therapeutic procedures for working with people who experience speech and language difficulties due to brain damage. Prerequisite: COMD 160.

Students will be placed in clinical settings which allow them to actually conduct speech and language therapy under the direct supervision of ASHA certified speech pathologists. The clock hours accumulated and the nature of the clinical placement will depend on the students academic standing and prior clinical experience.

The focus of the course will be to present a model of educational counseling based on the principles of preventive programming, educational interventions and develop-mental understanding of student concerns. In addition, there will be an emphasis on specific interventions, skills and counseling strategies that have been determined to be effective for educational settings. The course will be primarily concerned with the emotional development of children and adolescents.

The effects of environmental factors such as light, temperature and moisture on growth and yield are examined. The laboratory provides an opportunity to closely examine and carry out experiments on plant material. Lab fee required.

Major emphasis is given to forage production in the midwest and Wisconsin specifically, but students also are introduced to species and practices utilized in other soil and climatic environments. Species characteristics, adaptations, growth and management requirements of the major forage legumes and grasses are discussed.

An interdisciplinary critical analysis of production agriculture as a sustainable industry. Students will engage in an interactive dialogue about technical, social and economic concepts related to sustainability in production agriculture systems.

This is a writing intensive course. The course is designed to examine the theory, concepts and technology involved in integrated pest management. The course will include pesticide characteristics, usage and safety; economic considerations; human and environmental concerns; and descriptions of pest management systems being used in various crops. Prerequisites: CROP or HORT 161 and junior or senior standing.

Introduction to database systems, database administration and database design concepts, relational model and relational database systems are further examined through class projects. Security, privacy, concurrency control, distributed databases, object-oriented database, and client/server systems will be examined.

This is a continuation of the study of numerical methods. Techniques to solve ordinary and partial differential equations, boundary-value problems and nonlinear systems of equations will be examined. These will include finite-element and finite-difference methods. Integral equations and signal processing with fast algorithms will be considered. Co-listed as MATH 347. Prerequisite: CSIS 346.

This is the "writing intensive" course for all CSIS options. A seminar on advanced topics in computer systems. Students will research a topic and give an oral presentation along with a written report. Additional faculty and guest lectures on various areas not covered in other courses are included.

This course is an extension of current higher level computer science courses or a course in recent topics and advanced areas in computer science. The topics covered will be determined by the instructor teaching the course and within the instructor's area of expertise. Consult the instructor for topics covered.

An introductory course in movement fundamentals with emphasis on body awareness, rhythmic competency, coordination and alignment through basic dance skills in the technique of modern dance. May be repeated for a total of three credits.

An elementary-level course in the theory and practice of classical ballet, with emphasis on alignment, strength, coordination and flexibility. Ballet II will include a greater quantity of those exercises already learned in Ballet I and will gradually introduce them with faster tempi and in elementary combinations.

An introductory dance composition class designed to develop ones ability to choreograph in the modern idiom. Emphasis will be on identifying and expanding the individual's movement vocabulary and knowledge of compositional elements.

Directed rehearsal/production experiences in dance. Class work is to include rehearsals, performances, pre-concert preparation and basic preparation for dance production, a required skill for student performers, and dance minors.

An intermediate level study of the theory and practice of jazz dance with an emphasis on increased strength, coordination and flexibility. Body isolation, center work and across the floor work will be an integral part of each class.

This course is designed to allow the economics major to earn credit from practical work experience. The experience must be at a professional level and involve the application of economic concepts or techniques to a real world environment.

This course provides an overview of the economic conditions in less developed countries today. Emphasis is on the domestic economic issues of poverty, income distribution, population, unemployment, agricultural and industrial development, women in development, and others. The course incorporates theory and policy.

This course provides an overview of the effect of international economic conditions on less developed countries today. Emphasis is on the international issues of trade strategy, foreign investment, foreign aid, technology transfer, debt crisis, structural IMF reforms and others. The course incorporates theory and policy.

This course examines the role of government in the economic system. Emphasis is placed on the analysis and evaluation of various government expenditure programs and the theories and structure of taxation. The effects of the various government expenditure and tax policies on the allocation of economic resources, production of goods and services, and the distribution of income and wealth are also discussed.

Students will learn why and how nations trade, and why and how people's welfare is influenced by trade. Such issues as fairness in trade, job protection, environmental regulation and international competitiveness, and industrial policy will be addressed and explored. Effectiveness of such trade policies as tariffs, quotas, voluntary export restrictions, and more will be evaluated. Pros and cons of regional trading arrangements such as NAFTA and European Economic Integration, as well as the role of the World Trade Organization, will also be discussed.

This course provides a comparative analysis of various world economies, including the U.S., Western and Eastern Europe, and selected Asian, African, and Latin American nations. Emphasis is on the allocation of resources, the distribution of income, and the role of the private and public sectors. Other issues include the measurement and comparison of economic performance, global economic problems, economic reform, development strategies, and the future of economic systems.

This course can only be taken on a pass/fail basis. A maximum of 3 credits will count as electives for the economics major. Prerequisites: consent of department chair and department internship director, junior standing, and all courses required for the major except 480 (upon student request).

Reading and writing are employed to evaluate primary and secondary materials in the humanities, social sciences, and natural sciences. Students will learn to comprehend, analyze, and interpret oral, written, aural, and visual communication in order to reach judgments and construct arguments; utilize technology to communicate effectively; perform and document research.

This course helps students become independent, effective, and eloquent writers who are able to use a variety of heuristics and processes appropriate to particular writing contexts and who can write original, interesting and readable prose.

Students participating in the Greece Tour receive one to three credits of general elective credits in either English, Art or Geography. Participation in the Greece Tour Orientation Seminar (10 hours) offered during the spring semester is required.

The course is required for the Environmental Science major and should be taken during an Environmental Science major's first year at UWRF. The course includes presentations by environmental scientists, faculty and staff in the Environmental Science major, Career Services, Information Technology Services and the Library.

Preparation of environmental impact statements, environmental assessments, phased site investigations and environmental audits are discussed. Key elements of impact analysis are presented on specific environmental topics including water resources, air quality, environmental health and safety, wildlife and wetlands.

This is a writing intensive course and meets the diversity requirement. This course focuses on the holistically integrated relationship of humans with their environment - both social and natural. The course examines cultural conflicts over land, water, food, wildlife and pollution on a local to global scale. Concepts to be explored include, but are not limited to: biophilia; carrying capacity, deep ecology; diversity; ecofeminism; environmental "community," ethics and justice; Gaia Hypothesis; property rights; sustainable agriculture and development; and individual responsibilities regarding the environment. The full spectrum of American cultural identity delineations including race, ethnicity, gender, age, disability, religion, rural/urban, and others will be used to demonstrate how various cultural groups value, use, and share and/or control the social and natural environment. Prerequisite: junior standing or consent of Instructor.

This course is designed to provide the student with the philosophical, theoretical and practical foundations for designing and implementing a wide variety of interpretive media in support of park management and environmental education objectives.

The framework and methodologies of comprehensive planning are explored in detail and presented within the contexts of Wisconsin's "Smart Growth" initiative and as it applies to natural resources management. Comprehensive plan elements are identified, along with data gathering, analysis, and integration procedures.

This course examines the concepts and skills necessary to plan for development of the full spectrum of zoning possibilities encountered, primarily in an exurban area. Primary attention will be focused on conservation development of residential areas with moderate coverage of agricultural, recreational, commercial, and industrial sites. Site planning principles, layout, and design will be applied within the context of master and comprehensive plans, and the notion of sustainable development. Permitted and conditional uses, setbacks, and other criteria of various zoning districts will also be integrated. The student will prepare and publicly present a full set of maps and a planning document for a local community site. Prerequisites: ESM 151, GEOG 250, 360 and GENG 235, or consent of instructor.

This is a writing intensive course. This course provides resource management majors the opportunities to conceive, research, organize, and communicate their findings in both a technically written report and formal seminar presentation.

The study of inter-ethnic group difference. Origins of the field, theories of ethnicity and inter-ethnic relations. The experience of ethnic groups in the U.S., focusing on African Americans, Asian Americans, Latinos and Native Americans.

Television writing techniques and formats, elementary engineering terminology and theory will be discussed. The role and function of each member of the production team will be discussed. Each student will write, direct and produce his/her own video production. Prerequisite: JOUR 101. Co-listed as SCTA 160.

Film Studies 200 is an introduction to film language, art, style, technology, and analysis. This course will provide an historical overview and background on film theory. Students will view films showing a variety of styles and techniques.

American and Latino/a American cultures and compares them to contemporary ethnic filmmakers' perspectives on their own cultures. An emphasis will be placed 1) on film's relationship to written literature and 2) on identifying positive and negative features of the varied ethnic representations. Films, film clips, documentary specials, fiction, poetry and scholarly articles will be included.

This course examines the history and techniques of the non-fiction film. It involves analysis of historical examples of documentary film (including newsreels, propaganda films, and television documentaries) along with the works of prominent documentary makers and styles of documentary production, Co-listed as JOUR 302.

This course teaches students to be analytical viewers of film and thoughtful readers of film criticism. It gives students a view of the world through film, insofar as film reflects a nation's cultural and historical concerns. It also gives students a broad view of film beyond the borders of Hollywood and the USA, inviting them to see the medium itself through different cultural preoccupations and concerns. ENGL 253 or FILM 200 or INTS 200 or consent of the instructor.

The course allows an exploration of a particular area of Film Studies from examining film as an art form or industry, to the cultural popularity of this influential communication medium. Prerequisites: Student must be a Film Studies Minor and obtain the consent of the program coordinator for the Film Studies minor.

A survey of insurance and risk management concepts, the insurance industry and common insurance contracts. Topics include: types of insurers, functions of insurers, legal principles of insurance, and an analysis of property, liability, life and health contracts. Special emphasis will be placed on personal insurance for the home, automobile, life and health. Prerequisites: ACCT 231.

Topics considered include law of agency, real estate contracts, real estate finance, property appraisal, fair housing laws, professional ethics, and environmental issues. Real estate investment and property management will also be reviewed.

This is a writing intensive course. The analysis of the most efficient ways to combine individual securities into a portfolio and practical aspects of portfolio management will be covered. Emphasis is on formulating investment objectives and evaluating portfolios terms of those objectives. Prerequisite: FINC 348.

Independent study is an opportunity for upper class students to select a project in an area of business and work independently with an assigned professor. Open only to business administration majors. Prerequisites: a 3.0 GPA in accounting and business courses, upper class standing and consent of department chair.

This course provides an understanding of equilibrium and the ability to analyze the forces in equililbrium situations. Topics covered include force and moment vectors, resultants, principles of statics, applications to simple trusses, frames and machines, distributed loads, hydrostatics, properties of areas, centers of mass, area moments of inertia, law of friction and method of virtual work.

Software packages designed for use in a Computer Aided Design (CAD) environment will be used to construct and anlyze 3D models. Various software packages will be used to construct complex mechanical systems, residential buildings, irrigation system design, and landscape design. Additionally, the software will be used to perform engineering applications including stress analysis and list of materials.

This course deals with the following topics: analyzing and processing data for thematic maps; the creation of graduated symbol, dot, isoline, choropleth, dasymetric, and multivariate data maps; and cartographic problems posing special challenges when employing these mapping strategies. Special course fee required.

This course is designed to meet the certification requirement for teacher education candidates as specified by the state of Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction Environmental Education rule. The course will investigate the following environmental issues: the ecosystem, population, food production, energy, natural resource depletion, land use and misuse, and sources of environmental impact.

Teaching methodologies will be presented to incorporate environmental content into the curriculum. Field trips required. Does not count as credit toward a Geography major or minor. Co-listed as ESM 300/500. Special course fee required.

The course provides a regional survey of physical environments, human settlements, and cultures of the African continent. Topics include landforms and climates, population, cultural and agricultural systems, urban and economic development and current ecological issues. The impacts of the European colonial experience on the continent are explored. Prerequisite: GEOG 110 or 120 or consent of instructor.

This course emphsizes the theory and methods for creating and utilizing geographic information systems (GIS). Applications of GIS, digital database design and construction, geographic analyses and presentation of results of analyses in map form will be covered. Students will gain experience with both vector and raster systems, using ArcGIS, ARC/Info and Idrisi. Special course fee required.

This course covers topics on the integration, transformation, and processing of digital data common to Cartography, GIS, and Remote Sensing. Topics include data base design, sources of digital data, data structure and format transformations, line generalization, global positioning systems (GPS) and digital image processing of satellite imagery using ArcGIS, ArcInfo and Idrisi. Special course fee required.

This is a writing intensive course. A survey of the discipline of geography, including the development of the discipline, geographic source materials and methodologies, field methods and experience, and the subfields of the discipline.

Students will identify and carry out research on a field of their choice under the supervision of an appropriate faculty member. Written and oral presentation of research results. Prerequisite: geography major with junior or senior standing.

This course focuses on advanced topics in weather and climate, including measurement and estimation techniques, synoptic climatology, energy budget studies, forest climatology, and tree ring-climate relationships. Students will develop projects requiring data collection and field study. Prerequisite: GEOG 212 or GEOL 330.

Advanced mapping strategies are studied including cartograms, 3-D mapping, animated, and interactive maps. Advanced map design, distribution, and production are explored using image processing, GIS, internet, and graphic production software.

This course is designed for advanced geography students who wish to work independently on a project. A paper describing the research or a finished cartographic product is required. Prerequisites: consent of department chair and instructor.

This is a writing intensive course. This course covers the principles and analyses of processes that affect changes of the Earth's surface and govern the development of landforms. Topics include lecture and laboratory experiences in weathering and soil development, slope stability, stream hydraulics, wind action, groundwater and karst development, periglacial process, glacier erosion and transport, glacial sediments, and glacial landforms. Field trip required.

This is a writing intensive course. Geology field trip to acquaint students with structure, stratigraphy, petrology, geomorphology, paleontology, and geologic history of the western United States, New Zealand, Australia or Europe. Project and travel fees required. Prerequisites: GEOL 102 and consent of the instructor.

This is a writing intensive course. This is a field geological field trip to acquaint students with the structure, petrology, ore deposits, paleontology, geomorphology and regional geology of the central Appalachian Mountains. Project and travel fees required. Prerequisites: GEOL 102 and consent of instructor.

This is a writing intensive course. This field trip exposes students to the geology of portions of Maine, New Brunswick and southern Quebec, especially the Gaspe Peninsula. Themes of this course include: geologic/tectonic processes and structures involved in continent building of the northern Appalachian Region, continental margin and marine sedimentology, and surficial/coastal geology.

The course will provide an overview of the pertinent environmental regulations; major emphasis will focus on the scientific basis for toxicology and chemistry of hazardous materials. Laboratory experiences will emphasize utilization of environmental monitoring equipment. Safe work practices including use of proper personal protective equipment will be stressed. This course meets OSHA certification.

The elementary study of gravitational, magnetic, seismic, electrical and thermal properties of the Earth will be examined. Applications to the determination of earth structure and global tectonics from the measurement and interpretation of these properties. Exploration techniques and applications to the petroleum and hydrogeologic industries are also introduced. Weekend field exercises required.

The course includes an overview of the properties of porous media, the physical occurrence of subsurface water, groundwater flow mechanics, regional flow systems, well hydraulics and design, aquifer geology, groundwater resources, groundwater contamination and transport, remediation techniques, and an introduction to groundwater modeling. Laboratory activities, research projects, and field activities.

This is a writing intensive course. An introduction to the principles of paleontology as well as the taxonomy, morphology and biostratigraphy of major invertebrate and vertebrate fossil groups. Special topics in evolution will be discussed.

This course is designed to introduce business and economics students to business terminology and concepts which they would encounter in German-speaking countries or in German/Swiss/Austrian companies doing business in the U.S. or elsewhere.

German classic and new wave film is examined for cultural, artistic and linguistic merit. Films based on literary masterpieces of writers such as Schiller and T. Mann are studied as well as films created in the last 25 years by new wave directors Herzog, Wenders and Schlondorff. Prerequisite: German 202. (not offered on a regular basis) Co-listed as FILM 315.

The development of German narrative fiction from 1700 to the present. Critical reading and analysis of tales, stories and novellas by eighteenth, nineteenth and twentieth century authors are included. This course is taught in German.

A study of the content of the elementary and middle/secondary school curriculum in health with emphasis on unique teaching techniques. Emphasis will also be placed on emergency medical procedures unique to elementary school children.

Designed to provide an understanding of the content and methodology of teaching sexuality education and family life education in the school setting. Personal value development regarding topics related to sexuality (e.g. gender roles, sexual orientation, healthy relationships, conflict resolution) will be explored.

Designed as a supplement to students' required course work. This course allows students the opportunity for an in-depth study of issues and/or problems in health education. Prerequisite: consent of instructor.

This course is a survey of the history of the interdependence of cultures, religions, politics, ecologies, and economies in the Mediterranean region from late prehistory to the present. Offered every fall semester or on demand.

An introduction to various career options and methodologies used by historians who do not teach. The topics covered include museum management, oral history, historic preservation, archival management, television and business applications.

The course is an exploration of the major ideas and writers in the middle period of western political philosophy. The course covers the period from the Renaissance through the mid-nineteenth century and emphasizes the ideas of Machiavelli, Moore, Hobbes, Locke, Rousseau, Kant, Hegel, Marx and Mill.

The course is an exploration of the major ideas and writers in the recent period of western political philosophy. The course covers the period from the mid-nineteenth century to the present and emphasizes the ideas of Nietzsche, Pragmatism, Freud, Ortega, Arendt, Existentialism, Phenomenology and Post-Structuralism.

East and Northern Africa from the time of the Prophet Muhammad to c. 1500. The course will familiarize students with the fundamentals of Islamic religion, politics, culture, and economy. Offered every other Fall semester.

History. This course covers the social, political, economic and intellectual developments with specific reference to the first and second party systems, slavery and abolitionism, the reform movements and the industrial revolution.

This advanced course will examine major shifts in national history focusing on economic, political, social and cultural developments. Special emphasis will be given to the closing of the frontier, industrialization, the rise of corporate capitalism and the consumer culture, urbanization and immigration.

This advanced course will examine key political, economic, social and cultural developments of the cold war and post cold war era. Emphasis will be given to developing cold war policies and their national and global effects (especially in Korea, Vietnam and Latin America); the collapse of the liberal consensus; social movements of the 1960s; Watergate and its aftermath; the rise of conservatism and the culture of consumerism; and shifts in the post cold war national agenda.

The course provides an intensive training experience in an aspect of the work of historical agencies such as curating, exhibit work, registration, interpretation and administration. Prerequisite: Sophomore or above and consent of instructor and approval by the Dean, College of Arts and Sciences. (F,Sp).

A two-week study tour course designed to acquaint participants with the historical landscape of Colonial America by direct involvement in visiting these historic parts of the United States under the guidance of an experienced professor.

This course is required of all participants, preferably in the first year of enrollment. It will include an orientation to the Honors Program and other topics selected by the instructor. This course may be repeated.

Service learning means unpaid service work that will benefit the community and provide a significant learning experience for the student. One credit of service learning equals 45 hours of actual service learning experience. This independent experience must be documented as to the amount of time contributed and the learning component completed. This course is repeatable and graded on a pass/fail basis.

Required of all participants during junior or senior year. Participants must submit a project proposal outlining their research hypotheses, methodologies, and expected outcomes, and suggest appropriate faculty reviewers to the Honors Director for approval before commencing their work. Each project will be evaluated by three faculty chosen by the student and approved by the Honors Director.

Projects may be graded pass/fail at the student's request. Projects undertaken for departmental senior seminars may be accepted as honors theses/projects at the discretion of the department and the Honors Director.

The effects of environmental factors such as light, temperature, and moisture on growth and yield are examined. The laboratory provides an opportunity to closely examine and carry out experiments on plant material. Lab fee required.

This course emphasizes the basic fundamentals and practical cultural practices for successfully growing horticultural plants in the home and garden as well as in commercial production situations. The theoretical basis for these practices will be stressed. Prerequisites: HORT or CROP 161, or consent of instructor.

This course provides a survey of current plant tissue culture methodologies and applications. Topics covered include: rapid clonal propagation, protoplast fusion and cell culture, haploid plant generation, disease indexing, and shoot tip micro-grafting. Students will gain hands on experience in a plant tissue culture laboratory. A useful course for biotechnology and graduate school-bound students. Prerequisites: CROP or HORT 161, or HORT 200, or consent of instructor.

An advanced professional work experience with a cooperating employer. Individualized learning objectives are established for each participant. The completion of a special project at the internship site is an integral part of the experience.

Study the geological history and development of Southern England, including coastal erosion and deposition that are currently modifying the area. Evolving garden design and botanical diversity will be studied during visits to historic and modern English gardens.

This course is designed as an integrated study of Absolutism in France, and the Age of Enlightenment in Europe, the French Revolution and Romanticism, Realism and the Industrial Revolution, Nationalism, modernism in the arts, the Russian Revolution and the rise of totalitarianism, socially committed art, and existentialism.

A General Education course designed for senior students. This course is designed to give students an understanding of the assumptions and methodologies of the scientific approach to knowledge and the impact of scientific ideas on society.

A practical introduction to radio production using field and studio equipment with an emphasis on the technical skills used in news, public affairs and documentary production. A course fee of $20 for audio supplies will be added to tuition.

Students will receive intensive training in editing news material for print media using a desktop publishing program. Editing skills include writing headlines, cutlines and news digests; editing copy, photography and graphic art; and making news judgements based on legal, ethical and diversity issues.

Students will learn how to construct and edit a news website modeled on the best practices of journalism. This hands-on course will cover live editing, writing styles, legal and ethical issues, media convergence, and website organization and design.

Students will report for one of the student news media outlets. Student stories will be critiqued in class. Additional class discussions will cover current issues in journalism and the characteristics of various news media formats. Students will present a portfolio of their work at the end of the semester. This course may be repeatable once, totaling a maximum of 4 credits.

This course includes a thorough examination of media management principles and operations. It will study newspapers, radio, television and Internet by focusing on organizational structures, consolidation, and promotional and positioning efforts. (Sp, alternate years).

Topics will be drawn from areas related to Marketing Communications and may include subjects such as media relations, graphics design in media, special events planning, corporate communications or promotional strategies. Course subjects will be announced in advance. Prerequisite: Junior standing.

A senior level discussion of current marketing communications issues. In addition, techniques for preparing for careers in marketing communications will be emphasized with practical application projects. Portfolio presentations will also be included.

Properties of the real number system, relations, functions, solution of equations and solution of inequalities. Special attention is given to the analysis and graphing of linear, quadratic, polynomial, exponential and logarithmic functions.

An introduction to mathematical programming as supported by computer algebra software packages such as Mathematica or Maple. Topics covered include familiarity with front end commands, basic algebraic operations, graphics, animation, data processing, recursion and pattern matching, as well as the implementation of various classical algorithms such as Newton's method and the generation of fractals.

An introductory course in applied statistics, covering such topics as descriptive statistics, elementary probability, sampling and sampling distributions and hypothesis testing. May not be taken for credit if Econ. 226 has been taken.

This course will extend concepts introduced in other math classes, and present new topics of importance in the current school mathematics curriculum. Topics will be chosen from the areas of modeling, problem-solving, set theory, logic, the real number system, number theory, functions and graphing, geometry, measurement, probability, and data analysis. Prerequisite: MATH 246 and 247 or MATH 236.

This course will provide an introduction to mathematical problem solving, via the programming language logo, giving pre-service teachers the necessary background for teaching mathematics with the support of a problem solving language.

A temporary paid job (usually lasting for one semester or summer) providing pre-professional experience in an off-campus business or institution. The job must provide practical applications of mathematics-related skills and personal growth in these skills. Selected students will be matched with sponsoring organizations and a job description and evaluation method will be negotiated for each opportunity.

Introductory course that examines decisions made in creating products and services to meet consumer needs in a changing business environment. Topics include consumer and organizational markets, market segmentation, targeting, positioning, product development, pricing, distribution, and promotion.

Strategies for keeping business, institutional, and government customers by understanding their needs and buying practices are analyzed. The role of global strategic alliances, adding value, and creative problem solving are emphasized.

Planning and managing strategic marketing programs within the context of fundamental business objectives. Topics include: environmental analysis, market segmentation, targeting, positioning, and marketing mix strategies for each stage of the product life cycle. This class employs case analysis. Prerequisites: Senior standing, MKTG 310, FINC 345.

The course covers international activities of small and medium-sized firms as well as large multinational corporations. Topics include trade strategies, doing business with newly emerging market economies, the policy aspects of international business, reflecting the U.S. government and international institutions and functional areas of international business management. Prerequisite: MNGT 300.

Managers today are taking a more active role in designing and implementing information systems that meet their needs. The course takes a managerial approach to information systems concepts and applications. Ethical and global issues are discussed.

Windows applications. They can build professional-looking applications using the graphical user interface of windows even if they have no previous training or experience in computer programming. Prerequisites: ECON 205 or MATH 156.

This course has three components: a Mexican study seminar during the fall semester preceding the Mexican experience; a three-week period of group travel which explores major archeological, historical and cultural sites in Mexico; a paper dealing with the Mexican people and their immigrant experience in the U.S.A.

This course provides an overview and hands-on application of basic sound reinforcement and recording techniques and practices, digital audio editing and manipulation, and conversion of digital audio on to compact disc media.

This laboratory course provides opportunity for students to explore their voice as singers of musical theatre literature. Students will develop skills in vocal characterization and independence of the vocal mechanism during stage movement.

This is a writing intensive course. The development of the western musical style from 1750 to the early 20th century will be examined. Both secular and sacred music will be discussed through works of the major composers of this period.

The study of music in world cultures as a form of artistic expression and symbol of historical as well as national identity, recognizing the interrelationships between music and society in terms of function, context, and structure through both the "insider's view" and the comparative "outsider's view."

These courses provide private instruction in voice, keyboard instruments, and all orchestral and band instruments. It is assumed that students who wish to apply credit toward a major or minor in music will have had previous training and that the materials studied will be of collegiate level. All students must demonstrate basic performance competence through an audition for the instructor.

Private instruction is given to qualified music majors and minors to fulfill specific degree requirements. All Education and Broad Area Music Majors must take one applied area for 2 credits per semester. Liberal Arts Music Majors, Music Minors, and non-majors/minors may only take applied for 1 credit. If there is room in the instructor's schedule, non-music majors and minors may take applied lessons but must register for applied sections 6, 7, or 8 and pay a course fee of $150 per credit. Prerequisite: consent of instructor and previous training.

An activity course for individuals interested in developing skills necessary to participate in in-line skating as a lifetime, aerobic activity. Students will be required to bring their own in-line skates, safety equipment (helmet, elbow pads, hand protection, and knee pads), and appropriate work-out clothing.

An introductory movement class which will include a variety of stretching techniques in order to increase flexibility, relaxation exercises to aid in stress reduction, conditioning methods which can keep the body healthy and prevent injury, and basic movement vocabulary to enhance body awareness and motor efficiency.

An activity course for the beginning/intermediate volleyball player. The majority of time will be spent on development of the basic skills required in volleyball, learning the rules of the game, and applying what is learned in actual play.

The standard American Red Cross course designed to prepare the student to assume teaching responsibilities at all levels of swimming. Prerequisites: must be at least 17 years of age at the start of the course and must be able to perform the following strokes: front crawl, back crawl, side stroke, elementary back stroke, and breast stroke. There will be a special course fee for this class.

Information regarding safety, motivational issues, organizational concerns, administrative duties, conditioning programs, psychological factors and coaching philosophy will be presented Prerequisite: P ED 149 or consent of instructor.

This course provides an opportunity for in-depth study of contemporary issues, programs or practices in physical education. Depending upon the specific topic of study, the content of the course may focus on research findings, theoretical advances, or practical applications of research and theory as they affect physical education in schools. Because of its focus on contemporary issues the course is appropriate for teacher education students in training and experienced teachers who desire in-depth training in a specific area. (not offered on a yearly basis).

Basic principles and practices of developing and administering the physical education, athletic and sport management programs. Course will primarily focus on administrative theories, principles, financial management, legal liability, risk management, facility management and planning, public relations, and leadership.

This course is designed as a culminating course prior to student teaching or the internship experience. Methods and materials for the evaluation of students in physical education and human performance will be experienced, including written assessments and performance tests. Selected utilization of computers for data storage and manipulation is also included. The completion of the student professional portfolio and interview portfolio will be a requirement for successful completion of the course. The portfolio will be presented in electronic format. This course will provide students the opportunity to experience mock interviews and develop resume writing and presentation skills useful in job searching and other post-graduate situations. Prerequisite: Senior standing.

Philosophical examination of selected issues in professional journalism, public relations, and marketing communication: the aims of journalism, journalistic "objectivity," advertising ethics, newsworthiness vs. privacy vs. sensationalism, ethics of photojournalism, public relations and the public interest.

Philosophers of the Age of Enlightenment express views on topics in the philosophy of science, like a possible scientific explanation of the mind and its interaction with the body, whether causal explanations in science are objectively valid, whether mathematical premises (like the exioms of Euclid) are merely hypothetical constructs of self evident claims, the nature of scientific explanation, and the nature of space and time. Does modern science refute or support these views?

Meaning, pattern, objectivity, and explanation in history, illustrated by the work of selected ancient and modern historians. Prerequisites: graduate or senior standing. Qualified juniors may be admitted with consent of instructor.

Fundamental ideas of motion,and topics selected from heat, fluids, sound, light, electricity and modern physics are used to develop analytical thought. Written laboratory reports are required. Meets the General Education laboratory requirement.

Designed to apply toward the general education science requirement, this course examines the fundamental ideas from the dawn of time to the space age about the Earth, Moon, planets and constellations. The origin and evolution of the solar system, stars, black holes, quasars, galaxies and the universe are covered.

This course provides an understanding of the dynamics of particles and rigid bodies. The topics included are kinematics, kinetics, work and energy methods, impulse and momentum methods in two and three dimensions including rotation.

This is a writing intensive course. This laboratory familiarizes students with the statistical analysis of experimental data. Emphasis is placed on experimental design to minimize experimental uncertainty. Early in the semester experiments illustrating and applying Gaussian and Poisson statistics, least-squares fitting and propagation of errors are performed. These techniques are then used in experiments on advanced mechanical systems. Extensive use is made of computers in the analysis.

Electronics: Digital Circuit Theory and Applications A course structured as lecture and closely coordinated laboratory. Lecture topics include: Boolean Algebra, number systems, data formats, combinatorial and sequential logic, Karnough Mapping, timing diagrams, and an introduction to computer based circuit analysis. The basics of instrumentation busses and microprocessor architecture, programming, and interfacing are also covered. The laboratory investigates logic families, gates, counters, adders, decoders, shift registers, busses and microprocessor programming and interfacing. Prerequisites: PHYS 162 or 152 or consent of instructor.

This course is designed as a detailed study of curriculum materials available to the secondary school teacher. Emphasis is on laboratory procedures and innovative teaching strategies at the secondary level. Prerequisite: consent of instructor.

This course is designed as a study of vector analysis through Stokes', Green's, and the divergence theorems; curvilinear coordinates; series solutions of differential equations; complex variables with emphasis on integration in the complex plane.

A short term apprenticeship (usually lasting for one summer) with a business or government organization. The student learns to perform the tasks of a regular employee, applying theoretical knowledge and research to practical situations.

Through this course, students can have an opportunity to work with a physics department staff member on an ongoing research project of mutual interest. The area of research is determined by the nature of projects currently underway.

The course may be repeated. It is expected that the student will spend three hours per week during the entire semester per credit earned. A total of three credits may be applied to a physics major and two credits to a physics minor.

This course provides an exploration of the field of public administration and the growth of government and bureaucratic power in the U.S. The distinctive features of public goods and services, decision-making and leadership in the public sector, program evaluation and termination are presented and discussed.

United States. Topics include: the development of federalism, political cultures of the states, components of the policymaking process, selected contemporary policy issues at the state and local levels, and state and local budgetary politics.

This course will explore changes that have occurred in the American polity as a result of the increasingly dominant role played by the mass media in framing American politics. The course will focus on the implications of these changes for the meaning and practice of democratic politics. The course will take a broad perspective on the mass media and will include discussions of the impact of popular culture, as well as that of the news media, on American politics.

The course is designed as a survey of many areas of law which have a significant impact on the lives of American women, including employment, marriage, divorce, reproduction, education and criminal justice. Emphasis on legal issues concerning discrimination against both women and men. Prerequisite: upper class standing.

This course is an introduction to the psychology major, and psychology-related disciplines and careers, with guest lectures by staff members from Psychology, the Career Center, and other campus offices. Students will begin to develop a professional portfolio, write a paper on potential psychology-related careers, and participate in departmental events and assessment activities.

This course examines several approaches to the study of animal behavior including ethology, comparative psychology and sociobiology. The course also examines the methods used to collect data and surveys the contribution of developmental, social, ecological and evolutionary processes to animal behavior. Students will independently observe naturally occurring behavior and analyze their observations.

This internship program places selected students in human service agencies, businesses, industries, or organizations to provide opportunities to apply their knowledge of psychology. The Internship site must be approved in advance of the work experience by the psychology department. The intern's duties and responsibilities will be tailored to the needs of the sponsoring organization and the background of the student. Prerequisites: 60 semester hour credits (at least 20 credits in psychology), 2.5 G.PA., and consent of department internship supervisor.

This course is an introductory course of the developmental disability of mental retardation. The definition and characteristics of the learner with mental retardation is examined as well as the issues of normalization, individual rights, assessment, family issues and transition from school to community life. Field experience which can be used to meet Human Relations requirements (for Education majors) is a requirement of the course. Prerequisite: PSYC 330.

This course serves as a survey of the field of education for school aged high potential students. A variety of gifted education topics is explored including the historical development of services, definitions and identification, program options, teaching strategies, creativity, and critical thinking. Field experience which can be used to meet Human Relations requirements (for Education majors) is a requirement of the course. Prerequisite: PSYC 330.

This is the test-out section of Fundamentals of Oral Communication 101. Students first must complete, with a grade of "B" or better, a comprehensive exam over the course text. They then must demonstrate strong communication competence by successfully preparing and delivering a 10 minute extemporaneous speech.

Students will learn the fundamentals of acting through improvisation, scene study, and performance. Topics such as character analysis, basic stage movement and voice techniques will be covered. The course includes both theory and practice.

Students will study the theory and practice of the basic elements and techniques used in theatrical design. These elements include script analysis, research, and conceptual development and then application of the techniques of drawing, figure drawing, drafting, and color theory. Art and makeup materials are required.

An intensive six week (2 credits) to eight week (3 credits) workshop in theatre arts designed especially for eligible high school students or entering freshmen with a strong interest in theatre. Participants will have an opportunity to take advantage of the laboratory provided by St. Croix Valley Summer Theatre.

The public speaking course is a performance class that will include giving several speeches aimed at different objectives in a variety of settings. It will include the study of speeches given by others locally, nationally, and historically.

An intensive four week (1 credit) to eight week (3 credits) laboratory experience in theatre arts performance, design, and/or production techniques. Students will participate as members of the university summer stock theatre operation in preassigned duties including acting, theatrical design, construction, management, and/or sales activities. Prerequisite: Consent of instructor.

Students will analyze factors which have significant influence in the total communication process, e.g., the influence of environmental factors, the effects of physical behavior, the effects of vocal cues which accompany spoken words, and the various methods of observing and recording nonverbal communication.

The emphasis of this course is on similarities and differences in the communicative behaviors of women and men. The class will address such topics as female-male roles and stereotypes; differences in female-male verbal and nonverbal codes; partnership styles and alternatives; specific communication skills aimed at female-male relationships in a variety of settings; and special problem areas in female-male communication. Prerequisite: SCTA 284 or consent of instructor.

A practical approach to the planning and promotion of safety education as a desired way of life as it applies to the home, school and community. A close look at the natural instincts of self-protection and how one can develop, improve, and maintain skills, habits and attitudes that will promote safety in one's life.

The course provides an analysis of sport and leisure in the United States from the standpoint of its socioeconomic impact and relevance, contemporary social organization, social psychological processes, and issues such as violence, inequality, sports and education, and social values. Prerequisites: SOCI 100, PSYC 101, or consent of instructor.

This course examines the historical and present-day relationships within and among six crucial factors of social ecology: population, social organization, human values, environment, resources, and technology. Questions of an ethical and policy nature are raised regarding the above factors and the human condition.

This course is a sociological examination of the aging process, societal implications, and societal reactions to the aged. It will also help the student learn how to deal more successfully with aging parents/grandparents and how to age successfully themselves. Prerequisites: SOCI 100 or ANTH 100. (F).

Emphasis is placed on organizational processes such as differentiation, integration and the allocation of power within modern bureaucracy. Consideration is also given to the work attitudes of job satisfaction and organizational commitment as well as the changing nature of occupations in modern industrial society.

The study of major changes in rural life especially the changing demographic profiles in the United States and the developing world. Analysis of the impact of change on the family and other social institutions and sources of cohesion and conflict in the rural community. Rural development intervention will be studied. Prerequisite: SOCI 100 or ANTH 100.

This course requires on-campus study of Belize peoples, wildlife, and habitats followed by a spring break tour to Belize. Students are immersed in a variety of environmental settings to improve their appreciation of cultural and biological diversity. Sample rainforest activities include trekking, canoeing, cave exploration, and visits to Mayan temples. The reef component focuses on the marine environment, and includes sailing and snorkeling. There are opportunities for SCUBA certification.

This course is an examination of the social determinants of individual behavior with emphasis on theories of socialization and social learning, processes of social influence, interpersonal attraction, aggression, conformity, attitude and behavior change, and altruism. A variety of theoretical perspectives are presented for evaluation. Prerequisites: SOCI 200 or PSYC 101, 15 total credits of sociology or psychology or consent of instructor, and junior/senior standing.

For majors and minors in sociology or criminal justice seeking some special experience and background relating to sociology or criminal justice. Students must complete an application and receive departmental approval before registering.

A lecture and field study of the characteristics that make hydric soils and wetlands unique environments. Formation and interaction between hydric soils, wetland vegetation, and hydrology creating specific wetland types will be studied.

The course provides a detailed study of soil properties in the field, identifying and recording soil differences on maps, interpreting soil properties for specific uses, understanding soil formation and weathering, and integrating information into a comprehensive classification system. Prerequisite: SOIL 210 or equivalent.

The physical properties of soils, their behavior, prediction, and management will be examined. The course includes discussion of the principles which govern the behavior of the soil/water system in relation to plant growth and land use.

It will include an examination of required skills, settings for practice, client populations, special issues, history of social work services, current social service programs and policies, and how social work differs from other professions.

African American, Hispanic and Hmong persons as well as content on other minority populations including women; people who are gay, lesbian, or bisexual, as well as persons with disabilities. Although this course is taught from a social work perspective, it is appropriate for all students considering helping professions.

This course focuses on mental health systems in Wisconsin and Minnesota as well as the role of the federal government. The mental health laws of the two states, the delivery of services, the role of mental health professionals (including social workers), the role of managed care, private and public collaboration, advocacy groups, research organizations (NIMH) etc. will be addressed. The systems perspective will be the theoretical base. The course will review the medical model, the strengths perspective and issues within the mental health community.

This course focuses on the issues of suicide and euthanasia in the United States as well as utilizing a more global perspective with a comparison with other countries as appropriate. Life crisis, stress, perfectionism, role loss, physical loss, mental loss, etc will be important components of the class. Both suicide and euthanasia will be studied with an emphasis on adolescents, elderly, race and ethnicity. Prevention, intervention, and follow-up services will be addressed.

The course is designed for social work majors. Student must complete an application and receive department approval before registering. Students are limited to two credits per semester and a total of four credits. Prerequisite: junior status.

A language proficiency course that builds intercultural communication skills through the study of highlights of the literature of Spain from the writers called the Generation of 1898 to the present. The course is taught in Spanish.

This is a writing intensive course that develops an understanding of psychological theories in education. It includes development, learning, applications of learning theory, motivation, classroom management, individual differences and evaluation/assessment.

It is designed to provide an understanding of the interrelatedness of the theories of child development and an understanding of the important factors that affect the young child's development. Emphasis of this course lies in observational, recording and evaluation techniques of the young child's individual development.

This course is designed to provide students with an opportunity to gain a meaningful understanding of multicultural education. Students will study the effects and influence of cultural diversity in American education. The topics of cultural diversity include ethnicity and race, gender, SES, religion, exceptionality, language, and learning styles. Students will also study current affairs that influence the educational decisions as they relate to multicultural education.

The purpose of this course is to provide opportunity for intensive and systematic study of the skills required to communicate successfully. Coupled with each skill component will be a practical and realistic demonstration of current teaching practices known to be effective in teaching the language arts in grades K-9.

Emphasis will be placed on specific methods, instructional materials and evaluation procedures. Opportunities will be provided for students to use a wide variety of manipulative materials and to become actively involved in their own learning.

This course provides students with a comprehensive examination of infant/toddler programs. The course content includes developmental theories as they relate to the nurturance of infant/toddlers, curriculum planning for the very young, curriculum resources and materials, health and safety standards, and evaluation of infant/toddler program models. Prerequisite: TED 211; Co-requisite: TED 225.

This course acquaints students with the theory and background for using developmentally appropriate practices with pre-kindergarten children. Students study effective methods and materials to develop concepts, skills and values in early childhood settings. Pre-practicum experience provides opportunity to observe and work with children and families while under the guidance of a cooperating teacher and with instructor consultation. Prerequisite: TED 225. Materials fee required.

This introductory course is designed to provide educators with an overview of instructional applications of computers and an outline of the teacher's role in the evaluation, application and management of instructional software; treatment of topics includes the capabilities of instructional software, instructional programming, and the impact of technology on school curriculum and policy. Students will demonstrate an application of the microcomputer in an instructional setting.

This course provides thorough analysis of the knowledge base and current practice in middle/secondary school literacy in the content areas. Emphasis is on curriculum integration, current technology and strategies that enable students to become independent learners. Special emphasis is on individual differences among readers as well as the social and political implications of global literacy perspectives.

This course is designed to prepare students to teach health education as a part of a Comprehensive School Health Education program. Students will design lessons as well as practice and reflect on strategies and methods for teaching health education. Although instructional techniques are emphasized, other professional considerations (e.g., professional growth, professional organization and publications, resources, use of technology) are incorporated in the course structure. Field experience required (25 hours). Prerequisite: Admission to Teacher Education.

Students develop their competence in designing, implementing and evaluating lessons in a variety of instructional units. Emphasis is placed on developing ability to utilize a variety of teaching methods and strategies, and reflective analysis of focused observation data collection techniques designed to evaluate student and teacher behaviors, student learning, and student-teacher interactions.

This course explores theoretical, historical and sociological perspectives on the foundations of functional literacy, literacy disorders, holistic assessment and intervention. Emphasis is on the importance of individual differences in reading proficiency, the causes of literacy disorders, and methods for the improvement of general and specific reading difficulties. This course will examine the changing roles of family, community, and institutions in literacy acquisition as a process.

This course addresses a variety of topics in women's studies. Topics may change with each offering, although some may be repeated. Possible topics could include anthropology and gender, sexuality in culture, and feminist theory.

In order to be admitted to the College of Education, the student needs to be evaluated and recommended by the Chemistry Education Advisory Committee. Contact the Chemistry Department chair for further information.

Note: Substitution of other courses for degree requirements is possible upon application and approval by the department. This is on a case-by-case basis and particularly may affect students who change to a chemistry major or who transfer to UW-RF. Students should confer with their advisor and/or the department chair.

Courses in the major or required supporting courses may be double counted to satisfy the General Education science requirements. Therefore, the total General Education credit hour requirement is reduced by the courses that can be double-counted.

This major is awarded jointly with a B.S. in engineering after the student has successfully completed a three-year program at UW-River Falls with a minimum grade point average of 3.0 and a two-year program at either UW Madison or the University of Minnesota.

FREE Service For Employers: You are cordially invited to utilize the facilities of Career Services at the University of Wisconsin - River Falls. We would be happy to host you or your representative for on-campus interviews on the date you select. Please view our on-campus recruitment web page for more information.

FREE Service For Employers: Does your company have an open job or internship position? List your vacant positions with us! We provide graduating seniors and alumni access to an online vacancy list of job openings provided by employers. We also send each academic department a copy of this vacancy list for posting within their department.

FREE Service For Employers: Looking for the right candidate for an open position? Let us connect you with qualified candidates! Our continuously growing database of graduating seniors and alumni allow us to find qualified candidates who match your position descriptions.

Looking for the right employee? Let us connect you with a qualified UWRF candidate! A database of graduating seniors and alumni registered with UWRF Career Services is updated regularly, allowing us to email qualified candidate resumes to employers in minutes.

Services welcome the opportunity to serve as guest speakers for your classes, and/or the student organizations that you advise. Here is a list of some of the career and personal development topics we can address in our presentations, which can be adapted based on your preferences.

To schedule a class presentation and/or a tour, you can either call us at x3572 or submit an email request. Two weeks' advance notice is greatly appreciated, although we do our best to accommodate last-minute requests. If you are planning to be out of the office for a conference, or need to cancel your class due to illness, you may also want to contact us to serve as guest speakers instead.

In order to participate  in the below interviews, you must register with Career Services by completing your online Hire A Falcon account. During the registration process you will be asked to upload your resume, so have a copy of your current resume handy when complete the Hire A Falcon registration process.

Northwestern's Doctor of Chiropractic program is a full-time day program consisting of more than 4,300 credit hours over 10 trimesters. The University admits new chiropractic students in January and September of each calendar year.

For nearly three decades University Directories has been offering students from all areas of study the opportunity to take their classroom knowledge and apply it in a hands-on experience. We offer several internship opportunities. The Sales Internships are available nationwide. Advertising Design, Customer Relations and Inside Sales Internships are only available in our Chapel Hill, NC headquarters.

Each October, UW-River Falls hosts an all-campus Career Fair. Students of all majors and levels of study are encouraged to attend. Students can learn about possible career paths from the many organizations attending, and make valuable employer contacts for internships and full-time positions. Graduate schools also host tables at this event. Business professional attire is recommended, and students are encouraged to bring copies of their resumes.

The Etiquette Dinner is a popular event hosted once each semester. In addition to enjoying a delicious five-course dinner, attendees receive hands-on training for appropriate dining and business etiquette. Advance reservations are required to attend. Business professional attire is encouraged.

Flash us your resume and we'll give you some beads! During Mardi Gras week, Career Services staff and student workers, dressed in Mardi Gras outfits, provide walk-in resume, cover letter, and portfolio assistance to students.

A resume itself is not likely to result in a job offer. It is a tool to help you obtain a job interview. You do not need to include everything you have experienced, just enough to interest an employer in meeting you in person. The test of a good resume is whether or not you are getting interviews. The process of writing a resume is good preparation for a job search. It encourages you to review your accomplishments and identify those experiences that are relevant to your job target and are likely to interest a potential employer.

There is no one right way to write a resume. Within each profession there are expectations of what a "good" resume will look like. Some employers look for evidence of a well-rounded individual. Others look for a concrete focus supported with relevant experience, while others are impressed with accomplishments that show stability and long term commitment. Some attitudes tend to be occupation-specific. Have your resume critiqued by someone in your target profession. If you are looking for jobs in more than one field, you may need more than one resume.

Don't limit the resume content to just your work experience. There are many transferable skills that you develop through volunteer positions, involvement in student and professional organizations, and through class projects. In many cases, we do our best work on volunteer positions as they involve activities we really enjoy doing.

Make sure that your resume and cover letter have no typing or grammatical errors. Employers consistently cite this as the first reason why they eliminate an applicant. The care with which you present yourself suggests the care with which you would approach your work.

You may not end up using all of this in your resume, but it is important to get it all on paper to consider it. Once you have determined what to include on your resume, it will be easier to choose a format that best highlights your relevant skills and experiences.

Education: List schools attended, dates, courses taken, degrees, special projects, subjects, extra-curricular activities, other special courses taken and dates, special skills developed, and academic accomplishments.

Work History: Start with your most recent job and work backwards. List such information as the name, city and state of your employer, job title, dates of employment, duties, skills developed and accomplishments. The phrases (accomplishment statements) you use to describe your experiences are the most important part of your resume. This is where you have the opportunity to market yourself and show the results of your work-related efforts.

Name Block: It is preferred for you to use your full first name. Avoid using nicknames which are "cutesy" or "pet names." Your address should not contain abbreviations, and make sure your phone number includes the area code. Also, provide a phone number where you can be reached at all times, either by an answering machine, or an alternate number. Make sure your name stands out ---use a slightly larger, bolded font.

Employment/Career Objective: An employment objective should be stated only if you have a specific career goal in mind or if you know the exact title of the position for which you are applying. It should be concise, not flowery and philosophical. By using an objective, you may limit the number of jobs that will fit the objective.

Employment History: Usually the guideline here is to list your most recent job first, and include jobs you have had in the last ten years. Since the employer will read your resume from the top to the bottom, it may be better for you to highlight your most relevant experience first, followed by your other experiences.

Organizations/Affiliations: List organizational memberships which are related to your job goals and show professional standings. Avoid non-employment related or controversial organizations. Generally, it is best not to mention any involvement with a specific religious or political affiliation, or other potentially controversial groups unless they directly relate to the job you want.

Education: If the emphasis is on employment, list your education last and include only the basic details. If the emphasis is on education, (i.e. a recent graduate), then your education section should go first.

If you are worried about age discrimination, don't list your date of graduation. Omit your high school diploma if you have taken any higher education classes. Even if you haven't graduated, include any job related courses you have completed. Include specialized training you may have received from previous employment or independent studies.

Many Fortune 500 companies have now begun to use computers to sort out the thousands of resumes they receive. This process has forced job applicants to observe some changes in the way they write their resumes.

The companies who use technology to sort through resumes use online application forms or scanners to input resume information into a database, then use sophisticated programs to "read" what has been inputted. When open positions appear, employers query the database for resumes using keyword-specific words which relate to the open position.

Most individuals are surprised to learn that there are many different ways to organize the information you include on a resume. Ideally, your resume should be organized to highlight areas of relevancy to the type of job or career to which you are applying, emphasizing the skills, experience and personal attributes sought by the employer.

Letters play a very important role in a job search. They serve as an introduction to your resume, an inquiry about possible vacancies, a request for information or a follow-up to an interview. Many job seekers concentrate their efforts on developing a resume, but dedicate little time to writing effective letters. While a resume is important, a letter is another opportunity to introduce yourself and market your qualifications to a potential employer. Below are 2 types of cover letters.

This type of letter is used to apply for SPECIFIC positions and accompanies your resume. It gives you an opportunity to introduce yourself to an employer and provides a link between the job and the skills you have to offer that position.

A letter should inform the reader why he or she is receiving your resume. If you have already spoken to them by phone or in person, note this in your letter. Hiring officials talk to many applicants each day. Do not assume they will remember you.

When applying for a specific position, your letter should explain how your qualifications match the qualifications listed in the job posting. The closer a match there is between the employer's requirements and your background, the more likely you will be contacted for an interview.

Letters should be professional, yet written creatively enough to attract the attention of the reader. If a position is widely advertised, an employer might receive over 100 letters and resumes. A well-written letter could determine whether or not your resume will be reviewed.

Dr. Sievert, Chairperson of the History Department of University of Wisconsin-River Falls, recommended that I contact you concerning a Research Associate position with your organization. I am graduating this month and would like to begin working immediately.

As my resume indicates, I majored in U.S. Studies, an interdisciplinary program with a comprehensive research component. I am knowledgeable in research techniques, library searches, and have often worked from original source documents. In my junior year, I completed an independent research project on the sociological impact of child labor on the family unit in rural Minnesota in the early 1900's. This project helped expand my knowledge of social service research and in-depth investigative principles.

This letter of application for the position of secondary Language Arts teacher expresses a sincere interest in interviewing and working for the public school system of Saint Paul. Enclosed is my application form and resume. A credential file and transcript are being sent to your office.

As an English teacher, I bring real world experience to this position. Having successfully owned and operated a business, my practical knowledge and survival skills are extensive. My background has encompasses rich and varied experiences that have utilized the English language to function in society. Saint Paul's motto of "lifelong learning" has been my experience.

I also have all the qualities for an English Language Arts and Literature teacher, expressed in my innate appreciation and love of the language. Reading and writing have always be fundamental aspects of my life and, thus, my teaching. As a person, I combine thoughtful intelligence with empathetic concern. As a teacher, I incorporate firm expectations of my students into a flexible approach of addressing students' individual learning styles. My students appreciate the diversity expressed in my classroom. Regarding professional relationships, I have been commended for using tact and diplomacy in dealing with staff, administration and parents.

Recently, the state of Minnesota imposed guidelines regarding mandates for the year 2000. The challenge of working with students in the Saint Paul School District to ensure that they can meet state mandated evaluations interests me. I will work to implement the "road to change" that Saint Paul advocated throughout the school district.

Please consider my application and resume, as well as my credential file and references. If you need any further information, call me collect. I look forward to an interview to discuss how my qualifications are suited to your school district.

Letters of interest are sent to organizations to investigate POSSIBLE job vacancies. State your reason for inquiry in the letter. How did you find out about the organization? What prompted you to send a letter? Did you receive a referral from someone who works at the organization?

It is important to follow these letters with a phone call, since you may never receive a response if no positions exist. In your letter, state the day you will be contacting the person. Then make sure you follow-up as promised. Allow 1 to 1 1/2 weeks from the time you send the letter to the day you will make contact.

Opening paragraph: State why you are writing, identify the position for which you would like to be considered, and indicate how you heard of the position. (If you are sending a letter of interest which is not in response to a specific job opening, simply indicate the type of work you are seeking). Be specific.

Closing paragraph: End your letter by clarifying what will happen next and how they can most easily reach you. Whenever it is possible, you want to take the next step yourself. You might say, "I look forward to meeting with you to discuss my qualifications in more detail. I will call you on ________ to arrange a time."

I am very interested in the Frito-Lay sales and marketing position posted in the Career and Counseling Services at University of Wisconsin - River Falls. When I graduate in June, I would like to begin a career in sales and marketing with your organization.

You will note from the enclosed resume that many of my extracurricular and work experiences involved the organization, promotion, and publicizing of events. My background includes direct sales experience soliciting potential customers for COMB Company and success in managing employees in various capacities. My most challenging and rewarding experience to date was working with Senator Grey in the organization of his last successful legislative campaign. I am confident that I have the sales and managerial skills required to be a contributing member of the Frito-Lay organization.

A letter and resume can tell you only so much about my motivation and qualifications. I welcome the opportunity to discuss my background with you in person and would travel to Dallas at my own expense to do so. I will call you at the end of next week to discuss whether such a meeting would be possible and to confirm appropriate next steps.

My educational background and experience support my sincere interest in a career in (Marketing). I am interested in a challenging opportunity with your firm, affording training and eventual advancement in (Marketing) Management.

My interest in entering a career in , and my plan to locate in your (area or city) support my request for employment consideration with your (firm). I would appreciate receiving information relative to your application procedure.

Enclosed please find the application for your (professional opportunity, teaching position) in . I have requested that my credential file be forwarded to you in support of my application for the position.

In the course of completing my (senior research paper, study) in , I became familiar with your organization's work in/with (product, research, clients). I will complete my BA degree in May of this year, and I would like to join your (quality control) staff in a position. My senior studies (field experience) dealt with (short description).

Thank you for arranging a very productive day of interviews for me (last Wednesday). I appreciated meeting and talking with members of your (marketing) and (sales) department. I was able to gain a thorough understanding of the (sales representative) position and of various facets of your training program.

Thank you for the opportunity to talk with you about (school or company name) at UW-River Falls on (date). I am most impressed with your (school system, company, training program) and the opportunities (or challenge) you presented.

I want to thank you for the opportunity I had of visiting (name of school system, company) on (day or date). I enjoyed talking with (name/s of other interviewers) and feel that you provided a most informative and attractive picture of your (Co., school). I can appreciate the opportunities as well as the challenges of (working, teaching) with/in (company or school system name).

Thank you for the invitation to visit you (school system, plant operations and office facilities). I am looking forward to visiting with you and continuing our discussion about the (career opportunities, challenges of teaching) at/in (company or town name). I will arrive at (time) on (date).

Thank you for interrupting your busy schedule on (Saturday morning, January 15) and granting me an interview. I found the interview both enjoyable and informative concerning the requirements and opportunities of a (accounting) career with (employer).

During the past four years of college, I have developed through education and experience a strong desire to find an entry level opportunity in (work area). I feel that I am equipped with a strong basic educational preparation and valuable experience supportive of my qualification for a career in .

With a BA degree in Business Administration and Computer Science, plus varied experience in (traffic) departments of local industries, I am certain I could make a positive contribution to your organization (firm).

Your opportunity demands the kind of responsibilities I seek in a career position. My experience and capabilities to supervise, communicate effectively, and to see a task to its successful completion (to "get a job done") would support my contribution to the overall functioning of your operation.

Previous experience in a variety of organizations has given me a considerable amount of confidence in my organizational abilities and inter-personal communication skills. Although I realize that each person, circumstance and problem dictates an individual approach, the background and attitude that I hold can be an asset in supporting the activities of the (society, council, YMCA).

I view the position as described in (publication) as an excellent opportunity to learn and produce, and I would welcome the chance to perform and contribute to (company name) growth as a member of your (department) staff.

I plan to be in your area (at home) during our spring recess (break) from (April 2nd to April 9th). I would appreciate an opportunity to discuss my qualifications during this time. I look forward to hearing from you relative to an interview date.

Your reference page can be sent with your cover letter and resume if it is requested. Usually, prospective employers will not check your references until you get to the interview stage. However, it may benefit you to send your list of references in the initial stage of your job search even if it has not been requested. This may create a favorable impression if your references are particularly impressive, or the employer knows someone you have listed. Be sure to bring your reference page to the interview.

For your reference page, you should have names of 3 - 5 references who will speak highly of you if an employer contacts them regarding your employability. Your references should be past employers, supervisors, or professors. Prospective employers are not interested in personal references. Make sure you ask each reference for permission to include them on your list. Tell each reference what kind of jobs you will be applying for and what skills you want them to emphasize if they get a call from a prospective employer.

Ask potential recommendation writers in person if they will be able to write a strong and favorable letter for you. Be appreciative of the person who honestly tells you that they cannot write you a strong recommendation. Remember that a well thought out letter of recommendation takes about 45-60 minutes to write.

Letters of recommendation are best written by people who know you well through a job, class, or organization. Try to choose a variety of people who know you in different capacities and can speak to your different strengths, abilities, and experiences. You might ask a professor in your major, a recent work supervisor, or someone you have worked with in an organization. Generally letters written by personal or family friends are not appropriate.

Tell the letter writers your plans or interests and how this recommendation will assist you. Remind them of your past activities and accomplishments. Encourage them to identify specific skills you may want to have mentioned and give examples when possible. If you have completed a resume, give the writer a copy.

Let the reference writer know the date by which you need the letter of recommendation completed. Try to give them at least two weeks to write the letter. Provide the writer with an addressed, stamped envelope so that there is no question of where the letter should be sent. It might be sent to you, to an employer, to a graduate school or to Career and Counseling Services at the University of Wisconsin - River Falls. You should always keep copies of your letters of recommendation.

If you are considering attending graduate or professional school sometime in the next five years, it would be wise to obtain at least two letters of recommendation from faculty members now while your class performance is still fresh in their minds. Some graduate schools prefer that you use their own letter of recommendation forms. Check with the individual school to identify their policy. When applying to very competitive programs, a letter on university departmental stationary and written to a specific school will carry more weight. Check with you letter writers to see if they are willing to do this for you.

A letter sent following an interview is not only good manners, but it also assists the employer in remembering you and your unique qualifications. A recruiter may interview many candidates throughout the day. Letters serve as a reminder. A thank-you letter also leaves the employer with a favorable impression. If the employer is having difficulty deciding between you and another candidate, a well-written thank-you letter could play an important role in that decision.

A thank you letter should be brief and simple. Two to three short paragraphs are sufficient. A concise discussion that references a particular aspect of your visit with the employer may be included. A short statement about your qualifications and continued interest in the position may also be added. A letter should be sent within 48 hours following your interview. Be sure to get the correct spelling of the person(s) who conducted the interview. It is good policy to ask for a business card at the close of an interview so you will have this information.

Middle paragraph: Discuss requirements of the position and how they match your qualifications. Mention something specific from the interview. This might be an idea you have to solve a problem or a shared interest in a goal of the organization.

Closing paragraph: Restate your interest in the job. Provide your telephone number. If you are difficult to reach, list the days and times you are at this number. You might say, "I look forward to hearing from you regarding your decision."

During college and after graduation, large purchases and expenses will inevitably be a part of your life. Although a poor decision while making a large purchase or financial decision may be costly, with informed decisions, you will avoid the most common financial pitfalls and become a success at making wise financial decisions.

AnnualCreditReport.com: Official site where you may receive a FREE copy of your credit report once each year from the 3 nationwide US reporting agencies (Equifax, Experian and Transunion). It is common for errors to exist on your credit report, so check closely, as errors could affect your eligibility for loans and the interest you pay for loans. See: things to look for in your credit report.

Consumer Reports: Tests and offers ratings and recommendations for most consumer products based on reliability and features. Product research conducted by experts. Recognized for integrity and objectiveness of research findings. In 2007, the UWRF Purchasing Services made a campus-wide username and password available - call Gail Anderson at 3232 to obtain.

Edmunds.com: Provides road test ratings of all vehicles, and offers pricing for new and used vehicles. Some vehicle dealerships use Edmunds as their source for vehicle pricing. Reliability is not tested by Edmunds.

Purchasing Health and LIfe insurance may be pricy, but living without may pave the way for financial catastrophe for you or your family in the instance of a birth, medical emergency, or death. Protect yourself by ensuring you and your family have health and life insurance, and research your options.

Most likely, when you lose your job, the last thing you are thinking about is the law. Your emotions may react to a lump sum of money, but avoid the temptation to take the money and run. Be sure the offer is fair. The law actually says that your employer must provide compensation for the amount of hours worked, any commissions earned and vacation time. It is also not uncommon for employers to be required to continue handling your health benefits, but at your expense. Employers who only offer those things listed above are only obeying the law. They are required to at least offer continued coverage and payment for hours you have worked. They should offer more than just the bare minimum because you always gave them your maximum efforts. Do not be afraid to tell your employer that they are breaking the law if they do not offer you what you deserve.

If an employer asks you to sign papers promising that you will never sue them for an extra sum of money, beware. Chances are, if an employer is asking you to sign these types of papers, he or she may feel that they have wrongfully dismissed you. If you have even the tiniest doubt over why you were terminated, do not sign any papers until you seek legal counsel. If there is any chance that they could have fired you over race, gender, age or any other affiliation, they are aware of it. And asking you to sign papers promising not to sue can sometimes be as good as an admission of guilt.

Chances are after you have just been let go from a job, your confidence is a little shaken. Having someone to help you get back on your feet can be the best way to gain your confidence. Having someone else begin a customized job search for you and reminding you of how great your resume really is can turn your job search into an adventure. You might even begin to consider your layoff as an opportunity to develop new interests and talents. Also, starting an intense job search can keep you accustomed to the fast pace of having a full time job. After putting in hours of hard work for your previous company, the least they can do is put you on the right track to finding a new job.

Even though you might be a little bummed, now is not the time to be timid. Let your employers know exactly what you expect in a severance package. Let them know that you are not going to leave until you get what you want in terms of benefits and compensation. Keep telling yourself that you are worth every penny for which you are asking. Develop a catch phrase for yourself that will keep you focused in your negotiations. For example, "I just want to be able to help pay my daughter's tuition," is a good way to keep in mind what you are fighting for. If you enter in to negotiations knowing what you want, your success rate is definitely going to be higher. Leaving a job and negotiating a severance package does not have to be a bitter exchange. In fact, negotiating can actually be a huge boost for your confidence and your ability to effectively use your communication skills to attain what you need.

If you are able to show your boss how valuable you are to the company, he or she will be more willing to work with you on a severance package. You could have skills or secret knowledge that could be considered valuable to future employers. Do not be afraid to use your skills as leverage. You have spent years building your knowledge. Now, it' s time to get something in return for your hard work. Some companies will even add bonuses for you to not work with certain competitors.

As your career changes, be sure that you are always leaving a job with as much, if not more than you came in with, in terms of knowledge, money, skills and friends. Be firm in your severance package requests, letting them know that you are a master at getting what you want. Sometimes, the business world can seem like a revolving door that you are walking against, especially after being laid off. But, keeping these hints in mind should be the first step to making sure you walk out one door with your dignity and in another with confidence.

The terms "Credential File" and "Letters of Recommendation" are used synonymously and are typically a part of your application materials to school districts. A Credential File is merely your letters of recommendation with the addition of an official cover page which contains an official seal of the university where you received your degree. You may receive your UWRF Credential Cover at UWRF Career Services.

Receive a cover free at Career Services, or by requesting one via email at career.services@uwrf.edu. OR, complete your Hire a Falcon account - when your account is approved, you will gain access to printable credential covers in your account's "Resource Library"

Credential Template Pages - a thing of the past: Hiring school administrators who receive educator resumes are looking for specific information from applicants. Career Services for years has highly recommended that educators complete a two-page "Credential Template" to include with their Credential File to ensure that their information is provided to hiring administrators in a format and with content which best assists them in making hiring decisions, and captures the full breadth of the applicant's qualifications.

To lessen educators' work load while applying to positions, we have created a Resume Handout which incoprorates all the elements previously required in the Credential Template. If educators follow instructions in this handout to ensure all their critical information is included in their resume, then there is no need to provide hiring administrators with a Credential Template.

You can stop using your student teaching references if you wish, but you should have at least one reference from every teaching position you have held since graduation or there will be a question in the minds of future readers about whether or not there was a problem at the school were you have no reference. Always keep the best/strongest reference. Put your most current references on top and the older ones at the bottom. Administrators will read as many as they feel necessary to get a feel for what kind of teacher you are. If they get a good feel from reading your newest 3, they might not bother reading any older ones. If you have fewer than 8 and you have a really strong student teaching reference, by all means, continue to include it in your credential file, but have it at the bottom of your pile of references since it would be the oldest.

Jobs & Job Agent: From within your account you will gain access to over a hundred vacant teaching positions in Wisconsin and Minnesota gathered daily from various statewide resources. You can set-up a "Job Agent" in your account so that you may receive an automatic email notice when jobs you are seeking arrive in the system.

Uncovering old information regarding your student teaching experience, related coursework, references, etc... is difficult to uncover later in life, unless you have created a good Self Credentialing File.

Credential Files directly from applicants and require that credential files be mailed directly from the university where you graduated. In such rare instances, UWRF Career Services will mail your Credential File for you to school districts for a fee of $10.00 per copy.

Prior to 2001, Education Major candidates set-up credential files which were filed and maintained confidentially in Career Services. When the candidate wished to apply to a school district, they would contact Career Services and request that their Credential File be mailed to that school district.

In keeping with current trends, UWRF Career Service no longer provides this Credential maintenance and mailing service to Education Majors, as most school districts now accept credential files which are mailed directly from the candidate, and do not require that those Credential Files are mailed directly from the university where the candidate graduated.

After posting 3 public notices, and after sending mailings and emails, UWRF Career Services has destroyed most old paper references or Credential Files that it had on file which had not been requested from their owners.

Only send your transcripts to school districts who request to receive them as part of your application. Typically, school districts will accept a copy of your transcripts, which you may obtain by using a copy machine.

School district application forms are tyically long and comprehensive. Some require that you write answers in handwriting, others you may type to fit content into required space. Some applications are online. Some are sent to you upon receiving a cover letter and resume from you.

Some large school districts, like St. Paul Public Schools, pre-interview and screen candidates from various disciplines to create an exclusive applicant hiring pool from which principals identify candidates they will hire and/or second-interview for hire.

You may not be considered for a position at these school districts if you have not been interviewed for and accepted into these hiring pools. Before applying to large school districts, it is good practice to inquire whether or not they hire exclusively from an applicant hiring pool, as your application may not be considered if you apply for the position and have not been pre-interviewed and accepted into that pool.

St. Paul Public Schools hires from two separate applicant pools...one is a "Substitute Teacher Pool" and one is a "Hiring Pool" for full-time teaching positions. Each hiring pool must be interviewed for separately.

Human Resource Department personnel “paper screen” applications. This screening includes a review of the application, credentials and transcripts for quality and relevancy and also consists of confidential reference checks to persons identified by the candidate on the application form.

Principals may interview candidates whose qualifications “match” the position needing to be filled and make a recommendation to the Human Resource Department as to the successful candidate they would like for their position/school.

An electronic portfolio demonstrates to employers that you are technically savvy, and gives employers the opportunity to receive further information about you either before or after an interview to help narrow their selection pool.

Career Services advises using a PAPER portfolio rather than an electronic portfolio during the interview, as using an electronic portfolio in an interview setting is often ineffective. Setup is required, and technical problems may arise, which may either give a poor impression or interrupt the flow of a positive dialogue with an interviewer.

If you plan to use your electronic portfolio during an interview, ensure that you practice using it beforehand, and bring your own laptop. Be VERY selective with  content that is demonstrated, like a short video clip, or some of your favorite artifacts which demonstrate your work.

Folio 21: Sophisticated portfolio software that makes complicated tasks a cinch. Intuitive for beginners, yet feature-filled for the tech-savvy user. Comes to you compliments of CSO Research, the same company that provides UWRF with its campus Hire a Falcon System.

All students have access to campus web space on their personal "W:" drive, and may build their web pages to reside in their "PersonalPages" folder on their "W:" drive. Their home page should be named "welcome.htm", and they may view that home page by visiting "www.UWRF.edu/~w0000000" (zeros representing your campus ID). Tech-savvy students may use Dreamweaver and Fireworks in campus labs as tools for building their electronic portfolio by creating web pages from scratch.

While developing your web portfolio, it is important that you provide your documents / artifacts in an acceptable format which others may easily view. If your document format is not one of the below formats, then it is likely that an individual viewing your portfolio may not be able to view the document. All documents will have an extension at the end of their name identifying their format, as shown below.

MS Word: .doc extension - Fair warning that others viewing your MS Word document may not see exactly what you see, as they may have different fonts, or a different version of MS Word installed on their computer.

MS PowerPoint: .ppt extension - Fair warning that others viewing your MS Word document may not see exactly what you see, as they may have different fonts, or a different version of MS PowerPoint installed on their computer.

Use the Career Services Lab document sender to QUICKLY convert your color or black and white hardcopy documents to electronic .PDF documents emailed to yourself. Ideal for turning one or multiple page paper and other artifacts into electronic documents. An instruction manual is available in the Career Lab.

WARNING: It is important that your electronic portfolio has a professional appearance and is easy to navigate. While a well made portfolio makes a good impression, a poorly made one gives the opposite impression.

Email from hired UWRF grad working in Las Vegas: "I got a job! I will be doing speech and language therapy in Las Vegas Nevada for Clark County School District on the Nellis Air Force Base. It turns out that Nevada is one of the few states that does not require a Master's Degree for speech and language, so I took it! They offered me 7 years experience and 16 credits which upped my salary to over $40,000. There is also the option to teach the summer for $8,000 more. They are giving me a sign on bonus for $2,000 after the first month of service. I know it's a big change, but after sitting here jobless for so long and having so many rejections, I'm happy to be working again. I really thought at my age, with a firing on my record, and a hearing loss, I wouldn't work again, but I really kept plugging away at it. They also said they still need 600 more elementary teachers, so if you have people that are willing to move, I think it's a great start for any teacher, or for me a continuation of a career, rather than sitting around in the Midwest. Many teachers here told me they had to sub 3-5 years to get their teaching jobs. That's so much time to spend making hardly any wages with no benefits. So, anyway thank you and the other woman (I forgot her name) for your help. The Career Services Office has always helped me no matter what age I am, and I think that is wonderful. I also loved attending college at River Falls in general when I was young."

The law attempts to help employers give and get information about workers without fear of defamation lawsuits. The goal is to balance employers' hunger for help -- to avoid the heavy toll of bad hires -- with workers' rights to privacy and fair notice of what their bosses are saying about them.

It might be working. "I think you're going to see more employers knowing what they can get and what they can do," said Ellen Sampson, an employment attorney at Leonard, Street and Deinard in Minneapolis. "We are seeing the beginning of that, based on the kind of requests for personnel forms that I get from clients."

But reference takers are driving change, particularly using a new provision that lets them ask about applicants' actual job performance, such as: Did this person come in late very often? Miss much work? Work well with others?

Applicants must give their old bosses permission to share that information. But Sampson predicts more employers will tell job applicants, "If you want me to consider you, you have to sign a release so your old boss can tell me everything."

The new law will shake loose other information, too, because it says employers must share certain facts -- the really bad stuff such as bringing a gun to work, sexually harassing another employee or stealing.

Employers are slowly feeling more free to speak, Druckrey said, because it's harder now for a worker to punish them for a bad reference. Only employers who deliberately sabotage a prospective job are in legal trouble, she said.

No one expects all the changes to stop the time-honored tradition of calling a colleague of a colleague for unofficial information on a potential hire. Employers will always consider this an important source of candor. The downside is that job applicants have no chance to tell their side, attorneys said.

Employers who want to -- or have to -- give a bad reference should follow this procedure, Druckrey advises: Put all the information in writing. Choose facts over opinion. "This employee missed 87 days of work last year" is better than "This employee has an attendance problem." Funnel all references through one person for consistency.

Employees should know all their rights, too, the attorneys said. They are entitled to a copy of their references, so they know what's being said about them. During their work tenure, they may respond to any criticisms in their personnel files, and those responses must accompany the criticisms if they're released.

If job applicants know their reference is critical, they would be wise to volunteer that up front with their own explanations, Sampson said. Maybe they missed 87 days because they had a house fire, and they can show strong attendance in other years, for example.

Minnesota small-business owner Rick Anderson has already found one limitation in the law. He plans to hire three or four customer service representatives for his Eagan-based engineering firm, Cable System Services.

"The problem is some of these reps will be in Arizona, so I've got to research the law down there," Anderson said. "And in that kind of high-growth area a lot of people are coming from somewhere else, so I'll have to research the laws in those other states. So references are still an issue when you're doing national hiring."

Post-9/11 visa delays and security issues, combined with fierce competition from other countries, mean fewer foreign students are attending school in the United States. Well-versed in their options thanks to the Internet, more foreign students are heading for Australia, Canada and Europe. Domestic institutions also are getting a second look, especially in China and India where new, higher quality, educational institutions are springing up.

Swiss voters agreed to open the country's labor market in stages to citizens of 10 new European Union (EU) countries. Although not an EU member itself, Switzerland traditionally has put few restrictions on EU citizens seeking work within Swiss borders. With anti-immigrant sentiment rising in neighboring France and Germany, the outcome of the Swiss vote was difficult to predict, the International Herald Tribune reports.

While it's still a little early to put away your French phrasebook when traveling through French-speaking African countries, the Christian Science Monitor reports that English is fast becoming the preferred language. Seen as the language of global business, French-speaking Africans are rapidly adopting it to both capitalize on economic opportunity and to better communicate with English-speaking aid and military workers active in their regions.

As more women travel internationally for business and for pleasure, safety experts are advising them to take certain precautions. While being a foreigner often makes everyone - male or female stand out; women traveling alone can be even more of an oddity in some places. A brochure filled with tips to help women stay safe during business or other travel is available from the U. S. State Department Bureau of Consular Affairs.

To increase the diversity of the U.S. immigrant population, each year the U.S. State Department makes 50,000 permanent residency cards available to persons from countries with low U.S. entry rates. Selections are made through a computer-generated random lottery drawing. To be eligible for the drawing in 2005, interested individuals must submit online applications before December 4, 2005. Paper entries are not permitted.

Hoping to someday work in Indonesia? Better start practicing your language skills. Beginning in 2006, all foreign workers except directors and senior executives will need to pass an Indonesian language proficiency test to obtain work permits.

Reverse Chronological: With a focus on work history, a reverse chronological resume leads with education or work history and provides comprehensive employment history information. Reverse chronological resumes best suit those with a steady work history who are not changing careers.

Not necessarily. The one-page resume  "rule" no longer applies. New graduates with limited experience might only require one page, but experienced professionals often need two pages or more. For a two-page resume, make sure your strongest credentials are on page one.

No, unless you are writing a federal resume. Indicating your salary history or requirements could eliminate you from consideration. If the employer requests salary requirements, acknowledge the request in your cover letter with a line like: "I would be happy to discuss my salary requirements after mutual interest has been established." If you feel pressed to give a number, provide a wide range to give you some wiggle room for future negotiations. You can also create a salary history sheet, a separate document that outlines your earnings history.

You may think you just do your job, but consider what makes your work performance valuable to a potential employer. Ask your coworkers or supervisors about your performance, and review your written evaluations. You'll probably find you indeed have strong accomplishments you can mention.

Your resume must focus on a career goal so hiring managers immediately understand your job objective. However, you don't necessarily need to include a formal Objective section. Instead, incorporate your goal into a narrative qualifications summary. On the Monster Resume Builder, use the Objective field for your summary.

While most employers prefer applicants with no employment gaps, very few job seekers offer a perfectly steady work history. You can't change the past, so focus your resume on what you offer. If you participated in activities such as volunteer work, self-study or formal training while out of work, include them on your resume. If long-term gaps are an issue, consider a functional resume style, which emphasizes relevant skills while downplaying work chronology.

Your career-change resume should highlight your qualifications that are most relevant to your new career goal. You may have transferable skills, training, hobbies or other important credentials that will interest hiring managers. A good starting point is to research jobs by searching jobs on Monster and look for qualifications frequently mentioned in ads. Write down your matching qualifications, and work them into your resume.

Adapted from the new book, Monster Careers: Interviewing. by Doug Hardy Even if you have less than a day before your job interview, you can outshine the competition with a little preparation. The following four tasks will take you about four hours (plus five minutes) to complete, and you'll walk into the interview confident you'll be successful.

What's the dress code? Dress better than suggested. Most times, it's best for men to wear a suit and women to wear a professional business outfit. You'd be amazed how many candidates show up looking like they're going to class, not presenting a professional demeanor.

Write down and memorize three achievement stories. Tell about times you've really felt proud of an achievement at work or school. These stories demonstrate all those hard-to-measure qualities like judgment, initiative, teamwork or leadership. Wherever possible, quantify what you've done, e.g., "increased sales by 20 percent," "cut customer call waiting time in half," "streamlined delivery so that most customers had their job done in two days."

Achievement stories make you memorable, which is what you want. There's an exercise in Monster Careers: Interviewing called "Mastering the Freestyle Interview," which helps you develop these stories into compelling sales points.

Lay out your interview outfit the night before, get a good night's rest, and always get an early start. The last thing you want is to arrive at the interview flustered and panicked because you couldn't find a parking spot.

The largest percentage of respondents said that finding a job in their major is the most important consideration when deciding which job offer to accept. This places finding the right type of job well ahead of other considerations, including salary and location.

"Job seekers really want to put their college degree to good use," said Brian Krueger, President of CollegeGrad.com. "Doing meaningful work in their chosen field of interest is the most important factor for initial job satisfaction."

College students often spend a great deal of time and effort deciding on their college degree, including sometimes switching majors multiple times, or dedicating their first two years of college testing out their likes and dislikes, finally finding the best fit for their skills and personal strengths.

"While a college degree isn’t the end all for the comprehensive knowledge required in any work environment, it does provide the entry level training and a working knowledge of the industry," says Krueger. "It’s invaluable to have that training and preparation provided by the degree that matches your target job."

About CollegeGrad.com: CollegeGrad.com is the #1 entry level job site on the Internet and is the leader in the field of entry level job search. Brian Krueger is President and Founder of CollegeGrad.com and author of the best-selling book for entry level job search, College Grad Job Hunter.

Question: I'm interested in finding out who these employers are who really appreciate thank-you notes. I do the entire etiquette program for every application and I haven't gotten squat. Answer: Perhaps your choice of words could be improved. Seriously, there is much more to getting hired than just the etiquette program, and it's important to understand that thank-you notes alone won't get you hired, nor will resumes. If you interview well you might get an offer, but you must do other things well just to get the interview.

Question: I am from Lima, Peru, and am very happy living in the United States for the past six years. I want to get hired at Wal-Mart, but don't know how to write thank-you letters. Could you please send me a sample, and forgive my poor English.

Answer: Your English is just fine, and your attitude is excellent! Thank-you letters should be short and simple, preferably hand-written, and mailed or hand-delivered as quickly as possible after your interview. Use the following as an example: Dear Employer (use name and title): Thank you for your time and interest during my interview (name date) for the position of (name job title). I enjoyed learning more about your company and the available position.

This handbook has been prepared to assist you as a classified employee and your supervisor with questions concerning employment, salary administration, benefits, health and safety, and policies and procedures that affect classified employees.

The information in this handbook has been developed from the State of Wisconsin Human Resources Handbook, federal and state laws, the Wisconsin Administrative Code, University of Wisconsin System employment policies and various collective bargaining agreements. The language in this handbook is not intended to create, nor is it intended to be presented as, a contract or evidence of a contract between the University of Wisconsin-River Falls and any or all of its employees. Any material presented in this handbook which is found to be contradictory to union contracts, state and federal statutes, and university policies, will be superseded by such contracts, statutes and policies. You are urged to contact your supervisor, the Office of Human Resources, and union representative for more detailed information, as space limitations prevent this handbook from being all-inclusive.

Equal employment opportunity applies to all faculty, students, academic staff, classified, limited term and project positions, and to all employment practices including, but not limited to: recruitment, interviewing, screening, hiring, certification, testing, placement, classification, evaluation, transfers, promotions, tenure, training, compensation, benefits, layoffs, non-contract renewals, terminations, retention, and committee assignment. UW-River Falls is committed to making every good faith effort to achieve the goal of equal employment opportunity through implementing federal and state equal employment opportunity/affirmative action laws, executive orders, rules and regulations and University of Wisconsin System equal employment opportunity/affirmative action policies and guidelines. Employment is subject to federal laws that require verification of identity and legal right to work in the United States as required by the Immigration Reform and Control Act.

Persons with Disabilities. UW-River Falls ensures physical accessibility to work environments for persons with disabilities and provides reasonable accommodation to ensure equal access to employment and all benefits associated with employment. When requested, reasonable accommodations for religious observances and practices will be provided.

Affirmative Action goes beyond the concept of equal employment opportunity. Affirmative Action policies and programs are required to overcome the present effects of past discrimination and to achieve equal employment opportunity for members of groups that are or have been formerly under-represented. Affirmative Action policies and programs are tools whereby additional efforts are made to recruit, employ and promote qualified members of formerly excluded groups, even if that exclusion cannot be traced to particular discriminatory actions on the part of this university. Through specific and result-oriented activities the university’s goals are to ensure that every person is given full consideration through equal employment opportunity policies and practices and to achieve a representative workforce through its affirmative action efforts.

The university annually prepares and maintains an Affirmative Action Plan for the recruitment, employment and promotion of women, minorities, and persons with disabilities. The Affirmative Action Plan details the university’s progress toward affirmative action goals and compliance with all relevant policies. Copies of the Affirmative Action Plan are available in the university library, the Chancellor’s Office, and the Office of Equity and Compliance and are available for distribution upon request. A summary of the most recent plan is available on the Office of Equity and Compliance website (www.uwrf.edu/oec). The report also is submitted to the University of Wisconsin System.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls periodically examines all employment policies for discrimination and if discrimination is found takes remedial action to correct the problem. All management personnel share in the responsibility for monitoring all equal employment and affirmative action policies. Evaluation of management includes an assessment of performance effectiveness in assisting the university in achieving its employment goals. The Equity and Compliance Officer serves as the Affirmative Action Officer and is responsible for monitoring the effectiveness of equal opportunity and, where necessary, the implementation of affirmative action programs.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls has a complaint procedure to assist staff, students, and faculty. Persons seeking to file a complaint of harassment or discrimination should first bring the situation to the attention of their immediate supervisor. However, the employee may bypass their immediate supervisor and directly contact the Equity and Compliance Officer (117 North Hall; 715-425-3833) who can help answer questions, listen to complaints, advise on procedures, conduct an investigation, and recommend appropriate action. Situations are handled in the most confidential manner possible consistent with UW-River Falls, UW System, and state policies and regulations.

Retaliation against an employee who files a discrimination or harassment complaint, or against anyone who assists in the preparation of or testifies on behalf of an employee, is itself considered a form of discrimination and will be treated as such.

Through these policies and procedures, the University of Wisconsin-River Falls continues to reaffirm its commitment to the principle of equality of opportunity in employment and in education. While the university is obligated to develop and sustain a program of equal opportunity, we undertake these actions and adopt these policies not only because we are required to, but also because it is right and proper that we do so.

Non-Represented - employees who are not entitled to union representation. These are middle management, supervisors, or clerical employees who are considered to be working in areas where there is access to confidential union information.

Project Appointment - an appointment which is normally funded for six or more consecutive months and which requires employment for 600 hours or more per 26 consecutive biweekly pay periods, either for a temporary workload increase or for a planned undertaking which is not a regular function of the employing agency and which has an established probable date of termination. No project position may exist for more than four (4) years.

Recurring Limited Term Appointment - an appointment which is determined to require an employee on a recurring basis. There is no definite date of termination for the appointment with the exception that the position may not exceed 1,043 hours of employment annually.

Non-Recurring (short-term) Limited Term Appointment - an appointment which is determined to require an employee on a one-time only basis. A definite date of termination is set for this type of appointment. A period of six months or less is allowed for the non-recurring appointment with an hourly limitation of 1,043 hours.

Standard university business hours are 7:45 a.m.-4:30 p.m. Work hours and work days may vary depending on the operational needs of the department. Work schedules can be mutually changed; however, they must receive final approval from the Human Resources Director.

NOTE: The supervisor retains the right to schedule the employee’s rest periods to fulfill the operational needs of the work unit. Rest periods may not be postponed or accumulated. If an employee does not receive a rest period due to operational requirements, such rest period may not be taken during a subsequent work period. Rest periods are not designed to be used as make-up time to compensate for tardiness nor may they be taken at the beginning or end of a work shift.

UW-River Falls supports the use of alternative work patterns by full-time or part-time employees when such schedules are consistent with efficient and effective university operations. Alternative work patterns include job sharing, alternate work week such as four ten-hour days, and staggered work hours such as 7:00 a.m.-3:30 p.m., with a 30-minute lunch break. Requests for alternative work patterns should be made to your immediate supervisor who will determine if the proposal is feasible and will not interrupt the operational needs of the department. The department supervisor is responsible for adhering to the standard hours of work. Job share arrangements must also be approved by the Director of Human Resources.

The civil service classification determines an employee’s pay range. A represented classified employee’s pay rate is determined by collective bargaining agreements that are usually negotiated every two years. These negotiations are conducted through the union and the Office of State Employee Relations (OSER).

A non-represented classified employee’s pay rate is based the non-represented compensation plan which is determined by the Joint Committee on Employment Relations. This compensation plan is administered by the Director of the Office of State Employee Relations (OSER) and is reviewed biennially.

The pay period is comprised of two consecutive weeks beginning on a Sunday and ending on a Saturday. The standard work week consists of forty (40) hours which are scheduled between Sunday and the following Saturday (see Hours of Work). Individual work hours and work days depend on departmental requirements and the nature of the position.

A sample timesheet has been or will be provided to the employee during the new employee orientation with Human Resources. Employees may access the timesheet on the Human Resources Website. Timesheets are also available from supervisors or the Human Resources Office and must be completed by employees for each two-week pay period. They are due in the Human Resources Office by noon on each Thursday of the second week in the pay period, which is the same date paychecks are distributed.

All timesheets must be signed by the employee and the supervisor. If the supervisor is not available to sign, send a copy of the time sheet to the Human Resources Office by the due date, along with a note explaining why the copy is being submitted. The original time sheet must then be signed by the supervisor as soon as possible and forwarded to the Human Resources office. Supervisors are held responsible for the timeliness and accuracy of timesheets submitted by their employees. All timesheets become official, permanent records, documenting employee hours and time paid.

Differential pay was established as compensation to those employees who are required to work unusual hours or days as a result of the department requirements or as a result of the nature of their positions. Represented, non-represented, limited term, and project employees are eligible for night and weekend differential. Differential pay will not be paid to employees absent on leave with pay (vacation, sick leave, holiday, etc.). The employee must actually work the qualifying hours in order to be eligible for differential pay. Questions should be directed to the Classified Payroll and Benefits Specialist or to the union representative.

The specific amounts of night differential for represented employees are established and negotiated biennially between the union and the Office of Employee Relations (OSER). Specific amounts of night differential for non-represented classified employees are developed by OSER.

The specific amounts of weekend differential for represented employees are established and negotiated biennially between the union and the OSER. Specific amounts of weekend differential for non-represented classified employees are developed by the OSER.

Although it is the expressed policy that overtime is kept to an absolute minimum, there may be situations (i.e., emergency situations, rush seasons, and peak work-load periods) where overtime is necessary. All overtime must be approved prior to the date it is worked.

Under federal law, employees who are considered non-exempt (hourly) must receive overtime compensation for all hours worked in excess of 40 hours per week. Employees who are considered exempt (salaried) from the federal overtime provisions are generally not allowed overtime compensation. There are a few extraordinary situations where exempt employees may receive overtime compensation. Some exempt positions may also be represented by a union with its own contractual provisions for overtime pay.

Represented employee pay adjustments are generally made at the beginning of the fiscal year (July 1) or once contract negotiations are resolved. Pay adjustments are negotiated between the Office of State Employee Relations and the union.

Non-Represented employee pay adjustments are also generally made at the beginning of the fiscal year (July 1). Pay adjustments are recommended directly to the legislature by the Office of State Employee Relations.

Certain represented classifications, primarily in the Wisconsin Professional Employee Union, are eligible for additional pay adjustments called Discretionary Compensation Award/Payment (DCA/DCP). These pay adjustments are discretionary and must ultimately be approved through the Discretionary Compensation Award/Payment process and by the Chancellor. Supervisors or employees may request additional pay adjustment for the following reasons: new duties, pay equity, and retention.

Most non-represented employees (except for a few classifications) are eligible for additional pay adjustments also called Discretionary Compensation Adjustment/Payment (DCA/DCP). These pay adjustments are also discretionary and must ultimately be approved through the Discretionary Compensation Adjustment/Payment process and by the Chancellor. Supervisors and employees may request additional pay adjustments for the following reasons: new duties, increased significant competencies, merit, pay equity and retention/market influences.

Employees’ wages are distributed into employees’ designated direct deposit bank accounts on the second Thursday of each pay period. Funds are available to employees’ financial institutions on the pay date. When a pay date falls on a Federal Reserve (bank) holiday, a Saturday or Sunday, payment is available to employees the day prior to that pay date.

The following deductions are made from paychecks of all classified employees: Federal Withholding Tax, State Withholding Tax, and Social Security. Recurring limited term employees and Building Trades workers have a deduction from the Wisconsin Retirement System. Voluntary deductions may be authorized for health, life, and income continuation insurance; savings bonds; credit union; parking fees; charity; and tax sheltered annuities.

The classification of a position is determined by the duties and responsibilities assigned to the position. The University of Wisconsin-River Falls, as well as other UW campuses and state agencies, is under the jurisdiction of the Office of State Employee Relations. The division of Merit Recruitment and Selection determines and audits all classification changes which are delegated to the Office of Human Resources.

The classifications used at UW-River Falls are consistent to the classifications at other UW campuses. To view a complete listing of state classifications, please refer to the Office of Human Resources web site www.uwrf.edu/hr.

All new employees are required to serve a probationary period. Most probationary periods are for six months, though some may be longer. For example, employees who assume supervisory or management positions serve a twelve-month probationary period. The probationary period is meant to provide an opportunity for observing how employees apply skills and abilities to the tasks for which they were hired. A probationary period is also required when employees are promoted into higher-level classifications. If employees transfer or seek reinstatement to another campus or state agency, a permissive probationary period of six months may be required.

The purpose of the Position Description (PD) form is to document the major goals and worker activities assigned to a particular position. It defines the work to be performed in relation to the overall goals of the work unit. It is also the document used in determining the appropriate classification and level of a position and it can be the criteria for evaluation as well as the basis for identifying training needs. The position description is not, however, entirely inclusive. A supervisor may assign additional duties that logically and directly relate to the position. As the duties and/or responsibilities of a position change, the PD should be revised and submitted to the Office of Human Resources.

The Office of Human Resources recommends that departments review PDs with employees during their annual evaluations. A review of the position description allows the supervisor to evaluate the employee’s job performance and to offer guidance, feedback, and recommendations relative to job performance. It also allows the employee to conduct a self-evaluation and to review personal goals and objectives.

Whenever a position description update occurs, you must submit the original position description to the Office of Human Resources for their review. A copy of your PD may be obtained from the Office of Human Resources as necessary.

Confidential records of all classified employees’ education, experience, and general work-related data as well as confidential payroll records are officially maintained in the Office of Human Resources.

Employees have the right to view their own personnel records. Classified employees are required to submit a written request to their supervisor and the Office of Human Resources. Within a reasonable amount of time, a representative of Human Resources will allow the employee to view their file. The representative will be present during the viewing of the personnel file to ensure that no documents are removed from or added to the personnel file. A represented employee may authorize a designated grievance representative to review the file on the employee’s behalf in the presence of a designated management representative. In such a case, the written request must specifically identify the representative authorized to view the file.

In April/May of each year, supervisors are required to prepare a written performance evaluation for each of their classified employees. The purpose of the evaluation is to communicate performance standards to the employee based on key responsibilities of the position, to provide an objective evaluation in terms of standards established for the position, to establish improvement and/or development goals, to discuss employee career goals, and to provide a mechanism for employee feedback and input.

During the probationary period, the supervisor is required to evaluate and provide input on an employee’s performance at the third and sixth month of employment. An employee may be dismissed during the probationary period if performance expectations are not met.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls maintains the right to lay off employees or reduce work hours as a result of a shortage or stoppage of work or funds, reorganization, or the abolishment of a position.

Layoffs generally are guided by seniority. An affected employee about to be laid off may be able to exercise other options such as transferring to a vacancy, displacing a less senior employee, or voluntarily demoting to a lower classification in a different position. Employees who are laid off do have recall rights back to the university if vacancies in their classifications should occur. The university attempts to provide as much notice as possible if a layoff becomes necessary.

Permanent employees who leave state service for reasons other than misconduct or delinquency are eligible for reinstatement in any state agency for a period of five years from the date of resignation. The seniority will be the original date of employment adjusted to exclude the period of separation.

Reinstatement may be to the same employing unit, a different employing unit, or to a different agency. Persons wishing to be reinstated must contact the Human Resources Office to file a request for a reinstatement. Requests that are submitted to the Human Resources Office are kept on file for six months. Requests must be updated every six months in order to remain active.

An employee’s seniority date, in most cases, is the original date of employment with the state as a permanent employee. Adjusted hiring dates usually occur because of a break in service. The seniority date/adjusted date stays the same whether an employee works full-time or part-time. The percentage of appointment affects the accumulation of time toward retirement, but it does not affect the seniority date. The seniority/adjusted date does not change if an employee transfers, is promoted, or is reclassified to a new classification.

The seniority date is used for a number of important determinations. It is used to determine vacation earnings, length-of-service payments, contractual transfers, layoffs, vacation scheduling, and overtime assignments. For more information regarding seniority, please refer to the union contract or call the Office of Human Resources.

An employee who is retiring or leaves state service voluntarily is required to submit a letter of resignation. The employee’s letter of resignation shall contain the reasons for separation and the effective date of separation. The letter shall be submitted to the Human Resources Office with a copy to the supervisor not less than two weeks prior to the effective date, unless the employee and appointing authority have agreed to an alternate date. Upon submission of a notice of resignation, there can be no withdrawal or stopping of the separation action except upon mutual written agreement between the employee and the university.

Employees must fill out and obtain signatures on the Classified Exit Checklist before their departure. All university keys, uniforms, equipment and other university property provided to the employee must be returned at the time of departure.

Permanent employees who voluntarily separate may be reinstated to positions in the same, counterpart or lower pay range for which they may be qualified within five years from separation upon request from the employee. Please consult with the Office of Human Resources regarding reinstatement.

The supervisor or another selected person will acquaint the new employee with their job responsibilities. Most of the training required to perform one’s job is in the form of on-the-job training regarding procedures and equipment.

Training and advanced education can benefit the employee both personally and professionally. In keeping with a policy to provide development opportunities for all employees, the university offers some training programs.

The UW-River Falls Employee Development Committee was established for the purpose of recommending/coordinating job training opportunities for the development of employees. It is comprised of nominated or volunteer representatives from the represented and non-represented staff. Employee input is welcomed.

Union/Management bulletin boards are provided in each building on the campus for employees’ convenience in viewing and being kept up-to-date on pertinent management and union notices. The building coordinator in each building is responsible for circulating and/or posting all current personnel-related information received to provide a central communication source for employees in each building. Transfer postings can also be viewed on campus email notification.

The State of Wisconsin provides promotional opportunities for current classified employees. Employees are invited to participate with other individuals for advancement opportunities by applying and taking civil service examinations. Vacancies are posted in the Current Employment Opportunities Bulletin and on the State of Wisconsin Employment web page at: http://wiscjobs.state.wi.us/public/index.asp. To find out more information about promotional opportunities, please contact the Office of Human Resources.

Once employees achieve permanent status in their classification, they may have up to 24 hours of time off annually, without loss of pay, to compete in promotional exams and resulting interviews, if those exams or interviews are scheduled during normal work hours. However, proper advance notice must be given to the supervisor. All employees are encouraged to compete in promotional exams. Please consult the union contract or union representative for more information about promotional exams and interviews.

An employee or the employee’s supervisor may request that a position be considered for reclassification if the position has evolved into one with greater duties and responsibilities than originally outlined in the existing position description.

When a supervisor has reason to believe that there has been a significant change in a position, the supervisor should have the employee update the position description. Upon completion, the supervisor should review the position description for accuracy. The updated position description, an organizational chart of the department, and a justification specifying the changes in the position including why and how the changes have occurred should be submitted to the Office of Human Resources.

Generally, reclassifications are reviewed in chronological order from the date that they are formally submitted to the Office of Human Resources. In most cases an audit will be conducted with the employee and/or the supervisor to gain a better understanding of the position and the specific changes that have occurred. The Office of Human Resources may review positions at UW-River Falls as well as contact other campuses to obtain similar position descriptions in order to gain an understanding of similar staffing and classification patterns already in existence. This is necessary to ascertain consistency within the UW-System. The position will also be compared with the state specifications to determine if the position meets the intention of the specification.

After the analysis is complete, a decision to approve or deny the reclassification will be made. A detailed approval or denial justification is written by the Office of Human Resources and submitted to the employee and supervisor. If the request is denied, the employee is notified of the right to appeal. If the request is approved, there is generally a salary increase, which is determined by the appropriate collective bargaining agreement or compensation plan.

It is the policy of the university to carefully consider all requests for transfer subject to the provisions of related collective bargaining agreements with the intention of best serving the employee and the university.

When a vacancy occurs and the position is a represented position, the position, including any special requirements, is posted via email and on the union bulletin boards located in each building on campus. Generally, positions are offered to interested individuals in the same classification with the greatest seniority (consult the postings for instructions on how to express interest in the position posted). If no one has expressed interest in the position with mandatory contractual rights, other employees in different classifications but within the same pay range may be considered. Refer to collective bargaining agreements for more specific information regarding transfer procedures.

Positions not represented by a collective bargaining agreement (non-represented) are not required to be posted; however, these positions are generally posted in the same manner as represented positions. For these vacancies, Human Resources can include the following people for possible interviews, at the supervisor’s discretion: UW-River Falls employees in positions that are in a counterpart pay range; people from other agencies in positions that are in counterpart pay range requesting a transfer; people requesting reinstatement or voluntary demotion; and/or people from the civil service exam register.

Work rules are defined as “rules promulgated by the employer within its discretion which regulate the personal conduct of employees as it affects their employment except that the employer may enforce these rules outside the normal work hours when the conduct of the employee would prejudice the interest of the state as an employer.” The following work rules were issued by the University of Wisconsin System as part of its responsibility under law to inform all classified employees of personal conduct considered unacceptable as a University of Wisconsin employee. These rules have not been established to restrict the rights of employees, but rather to advise them of prohibited conduct which would interfere with the university’s objectives in maintaining an orderly and efficient system.

A classified employee engaging in one or more of the following forms of prohibited conduct may result in disciplinary action ranging from a reprimand to immediate discharge, depending upon the specific form of conduct and/or the number of infractions pursuant to Section 16.28, Wisconsin Statutes and Wisconsin Administrative Code, Chapter ER-Pers 23, or pursuant to existing collective bargaining agreements. An employee who alleges that such disciplinary action was not based on just cause may appeal demotion, suspension, discharge, or written reprimand by following grievance procedures outlined in this handbook and/or contacting a union representative.

These work rules do not constitute the entire list of violations for which employees may be disciplined. Other rules are provided by statutes, by Administrative Code, and by administrative procedures established by management. Violations of these rules can also result in appropriate disciplinary action. Additional work rules may be established by management to meet special requirements of departments or work units or as circumstances require.

There may be situations where employees feel that they have not been given fair treatment. The employees should discuss these situations with their supervisors. If the discussion does not result in a satisfactory resolution, a formal grievance is available to use. There are specific procedures that apply to represented and non-represented employees. Represented employees should contact their union representatives for specific information related to filing a formal grievance and non-represented employees should contact the Office of Human Resources.

The presence of children in the workplace must be restricted to occasional visits or emergency situations. This is primarily due to the employer’s liability, efficiency considerations, disruption of the workplace, and consideration for co-workers.

Children are not permitted to run unsupervised in campus buildings nor on the grounds. Parents or guardians are requested to be responsible for the behavior of visiting children and asked to explain workplace rules before bringing children to their work stations.

As citizens, university employees have the right to engage in political activities. Generally, such activities may not take place on work time or university property or otherwise interfere with the performance of the employee’s job. Classified employees who declare intent to run for public office must take a leave of absence for the duration of the election campaign and if elected must separate from the classified service on assuming the duties and responsibilities of such office.

Any state employee, including LTEs, can submit suggestions for improvement in any area of state government operations to the State Employees Suggestion Program. The employee is encouraged to submit ideas for improvements in methods, procedures, or materials that could provide substantial savings or improvements to morale, safety, service, public relations, etc. Suggestions cannot be a part of the employee’s normal job duties or the result of a management-initiated or directed project to be eligible.

Individual cash awards of up to $1000 are presented for meritorious suggestions. The success of this program is dependent on the personal efforts of employees. For more information, please contact the Office of Human Resources.

University committees include classified employees as committee members. Classified employees are generally appointed to these committees by the Chancellor, Human Resources Director, Equity and Compliance Officer, or through recommendations from theEmployee Development Committee.

In addition to the Code of Ethics, employees also retain all rights under the Constitution of the United States, Wisconsin State Statutes and laws, and any labor agreements negotiated pursuant to Wisconsin statutes.

If an employee is ever accused of violating provisions of the Code of Ethics, the matter will be reviewed through the following channels by the campus: appropriate division head and department director or chairperson, where applicable. They will investigate complaints and report their findings to a committee consisting of the Chancellor, Vice Chancellor, Vice Chancellor for Administration and Finance, and the Human Resources Director in accordance with state personnel procedures.

If employees have any questions about their rights or responsibilities under the Code of Ethics, they should contact their supervisors or the Director of Human Resources who serves as the university’s coordinator for Code of Ethics advising and counseling and is available to assist employees and supervisors. A copy of the Code of Ethics from the Wisconsin Administrative Code is available at the Office of Human Resources for viewing.

Use of information technology (IT) resources must be consistent with the university’s mission and with its role as a public agency. Each member of the university community is expected to protect the integrity of these resources and to know and adhere to university rules, regulations and guidelines for their appropriate use. It is the responsibility of users of IT resources to understand and be aware of the current Acceptable Use Policy, which is available from IT Services. The Acceptable Use Policy applies to all individuals who access IT resources, regardless of their familiarity or understanding of the policy.

Access to university IT resources is a privilege granted to members of the university community which carries with it the responsibility to use them for university-related activities, exercising common sense and civility.

Authorization for use of IT facilities is provided to each person for individual use. No person may use an authorization which belongs to someone else, nor can any person granted this right share it with another. In many cases the university has obtained access to these resources exclusively for the use of members of the university community. It is a violation of those agreements for others to use them.

The protection of university IT resources depends heavily on each user’s careful handling of keys to these resources. Since any account can serve as an entry point for theft, damage, or unauthorized use, users must protect the confidentiality of their personal identification codes and passwords and are expected to exercise reasonable care to ensure that others cannot use their accounts. Every account must be safeguarded as any account could provide a foot in the door for a hacker.

Persons may not obtain or use, or attempt to obtain or use, passwords, IP addresses, or other network information that have not been assigned to them as individuals or authorized for their use. Persons may not obtain, or attempt to obtain, unauthorized access to computer accounts, software, files, or any other university IT resources.

Persons may not alter or intentionally damage software or data belonging to someone else or interfere with another person’s authorized access to IT resources. Users may not intentionally disrupt or damage university computers or networks in any way.

Persons may not use university IT resources to sell or solicit sales for any goods, services, or contributions unless such use conforms to UW-River Falls rules and regulations governing the use of university resources. University employees may not use these resources to support the nomination of any person for political office or to influence a vote in any election or referendum. No one may use university IT resources to represent the interests of any non-university group or organization unless authorized by an appropriate university department.

Use of network resources, and the Internet in particular, may expose individuals to content which they personally find objectionable, including comments or graphics which are profane, obscene, racist, sexist, or otherwise offensive. UW-River Falls does not seek to censor any materials that employees may access via IT Resources. Individuals accessing IT resources are solely responsible for what they may encounter. In accordance with the university’s Sexual Harassment Policy, sexually explicit or obscene materials may not be publicly displayed, whether they are obtained via electronic or other means.

In the interest of making the use of IT resources a natural part of the day-to-day learning and work of all members of the university community, incidental personal use is tolerated. However, one should use other providers of e-mail, internet access, and other IT services for activities of an extensive nature that are not related to university purposes.

Individuals who suspect or know of violations of the Acceptable Use Policy must report the incidents to IT Services. Violations should be reported by email at abuse@uwrf.edu. If employees are unsure whether their own actions or the actions of other persons may be in conflict with the Acceptable Use Policy, they may contact IT Services for clarification. However, if employees feel personally threatened, they should immediately call the Office of Public Safety, the police, or 911 emergency services.

Represented and non-represented classified employees earn paid vacation, legal holidays, personal holidays and sick leave. If employed on a part-time basis, leave is pro-rated based on percentage of employment. Caution: Generally, vacation, sick leave and holiday allotments for represented and non-represented classified employees are similar but represented employees should refer to their collective bargaining agreements for paid leave information.

NOTE: All vacation, sick and personal holiday time should be taken in 15-minute increments. All time off requests require supervisory approval. It is recommended that personal holiday time be used before vacation time since vacation can be carried over while personal holiday time cannot. Employees are permitted to carry over up to 40 hours of earned vacation credits until June 30th of the following year. Employees must inform supervisors of their intent in writing and the request must be submitted to the Human Resources Office.

Permanent employees begin earning sick leave immediately upon employment, with unlimited accumulation. Sick leave accumulates at the rate of five hours for each 80 hours of employment during a two-week period. The amount of sick leave earned is prorated for persons working less than full time during a pay period.

The employee must notify his/her supervisor of any sick leave taken prior to or at the very beginning of the regularly scheduled workday. If the employee is unable to reach the immediate supervisor, notification should be made to the next higher-level supervisor.

An employee who retires can utilize total accumulated sick leave, converted to a cash value, for the payment of group health insurance premiums. If an active or retired employee with family health insurance coverage dies, the sick leave credits are available to the surviving spouse/dependents for payment of group health insurance premiums.

Sick leave credits are available upon receiving a WRS retirement benefit to employees who terminate with 20 years of continuous state creditable service. A tax-free account is set up to pay State Group Health Insurance premiums equal to the employee’s unused sick leave hours times the highest rate of pay. When the account is exhausted or if there is no accumulated sick leave, the employee pays the full premium. Employees with 15 or more years of university or state service receive supplemental sick leave credits at the time of retirement. Survivors may use the sick leave credits if the family plan coverage is in effect at the time of the employee’s death or the sick leave is escrowed and the survivor had comparable coverage.

Employees may choose to take FMLA as unpaid or they may substitute their annual leave, personal holidays, and/or sick leave. Leave taken for FMLA-eligible reasons must run concurrently with other leave available (i.e., collective bargaining agreements, administrative codes, etc.) to university employees. Thus, the leave available under the various provisions is exhausted simultaneously.

Under the statutes, employees are required to inform the supervisor 30 days in advance of the need to take family medical leave, or give as much notice as feasible if the leave is unanticipated. The employee must complete the Family Medical Leave Form and the Family Medical Leave Physician/Practitioner Certification (if applicable). The use of this leave and the forms must be submitted and approved by the Human Resources Office.

Upon request of the employee, parental leaves of absence shall be granted for a period of time requested by the employee, not to exceed six months. This leave shall be concurrent with any leave under the Family and Medical Leave Act to which the employee is entitled. Upon request of the employee, the appointing authority may extend or renew an unpaid parental leave of absence for up to six additional months.

Up to 12 weeks of annual leave, personal holiday, or sabbatical leave may be substituted for parts of the unpaid leave as provided in the Family and Medical Leave Act. In addition, sick leave may be substituted for part of the parental leave when the time is taken for the mother’s own recovery, or to care for the mother or child with a serious medical condition.

Employees may use up to three days of accumulated sick leave for death in the immediate family, which includes: employee or spouse’s immediate family; spouse or spouse equivalent; step child; son- or daughter-in-law; a person for whom the employee is a guardian; foster parent; and various other family members. Employees may also use up to four days of additional sick leave for travel time to and from the funeral.

Employees may use one day of accrued sick leave for attendance of a funeral for a niece, nephew, or cousin of the employee or employee’s spouse. Travel time to attend such funerals shall not exceed four working days.

Employees who are summoned to court for grand jury or petit jury service will be granted leave with pay. Pay while summoned for such service will be at the employee’s base pay rate, which will exclude any overtime or supplemental pay.

Jury service will include the period of time which the summoned employee must spend during a jury selection process. However, when such an employee is not actually impaneled for actual service and considered only “on call,” that employee is required to report back to work unless authorized by the appointing authority to be absent from his/her work assignment. When the employee is impaneled or dismissed with four or fewer remaining hours on the employee’s shift, upon contacting the supervisor, the employee will not be required to return to work and will be continued in jury duty pay status for the remainder of the employee’s work shift.

Employees who are eligible to vote, but are unable to do so during non-working hours, may be granted leave to do so. This time is not to exceed three consecutive hours and must be requested by submitting a written application to the supervisor at least two working days prior to the election date. If the leave is granted, the supervisor may designate the time of day that the employee will be allowed for voting purposes.

Unpaid leaves of absence may be granted without pay with the approval of the supervisor and the Director of Human Resources. A form, available from the Human Resources Office, must be completed to request such a leave. When reviewing the request, the Director of Human Resources will evaluate the recommendation of the supervisor and the impact of a leave on the department’s operations. Common reasons for requesting a leave without pay include pursuit of further education, lengthy illness, child care, and other exceptional personal reasons. Generally, leave will be approved for six months or one year. Leaves can be extended on a year-to-year basis for up to three years.

Employees of the university are eligible to participate in a number of insurance programs. These programs include health insurance, income continuation insurance, life insurance, accidental death and dismemberment insurance, and others. Insurance programs are optional, allowing employees to select participation according to individual needs. It is important that employees make enrollment decisions during their first month of employment when they are eligible for open enrollment. Brochures about these programs are provided during new employee orientation meetings.

The State Group Health insurance program offers several comprehensive health care plans to university employees covered under the Wisconsin Retirement System (WRS). Employees are entitled to enroll in either single or family coverage.

Employees are initially eligible for coverage after completion of six months of WRS participation at any employer. Regardless of when you want your coverage effective, you are encouraged to submit an application as soon as possible to avoid missing the enrollment deadline. Employees pay full cost until, after annual review, sick leave balance is sufficient to warrant employer contribution. The ICI program is a state self-insured disability insurance program. If you become physically or mentally disabled, ICI coverage will replace 75 percent of your gross salary. This program covers both short- and long-term disabilities.

This is term group life insurance with coverage option of up to five times your annual salary, payable only at death. There is no cash loan value. Employees are initially eligible for coverage after completion of six months of WRS participation at any employer. Applications must be received within four months of begin date. Spouse and Dependant coverage is available. Coverage on the life of the employee includes an Accidental Death and Dismemberment and Loss of use benefit.

There are several other insurance programs available to university employees. Each program offers some unique features and benefits. Other insurance plans available to university employees are additional life insurance, catastrophic insurance, accidental death and dismemberment insurance and dental plans. Contact the Payroll and Benefits Specialist for more information.

These are expenses that can be paid by ERAs which include qualified dependent care expenses as defined by the IRS and allowable medical and dental expenses not covered by insurance. You save federal, Wisconsin, and social security taxes on these expenses. All permanent and project employees are eligible. New employees must enroll within 30 days of employment. Coverage is effective the first payroll date your contribution is deducted.

This is a voluntary supplemental retirement savings program. It allows employees to invest pre-tax salary and defer income taxes on savings. Investment companies are approved by a UW System Committee. There is an annual administration fee of $9. For further information, see the Tax-Shelter Annuity Program website at www.uwsa.edu/hr/benefits/retsav/tsa.htm.

This is a voluntary supplemental retirement savings program, allowing employees to invest pre-tax salary and defer income taxes on savings. All employees are eligible and can enroll at any time. Fees are charged based on account balances. For more information, see the WDC website at www.wdc457.org.

All employees of the university, other than most student employees, are covered by Social Security and Medicare. Social Security and Medicare taxes, sometimes called FICA (Federal Insurance Contributions Act) taxes, are automatically deducted from employee wages.

In the event of a layoff or termination, employees of the university may be eligible for unemployment compensation. Please contact the Department of Workforce Development for determination of your eligibility for benefits.

It is the sole responsibility of the employee to inform the Office of Human Resources of any personal changes that may affect records and/or benefits eligibility. This would include change in name, marital status, birth or adoption of a child, death, address or telephone number, any specialized training, or additional education.

As a person enters employment at the university, the employee has the right to be informed and inquire about safe working conditions, and provided with proper working tools to perform safely on the job.

Using appropriate resources, it is the intent of the university to provide a mutually profitable and harmonious safe working environment for university employees. Therefore, the university will attempt to provide a safe work place, proper equipment and materials, and establish and monitor that proper safety procedures are practiced.

With this attitude in mind, joint cooperation between the employee and the university will contribute significantly to safe working conditions and contribute to accident-free performance to the advantage of the entire university community.

Risk Management is the assumption of responsibility for recognizing, measuring, and controlling the exposures to loss of both human life and property that are created by the activities of the university. The university is insistent upon promoting a policy of sound risk management to provide facilities, services and working conditions that are conducive to safety, security, and maximum efficiency.

UW-River Falls strives to operate a risk management program that is consistent with UW System, State, and Federal requirements. Such programs attempt to protect employees, students and members of the general public involved in university activities on or off the campus. It is also entrusted to protect the physical properties of the university and state. The university also expects its faculty, staff and students to exercise good judgment in connection with safety regulations and methods relating to their personal safety and well-being.

The Risk Management Coordinator provides guidance, advice and other aid as needed by department administrators, faculty members, staff, and students. The coordinator gathers information and files claims regarding accidents and incidents and acts as a liaison between the university and Central Risk Management and/or State Risk Management. The Risk Management Coordinator works closely with the Public Safety Department, the Workers Compensation/Human Resources Office, the Property Control/Purchasing Department, the Physical Plant and Campus Planning Office in all loss control matters. The campus risk management responsibility is coordinated by the Purchasing Director in cooperation with the Department of Public Safety.

Departmental chairpersons, unit supervisors, and instructors are expected to encourage employees, students, and visitors to comply with safety rules and regulations such as wearing of personal protective equipment and having safety guards in place. Their efforts should be directed toward maintaining a safe working environment in all areas under their direction. Their duties include protecting university property within their department areas from theft and damage.

Department and unit heads should report all accidents and injuries to the Risk Management Coordinator within 12 hours after their occurrence. Theft or malicious damage, lightning and weather-related damage, or any other destruction of property should be reported to the Risk Management Coordinator as soon as possible after the occurrence. These initial reports will be followed by written reports to appropriate university and state offices for possible insurance claim and reimbursement.

Any work-related injury or illness must be reported to the supervisor and to the Worker’s Compensation Coordinator immediately. Questions regarding worker’s compensation can be directed to the campus Worker’s Compensation Coordinator. The Worker’s Compensation Coordinator is located in the Human Resources Office, 218 North Hall, and can be reached at ext. 3109. Forms can be accessed on the Human Resources web site www.uwrf.edu/hr.

The health and well-being of all employees is of great importance and concern to the University of Wisconsin-River Falls. It is well documented that injuries affect the whole body and effective rehabilitation and treatment must address the whole body. Part of that treatment includes the concept of keeping physically and mentally active within the restrictions of the particular injury. The University of Wisconsin-River Falls will make an effort to provide employees with the opportunity to maximize their rehabilitation and physical therapy and enable their return to work.

The Work/Light Duty program has been designed and developed to maintain the dignity and the work status of the employee; ensure the injured employee receives the best practical medical care in order to speed the recovery and return to work; return the employee to the original position as soon as possible; assist in the early evaluation of potential long-term disability cases in order to determine early job placement, rehabilitation or retraining needs when appropriate; and treat all injuries as legitimate unless an investigation reveals otherwise. It is the goal of the program to return the injured employee to their position as quickly as possible or to find alternative and productive work activities when possible.

The Employee Assistance Program (EAP) is an assistance program for employees and their families. It is a free, confidential counseling resource available on campus in Counseling Services for use by employees who would like help in dealing with personal problems. Supervisors will not be informed if an employee is seeking help unless the employee requests it. Visits to the EAP Counselor will not be entered in the personnel file. Voluntary contacts with the EAP coordinator may remain confidential.

The purpose of the Employee Assistance Program is to help employees resolve problems in ways that keep their work performance from being affected negatively. Questions regarding the program or requests to make an appointment with a counselor can be handled at Counseling Services, 425-3884.

Congress enacted the Drug-Free Workplace Act of 1988, which took effect March 18, 1989, and places certain responsibilities on the university as the recipient of federal grants and contracts. Pursuant to federal requirements and in keeping with current university policy, all UW-River Falls employees are reminded that university rules, policies and practices prohibit the unlawful manufacture, distribution, dispensing, possession, or use of controlled substances on all university property and worksites. Any employee who engages in any of these actions on university property or worksites or during work time may be referred to counseling or treatment and may be subject to disciplinary action up to and including discharge.

Employees who are convicted of any criminal drug statute violation occurring in the workplace must notify their dean, director, or department chair within five days of conviction if the employees are employed by the university at the time of the conviction.

Employees who have problems with alcohol or controlled substances are encouraged to contact their Employee Assistance Program (EAP) coordinator voluntarily for referral to counseling or treatment programs. Early diagnosis and treatment of chemical abuse is in the best interests of the university and the employee. Voluntary contacts with the EAP coordinator may remain confidential. For questions regarding the program or to make an appointment to see a counselor, call Counseling Services at 425-3884.

The development of a non-smoking policy was based on faculty, staff, and student deliberations and recommendations. The recognition of the substantial health risk that occurs when people are exposed to tobacco smoke was a critical consideration in the formation of this policy.

Smoking is not allowed in any UW-River Falls campus building or state vehicle; and effective January 1, 2004, smoking is banned within 25 feet of all campus buildings. It is expected that all individuals will comply with this policy.

In the event of weather emergencies, the chancellor or designee may cancel classes and close the campus to the public and/or direct all non-emergency employees to leave work early or not report to work. In spite of inclement weather, it is unrealistic to close a campus. There are numerous vital services that must be maintained such as security services, food services for residential students, power plant operations, snow removal, etc. However, if inclement weather is severe enough, classes can be canceled, the campus can be closed to the public, and all non-emergency personnel can be directed to leave.

Non-Exempt (hourly-based positions that earn overtime compensation for any hours worked in excess of 40 hours per week) employees who report late to work after having made an earnest effort to report to work on time but were unable to do so because of inclement weather, severe storm, or heeding an official travel advisory shall be allowed to work to make up for lost time during the current work week (including Saturdays if the employee’s work unit is in operation) as scheduled by the employer. Make-up shall be at the regular rate of pay. Employees may use vacation, personal holiday, or leave without pay in lieu of making up the time when approved by the employer. Where situations described above occur on the last day of the work week and the Employer cannot schedule the employee for make-up time, the employee may elect to use vacation, personal holiday or leave without pay.

Exempt (salaried positions that do not earn overtime compensation) employees who report late to work after having made an earnest effort to report to work because of inclement weather or severe storm or heeding and official travel advisory shall be allowed to work to make-up for lost time during the current or next pay period as scheduled by the employer. Make-up shall be at the regular rate of pay. Employees may elect to use vacation, personal holiday for the time absent.

Non-represented (not covered by a labor agreement) employees should abide by the appropriate provisions stated above based on the Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) designation (non-exempt or exempt) for their positions.

The union contract may require an employee’s department to pay an allowance toward the purchase of protective clothing, shoes, or glasses. Please refer to the union contract or talk to a union representative for additional information about protective clothing.

In the event an employee believes he or she has been assigned an abnormally dangerous task, the employee shall inform the immediate supervisor in writing on an Abnormally Hazardous Task Report form. Forms can be obtained from the Human Resources Office.

The Facilities Management Department operates and maintains a fleet of vehicles for the use of the University of Wisconsin-River Falls faculty, staff, and students who are engaged in official business of the university. Persons must be authorized and engaged in official business to be eligible to drive a state vehicle. Vehicles are reserved on a first-come, first-served basis.

Vehicles may be reserved by submitting a Vehicle Request form to Fleet Vehicles in the Maintenance/Central Stores Building. Authorization to drive a fleet vehicle is granted by the Public Safety Department. Call ext. 3133 for information about becoming an authorized fleet vehicle driver, or visit www.uwrf.edu/public-safety to obtain a Driver’s Authorization Form.

Under the expressed wish of Annette Blanchette and the Margis Family, an endowment fund has been established. This fund was first created with a principle gift from Annette Blanchette, followed by memorial gifts honoring Sally Margis added to the original endowment.

The endowment was established to generate an annual award to develop, through education and/or training, a classified employee's career at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls. The amount granted is to be used to support direct or indirect costs associated with career development. Examples of direct costs may include educational tuition and workshop/conference fees (relating to career development). Examples of indirect costs may include textbooks, special equipment, software, and daycare expenses.

The DCA/DCP Program allows UW-River Falls the discretion to provide broadbanded represented employees and non-represented employees economic recognition for certain changes in responsibilities or to address pay inequities/retention needs. Written justification must be submitted to substantiate the request. Any questions on the following criteria and request procedures should be addressed to the Human Resource Office at ext. 3221.

Note: As of July 1, 2003 agencies have approval for up to two within range pay step increases or the equivalent as a lump sum payment. Awards for amounts higher than the two step amount must first be approved by UW System.

When an employee has received a formal job offer from another employer, the supervisor's request should include a copy of the job offer, the supervisor's recommendation for a counter-offer, and any other information supporting the DCA/DCP request. If possible, the supervisor's or Director's comments should include a recap of all previous merit increases, of any kind, the employee has received in the past 3-5 years. This type of request can happen out of cycle.

The Vice Chancellor will review and make the final recommendation to Human Resources. A committee within Human Resources, after reviewing submitted materials, market data, and equity impact at UWRF, will make the final decision. Appeals can be directed to the Chancellor.

Recruitment processes can vary depending on the type of vacancy. An established list of applicants may already be established because of a pre-existing examination, or an exam may need to be created by the supervisor and the Human Resources Office.

Merit sheets are distributed by the Budget Office in early December, and are due back before mid-February. Therefore, the performance review process of Academic Staff employees takes place in December/January. The calendar year ending in December will be the focus of the review. Once the review is completed, work related goals and developmental goal(s) will be identified for the new calendar year.

The process will be triggered by Human Resources. Copies of the review will be kept by the employee and supervisor, while the original will be put in the personnel file. All reviews will be due in the Human Resource Office by the end of January.

Want to continue your education without committing to a degree program? The University of Wisconsin-River Falls offers credit and noncredit classes, workshops and events year-round that may meet your professional or personal enrichment goals.

Take charge of your professional skills development and personal growth. Browse the list of professional development programs, scan featured credit courses and take a look at noncredit offerings. Then follow the steps below to apply and register for the course or event of your choice.

As a temporary graduate student, you may enroll in graduate courses without being admitted into a graduate degree or certificate program at UW-River Falls. All you need is a bachelor's degree from an accredited institution. The $45 application fee is waived.

NOTE: If you decide to pursue a degree or certificate in the future, you will need to notify the Graduate Studies Office in writing and meet any additional admission requirements. No more than nine (9) semester credits earned as a temporary student may be applied toward a degree or certificate, with approval from the program coordinator and the director of Graduate Studies. And, graduate degrees must be completed within seven years of the date of the earliest course applied toward your degree or certificate program.

If you have never taken a graduate class at UW-River Falls, you will need to apply as a temporary graduate student. Complete your application online at Temporary Graduate Application  or print and complete the following PDF document  and return it to the Graduate Studies office.

You need to apply as a temporary undergraduate student if you are just interested in taking courses for undergraduate credit and not pursuing a degree at UW-River Falls . If you are interested in pursuing an undergraduate degree here, contact the Admissions Office  for application instructions.

NOTE: If you are currently enrolled as a graduate student at UW-River Falls, you will pay graduate tuition rate for an undergraduate course. Contact the Graduate Studies Office (email) if you need to change your graduate status.

Students may also register by printing and completing the Outreach Registration Form (PDF) and returning it to the Registrar's Office. Tuition payments may also be dropped off or mailed to the Cashiers Office.

NOTE: A enrollment deposit of $100 is required before processing spring and fall term registrations for undergraduate students. See Accounts Receivable for information on deposits, payment plans and options.

You can register and make payments online for most noncredit courses and events. Go to Noncredit Registration. Other registration options may be offered and are described within the course or event description.

We have provided some general information about acquiring and using your Falcon Account at UW-River Falls . You may scroll through the entire page or use these links to jump to specific topics on this page.

All communication to you from UWRF offices will go to your UWRF email account, which will be created when you activate your Falcon account. This includes billing and other essential information that you will need to receive! You can access your UWRF email at: https://webmail.uwrf.edu/src/login.php.

You can request a refund of the deposit in eSIS if your account balance is zero or has a credit balance. However, there will be a $50 fee if any registration activity has occurred for the deposit term.

You can make a request in eSIS to apply the deposit to your account balance. There won't be a finance charge assessed if the balance of your account less $100 is paid by the first due date of the term.

If you previously requested a refund or application of the deposit to your account, a new deposit payment cannot be made electronically but will have to be made in cash or by paper check. However, the fee payment agreement will still have to be signed in eSIS even if a deposit is made with a physical payment.

During the final enrollment period of your graduate program leading to the Master's degree, you must successfully complete a written and/or oral comprehensive examination prepared and administered by your graduate committee.

If you are unsuccessful in the comprehensive examination, you may, upon approval of the Graduate Council, reschedule the examination after a delay of six months. If you receive an incomplete on the comprehensive examination, you must make up the deficiencies identified by the chair of the committee.

In the case of an oral examination, you will receive a form for reporting the time (a block of two hours) and location to the Graduate Office, and you are responsible for making these arrangements with the committee. You must make all such arrangements and report them to the Graduate Office at least two weeks before the examination and not later than four weeks before the end of the term or session or the commencement ceremony in which you plan to be granted the degree. For an oral examination to be held during the summer, you should make arrangements during the spring semester.

All Plan A (thesis) candidates will take an oral examination about the thesis. This may be in addition to a written comprehensive, if required by the department concerned. All Plan B or Plan C candidates will take a written and/or oral examination based on specified program requirements. You are responsible for meeting with all members of your graduate committee before the examination to discuss how to prepare for the written and/or oral examination.

You will defend your master's paper in an oral examination by the three members of your graduate committee. Master's papers will be signed by the advisor and sent to the Graduate Office. The paper will not be bound. A copy will be filed in the Archives, as well as in the department.

Because each member of your graduate committee must approve your completed thesis, you must inform all three members of the committee about the development of the problem, research progress, and results, as well as the writing of the thesis. You will defend your thesis in an oral examination.

Three copies of the thesis must be filed for binding. Following approval by your graduate committee, you will pay a ten dollar ($10) per copy binding fee in the University's Business Office. When you present your receipt to the Graduate Office, the Dean of Graduate and Professional Studies will sign the title page of the thesis. The three copies will then be sent out for binding. It is your responsibility to check the manuscripts for proper pagination and deliver them to the Graduate Office.

If you take undergraduate courses, each three undergraduate credits will count as two graduate credits in calculating your load. Graduate assistants must take at least eight credits and no more than twelve credits.

The grade of "SP" (satisfactory progress) may be used in field-based or research-oriented classes where the nature of the work involved requires more calendar time than is available during the term for which the student is registered for the course. Upon completion of the project, this special grade will be changed to an appropriate letter grade.

You must maintain a "B" (3.0) average in your area of specialization, as well as on an overall basis. In determining this average, transfer credit will not be included. If you do not maintain a "B" (3.0) average, you will be placed on probation for the next enrollment period.

If you are placed on probation, you must earn a "B" average in the next enrollment period for full-time students and in the next 12 credits earned for part-time students. If you do not succeed in doing so, you will not be allowed to register for further courses.

If, after discussing the grade with the instructor, you still believe that the grade is inappropriate, you may appeal in writing to the department chairperson. You must do this before the end of the semester (excluding summer) following the assignment of the grade. The chairperson will submit your written claim to the instructor, who will prepare a written response. A copy of the instructor's response will be furnished to you within three weeks after the chairperson receives your request.

If, after you receive the instructor's response, you are still dissatisfied, you must notify the chairperson and Dean of Graduate Studies of this in writing within two weeks of receiving the response. The Dean will convene a meeting with you, the instructor, and the chairperson and try to resolve the grading conflict. Both you and the instructor shall provide copies of any course work which is in your possession. The burden of the proof is on you to demonstrate evidence of misgrading. The Dean will inform you in writing of the outcome of this meeting. If the grade you appeal was assigned by the chairperson, the Dean will receive your initial appeal and request a faculty member to replace the chairperson or program director in the appeal proceedings. If the issue is not resolved in your meeting with the Dean, the instructor and the chairperson, you may appeal to the Vice Chancellor, whose decision is final.

To graduate, you must have met all the minimum requirements for the master's degree. You must have earned all credits accepted toward the degree, including transfer credit, within the preceding seven years. The Graduate Council may approve a single extension in the case of unusual health conditions, fulfillment of military obligations, or similar extenuating circumstances.

If you plan to write a thesis or you are enrolled in a program that requires a committee for a final comprehensive examination, the Office of Graduate Studies will appoint your graduate committee when the tentative degree plan is accepted. Your adviser will chair the committee, which will include another graduate faculty member from your area of specialization and one member from outside your area of specialization. Your committee will evaluate your thesis, conduct your oral comprehensive, or evaluate your examination papers when an open-ended written comprehensive is used.

If you feel that an error has been made in your admissions status or denial of admission, you may present an appeal to the Appeals Committee of the Graduate Council. You must write a letter explaining why you believe you should be admitted, or admitted to a different status. You must also meet with the chair of the department concerned, who will write a letter with a recommendation to the committee. The committee will consider your letter, the chair's letter, and your other admissions material, including transcripts, any test scores submitted, and recommendations. It will then make a recommendation to the Graduate Council, which will vote on the appeal.

You may be denied admission to the Teacher Education program on the basis of either a low grade point average (GPA) or inadequate scores on any one subsection of the Pre-Professional Skills Test (PPST) or the Computer-Based Academic Skills Assessments (CBT). In addition, you may be denied admission to the Teacher Education program based on faculty assessment of your capacity to carry out the responsibilities of a beginning teacher and to successfully complete the requirements of a professional teacher education program.

If you are denied admission to Teacher Education, you may begin the appeal process by making an appointment with the Academic Advisor in the Dean's Office. The appeal process can only be initiated after you have received notification from the Dean's Office denying admission. The Teacher Education Appeal process can be initiated by a student and/or a faculty member who may serve as an advocate for the student.

If, for legitimate and verifiable reasons, you are unable to complete your program of study within a seven-year time limit, you may appeal for an extension of the time limit. You should obtain an appeal form from the Graduate Office and return it to that office once it is completed. You must include the reasons for the appeal, a timeline for completing the program, and your adviser's recommendation. The Appeals Committee of the Graduate Council will act on these appeals by making a recommendation to the Graduate Council, which will vote on the appeal.

Competency in the English language, as established by the results of a standardized English examination, is required of all international students from non-English speaking countries. Except in unusual circumstances, proof of proficiency must be established before   Graduate  Studies makes a decision on admission.

You should have received written or email instructions from the Graduate Office on how to activate your Falcon account. If you do not have them, go to https://www.uwrf.edu/apps/nrm/  and follow the instructions.

All students planning to enroll in an initial professional education program in Wisconsin colleges or universities that leads to a license to teach in the state will be required to pass basic skills tests in reading, writing, and mathematics.

The tests cover basic skills needed by teachers and were selected by the state Superintendent of Public Instruction based on the recommendation of a committee of Wisconsin teachers and teacher educators. The successful completion of either the PPST will fulfill the Wisconsin requirement.

Undergraduate students are required to complete this requirement before student teaching. Students who took the test before 7/1/04 are not subject to a minimum passing score in the state  of Wisconsin. Students who take the test after 6/31/04 must  receive the minimum passing score to student teach.

Developed in  cooperation with the National Community Education Association (external link), the UW-River Falls created this graduate-level certificate program in community education to meet this national need.

An overall undergraduate grade point average of at least 2.75 (on a four-point scale) or an average of at least 2.90 based on the last 60 semester credits (90 quarter credits) of the undergraduate program.

Under an agreement signed in November 2006, students in the UWRF certificate program may continue their community education studies and transfer 12 credits toward the completion of a MA in Education degree offered by Goddard College (external link).

More than one million students participated in service-learning last year through the national Learn and Serve America program. When students are engaged in meaningful service to their schools and their communities, both they and their communities benefit. Educators across the country are discovering the rewards of incorporating established curricula with hands-on service projects to increase student involvement and enhance academic achievement, citizenship, and character development.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls, working in partnership with the National Youth Leadership Council (external link), has developed a graduate-level certificate in service-learning. The program assists educators to understand, plan and apply service-learning methods in their classrooms and their communities.

Developed in partnership with Watchable Wildlife, Inc. (external link), this graduate-level certificate program will help conservationists, community leaders, and recreation and hospitality providers build the skills necessary to effectively preserve the natural resources of and generate jobs and revenue for their communities.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls Outreach and Graduate Studies office provides high quality, innovative, learner-centered, academic and professional development programs that respond to the changing professional, cultural, and social needs of continuous lifelong learners. We are dedicated to offering students quality academic programs that are practical, flexible, convenient, and affordable, thus fostering a climate in which our students can thrive.

Dr. Doug Johnson was appointed the director of Graduate Studies in March 2005. He is an Associate Dean in the College of Arts and Sciences and also teaches in the biology department and is the faculty coordinator for the Master of Science in Education in Secondary Education - Sciences. He holds a B.S. degree from Ohio University and a Ph.D.from the University of Minnesota. His academic specialization is in genetic counseling and related human genetics services.

Before joining Outreach and Graduate Studies, Linda implemented two grant-funded programs at UW-RF, both of which involved building community networks, planning, developing new programs, and facilitating collaboration. Linda brings several years of experience working with a number of community foundations both as the executive director and as a consultant. In addition, she has more than 10 years of experience as a County Extension Agent with the Cooperative Extension Service in Minnesota and Wisconsin . She holds bachelors and master's degrees in Home Economics Education from North Dakota State University and the University of Minnesota , respectively, and an MBA from the University of St. Thomas . As program manager, Linda's responsibilities include needs assessments, program development, delivery and evaluation of outreach programs in the broad array of disciplines encompassed in the College of Arts and Sciences.

Amber Tubr has been working in Outreach and Graduate Studies since August 2001. She earned her B.A. in Psychology from Luther College and a master's degree in Industrial / Organizational Psychology from Texas A&M University . Amber has extensive experience in higher education, including instruction, advisement, recruitment, and project management. Her responsibilities as Program Manager for the College of Education and Professional Studies are focused around needs assessment, program development, promotion, delivery, and evaluation of professional development programs for professionals in the disciplines of education, social work, communicative disorders, counseling and school psychology, and health and human performance.

Angela Whitaker joined Outreach and Graduate Studies in January 2003 as the College of Arts and Sciences program assistant. A long-time resident of River Falls, Angela holds a B.A. in journalism and biology from UW-River Falls.  Her responsibilities include  website updates,  writing copy for various marketing materials, prospect database administration and supporting the customer service staff. Before joining UW-River Falls, Angela was a regulatory compliance manager at Conseco Finance in St. Paul , Minnesota. She brings several years of experience in customer service, training and supervising, and information management.

Deb Wulf joined the Outreach and Graduate Studies office in October 2002. In her role as marketing manager, she assists the program managers and other staff in identifying potential students for their programs and classes and in promoting these programs and classes. She holds a B.S. in journalism and wildlife biology from Iowa State University and a Master of Business Communication from the University of St. Thomas. Before joining UW-River Falls , she was the marketing manager for a global software development company and has several years of experience working in Minnesota State government. She contributes her knowledge of service marketing and market research, business communication, promotion, advertising, and media relations to help the staff in Outreach and Graduate Studies meet their goals.

Federal law allows the UW System to request and use your social security number. While you are not legally required to provide your social security number on this form, you are strongly encouraged to do so. You will be required to provide your social security number when you apply for financial aid or the new educational tax benefits.

If you intend to apply for financial aid, the social security number is required. As applied to financial aid, it may be used for a number of purposes, including verification of identity of the borrower or recipient and as an account number throughout the life of a loan; determination of program eligibility; certification of enrollment and student status; determination of eligibility for deferment, cancellation or repayment by third parties; determination of eligibility for disability or death claims; and, in case of delinquent or defaulted loans, for tracing the borrower and collecting.

The following is an alphabetical listing of the many resources that are available to UW-RF students. Browse for the answer to your question or use the Google search feature in the menu to find the answer within the site. You may also use the Hot Topic links for answers to our frequently asked questions.

All admitted students receive instructions on how to activate your account. (See How to Apply for admission or re-admission instructions.) You may activate your Falcon Account online at https://www.uwrf.edu/apps/nrm/.

Information on fee payment schedules, required deposits, finance charges and payment methods are found at http://www.uwrf.edu/accounts-receive/. You can pay credit tuition online by MasterCard or electronic check. You can also mail or drop off payment at the Cashiers Office, 217 North Hall.

Recognized by the National Education Association as having one of the best teacher education programs in the country, the University of Wisconsin-River Falls is uniquely able to offer relevant, practical, convenient, and high-quality courses in reading. The UW-River Falls teacher education programs are nationally recognized for excellence and are accredited by the National Council for the Accreditation of Teacher Education, North Central Association and the Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction (DPI).

Technology for Educators is a 12-credit certificate program, with three core classes and one discipline-specific elective. Individual classes within the certificate program can also be taken to satisfy DPI teaching standards or as graduate credits to fulfill personal or professional development plans.

The following list does not include all the graduate courses currently offered. If you do not find a course that meets your needs, use the Class Schedule Lookup to find a course by key word, title, or term.

A variety of one-credit courses offered online and that are designed to address contemporary and timely issues in the area of economics. Topics offered this term include Personal Finance Economics, Transition to Market Economies, Roaring 20's thru Depression, and Money and Banking.

Registration is now open for Spanish and Italian language classes for adults. Classes are offered in the evenings, once a week and are designed to give people the skills to successfully communicate during their travels, whether for business or pleasure.

Outreach and Graduate Studies partners with the College of Arts and Sciences to offer the Community Classroom series each fall and spring. University faculty share their expertise through informal presentations on a variety of topics.

SOS offers six-week sessions of discussions with university professors and   community members who share their expertise, knowledge and opinions on a broad variety of current and historical events, experiences and issues. Join us for these lively and informative discussions. There are  fall and spring sessions, with  two-hour classes  held one morning each week.

If you are planning to park on campus during your visit, there are specific lots with parking meters available for your use. The largest metered lot is Q-Meter, located on the corner of Cascade and 3rd Street. These meters have a maximum time limit of eight hours and are 25 cents per hour. Other metered spaces on campus are limited to 4 hours, 1/2 hour and 20 minutes, each at a cost of 25 cents per increment.

Visitor parking is available in the 8th row at Ramer Field with a valid visitor permit issued by the Parking Office. There are very limited visitor parking spaces available outside of the  Outreach and Graduate Studies Office buliding and all visitors must sign in at the reception area.

Parking permits are required when parking in student and faculty/staff lots as well as handicap areas and loading zones. Contact the Parking Office at  (715) 425-3333 to obtain a parking permit or visit the Web site for more information.

On Friday, November 3, 2006 we experienced a problem with a listserv that the university manages and which serves teachers in our region. This problem caused all recipients to receive unwanted and unintended email messages. We have corrected the problem and sincerely apologize for the inconvenience it caused you.

Educators have told us that they prefer to get information about professional development courses and graduate degrees and certificates in a timely fashion. Most teachers have indicated a preference for electronic notification. Emails are used  because they can get the word out quickly and inexpensively.

This list was developed as a means of notifying potential and current students about upcoming learning opportunities through UW-River Falls. Unlike many listservs, this list is not intended to facilitate two-way communication among members. As such, all replies to the list messages are intercepted  by the list administrator and the list of members is not made public.

Generally, an email message is sent by the Outreach and Graduate Studies office once or twice a month to list members. All postings are created exclusively by the UW-River Falls staff. The list is typically not used during the summer months. All replies to the messages sent are directed to the list administrator, who would respond appropriately just to the sender.  Email communications are not shared with the list membership.

Best practices for electronic marketing emphasize  an “opt in” process for listservs. With “opt in” listservs, members are invited but not added to the list unless they confirm that they would like to receive these emails. Under the current practices used for the Teachers Listserv, no one can be added to the listserv without the express permission of the email recipient.

We will continue to invite active UWRF students and those who have expressed an interest in any of our teaching programs or courses to participate in the listserv. However, these individuals must follow the subscription instructions or they will not receive the email messages about unique learning opportunities with UW-River Falls.

Even a moderated, closed listserv  may experience problems. Members of the list may be receiving more spam (unwanted messages)  as a result of the unintentional publication of the list membership in November 2006. We apologize for any  inconvenience as a result of this problem. Please contact your network administrator for possible solutions to this problem.

Some individuals may have set their Spam filters to block any messages from @uwrf.edu. If you are a current UWRF student or intended to take a UWRF course in the future, you should be aware that this action may inhibit any official messages from the university, such as tuition payment notices, financial aid notification, grade reports and course registration confirmations. Each UWRF student is given an email account that ends in @uwrf.edu and this is the account used for official university business. If you are currently a student or an UWRF alumni, please remove this filter so that your communications with the university are not inhibited.

For more information about the listserv, visit the web page or send an email to: Teachers Listserv and the administrator will reply to your request. Your request will not be sent to other members on the list.

DetailsThis course provides an examination of the fundamentals of individual income taxation, tax advantaged investments, capital gains and losses, life insurance, tax implications for different types of businesses and more.

Every first floor entry door of each residence hall has a card reader. Card holders can access any of these doors 24 hours per day 7 days per week. Between 6:00am and 10:00pm daily students and staff can enter any residence hall with their ID card. Between 10:00pm and 6:00am daily you can enter only the residence hall in which you live.

The ID card is used to help keep track of student and staff meal plan access and balances. You can also use your ID card to purchase food in the food service locations, items from the bookstore, or copies from the copy machines found in the library.

Information Desk. Students and staff wishing to use the Hunt and Knowles facilities will be asked to present their ID card for scanning before allowed access. ID cards are also used when obtaining health care.

The Body Shop, a nautilus fitness center, is located in Hathorn Hall. If you decide to purchase a membership, your ID card will be used to verify paid membership. Body Shop memberships are available to students and staff through the Involvement Center.

All of this starts with the stripe on the back of the card which is encoded with your student/staff ID number. This number identifies you with our computer access system and if you are participating on a meal plan it allows you access into the dining rooms. If you purchase points, this stripe allows you to spend your points in all Dining Services locations, in the bookstore, or to use the copy machines.

The conference planning committee has identified a common reading for the conference that centers on the issue of sustainability. We hope you take the time to read this brief, but informative series of articles, and allow the articles to inform your program proposals and award applications.

The common reading consists of a series of three articles that appeared in the July/August 2006 edition of Public Purpose, the magazine of the American Association of Colleges and Universities, entitled "Educating for a Sustainable Society."

Physical  Spaces of Civic Engagement could include such topics as  architecture, lighting, classrooms, libraries student centers, coffee houses, outdoor  landscapes, campus malls, green building practices and natural habitat areas. Presentations  should address how physical spaces can reflect positive and sustainable civic  engagement.

Virtual  Spaces of Civic Engagement could include such web-related  topics as web-based learning, text messaging, podcasting, blogging, digital  imaging, as well as user generated websites such as MySpace, Facebook, Ebay,  Craig’s List, etc. Presentations should address how virtual spaces can reflect  positive and sustainable civic engagement.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls University Theater will offer a production of a newly adapted version of "The Diary of Anne Frank." Those conference participants wishing to receive a free ticket to the Friday, April 13 production will be asked to indicate their desire to attend on the conference registration form.

A frequent writer and speaker, Dr. Betz has addressed international,   motivational and educational topics for over 30 years. He has worked with   newspapers, radio and television in the United States and other countries   addressing international, leadership and educational issues.

In his role as Senior Editor of The Times, Brock helps oversee the   standards and ethics of the newspaper and works with editors and reporters   throughout the newsroom to address readers’ concerns about bias, fairness and   accuracy.

Anne Colby, a psychologist whose work centers on adult development with   special reference to the development of character and values, co-directs the   Preparation for the Professions Program and the Political Engagement Project.   She was also a team member of the Foundation's study of Higher Education and the   Development of Moral and Civic Responsibility Project. She was previously   director of the Henry Murray Research Center of Radcliffe College.

But his is not strictly an environmental message. His inspiring combination   of personal achievement, humor, optimism, and expert storytelling has motivated   diverse audiences all over the country to believe that as individuals, they too   can shape their future starting in their own backyards.

Most recently, as director of the Pace Academy for the Environment at Pace   University, John has turned his attention to working regularly with citizens,   teachers, scientists, policy makers, and business leaders on the ethical   dimensions of the human relationship to nature.

George Mehaffy serves as the Vice President for Academic Leadership and   Change at the American Association of State Colleges and Universities (AASCU).   His division is responsible for a number of special programs and projects for   AASCU presidents and chief academic officers in the areas of leadership and   organizational change, specifically focusing on subjects such as technology,   teacher education and international education.

BizNews provides the latest UW-River Falls information each month for business and industry on topics of general interest as well as the latest on UW-RF programs and services tailored to the private sector.

"We expect about 275-300 new students, most of whom are transferring from other educational institutions," said Alan Tuchtenhagen, executive director of enrollment services. "This may well be a record new student enrollment for spring term. Our location, affordability and broad array of academic programs makes us a very popular choice for transfer students."

Students can take either a full-time or part-time schedule of classes. Registration is Jan. 18 and classes start Jan. 22 for all new, incoming students including transfer students. Students must be admitted before registering. On-campus housing is available as is financial aid for those who qualify.

The event, geared toward parents and high school seniors, is free and open to the public. Participants do not have to be planning on applying or enrolling at UWRF to attend, as the program is designed to meet the needs of any student who plans to continue education after high school. Family members are also encouraged to attend.

Among the topics to be covered are the types of federal and state financial aid programs, how to complete the Free Application for Federal Student Aid, how awards are made, and the costs to attend college. You will also be able to submit questions to financial aid experts.

The classes will be held on six consecutive evenings beginning with Spanish I on Feb. 6, Italian on Feb. 7, and Spanish II on March 27. All courses are designed to give adults the skills to successfully communicate and enjoy travel whether for business or pleasure. All classes will take place on the UW-River Falls campus with free parking.

A course in promotional strategies for businesses and nonprofit organizations will be offered spring semester. The class, Advertising Methods 361/Public Relations Methods 371, is open to those with a basic familiarity with advertising and public relations.

Research and planning required for promotions and evaluation of promotional plans will be covered along with details and practice in media planning and buying as well as public relations writing. There will be an opportunity to work on an individual project related to one's job or organization or on projects related to community organizations as "clients."

Assistant Professor Tracy O'Connell has taught in the UWRF marketing communications program for three years. She has previously managed advertising, marketing and public relations activities for nearly 30 years in the nonprofit arena as well as for a Fortune 500 company. She taught for 10 years in California colleges and holds a doctorate from UCLA.

The 2007 event builds on the success of the legislative activities from last March, during which time 40 citizens from the St. Croix Valley traveled to Madison. Creating awareness of the St. Croix Valley was an important theme, with much success.

The organizers of the United St. Croix Valley Legislative Days cordially invite you to participate in meetings with key legislators and cabinet secretaries during our time in Madison. We’re also hoping to arrange for a meeting with Governor Jim Doyle.

After arriving in Madison on Feb. 13, activities will include brushing-up on legislative issues and advocacy basics 101; meetings with legislators; lunch with a guest speaker; additional legislative meetings; evening reception; and breakfast with a guest speaker on Wednesday morning.

Please register by Jan. 12. The fee of $75 per participant and includes transportation to and from Madison, event meals and an evening reception. Hotel reservations are not included and should be made and paid for separately.

The Mentor Network is an online resource to help students and alumni connect with other alumni and friends of the University while researching major choices, career options or gaining insight into various career paths and vocations.

Mentors volunteer information related to their career path or chosen vocation when requested by a currently enrolled student or alumnus. Only UWRF students and alumni have access to contact you as a mentor.

One of the most common forms of participant requests from Mentors is to conduct an informational interview which can be performed in person, over the phone or by e-mail. This informational interview takes 20-30 minutes to complete.

Chancellor Don Betz announced the award, which will be presented to the Chiefs organization at fall commencement on Dec. 16. Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer Denny Thum is expected to accept the recognition on behalf of the team.

"The Chiefs are an excellent choice for this award," Betz said of the Chiefs presence at summer training camp in River Falls.. "For the past 16 years the team has been an important member of our university family. They have helped us to achieve many of our institutional objectives, including bringing more visitors to campus, increasing our economic impact on the region and enhancing our institutional visibility. The Chiefs have also been great partners to us on campus in other ways. Their presence has enabled us to offer dozens of internships to students, who have also found the Chiefs to be accessible, remarkable mentors.

"They've helped us to generate the resources to make numerous campus improvements. The team's leaders also have been outstanding advocates on our behalf to our state government in Madison, helping us to secure state funding for remodeling projects.

The Outstanding Service Award was established in 1983 to recognize individuals or organizations outside of the university community who have made exemplary contributions to UW-River Falls through their support of the institution's goals and their voluntary efforts on behalf of the university.

The array of works available for purchase includes intricately wrought ornaments, glassworks, ceramics, paintings, fibers, jewelry, printmaking, photography and mixed media. Participating artists range from students, faculty, alumni and local artisans, all eager to contribute to the UWRF art department scholarship fund through their art.

The sale benefits a scholarship fund for continuing students as well as the Art Society, a student organization. Participating artists retain 65 to 70 percent of the proceeds, and the balance goes to the scholarship fund. Organizers say it is great place to find holiday gifts, as every purchase supports local artists and gives back to benefit deserving students.

UWRF will gain acreage immediately adjacent to the west and northwest of the farm, which adjoins Country Road MM northwest of River Falls. K&S will receive acreage south of the county road, directly across from the existing laboratory farm.

Proposed plans by K&S include developing the acreage for rural residential purposes, possibly including an elementary school, retail services, a fire substation, parks and a playground, according to UWRF Campus Planner Dale Braun.

The university will use the newly obtained land for the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences. According to Braun, a land assessment conducted by the college indicated it needed another 295 additional tillable acres beyond the 398 acres currently available.

The trade is compatible with the land use planning goals of the Town of Troy, St. Croix County and the City of River Falls. The land to be acquired by K&S can be served by municipal sewer and water services. The land to be gained by the University lies within the Town of Troy and is not eligible for city services.

"Approximately $500,000 has been gifted by individuals, companies, and business to make this project possible," said Betz. "It's very clear to me that this initiative is part of the historic mission of this institution."

Professor Steve Kelm, chair of the UWRF department of animal and food science; spoke of the excitement that faculty and students have for the new facility. "As a faculty member and chair of the department, I'm excited that we'll be able to use this new tool, but mostly I'm excited for our students," he said. "A project like this required a lot of vision and a lot of perspective and understanding of what this institution is about."

The complex is expected to be completed by the summer of 2007 and will replace the old dairy facility, constructed in the 1950s, located at Lab Farm No. 1 near the main campus. It will include a compost bedded pack barn for approximately 100 lactating cows, a BouMatic double-6 herringbone parlor, which will increase milking speed and efficiency, as well as a special needs barn, calf barn, heifer barn, hay barn, feed shed and machine shed.

The facility will also feature a StepMetrix automated lameness detection system with sensors that will monitor weight distribution of the cow in order to identify lame animals; research bays with Calan gates, allowing the herd to be split into groups for nutrition trials, confinement and pasture-based management systems; and two 25-student classrooms attached to the milking center that can be expanded for industry-sponsored workshops and meetings.

UWRF is well known in the U.S. dairy industry as having one of the three largest dairy science undergraduate programs in the country with about 110 dairy science majors. In addition, the program has more than 450 animal science majors.

The solution we are proposing to the Wisconsin Legislature is a “Growth Agenda for Wisconsin,” that will contribute to the state’s economy in three ways: First, over the next several years, the UW wants to increase the number of Wisconsin residents who have four-year college degrees. Second, we want to help attract more college graduates to Wisconsin. Finally, we want to work with Wisconsin business and government to create knowledge-economy jobs in areas of high state need. We’ll couple that to one of the lowest requested tuition increases in over two decades.

The more Wisconsin citizens who hold college degrees, the more we can attract high-paying jobs, bolster the state tax base, and improve our quality of life. One of the reasons Wisconsin’s economy has not been as robust as it could be is that, when compared to other states, a lower percentage of Wisconsin residents have four-year college degrees – just 25 percent, compared to 27 percent nationally and 33 percent in Minnesota.

Through the “Growth Agenda for Wisconsin,” we will enroll and graduate more traditional students. The university also will reach out to working adult students and students from low-income backgrounds.

At UW-River Falls we plan to move in a conscientious manner with the other UW System campuses on the Growth Agenda, even as we undertake our own massive strategic planning process to articulate a new future for our campus and the St. Croix Valley.

One of UWRF’s primary objectives is to be efficient with our existing resources. We intend to invest funds to become an institution of excellence in programming for incoming first-year students. We’ll develop workshops, curriculum and support materials to connect students with our campus. This is one way we will assist more students to graduate prepared to be productive, creative, ethical and engaged in the growing knowledge economy.

UWRF also is included in proposals to recruit and retain a more diverse population among education majors, as well as to electronically monitor our students’ records so they enroll in the right courses on the schedule they need for their degree program, saving them both time and tuition.

As UWRF’s strategic planning process unfolds this fall, we’ll consider expanding our enrollment to meet the increasing educational demands of the dynamic St. Croix Valley. We’ll explore a range of initiatives: distance-learning classes; teaching at other locations; admitting more transfer students; adding undergraduates; and launching new graduate and certificate programs for adult learners. We’ll be asking future Legislatures to help with those funding needs.

Across the UW System, we’re ready to help more taxpaying, working adults access a UW education. A statewide program called the “Adult Student Initiative” would provide services and course delivery designed specifically for working adults who want to earn a four-year college degree.

A proposed financial aid program titled the “Wisconsin Covenant” would cover all tuition and fees as needed for Wisconsin’s students who fulfill a pledge they would make in the eighth grade. If they take rigorous high school classes and prepare themselves for college, the Wisconsin Covenant would make sure they do not have to worry about finances coming between them and the opportunity to attend a UW campus. The Wisconsin Covenant would not begin until 2011, but we’re asking elected leaders to fund increased financial aid for current UW students.

In the end, the “Growth Agenda for Wisconsin” is really about solving the silent crisis that confronts Wisconsin and the nation as a whole. National research shows if current trends continue, for every 100 of our eighth graders only 30 will earn a college degree. Without a college education in the knowledge economy, where will our other 70 kids end up? We believe the Growth Agenda will help create some promising futures.

Community Classroom events are sponsored by the College of Arts and Science and the Outreach office of UW-River Falls. All events are free and open to the public. The lectures begin at 7 p.m. in the lower level of the River Falls Public Library on Division and Union streets in River Falls.

The UWRF Outreach Office plans to offer Spanish and Italian language classes in February 2007 for adults. The classes will be offered in the evenings, once a week and are designed to give people the skills to successfully communicate during their travels, whether for business or pleasure.

The UWRF Fall Recruiting Season is off to a great start! The UWRF Career Fair is less than two weeks away and we are fortunate to have more than 100 employers coming to campus. The Etiquette Dinner is sold out and we are continuing to assist employers fill their on-campus recruiting schedules as well.

As an office we seek to prepare our students with critical skill sets for their career development. To increase our student's success in interviewing we offer Mock Interview Events for students to gain valuable feedback.

The Center for Economic Research is sponsoring the fourth installment of its Friday Seminar Series featuring talks by business professionals and professors from the College of Business and Economics on a broad range of economic subjects.

The 15th annual Career Fair was held Oct.18 in Karges Gymnasium. The fair was a tremendous success with more than 105 area employers and institutes of higher education in attendance, 45 of which were new organizations. The increased employer attendance drew a staggering 1,350 individuals, representing almost 500 more than last year. Fair-goers had the opportunity to meet with companies and speak with others from their field of interest, as well as seek out job and internship opportunities. The enhanced attendance provided significant networking opportunities for students and employers.

Nancy Devine will begin her duties with the university in November. She is serving as the executive director of development at the University of Detroit Mercy, a campus of 5,600 students and one of the oldest private universities in Michigan.

In making the announcement, Chancellor Don Betz noted, "Nancy brings a wealth of successful experience in all phases of advancement to this important position. Her career clearly demonstrates an exceptional passion and effectiveness for encouraging support for education and a gift for organization and interpersonal relations. Nancy will be joining the University Cabinet as a senior leader and will work directly with our much appreciated UW-River Falls Foundation Board."

"I'm delighted to join UW-River Falls as the executive director of the office of University Advancement and president of its foundation. During my visits to the campus, I found its leadership, students, faculty, staff, alumni and friends to be welcoming and passionate about the university.

"It's clear that the campus is poised on the edge of greatness. It is an excellent regional asset for education and outreach in the St. Croix Valley of western Wisconsin. It's proximity to the Twin Cities metropolitan area will provide many opportunities for developing successful new relationships.

During the past three years, she simultaneously planned and implemented a new comprehensive campaign while strategically expanding the overall development program. Prior to her work at UDM, Devine was responsible for development, alumni relations, and advancement programs in non-profit organizations and higher education institutions, including the University of Minnesota and Arizona State University.

Reilly will address the UW System's current "Growth Agenda for Wisconsin," that has been approved by the Board of Regents, and has been advanced to Gov. Jim Doyle and the Wisconsin Legislature for consideration.

At the heart of the Growth Agenda initiative, which carries a $27.3 million price tag over the next state two-year budget, is the production of more bachelor's degrees in such critical areas as teacher education in math and science; engineering; nursing and health care professions; nano-technology; sciences, and business.

"The more Wisconsin citizens who hold college degrees, the more we can attract high-paying jobs, bolster the state tax base, and improve our quality of life," Reilly explained. "One of the reasons Wisconsin's economy has not been as robust as it could be is that, when compared to other states, a lower percentage of Wisconsin residents have four-year college degrees - just 25 percent, compared to 27 percent nationally and 33 percent in Minnesota."

Betz will speak to UWRF's ongoing extensive strategic planning process that will consider expanding the size of the student body. UWRF currently enrolls 6,100 undergraduate and graduate students. This year is the eighth time in the last decade that the campus has set an enrollment record.

"As UWRF's strategic planning process unfolds this fall, we'll consider expanding our enrollment to meet the increasing educational demands of the dynamic St. Croix Valley. We'll explore a range of initiatives: distance-learning classes; teaching at other locations; admitting more transfer students; adding undergraduates; and launching new graduate and certificate programs for adult learners. We'll be asking future Legislatures to help with those funding needs," Betz said.

University records show nearly 6,800 UWRF alumni reside in Pierce, Polk and St. Croix counties. A total of 1,655 students are enrolled from those counties this year in undergraduate or graduate programs. The University also has been active in providing expertise to many communities across the three-county area as they address issues of growth and change.

"With ongoing increases in the cost of energy, now is the time for Wisconsin to take control of our energy future. By committing four of our campuses to energy independence by 2012 we are tapping into the ingenuity of the UW System and laying the groundwork for a cleaner, more energy independent future in Wisconsin," Doyle said.

Doyle told about 200 persons who attended the announcement, "UWRF is obviously a natural to be selected for this pilot. This is a campus that has been devoted in so many different ways to conservation and to renewable energy.

He said the initiative's intent is to have the campus produce as much energy as it consumes. By using innovative energy generation methods and buying "green" energy produced by local utilities without the use of fossil fuels, the campus is expected to break even on its energy costs in five years.

According to the Governor, his staff will work with UW-RF to develop an energy plan and then seek money from the Legislature as a front-end investment in technologies and research. He said the money will be recovered by cost savings.

"Sustainability is a way of life at UW-River Falls. We believe that sustainability is a core value as well as a practical objective that should be pursued in many ways both on our campus and in the St. Croix Valley region that we serve.

"This designation will motivate us to rededicate ourselves to modeling the way on sustainability, whether the benefit is to other institutions or to communities. We embrace the trust that has been placed on us to lead the way, to achieve success, and to share our successes with others," the chancellor said.

The facility will be 40 percent more efficient than similar contemporary student centers. It includes a 48,000 gallon storage capacity of collected rain water that is used for grey flush water. The structure incorporates natural building materials, with a white roof to reflect sunlight, along with many other features. An educational kiosk will also be on display in the Great Hall, which will monitor various elements of the building's resource consumption.

When Pettingill arrived at Allina in 2002, he knew that the health care system needed radical change but thought it would be incremental and evolutionary. He set his sights on transforming Allina--taking it from a decentralized holding company to a high performing operating company, poised to be a national model for quality, community benefit and low-cost health care. Pettingill will cover the innovations implemented by Minnesota's largest health care organization to improve health care for patients and communities.

President and CEO of Allina Hospitals and Clinics since 2002, Pettingill has a diverse background that includes spending several years at a premiere academic medical center, a district and community hospital system, and Kaiser Permanente, one of the nation's largest integrated health care systems.

As Baby Boomers edge closer to retirement, new generations of leaders and workers are changing the way we do business. The UW-River Falls and Wisconsin Indianhead Technical College are offering a ground-breaking seminar with solutions to overcome the challenges of working in a multi-generational workforce.

"UW-River Falls is situated perfectly in the St. Croix Valley, which is the fastest growing region of Wisconsin," says Betz. "We intend to continue to increase our student enrollment to meet the educational needs of our region."

UW-River Falls, which currently requires incoming freshmen and sophomores to reside on campus, has filled all 2,568 residence hall beds, with 120 students assigned to temporary housing. Returning sophomores were given the option to live off campus this year to open up rooms for incoming freshmen.

The Food Microbiology Symposium is Oct. 14-17 and features speakers from academia, industry and regulatory agencies that will provide an overview on various topics including the pathogens, toxins, and contaminants that may occur in food, water, and the environment. The emphasis will be on practical application of food and quality problems.

The symposium attracts a diverse community of attendees. The program is suitable for food scientists and technologists, quality assurance supervisors, food laboratory directors, microbiologists, consultants, researchers and graduate students interested in food microbiology.

Betz stressed several key initiatives based on the university's newly redefined mission, vision and values in his keynote address. These included retention of first- and second-year students, a commitment to civic engagement and service-learning, globalization and international linkages, sustainability, and leadership.

Among the endeavors, Betz outlined the installation of a new Chancellor's Leadership Council; preparations for re-accreditation from the North Central Association Higher Learning Commission; a new First-year Experience/Students in Transition office; creation of a leadership institute on campus; strengthening of the new Center for Interdisciplinary Study, founded by an alumna gift to the university; and the start of a new committee to explore, promote and strengthen sustainability efforts on campus.

He also stressed smart growth on campus as directed by the UW System. "We are fortunate in that UW-River Falls is strategically placed geographically to maximize that enrollment growth potential," he said. Betz also pointed out that the UW-River Falls Foundation had a banner year with alumni support at an all-time high.

"By what we say and what we do, what we think and what we value, by what we embrace and what we reject, we shape and define our lives and our communities. Much of that influence will be actualized in the thoughts and deeds of those students. As a university, a community of scholars, teachers and learners, it is our expressed intention that we create each day the optimum possibility for personal growth and a sense of social responsibility ... and it is equally imperative and intentional that we do this together.

The conference provides an opportunity for leaders in business, community, workforce development, government, health care and education to focus on issues and find practical solutions to the challenges that accompany economic growth in a nine-county region of West Central Wisconsin. The region includes the counties of Barron, Chippewa, Clark, Dunn, Eau Claire, Pepin, Pierce, Polk and St. Croix.

Keynote speakers include Rebecca Ryan, founder of Next Generation Consulting, and Jack Schultz, author of Boomtown, USA. There will also be breakout sessions on affordable health care, economic development, education, quality of life, and workforce development in the region.

Upcoming seminars include an exploration of the value relevance of foreign currency on Oct. 13; decision-making factors in failing projects on Nov. 3; organizational challenges in launching new products on Nov. 17; and economics literacy in high schools on Dec. 1.

All seminars are free, open to the public and designed for students, educators, business people and community leaders. A refreshment and social time precedes each seminar at 3 p.m. in Room 317, South Hall.

The mission of the CER is to assist and encourage research that supports the mission of the UW-RF College of Business and Economics as well as other colleges within the university. The center also provides a Web-based outlet for research efforts at www.uwrf.edu/cer.

Global Kids is offered for children in K-5 grades and may be taken in one or two, eight-week sessions. Each language offers an introductory fall session with the opportunity to build on the knowledge gained with a winter session.

Instructors are enthusiastic individuals chosen for their teaching and language abilities. Classes begin Sept. 18 on the UW-River Falls campus and at Zanie Janie's Activity Center in downtown River Falls.

This program is for individuals, who work with Spanish speakers in medical, dental, agricultural, hospitality, business, construction, law enforcement and legal services, as well as people who want an introduction to spoken Spanish for personal growth, travel and family interactions.

The Career Fair is an ideal opportunity for your business to attract potential employees or interns. The Career Fair provides the opportunity to match qualified candidates with employer needs. UW-River Falls generates a pool of highly qualified students every year. Last year’s Career Fair attracted nearly 1,000 students.

Right now, there is peace in Northern Ireland – with hopes for workable shared governance. But for 30 years, the struggles of the different factions operating there resulted in the deaths of more than 3,500 people, and the injury of thousands more. These events have confused and frightened people worldwide. Is there a real chance for lasting peace?

Join presenter Kenneth Olson, UW-RF English department, for an assessment and perspective on the troubles in Northern Ireland, including the politics and incidents of conflict, the culture, and climate for change. Olson has traveled and studied extensively throughout Ireland.

This is one of four Community Classroom events sponsored by the College of Arts and Science and the Outreach office this fall. All events are free and open to the public. The lecture is Thursday, Sept. 14, and begins at 7 p.m. in the lower level of the River Falls Public Library on Division and Union streets in River Falls. No reservations are required.

Are we prepared for what will happen when it’s time for today’s younger citizens to take the helm of government? How do members of all generations move beyond the Internet to harness the power of American media, and to have our voices heard as “citizen journalists” and future leaders.

An expert in information sciences, technology transfer and knowledge management and a seasoned university administrator and faculty member has been named as provost at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

"Charlie brings energy, experience and insight to this vital position," said UW-RF Chancellor Don Betz. "His collaborative work and leadership and faculty roles have prepared him well for this opportunity."

His accomplishments at WCU since joining its staff in 2002 include developing a consortium for large scientific instruments within the university and in collaboration with other institutions and implementing a strategic plan process to prioritize programs and reallocate resources. He guided the college through a $1.3 million shortfall in his first two years and developed a $1.9 million surplus in 2004-05.

Hurt's administrative experience includes dean- and directorships at the University of Arizona. He was associate, acting and interim dean of its College of Social and Behavioral Sciences; head of the Near Eastern studies department; and director of its School of Information Resources and Library Science. He also held academic appointments in the departments of communication and anthropology.

Having authored more than 50 journal articles, conference papers and reports, Hurt's scholarly works include topics ranging from information retrieval and knowledge management to scientific information. His publications have appeared in journals such as Information Processing and Management, Cataloging and Classification Quarterly, Journal of the American Society for Information Science and Scientometrics. Hurt has been a reviewer and acquisitions editor for several academic publishers.

Ryan’s presentation will focus on the steps West Central Wisconsin can take to reverse its brain drain. She also will present a “handprint,” or regional profile, of the area based on seven leading indexes for retaining and developing a talented workforce.

Schultz will present innovative ways rural communities can recruit new businesses and retain young adults through better job opportunities. He also will participate in a breakout session on economic development.

In “From Field to Freezer” you will learn safe killing, dressing, boning, and cutting techniques. There will be demonstrations of basic kill zones on the deer, correct techniques and equipment for field gutting, skinning, caping, cutting and boning, and getting the meat ready for freezing.

Global Kids, an exploratory foreign language program for children in first through fifth grade will be available this year. Chinese, German and Spanish classes will be offered in two, eight-week sessions, once in the fall and once in the winter. Classes will be held generally from 4 - 4:45 p.m. on Mondays or Thursdays.

The popular Punt, Pass & Kick competition for boys and girls age 8-13 will be on Saturday, July 29. Registration is free, and on site will start at 11 a.m. with competition starting at noon. The event is sponsored by FedEx Ground and FedEx Home Delivery. Everyone who participates receives a ribbon and the top three place winners in each category receives a trophy. Head Coach Herman Edwards will present the trophies to the winners after the Family Fun Night practice on Aug. 5. To register on-line go to: www.uwrf.edu/chiefs/ppkform.htm.

Businesses who might wish to become corporate partners with the Chiefs by providing goods or services should contact Mary Halada, vice chancellor administration and finance, at 715-425-3882. Each year more than two-dozen Valley businesses act as sponsors and gain exclusive marketing opportunities as a result.

Do you have open positions that require a college degree or specialized training? Use one of the three below job posting systems to post the position to all colleges/universities in the state of Wisconsin.

"Our objectives were fully realized and even surpassed," said Betz. "The delegation set out to strengthen the relationships that UW-RF has with numerous Asian education institutions and to develop greater student and faculty exchange and research opportunities between these intuitions and UW-RF. We returned with specific collaboration agreements as well as a wealth of opportunities to be developed in the immediate future."

"It's your chance to 'kick the tires,' so to speak, on business plan development to satisfy your entrepreneurial urge," says Steve DeWald director of the UW-RF SBDC. The workshop is also geared toward small business owners who are thinking of a business expansion.

The workshop will address questions such as: Will your business idea work? Is it a good investment for your life savings? Should you take the next step? Do you want to participate in the American dream of owning a small business?

Tuition and fees are $650 for Wisconsin residents and $710 for Minnesota residents with reciprocity. If not enrolled at UW-RF, participants can apply  for admission as a “temporary undergraduate” by completing a short form online at www.uwrf.edu/summer. The UW-RF admissions office will then follow up with information on registering and paying for the class.

Free and open to the public, KinniFest offers opportunities to learn about the “Kinni” and the resources it provides for the community. The festival will also feature nature art displays from local artists and a historical presentation of River Falls.

The event runs Friday, June 2 from 6 to 9 p.m., and begins with music in Veterans Park in downtown River Falls and the dedication of Riverwalk. On Saturday, June 3, the celebration continues from 7 a.m. to 4 p.m. with nature field trips, demonstrations and exhibits by local businesses, organizations and schools. Exhibits open at 10 a.m.

The day’s events also include a Harris Hawk demonstration by Nell Henry, a long-time volunteer at the Raptor Center at the University of Minnesota, as well as rock and fossil identification by Cordua and a Trout Unlimited Fly Fishing Seminar.

All are welcome to attend KinniFest to help celebrate, protect and enhance the Kinnickinnic River. For more information please contact festival coordinator Joyce Mattson by sending an email to jycmttsn@yahoo.com.

Beginning June 19, teens who have finished grades 6, 7 or 8 will have an opportunity to get a taste of the college campus environment. Another program for students who’ve finished grades 3, 4 and 5 begins July 17.

Each year, hundreds of youths attend Teen University or College for Kids, two summer outreach programs offered by the university. Both programs provide academic enrichment classes for students who show high academic potential, motivation and talent.

Students can choose from a number of classes taught by University faculty and other highly qualified instructors. The classes are designed to stimulate creative and critical thinking in a variety of artistic and academic disciplines, and to provide individual and social enrichment through a university campus-based experience.

The course is open to students, professionals and interested members of the public. Participants will have opportunities to see examples of and examine different approaches to residential development. Noncredit fees for the class are $280, and participants who want undergraduate credit will pay applicable tuition and campus fees.

On July 24-26 physical and health educators and industry experts will come together for two workshops and a one-day conference to sharpen their talents with an assortment of best practices that they can immediately apply in their classroom. Physical education and health education faculty and professionals will present the latest information in physical education and health education practices.

Chancellor Don Betz spoke passionately about the University’s mission of creating ethical and engaged graduates who have a global perspective at his inauguration speech and ceremony April 28, installing him as the 16th chancellor of the 132-year-old public university serving 6,000 students.

Betz emphasized three inaugural themes that the university will pursue: globalization, diversity, and service in the St. Croix Valley. Leadership development will be a thread throughout all educational efforts, he added.

In addition to alumni, UW-River Falls was represented by Faculty Senate President Barbara Werner, who gifted Betz with a wooden park bench; Student Senate President Nicholas Cluppert, who presented the chancellor with a carved falcon on behalf of the student body; Academic Staff Representative Sarah Egerstrom, who, on behalf of academic staff, donated a cache of leadership books and literature for a special library collection,;and Classified Staff Representative Greg Elliott, who bestowed Betz with a tree to be planted on campus.

At the both the inauguration and close of the ceremony, approximately 200 faculty and staff as well as visiting colleagues and guest from other universities dressed in traditional academic garb. Also participating in the processional were international students dressed in traditional costume and carrying flags representing their home countries, students who received the 2006 Chancellor’s Award for Excellence and students who represented the more than 125 student organizations.

Included in this summer’s offerings are undergraduate and graduate classes for credit, travel opportunities and professional development opportunities. To accommodate students’ busy schedules, weekday, weekend and evening classes are offered along with compressed schedules that finish quickly. Each class lasts about three weeks, including one Saturday class. Some courses are offered online.

Professors Michael Middleton and Kerry Keen bring enthusiasm, humor, and extensive knowledge of the region’s rocks and waters to a course offered June 7-8, as part of the St. Croix River Institute’s summer offerings.

Participants will spend one day exploring the geologic history of Interstate Park and the Dalles of the St. Croix River. This area is rich with evidence of continental rifting, ancient vulcanism, storm-battered seacliffs, glacial scouring and massive glacial meltwaters.

On the second day, participants will trace the flow of water along the Kinnickinnic River, a major tributary of the St. Croix River, from source to outlet. Features to be explored include springs, river processes, delta formation, and environmental issues related to surface water and groundwater.

Designed for adults, the workshop includes some hiking on level to moderately steep, mostly well-maintained trails, with some crossing of irregular ground in fields and woods. No climbing is required, but there may be some wading in shallow water.

Residential developments reflect aesthetic and environmental sensibilities of a region’s population as well as economic and social realities of the times, according to Eric Sanden, professor of land use planning at UW-River Falls and workshop instructor.

In an increasingly affluent country, new subdivisions offered affordable housing and easy commuting to cities served by newly established highway networks. Although convenient and efficient, these developments are viewed by some as being homogenous and sprawling. Traditional U.S. neighborhoods were more compact, contained more diverse types of housing, and were pedestrian-friendly.

In addition to the traditional planning tools of zoning, subdivision regulations, and building codes, planners can now draw on tools such as conservation development, traditional neighborhood design and planned unit developments to enhance the livability of a neighborhood.

The residential building boom of recent years has boosted demand for people who understand how to use these tools, says Sanden, who designed the course, “Residential Design Options,” in response to these needs of students, planners, government officials, land developers and concerned citizens.

The course is open to students, professionals and the public. Participants will have opportunities to see examples of and examine different approaches to residential development. Noncredit fees for the class are $280, and participants who want undergraduate credit will pay applicable tuition and campus fees.

Courses offered by the St. Croix River Institute will benefit: science teachers; educators; landowners interested in natural processes and local waterways; and anyone who is curious about the physical history and health of the St. Croix Valley.

Physical and health educators and industry experts will come together for a unique professional development opportunity July 24-26. Two pre-conference workshops and a one-day conference will sharpen the talents of educators with an assortment of best practices that they can immediately apply in their classroom.

Falcon Daily competed against other entries submitted in such areas as advertising, public relations, corporate communications, graphic design and web sites. The entry was submitted by Public Affairs Director Mark Kinders, who noted, “It is pretty substantial competition."

As the pair signed the agreement to explore future partnerships, they also exchanged gifts; Nolan gave Betz a charango, a guitar-like stringed instrument hand-carved and decorated in mother-of-pearl by one of the students at UAC-CP. Betz gifted Nolan with a new resident goat for the UAC-CP Goat Project, an initiative that employs 18 university students and helps supply milk to several dozen neighborhood schoolchildren. The goat was on loan from Judy Moses and Larry Jacoby of the Shepherd Song Farm in Downing, Wis., and the real goat will be purchased in Bolivia.

UAC-CP offers degrees in five fields: agriculture, veterinary medicine, nursing, teacher training and eco-tourism. It also has institutional partnerships with South Dakota State University and the College of St. Catherine. UAC-CP has been designated by the United Nations as one of the seven most effective initiatives to eradicate poverty along with a $1 million grant to assist the efforts.

Immediately following the golf tournament will be a reception, silent auction, and dessert auction at the clubhouse. A dinner buffet will be served at 6:30 p.m., followed by awards and a concert consisting of river songs by Charlie Maguire, a New York native and folk singer.

SCVRTA, an all-volunteer organization supported solely through membership dues, grants and fundraising events, serves as an educational resource for the history, culture, and natural resources of the Lower St. Croix National Scenic Riverway. It also works to increase the economic impact of tourism through cooperative promotion of the Scenic St. Croix Valley www.saintcroixriver.com.

The inauguration of Dr. Don Betz as the 16th chancellor of UW-River Falls is scheduled for Friday, April 28. The installation ceremony will highlight a week of activities that will emphasize three significant themes for UW-River Falls: globalization, inclusiveness and service within the St. Croix County. Underscoring the themes will be an emphasis on building leadership capacity both on and off campus.

Community members are welcome to attend public events, and to observe the installation ceremony. All items are free unless otherwise noted. Complete details are available on line at: www.uwrf.edu/inauguration.

Brown joined UW-RF as an assistant professor of English in 1989, and has had a number of responsibilities since joining UW-RF. Brown chaired the search-and-screen committee for the new chancellor. She also chaired the American Democracy Project, a nationwide program designed to promote civic engagement on college campuses. In addition, Brown was also the coordinator for the women's studies program on campus for a number of years.

Brown’s previous positions at UW-RF include interim dean, assistant dean, outreach program manager and administrative intern for CAS. As associate dean of the CAS, Brown oversaw and promoted outreach activities for the college, administered to student record-keeping affairs, and represented Dean Hedahl when necessary. Brown has also served as a professor, associate professor, and assistant professor of English at UW-RF. Prior to joining the university, Brown was a graduate teaching assistant at the University of Florida and at Virginia Tech.

Reza Rehgozar, a finance faculty member , will present "Are Share Values a Good Measure of Company Performance?" The presentation investigates the relationship between stock prices of the Dow Jones industrial, transportation and utility indexes with several financial and market variables.

Traditional students, teachers seeking advanced degrees, lifelong learners, business professionals and community members are invited to apply for summer session to gain valuable knowledge and professional development skills through a summer course at UW-RF. Students home for the summer from other universities can transfer credits to their home institution degree programs.

Learn about how the history of Qingdao beer exemplifies the century-long Chinese struggle for economic and political independence and modernization, and how the beer industry connected China with the rest of the world during the Cold War and made China part of the global community in the post-Cold War era.

All events are open to the public and are held from 7 – 8:30 p.m. in the lower level of the River Falls Public Library on Division and Union Streets in River Falls. No reservations are required to attend.

Some critics argue that boys and girls need to learn together in order to later work effectively with both genders in the workplace. Others say that studies at this time are too limited to undertake such dramatic changes in education. The presentation is designed for parents and educators, as well as business professionals, to learn about the proposed legislation and its implications to education and the future workplace.

Mu Daiko performs over one hundred times each year for schools, community organizations, arts institutions and corporations. In addition Mu Daiko reaches hundreds of taiko enthusiasts through its ongoing taiko classes and elementary, secondary and college-level workshops and residencies.

The FPC program provides participants with the skills, tools and knowledge to begin a career in the financial counseling and planning profession. The program consists of five courses that cover a range of financial planning topics. Participants who successfully complete all five courses meet the educational requirement of the CFP Board's educational requirement for CFP certification and are eligible to take the CFP Certification Examination.

The statements will drive the strategic planning process, the Chancellor explained. He expects to launch an intense, short strategic planning process that will establish up to five objectives for the University.

Chancellor Don Betz was among a select group of 125 chief executive officers from higher education institutions and national secondary education advocacy groups who attended the event on Jan. 5-6 in Washington, D.C.

The highlight of the conference was an announcement by President Bush that he will seek $114 million for a national security language initiative. It will provide money to higher education and school districts for education in Arabic, Chinese, Russian, Persian, Hindi and Central Asian languages. It also will provide funds for additional Fulbright Scholarships to send Americans overseas and to bring scholars to the U.S. to study.

"I'll tell you what's really neat, is to sit down with leaders from around the world, welcome them in the Oval Office or go to their office, they say, you know, Mr. President, I went to Texas A&M, or I went to Stanford -- like President Toledo of Peru," the President related. "It makes it so much easier to conduct foreign policy and diplomacy when you've got that common ground of being able to talk about a university experience here in the United States. It makes it so much easier to be able to advance the interests of this country when you're dealing with a leader who doesn't have a preconceived notion about what America is all about, because he spent time studying here in the United States."

"The clarion call from Secretaries Rice and Spellings as well as from the First Lady and Karen Hughes was a commitment to public service, to become involved in some dimension of America's multifaceted international initiatives and programs," Betz said. "We want our students to become the face of America abroad whether it's via the Foreign Service, Department of Commerce and dozens of other gateways to serving the country by connecting with other peoples and cultures in their native lands."

Betz has long had an interest in international affairs. He holds a doctorate in international studies with his dissertation on the Arab-Baath Party in Syria. He was a staff member for several years in the United Nations working with the International Peace Conference on the Question of Palestine. For 17 years, he was chairman of the United Nations-affiliated International Coordinating Committee for Non-Governmental Organizations on the Question Palestine.

In addition to his administrative duties at UW-RF, Splett also teaches introductory agricultural economics, advanced microeconomic theory, agricultural accounting, agriculture law, farm management and horticulture management. He is a former chair of the UW-RF department of agricultural economics.

Splett's experience combines teaching and research with experience in agri-business and the public schools. He was a vocational agriculture instructor in the Barron and Turtle Lake high schools, a loan officer for Production Credit Association, a supervisor for the Farm Credit Administration, has served as a consultant to agriculture-oriented financial institutions, and has taught economics at UW-Stout. He has also been a visiting lecturer at the Academy of National Economy in Moscow.

"The beauty of a memorandum of understanding is that it opens up the dialogue for a thorough review of opportunities," said Chancellor Don Betz. "The commitment to international education is more than alive here at UW-River Falls."

Participants will gain a solid foundation in the HR principles and practices critical for managing the challenges in today’s work environment. Using the Society for Human Resource Management (SHRM®) Learning System, the course supplies a current reference of HR practices, broadens the perspective of functional specialists, and strengthens individual competencies and productivity.

A bill recently introduced in the Wisconsin Legislature would permit public schools to enroll only one sex or to create single sex classrooms. Some critics argue that boys and girls need to learn together in order to later work effectively with both genders in the workplace. Others say that studies at this time are too limited to undertake such dramatic changes in education. Parents and educators, as well as business professionals, will want to know about the proposed legislation and its implications to education and the future workplace.

This topic will be presented by Rellen Hardtke, UW-River Falls physics department on March 9 as part of the Community Classroom series sponsored by the College of Arts and Sciences Outreach and the Outreach office.

The first class in the series, Financial Planning Process and Insurance, will focus on the basics for successful financial planning; the legal, ethical and regulatory issues affecting financial planning and the time value of money concepts. The course will also cover the insurance principles and risk management concepts that will help professionals in identifying their clients’ needs.

This program is also the only CFP Board-registered program offered in west-central Wisconsin and conveniently close to the eastern suburbs of the Twin Cities. Besides preparing individuals for CFP certification, the program provides practical training for anyone currently employed in a variety of financial services, legal or administrative professions. The courses may also meet continuing education requirements for a variety of professions.

In announcing Gallenberg’s selection Chancellor Don Betz cited the prospective dean’s expertise in his discipline, extension experiences, skill at administrating and collaborating across numerous academic departments, and his strong record of assisting in the economic development of the agriculture industry.

Gallenberg holds a bachelor’s degree in plant pathology and horticulture from UW-Madison. He received master’s and doctorate degrees in plant pathology from Cornell University, where he also served for six years at a research assistant.

He joined SDSU in 1984 as an extension plant pathologist and faculty member. He held that post for 11 years, developing and implementing statewide educational programs in plant disease management. On an annual basis, Gallenberg was in direct contact with some 2,500 producers and others in South Dakota’s agriculture industry.

In 1996 he was selected to serve as the Head of the Plant Science Department where he also is a professor. That department is the largest at SDSU, and is multidisciplinary with a broad scope of programs in teaching, research, extension and outreach, as well as technical service. Gallenberg directed over 100 faculty and staff members in crop science, soil and water sciences, entomology, plant pathology and weed science.

In his current position he has extensive experience partnering with South Dakota’s crop commodity groups and other agricultural industry organizations, including the Crop Improvement Association, Wheat Commission, Soybean Research and Promotion Council, Corn Utilization Council, and Oilseeds Council. Additionally, he served as chair of the board of directors of the South Dakota Foundation Seed Stocks Division.

Senior Outreach Studies at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls and The Phipps Center for the Arts present a new program targeted for adults aged 50 years and older who have a passion for the arts. Program sessions will center on an exhibit or performance at The Phipps and include presentations as well as discussions with artists, directors, authors, musicians, art historians, and other arts professionals.

Recent riots that began in the suburbs of Paris eventually spread to urban centers throughout France, and even into Belgium and Germany. In the wake of these riots, it has become clear that the tensions in disadvantaged communities can no longer be ignored.

Explore the history of French immigration and the urban planning decisions that led to large concentrated "ghettos" of North and West Africans in the French suburbs. Talk about how France is coping today with the legacy of this immigration, and discuss some key differences between the way France and the U.S. deal with issues of ethnic and religious diversity. Speculate on the potential consequences of not finding good solutions to this problem: is France is at risk of becoming the next potential recruiting ground for Islamic fundamentalist groups?

A collaboration of representatives from business, civic, education, and government from Polk, St. Croix, and Pierce counties announced they will travel to Madison on March 8-9 to advocate legislators and cabinet secretaries on five high priority issues for 2006.

The group will convene in Madison on Wednesday morning, March 8, and begin meetings with key legislators. Lunch will include a guest speaker, such as a cabinet secretary, followed by additional legislative appointments and an evening reception. At the reception, representatives from United St. Croix Valley will be joined by members of the St. Croix Valley Municipal Association. The municipal association will also be in Madison for its own meetings with state departments and legislators.

In addition, volunteer participants are being recruited for the Madison trip. For $75 (includes ground transportation, event meals and reception), representatives from business, industry, civic, and local government can participate in the entire lobbying event. A block of rooms is reserved at the Best Western Inn on the Park near the capitol.

Historic rivertowns. Spectacular scenery. Outdoor recreation and indoor events. These are just a few of the attractions that draw visitors year-round to the lower St. Croix River Valley of Wisconsin and Minnesota.

January through April is a great time to visit the valley for wintertime activities as businesses, attractions and communities "Celebrate Winter on the Sparking St. Croix" as part of a promotional campaign sponsored by the St. Croix Valley Regional Tourism Alliance. Many valley lodging establishments are offering special discounts and packages for skiing enthusiasts and other visitors.

Its Web site, www.saintcroixriver.com features details on indoor cultural events and museums, hot air ballooning, downhill and cross-country skiing, state parks activities, an events calendar and lodging discounts.

Park Service, St. Croix Scenic Riverway, have collaborated to create an ongoing summer institute. This effort brings together the expertise and resources of the two institutions to build connections to and strengthen stewardship efforts throughout the scenic St. Croix Valley. This summer, we are introducing two courses, one in biology and one in geology and hydrology.

Participants will spend the first week collecting data in the field. During the second week, they will use collected field data and catalogued data from the National Park Service in computer simulation models. STELLA simulation software allows users to investigate questions and test hypotheses about the environmental effects of abiotic and biotic factors without manipulating the site in question.

Before registering for this credit class, you must apply for graduate school or contact the Graduate Studies Office at 715/425-3843. Once your application has been processed you will receive instructions on how to register.

Participants will meet near Interstate Park on the first day and at UW-River Falls on second day. The course fee is $89 per person and includes park entry fees, lunches, snacks and the field transport on the second day.

Kinnickinnic River, a major tributary of the St. Croix, from its source to outlet. Key points of observation and discussion are springs, river processes, delta formation, and environmental issues related to surface- and ground-water.

This course includes hiking of low to moderate difficulty, on level to moderately steep ground. Most of the hiking is on maintained trails, but may include some rough ground and shallow water crossings. No climbing is required.

Middleton and hydrologist Dr. Kerry Keen, who are professors at UW-River Falls. Both instructors bring enthusiasm, humor, and extensive knowledge of the area's rocks, waters, plants, and animals to the class.

The Wisconsin Technology Council board meeting, a collaboration of the most influential and enterprising businesses and associations in Wisconsin, held it quarterly meeting at the UW-RF College of Business on April 19.

WTC is the science and technology advisor to the Governor and the Legislature, serving as an independent, non-profit and non-partisan board with members from tech companies, venture capital firms, all levels of education, research institutions, government and law.

In addition to discussing the advances made and initiatives created for the State of Wisconsin in the past three months, the WTC also had the opportunity meet and hear presentations from two River Falls companies: Angel Zimmerman, Director of Operations for Sajan, and Quentin Schultz, President of BioDiagnostics, Inc.

The facility, funded entirely by student fees, will bring all food services under one roof and provide space for student life programming including student government and organizations. The building will include an entertainment complex, bookstore, bank, coffee shop, convenience store, banquet hall, theater-style meeting room and a conference room.

The building incorporates features that are designed to be ecologically and environmentally sustainable, including use of natural daylight to illuminate the architecture, the use of recycled building materials, recycling of construction waste and stored rainwater for toilet fixtures.

The north side of the building will emulate the traditional modernist style of existing academic buildings, while the south side will mimic the Kinni’s natural ecosystem with a curved "organic" design.

Regional leaders in business, industry and education are invited to the county forums to discuss issues of human capital, innovation, financial capital, communications infrastructure, physical infrastructure and quality of place.

Errors may be the result of changes to this Web site in December 2005 to better serve our current and prospective students, community and other lifelong learners. We are sorry for any inconvenience that this may cause you.

Chancellor Don Betz spoke passionately about our mission to create ethical and engaged graduates who have a global perspective during his inauguration speech April 28. He was installed as the 16th chancellor of university at an afternoon ceremony in the Knowles Center, addressing an audience of 700 alumni, faculty, staff, students community members, family, friends, colleagues, public servants and invited guests. More.

"It's about telling stories with the hands," says dance theatre director Karla Zhe, describing the true hula dance form. For decades, popular culture has portrayed the hula as an exotic dance involving mostly hip movements. But real ancient hula performed by the Polynesian people of Hawaii is an expression of their history and connection to the islands where they live. More.

What premiered as a summer institute to inspire area teachers to stage theatrical performances in their schools has turned into a 40-year run for the St. Croix Valley Summer Theatre at UW-River Falls. More.

Our current graduates are full of expectations and optimism about their futures. We applauded them on graduation day, but we genuinely served them by what we did each day they were with us. We are striving to make each day at UW-River Falls a fresh learning opportunity both in and outside the classroom. We believe that what students learn here, and how they are treated daily, define the true dimensions of the River Falls education. We are reminding each other that we are here to help students learn. How learning occurs is equal in importance with the subject and discipline. We are preparing our students to make learning an integral part of their professional and personal lives.

Two weeks prior to graduation, the university honored its past, celebrated its present and imagined its future at inauguration. Alumni and guests from near and far were openly complimentary about the week’s events; the refined talents of our faculty, staff and students; and the quality of the inaugural luncheon, the students’ picnic and the receptions. The UW-River Falls team planned and performed with distinction. My thanks and respect for all who made such a difference that week is unbounded.

The summer is upon us. We now proceed--welcoming new members of the team and planning our future. Each new faculty, staff or administrator brings to us a unique set of talents, expertise and experience. We invite them to become part of the UW-River Falls team by embracing the institution's core values, mission and vision. These factors will guide our institutional planning during the coming months.

The key to success is the team and its ability and willingness to reflect, adapt and create the blueprint for purposefully designing ways of learning together. Your involvement and counsel are essential to UW-River Falls continuing efforts as we prepare our students, our state and ourselves to thrive in this dynamic global century.

A classy new clock, located on the central campus mall, provides a stylish flair to the grounds as well as accurate time for those hurrying off to class or other events. The waterproof clock, constructed of finished cast aluminum and four backlit dials, stands 16 feet tall and automatically adjusts for daylight savings time. Plaques hanging from the top note the school's founding in 1874. "I believe its quality and elegant style capture our enduring yet fresh commitment to excellence," said Chancellor Don Betz upon its installation in April.

Chances are if you take a ride on the Stillwater trolley, you’ll encounter 1973 grad Bill Klein. A loquacious character himself, Klein offers a colorful, narrated tour around the back alleys and river vistas of the historic, once-boisterous lumber town. When he’s not driving for the Stillwater Trolley Co., he can be found working as the director of the St. Croix Valley Religious Education Program in Stillwater or guiding a municipality as a member of the Inver Grove Heights, Minn., city council. Trolley tours operate daily May through October, with a limited schedule April and November.

The lack of men on campus was another war-time reality in those days. “When the women on campus wanted to have a prom, we went with other women,” recalled Hanson at The Student Voice 90th anniversary celebration in May.

Grad student Beth Eifler has been awarded a prestigious Fulbright teaching assistantship. She will spend the next academic year at a college in Baden, Austria, promoting mutual understanding of the German language and culture. The highly-competitive Fulbright grants are awarded to accomplished scholars with the ability and willingness to share ideas with people of diverse cultures.

Recent alumna Moria Clinton and senior Iris O'Brien are both Yale bound next fall. They've been accepted into the Yale School of Drama, one of the premier graduate programs in the country. Clinton was one of three students selected for the design program, and O'Brien was one of four students admitted to the stage management program.

May 2006 graduate Kendra Scudder was one of 60 undergraduate students nationwide selected to present her research at Posters on the Hill in April. Her poster, showing the effects of estrogenic pollutants on the reproductive system of worms, was displayed in the U. S. Capitol rotunda, demonstrating to members of Congress the important work being accomplished by gifted student researchers. Scudder plans to attend Mayo Medical School in Rochester, Minn.

Terry Brown was selected to head the College of Arts and Sciences. She's been on campus since 1989, serving on the English faculty and holding such positions as interim dean, assistant dean, outreach program manager and administrative intern for CAS.

Rick Bowen relinquished the reins as head men's basketball coach in March to devote full-time efforts to his athletic director position, which he has held since 2004. Assistant coach Jeff Berkhof will serve as interim head coach for the 2006-07 season.

One of those thriving study-exchange programs is the six-year-old program with Shih Chien and Shih Hsin universities in Taipei, Taiwan. Six UW-RF students journeyed to Taiwan over Spring Break 2006. "The purpose was to expose the students to a new culture and gain insight into the business and economy in Taiwan," said tour leader and business professor Darryl Miller.

A New Voters Project in 2004--aimed at increasing the participation of students in the democratic process--saw a doubling of registrations and actual votes cast from the 2000 presidential election. Because of that success, we've been invited to present at several national conferences. And the 430-member American Association of State Colleges and Universities cited UW-RF's program as a "best practice" for developing citizenship.

The UW-RF Society of Physics Students was named an Outstanding SPS Chapter, one of the 48 chapters--out of 700 campuses nationwide--to earn the honor. The active chapter, nearly 40 members strong, has visited fifth grade classes, performed demonstrations for high school students, and attend regional meetings in its efforts to promote physics, contribute to research, and recruit physics majors.

Falcon Daily, an online newsletter that keeps faculty and staff connected to what's happening on campus, received a national Award of Distinction in the international Communicator Awards competition. The daily e-newsletter was started in Fall 2005, the product of extensive collaboration among offices across campus. Community members and alumni are welcome to subscribe to Falcon Daily by entering their e-mail address at https://lists.uwrf.edu/mailman/listinfo/falcondaily.

That's right! This year marks the return of the Homecoming Parade through downtown River Falls, now co-sponsored by the Shriners. A favorite of students and alumni alike from the early days of the school, the parade was abandoned 15 years ago. But last year's mini-parade through campus revived interest, and the streets of River Falls will once again come alive with a variety of student organization-sponsored, Shriner, and community units. Parade time is set for 10:30 a.m. Saturday morning, Oct. 21.

Then head back to campus for a Homecoming Bar-B-Que on the Student Center Mall. The picnic will run from 10:30 a.m.-1 p.m., so you can get a bite in before heading to the big game at Ramer Field. As always, a number of reunions and special events will round out the weekend schedule. Keep checking www.uwrf.edu/alumni for updates on Homecoming activities.

Traditional student events--the medallion hunt, lip sync contest, window painting, change wars, and food drives--will have a decidedly western theme this year. A Friday evening concert (9 p.m.-midnight) in the Knowles Center will feature the Johnny Holmes Band.

Remarkable Ireland--with its changing colors, magnificent landscapes, lush green fields, deep blue lakes, and charming friendly people--will make a lasting impression. Tap your toes to its traditional music and join in the "crack" (convivial chatter) at its welcoming pubs. Great restaurants and the talent for fun and conversation are part of the fabric of the country. Experience two exciting destinations--Killarney, a Camelot-like town on the southwest coast, and Galway, an ancient fishing village with rich historic ambience.

All graduates from the 1972 graduating class and earlier are invited to spend an afternoon with friends, catching up and reminiscing about those good old college days at UW-River Falls. The event will be held at Rodli Commons.

Join alumni and friends for a 3 p.m. reception at the Dock Café in Stillwater, followed by a 4:30 p.m. cruise on the St. Croix River. A buffet dinner will be served and entertainment provided by the “Emperors of Jazz” band. Call the Office of University Advancement for more.

Plan to stop by during the regional teachers convention held at Eau Claire Memorial High School. A reception will be held in Room 258 for all alumni. Refreshments will be provided as well as an update on the university.

Mark your calendar and make plans to join friends for the return of the Homecoming parade in downtown River Falls, followed by a barbeque on the mall outside Hagestad Student Center. Other scheduled events include an alumni and friends coffee hour, campus tours, and various reunions that start before and after the football game.

Relish this holiday tradition at the new Guthrie, located in the historic Mill District of downtown Minneapolis. Enjoy an 11 a.m. lunch at the Spaghetti Factory, followed by the 1 p.m. performance of A Christmas Carol. An event not to be missed! Call the Office of University Advancement for more.

Lee E. Jensen dedicated his life to education. He came to the university in 1963 and held various positions, including professor of secondary education and professional studies, head swim coach, interim hockey coach and director of career services, the position he held upon his retirement in 1991.

He taught courses in educational psychology and school community relations. During his time here, he served on the graduate council, human relations committee, alumni relations committee, chancellor’s council, and campus planning committee. He chaired the athletic committee and the education curriculum committee. In addition, he was a supervisor of student teachers.

Upon retirement, Jensen recalled many fond memories of campus life, including co-starring in a student production of “Lysistrata,” working to improve the South Fork and building the Wall Amphitheatre. Known for his rich baritone voice, Lee was the “Voice of the Falcons” at football games and a voice-over for recruitment videos for many years.

Prior to his arrival at UW-RF he was an instructor and assistant director of education and education placement at UW-Madison, principal at Ellsworth High School, a history teacher and coach at Watertown High School and an English teacher, history teacher and coach in Gallup, Minn.

Each semester, 50 students spend a collective 270 hours per week calling alumni, parents and friends to raise money for the University of Wisconsin-River Falls annual fund and the individual College Fund for Excellence campaigns. Callers have plenty of news to share, and they look forward to hearing about your connection to the university.

They're also happy to help you make a donation. During the past year, your pledges and gifts totaled more than $421,000 for student research grants, classroom upgrades, faculty grants, alumni programming, and much more.

Wong How Man's efforts to preserve the blood lines of true Tibetan mastiffs was described in a March 2006 Wall Street Journal article. World-renowned guardian of China's nature and culture and 1976 UW-RF grad, Wong has been locating pups, breeding them, and placing them in the care of Tibetan villagers for several years now. The endangered breed, with its low bark and fierce personality, has guarded Tibetan nomads and their herds of cows and yaks for centuries.

Brian Schultz, director of the UW-River Falls Center for Economic Education, professor of economics and the state program director for Economics Wisconsin, was quoted in the Milwaukee Journal Sentinel’s coverage of the Wisconsin Economics Challenge. Two high school teams, Brookfield Central and Ashwaubenon, competed in Chicago. The Brookfield team made it to nationals in New York in the competition sponsored by the National Council on Economics Education and the Goldman Sachs Foundation.

Marv Lansing, ’54, has written a follow-up to his first book, "They Just Grow Up," which chronicled his early life as a child of the Great Depression. Now he's told the rest of the story in "Looking for the Handle," a book about his and his wife Mag's, life in education and community leadership activities. He shares some of the "issues faced by teachers and school administrators over almost 50 years" and weaves that with the "challenges, decisions, and sacrifices we made as a family during our long and very interesting journey."

Dr. John Clemons, ’57, tells the story of his life in "Tending My Flock." The noted La Crosse physician relates some of the defining moments in his life so that his children and grandchildren "might know something about me," but also to help readers realize that it's up to them to decide which road to follow, ethically and morally. As a youngster, Clemons raised sheep on his Chippewa County farm to help finance his college education. Encouraged by his UW-River Falls professors, he attended medical school and later specialized in facial reconstructive surgery. In his most famous case, he reattached a completely amputated ear (bitten off during a fight in a pizza parlor) using a procedure that became known as the "Clemons Technique," now included in a textbook on plastic surgery.

Ron Perrier, ’62, delved into the psyches of young men to uncover the bluster and inscrutability of what men think and feel in "Growing Up Male in America." Through a series of 16 interviews, which guaranteed anonymity, Perrier was able to get his subjects to open up on everything from sex to what makes them cry. A professor emeritus of film studies at St. Cloud State University, Perrier told Star Tribune reporter Bill Dawson that he's always been "fascinated by the private nature [of men] … It's just the mystery, for lack of a better word, the mystery of what men tend to be."

You might remember reading about Michael Kulstad, ’96, in our Spring 2003 issue. At that time he was working for the U.S. Justice Department, handling media issues for the District Attorney' office in New York and answering reporters' questions about the Martha Stewart trial. He's moved on to an even more high-profile case. Last spring he went to work for the U.S. Marshals Service, and after a couple of months on the job he was offered a position covering Saddam Hussein’s trial in Baghdad, Iraq. His job was to put a team together that built a television studio to broadcast the trial to the Middle East and the rest of the world. "This was easier said than done," wrote Kulstad in an e-mail to Falcon Features. "A few days before trial, I was trying to get a couple of palates of TV gear into Baghdad when we had plane problems (the C-130 had a fuel leak and was stuck in Amman), sandstorms, and a delayed convoy into Baghdad. At any rate, we were able to put together a functioning TV studio in the courtroom together in just about a day and put out a signal to the world on Oct. 19. For me, it was really a good feeling looking at the pictures of ordinary Iraqis crowded around a TV set watching the former dictator of Iraq being held accountable for his actions, and knowing that I had something to do with it."

"I was up in the broadcast booth for every day of the trial, and listened to it all through a translator," reports Kulstad. "At times it was hectic, as I was listening to the trial in one ear, listening to the command center through a secure radio in the other, and still trying to communicate with the production director who was switching the trial feed. There were times when it got pretty taxing up there, but it was challenging. This question always comes up, and yes, I was in the same room with Saddam on two occasions. It was strange to say the least."

A trailer behind the U.S. Embassy was home for the six months he spent in the Green Zone. He rarely left the embassy compound without his flack jacket. Kulstad returned home this March and was very happy to reconnect with his family and his new son, who was born shortly before he left for Iraq. “Now, instead of putting on my boots and a gun every day, I put on a suit and a blackberry. It was a trade I was happy to make,” he says.

Two highly accomplished individuals were named the university's 2006 Distinguished Alumni this past spring. The award is made annually to one or more alumni who have demonstrated outstanding leadership and service to their communities and the world.

During his career, Boehm has worked for the U.S. Department of Agriculture and served as a senior economist for food and agriculture on the President's Council of Economic Advisors. He has held numerous positions at Kroger Company since joining the large food retailer in 1981. He became a member of Kroger's senior management in 2001 where he heads Kroger’s manufacturing division, which includes 36 food processing plants operated by 7,700 associates with annual sales of approximately $3.3 billion. Boehm is the author of a popular food policy textbook, Agricultural and Food Policy, and was named to Alpha Zeta's list of the 100 Agriculturalists of the Century. He has been actively involved in the national leadership of FFA and the Alpha Gamma Rho fraternity.

Dr. Donald Babbitt, ’42, was the world's leading expert on Pancreaticobiliary Maljunction, a disease of the pancreas, and a noted pediatric radiologist. He was instrumental in proving that children do, in fact, get gallstones. He was a strong advocate for children without health insurance and often delved into his own resources to care for their medical needs. Dr. Babbitt died in 2005.

Following his pre-med program at UW-River Falls, Babbitt attended the Marquette University School of Medicine, now known as the Medical College of Wisconsin. He served as the chief of radiology at the 250th Army Station Hospital in Regensberg, Germany, after World War II. His long career as a physician, researcher and instructor culminated in the position of Chief of Staff and Chief of Radiology at Milwaukee Children's Hospital. Highly involved in numerous medical and professional societies, Babbitt published more than 70 papers and articles, gave nearly 60 presentations on his areas of expertise, and created 16 scientific exhibits.

Recognition was extended to the recipients at the two commencement ceremonies on May 13. Babbitt's widow, Katherine, accepted the award on his behalf. Portraits of Boehm and Babbitt will be added to the campus Distinguished Alumni Wall.

Roger Ballou, Dean of Student Development and Campus Diversity. He was instrumental in reorganizing the student affairs division to provide more efficient service to students. He was also recognized by a number of internal and external organizations for his efforts in fostering diversity and tolerance on campus. Coming to UW-RF in 1992 after being dean of students at Southwestern University near Austin, Texas, Ballou is now pursuing a new career as Adlerian Program Director and a faculty member at the Adler Graduate School in Minneapolis. In addition, he is a licensed family and marriage therapist with his private practice, Family Life Services, in River Falls.

Arlyn Brackemyer, facilities management, began working at UW-River Falls in 1982. His training and experience with steamboats on the Great Lakes prepared him well for his many years in the campus heating plant as a power plant operator. In 1967, Brackemyer served with the Military Sea Transportation Service, carrying troops and supplies to Viet Nam. He attended school for a marine engineer license in Toledo, Ohio, and served for 10 years on steamboats shipping steel in the Great Lakes. Among his memorable accomplishments at UW-RF has been keeping vintage turbine steam pumps operating long after their typical "life span." In retirement, Brackemyer plans a motorcycle trip to Alaska.

Myrna Brantmeier, Outreach and Graduate Studies. She recalls spending an entire summer on campus learning Volkswriter, a software program for the computer that replaced her IBM Electronic typewriter. Joining UW-River Falls in 1975 as a limited term employee, Brantmeier says that the office technology was one of the biggest changes she noticed during her more than 30 years on campus. Brantmeier was a co-initiator and a charter member of the Employee Development Committee. Some of her fondest memories include working with West Central Wisconsin Consortium, the Pigeon Lake Field Station and the National Student Exchange as well as in the earliest days of the Wisconsin in Scotland program.

Perry Clark, professor of animal science. He notes that the most significant change during his tenure on campus has been the number of women enrolled in the animal and dairy science programs. Prior to UW-RF, he was a State Extension Dairy Specialist in Kentucky. At UW-River Falls he was named Outstanding Club Advisor for the UW-RF Dairy Club; the Outstanding Teacher in the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences; and the university's Distinguished Teacher, the highest award bestowed upon teaching faculty. He also coached the 1995 winning collegiate dairy club at the World Dairy Expo in Madison. Clark plans to embark on a second career in the animal and dairy science industry upon his "retirement."

Rhoda Foley, College of Education and Professional Studies. She arrived on campus in 1973 and worked in many situations, including secretary for the Ames Laboratory School and Elementary Education Department as well as program assistant with the Teacher Education Department and Office of Field Experiences and finally as dean's assistant in the college. A resident of Beldenville, Foley says that helping students and staff was the most satisfying aspect of her work. She is looking forward to retirement days filled with reading, outdoor work, volunteer work, and more time with her grandchildren.

Clarke Garry, professor of biology. His work is nearly synonymous with the Kinnickinnic River. Garry is known far and wide for his comprehensive inventory of insect and crustacean life on the Kinni, which he's worked on for the past decade. Garry came to the biology department at UW-RF in 1976. He notes that other career highlights include the 1993 and 2004 College of Arts and Sciences Outstanding Faculty Member of the Year. He also received a National Geographic Society grant in collaboration with North Dakota State University to travel to Alaska and Canada in search of paleo-environmentally significant beetles. A River Falls resident, Garry will pursue more educational endeavors, including teaching workshops as well as writing about, working with and learning more about the Kinni.

Judith George, registrar. Thanks to Judy George, many students avoided getting rained out during commencement; she modified and streamlined the commencement ceremonies for the indoor-only ceremony that is currently used. George was instrumental in supervising the transition to the Degree Audit Reporting System, which was implemented on campus in 1993 and the eSIS system, implemented to streamline student data records. She joined UW-RF in 1978 as assistant registrar. The biggest change she noted during her time on campus is the transition to online records and information sharing.

Paul Hayden, professor of communicative disorders. As chair of the communicative disorders department for 15 years and involved in the speech and hearing clinic on campus, Hayden has helped countless children and community members. Joining UW-RF in 1975, he says that he especially "enjoyed seeing students gain confidence and grow professionally." One of the biggest changes he has noted is the increasing influence that outside accreditation organizations have on curriculum within the university.

Paul Jantz, facilities management. He began working on campus in 1981, and spent 17 years working in the heating plant as a power plant operator 3. He then moved to the building maintenance area as a maintenance mechanic 3. Jantz enjoyed the opportunity to work with a wide range of people. He noted the growth and development of facilities as a significant campus change. He's often worked in Kleinpell Fine Arts Building, and appreciates the "amazing talent" of UW-RF art, music and theater students. Jantz is looking forward to spending more time with his family and enjoying hunting and fishing up north.

Larry Kasten, professor of animal science. He is well known for leading UW-RF's nationally recognized horse science program, the only one of its kind in a public university in the Upper Midwest. He's probably a "horse whisperer" but he'll never tell. Since arriving at UW-RF in 1973, he has taught many courses including genetics, equine evaluation and nutrition, horse production, advanced horsemanship and colts in training. As well known in the industry as he is in academia, Kasten is an approved American Quarter Horse Association and National Reining Horse Association judge. Born and raised in Minnesota, Kasten credits his father for his love of horses and teaching. As a faculty member and mentor, he says he has taken great pleasure in witnessing the success of many students. He plans on continuing his love of training, riding, buying and selling horses at his family-run 70-stall facility in River Falls. He plans to spend winters in Texas with his wife, Dianne.

John Laird, Chalmer Davee Library. He first joined UW-River Falls as assistant director of financial aid and served as director in 1985-86. The majority of Laird's career has been spent in the library, first as a student assistant, as an LTE, and then as a permanent employee. He has been a familiar face to many students at the reserve desk. Laird has helped many students stay in school in his roles as a library resource person and also during his work in financial aid. In retirement, Laird will continue as president of the Laird Youth Leadership Foundation and also plans to do some consulting.

James Senft, professor of mathematics. While internationally noted as a Stirling engine expert, a Fulbright scholar, visiting research professor and author, he is probably remembered by many students for demystifying mathematics. A model of a "teaching scholar," he has been noted by award nominators as always willing to share his research and knowledge. As the recipient of the 2005 Outstanding Research, Scholarly and Creative Activities Award (division of science and mathematics) from the College of Arts and Sciences, Senft is recognized as a leading expert in the area of the mathematical analysis of heat engines. He's been a visiting research professor at the Argonne National Laboratory, the University of Washington Joint Center for Graduate Study, the University of Rome, the University of Zagreb, and a visiting fellow at the Australian National University Institute of Advanced Study. He has involved many students with his research over the years and served to further their interests in mathematics and research.

David Woodward, director of financial assistance. He oversaw the progression of the Financial Aid Office on campus from a "paper" operation when he arrived in 1988 to a computerized system integrated with ESIS and Peoplesoft upon his retirement in 2005. "My greatest accomplishment was working with a great staff," says Woodward. " He was president of the Wisconsin Association of Student Financial Aid Administrators, having received its Distinguished Service Award in 1998 and a Special Achievement Award in 1996. He is still active in the Midwest Association of Student Financial Aid Administrators, where he developed and continues to teach at a special summer institute to train financial aid professionals in a nine-state region. Currently he is working with Education Finance Partners, where he can set his own schedule and travel around the Upper Midwest at his own pace. A resident of North Hudson, he says his favorite retirement activity is golf.

The company’s first official season debuted in 1966 as “Falcon Summer Theatre.” With the help of the Oostendorps, other faculty, community members, and students, Syse took the fledgling group under his wings and created the foundation for the troupe that remains today.

Tillman, who graduated in 1968 with a double major in English and speech and emphases in public speaking and theater, has taught for 37 years throughout Minnesota and served as that state’s director of graduation standards as well as executive director of the Board of Teaching. He is currently the English-language arts curriculum specialist for the South Washington County School District and a director of Park High School’s theater program.

While this year’s company includes several notable Twin Cities artistic and musical directors who are first-time SCVSTers, the 40 th season revisits the very heart of what Oostendorp and Syse began four decades ago. “We are returning to the roots of St. Croix Valley Summer Theatre with many more of our own students and community members in this summer’s productions than any other previous season,” says Murray, the 2006 managing director.

Students commissioned the chainsaw artistry of David Helberg, Cushing, Wis., to sculpt a new falcon icon for the campus. It was presented to Chancellor Betz and the university at the inauguration ceremony on April 28.

Danae Davis has been a member of the Board of Regents of the University of Wisconsin System since 2003. Committed to helping individuals develop their full potential, she is the executive director of PEARLS for Teen Girls, Inc., a Milwaukee-based girl empowerment and leadership non-profit organization. She previously served as director of diversity affairs at Miller Brewing Company, director of the Department of Employee Relations for the City of Milwaukee, a commissioner on the Wisconsin Employment Relations Commission, executive assistant at the Department of Employment Relations, legal counsel for Gov. Tony Earl and director of diversity management and work/life programs at Kraft Foods, Inc. Davis is a member of the African American Women’s Project of the Milwaukee Foundation, the Leaders Forum and the Girl Scouts of the Milwaukee Area. She is also on the Board of Directors of Safe and Sound. Davis is a graduate of UW-Oshkosh, where, in 2002, she was honored as one of four distinguished alumni. She received a law degree from the University of Wisconsin Law School.

Nicholas J. Karolides received his bachelor of science, master of arts, and doctor of philosophy degrees from New York University, where he had a teaching fellowship. A member of the English Department, he created and taught 28 courses; he was honored in 1971 with the Distinguished Teacher of the Year Award and in 1994 with the Wisconsin Regents Teaching Excellence Award. Professor Karolides has served as associate dean of the College of Arts and Sciences. Among numerous university committee assignments, he was elected to the faculty senate, serving also as its chair. For 22 years, he was editor of the Wisconsin English Journal. The author of 15 books, he has principally focused on censorship issues and on the application of literary theory to classroom teaching; the most recent publications are the Encyclopedia of Censorship, New Edition (2005) and Banned Books: Literature Suppressed on Political Grounds (2006). The censorship publications and activities have been celebrated with three intellectual freedom awards.

Barbara Lynn Werner joined the faculty in the Department of Speech Communication and Theatre Arts in 1994. Professor Werner earned her doctorate at the University of Kansas; she holds her undergraduate and master’s degrees from Saint Louis University. Currently, Werner is chair of Faculty Senate, professor and chair of SCTA, and serves as the coordinator of the Women’s Studies Program. Today, on behalf of the faculty, she is pleased to present Chancellor Betz with a bench to be placed on the campus grounds. The University of Wisconsin-River Falls embraces inclusivity and connections on campus and in the community. This bench will serve as one space where people can gather—connecting with one another, celebrating traditions, and valuing their diversity.

Nicholas Cluppert is a fifth year senior from Markesan, Wis., graduating in May with a bachelor of science degree in political science. He has been involved with Student Senate for the last four years and is this year’s Student Senate President. Throughout his college career he has been involved in many activities: working as a resident assistant for two years, interning at the Wisconsin State Capitol for Representative Joan Ballweg, and serving on numerous campus committees. Most recently he has been involved in re-structuring the General Education program. Nick is a recipient of the 2006 Chancellor’s Award, the highest non-academic award given to UW-River Falls students. After graduation, Nick hopes to become a legislative aide or assume another active role in government. Representing UW-River Falls students, Nick is presenting the Chancellor and the university with a carved falcon, the campus’ emblematic mascot. It will be placed in the new student center when that building is completed.

Sarah Egerstrom received her bachelor’s degree in marketing communications from UW-River Falls and her master’s degree in organizational leadership from Gonzaga University. For the past six years, she has worked in the Admissions Office as a student services coordinator. Sarah has a special interest in leadership development and activities that relate to the recruitment and retention of our first-year students. She is currently the chairperson for the Equal Education Opportunity Committee for the WACRAO organization and serves on the University Hearing Committee; the Recruitment, Admissions, and Retention Committee; the Budget Committee; and the Enrollment Management Committee. She has served on the Academic Staff Council for four years and is currently its chairperson. On behalf of the academic staff at UW-River Falls, Sarah is presenting Chancellor Betz with Kouzes’ and Posner’s book, The Leadership Challenge. This leadership development text will be added to the newly created Chancellor’s Leadership Collection in Chalmer Davee Library.

For the first 75 years of its existence, as both Normal School and Teachers College, UW-River Falls concentrated on training teachers for Wisconsin’s growing public school system. But the years were not without struggle. In 1897 the original building (shown here) was destroyed by fire. Despite efforts to relocate the school to another city, River Falls prevailed and South Hall rose on the foundations of the ruined school. Yet, throughout that period the curriculum expanded, reflecting the increasing professionalism of teacher education. In 1912, along with the other State Normals, River Falls added a specialty to its curriculum—agricultural education. The specialty added distinctive elements to the school’s academic life and helped it to weather new challenges to the school’s survival. Following accreditation by the North Central Association in 1935, the institution continued to evolve and expand curricular offerings. After World War II, with returning G.I.s filling the classrooms and hoping to pursue careers other than teaching, opportunities in the liberal arts were added and the Teachers College became a State College in 1951. With the addition of graduate programming in the early 1960s, the school achieved university status, and in 1971 became a member of the prestigious University of Wisconsin System.

The expanded mission of the university over the years was accompanied by an increasing enrollment, growing from just several hundred students in the 1800s to approximately 6,000 students today. The physical campus has also grown, today consisting of more than 30 academic, residential and student support services buildings.

Now nearly 50 degree programs are offered in the university’s four colleges—arts and sciences; agriculture, food and environmental sciences; education and professional studies; business and economics; and in the graduate program.

The academic apparel worn by the faculty and staff in the processional has its origins in the universities of the Middle Ages. Because the universities grew out of church schools, both faculty and students were regarded as part of the clergy and wore clerical clothing based on monastic dress.

In the Middle Ages, those with bachelor’s and master’s degrees could be distinguished by the simplicity or elaborateness of their gowns. The master’s gowns were often furred, a decoration surviving as the three velvet bars now used on the sleeves of the doctoral gown. Today’s doctoral gown is an open-fronted garment with voluminous bell-shaped sleeves. The master’s gown has an open front with extremely long, closed sleeves, from which the arms protrude through a slit at the elbow. The end of the sleeve is square, with an arc of a circle just above the bottom. The bachelor’s gown has a closed front and long, pointed, open sleeves. Gowns are usually black, although some universities use other colors.

The head covering developed from the skullcap worn to protect tonsured heads in cold weather. In the universities, the skullcap acquired a point on top, which gradually evolved into a tassel. In Europe, the bonnet with tassel is still worn but has been replaced in America by the mortarboard cap or tam with tassel.

The hood was originally worn over the head in bad weather and otherwise dropped onto the shoulders. First worn by faculty and students, the hood is now added to the apparel of those with master’s and doctoral degrees. The color of the velvet trim on the hood indicates the wearer’s scholarly field—agriculture is maize; arts and letters is white; business is drab; economics is copper; home economics is yellow; engineering is orange; fine arts is brown; library science is lemon; medicine is green; music is pink; physical education is sage green; science is golden yellow; social science is citron; speech is silver gray; and theology is scarlet. The colors of the satin lining are those approved and authorized by the college or university from which the degree was obtained—for instance, the University of Wisconsin-Madison is red and white, and the University of Minnesota is maroon and gold.

The University Mace. This ceremonial staff, called a mace, is the official symbol of the University. Carried by the Chief Marshal—in today’s ceremony, Nicholas Karolides, the longest-serving faculty member on campus—it signifies that the Inauguration is an officially sanctioned University event. It is used at commencements, dedications and other ceremonial occasions. The hand-crafted mace reflects the quality and history of UW-River Falls. It is 40 inches in length, made from Flame Birch Timeless Timber with black walnut inlays. The head of the staff features two, three-inch bronze medallions of the University Seal inset into a circular piece of wood. Designed and created by expert craftsman Dave Enersen of Chippewa Falls, Wis., the mace makes use of unique materials with a storied past. “Timeless Timber” is rare wood taken from an old, slow-growth log. During Wisconsin’s log boom era at the end of the 19th century, millions of logs were sent to sawmills by floating them on lakes and rivers. Many became water-logged and sank to the bottom. Today these logs, many of them 400-500 years old when cut down a century ago, are being reharvested. The incredible color, the fine grain and lack of checking and blemishes are unmatched in wood cut from today’s new growth timber. The UW-River Falls mace is truly a unique and beautiful creation that adds distinction to every ceremonial event.

As a class project, Kurt Leichtle’s Introduction to Public History students researched and wrote a historical account of the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, focusing on each of the school’s presidents—their challenges and accomplishments and the changes experienced by the student body through the years. The 44-panel traveling display has been showcased at other Inauguration Week events and is available for viewing during the University– Community Reception following the installation ceremony.

One form of commemorating the Inauguration themes for Chancellor Don Betz was the campus creation of a Mandala mural. The initiative of art Professor Lynn Jermal, the Mandala captures through artwork the themes of globalization, diversity, and service in the St. Croix Valley. Mandala is Sanskrit for whole world or healing circle. It is a representation of the universe and everything in it. Circles, suggesting wholeness, self, unity, completion and eternity, are expressed in many civilizations, including Ancient Rome and Greece, in Gothic cathedrals, in Tibetan Buddhist monk artistry, in Native American medicinal practices, and in the work of Carl Jung. Through workshops, students, faculty and staff painted 5-inch-square tiles with acrylic paint, permanent markers or paint markers to communicate their feelings and visions as they relate to one of the themes. The themes can be reflected by individuals or by groups or painters. Professor Jermal explains, “Within the circle we captured important scenes from everyday life, symbols, designs or objects of fascination from the world of nature. There were prompts to help participants to think about the mural themes, but they were invited to bring resources and designs with them to incorporate into their piece. No experience, only interest, was necessary to be involved. People experienced the satisfaction of adding to the fabric of our campus celebration in a tangible way.” Professor Jermal edited and arranged 180 tiles in a three-panel mural.

A man of many hats--literally. The top shelf of his office bookcase is devoted to his hat collection. He wears them, too--whenever he's out and about on campus. Since arriving at UW-River Falls in 1990 as director of grants and research, Bill has been known for his hats, but also for being instrumental in providing a unique learning experience for students.

In 1992, Campbell initiated the campus-wide Research Day to encourage more research by undergraduate students. Under the supervision of faculty, students prepare posters for display that promote dialogue and discussion of the various research projects undertaken. UW-River Falls was the first university in the UW System to provide this opportunity, which has evolved into Research, Scholarly and Creative Activity Day. Research and scholarly activities can include creative projects from music, art, and theatre, as well as laboratory and other research. Students have also presented their research findings to the UW-River Falls Foundation Board, alumni gatherings, and at various regional and national research conferences. Additional funding for many of these activities is provided through stipends sponsored by the UW-RF Foundation. Alumni who have an interest in specific research areas have been and can be supportive by providing funds through the Foundation.

Writing grants is Bill’s favorite part of his job, and he enjoys meeting with faculty to review possibilities for new proposals and new research ideas. That's opened up opportunities for travel. He's visited Latvia, Mexico, and Costa Rica, among other countries. While traveling, Bill has collected objects, paintings, drawings, and photographs done by artists local to the areas he has visited. Those, too, have become part of his office décor.

Studies have shown that serious mental health issues are a growing problem on college campuses in recent years. Financial worries, parental expectations, academic competition are just a few of the factors that combine to add stress to a student's life.

To address the problems, UW-River Falls applied for and received a $2,500 grant from the Association of American Colleges and Universities Bringing Theory to Practice Project. The university used the funds to establish a work group, which proceeded to get informed about the issues involved and to identify potential solutions to the dilemma.

Their first step has been to pick the brain and expertise of Dr. Richard Kadison, one of the premier authorities on collegiate mental health in the nation and Chief of Mental Health Services at Harvard University. The group purchased 30 copies of his book, "College of the Overwhelmed: The Mental Health Crisis and What to Do About It" and scheduled him to lead a one-day workshop on campus this past January.

During his presentation, Kadison noted that UW-River Falls students aren't immune from the consequences of depression, eating disorders and sleep deprivation. It happens here, too. So he urged those attending to play a role in helping students to balance academic demands and mental health needs. All can play their part, he argued.

First, faculty, parents, staff and students can learn to recognize symptoms associated with being overwhelmed, he said. In addition, they can take steps to ensure that students have access to appropriate care to help reduce the sources of stress that push students to the edge.

Kadison urged staff and students to promote and use the counseling services available on campus. He pointed to studies that show how students who seek counseling services often improve their grade point averages.

Blanche Davis taught speech and theatre at UW-RF from 1949-73. She was an exemplary, intelligent, and inspiring teacher and director, a mentor to her students who went on to become teachers, and a dynamic and indefatigable personality. She died gently in her sleep on April 5--with a hint of her trademark smile--at the venerable age of 97.

Blanche was always a pacesetter and something of an iconoclast, personally and professionally. When she was born in 1908, the life expectancy for women in America was 53 years. When she earned her doctorate from Columbia University in New York in 1949, she was among just 600 or so women in the U.S. who did that year.

When she joined the faculty at River Falls State Teachers College in 1949, she was the sole professor of speech and theatre courses. She saw what needed to be done! She added more speech/theatre courses. And she selected and directed theatre productions that represented a wide spectrum of the best dramatists in world theatre. These were often challenging and difficult plays, but she wanted students (as well as the college audience) exposed to excellent dramatic literature as a solid foundation for their future graduate studies and classroom teaching.

Money was scarce in Ottumwa, Iowa, where she was born, and even as an young teenager, Blanche realized that getting an education, as quickly as possible, was the way to help her mother support Blanche and her two siblings. Blanche crammed her high school years into two years and graduated at age 16 in 1925. It was as if she was somehow aware that the dawn of the Great Depression was just around the corner. She worked at several jobs to earn tuition money for junior college. One of those jobs was at a creamery in Ottumwa where she wrapped pounds of butter. All through her life, as she recalled that job with a wry smile, she would mimic with her hands the motions and movements of wrapping those endless pounds of butter.

After some coursework at the junior college, she transferred to Illinois State University in Normal. Earning her bachelor's degree in 1930, she took her first high school teaching job, and in the summers she worked toward a master's degree at the University of Iowa, which she earned in 1936. She supplemented her income by doing housecleaning in faculty members' homes.

Prior to coming to UW-RF, while teaching at DePauw University in Greencastle, Indiana, she met a man who would change her life--Maurice Frink Jr. Blanche's first impression of Maurice was that he was a farm boy--but she soon realized he was a farm boy of considerable intelligence and eloquence. He graduated from DePauw in 1942 and was immediately hired by Vogue Magazine in New York as a photographer. In summers, when Blanche and her mother visited New York, Maurice and Blanche would get together to see theatre productions and spend long hours discussing them. These were days, as Blanche would say, "when the plays actually had something to say worth discussing." The fondness between Maurice and Blanche grew, and now madly in love with her, Maurice asked her to marry him. She laughed and told him that marriage would probably ruin her career and her life and might also ruin his life.

Twenty-five years passed before Blanche and Maurice talked again--in a phone conversation arranged by friends. Since his first marriage was now over, Maurice felt free to visit Blanche a number of times in River Falls. He fell in love with her all over again, and he asked her once again to marry him. Blanche did not laugh this time, but she did refuse his offer. "I want to retire first, and that will be five years from now in 1973." Maurice agreed. When 1973 came, Blanche submitted her course grades for the last time. She and Maurice were married in a private ceremony on June 1. Blanche was 65 years old and together they had 27 years of blissful marriage. Maurice Frink Jr. died in 2001.

We who were students in Blanche's classes were never privy to the romantic drama which had played out in her personal life. She didn't believe that a teacher's personal life should overlap or intrude itself into the subject matter. "You don't pay your hard earned tuition money to listen to me reminisce about my life," she once said. But those of us who were fortunate enough to sit in her classes or to be involved in her theatre productions did see a woman of intelligence and high ethical standards. We saw a woman of enormous energy who would teach a full schedule of classes, come back to campus to spend several hours in rehearsal, and then go back home and work into the wee hours of the morning sewing costumes with her "Mama" Ann Wonderly. How she could maintain this schedule, we never knew, but we loved her commitment to us as students and to an excellent undergraduate program which she almost completely established herself.

The real estate magnate from California's Silicon Valley was back on campus in April to share his story with the campus community as part of the College of Business and Economics Executive-in-Residence series. And he was here with a $100,000 donation to give current UW-RF students the same kind of boost he received those many years ago.

Born in 1938 in Japanese-occupied Korea, his early years were filled with struggle and uncertainty as his war-torn country became the frontline of the Cold War. He remembers seeing his grandfather arrested by the Russians as that army moved into the north after World War II. His family fled south. During the Korean War, separated from his family, the teenage Hahn battled for daily survival in the streets of Seoul. The war impoverished the country, but Hahn managed to complete high school, work to save money, earn a college degree, and become a high school teacher. For years he harbored a desire to come to the United States for additional education and more opportunity for his children. He finally made it in 1973, enrolling at a large university in Dallas, Texas, to study business. But the school wasn't for him. While there he met a librarian who told him about a great small campus in Wisconsin--a beautiful setting with a family-like atmosphere.

Hahn was sold. He brought his wife and young children--ages nine, seven, and five--to River Falls in August 1974. Unable to find an apartment large enough, he purchased a mobile home on the outskirts of town for $1,200. And he delved into his graduate program in economics. It was hard work. On top of classes, studying and family responsibilities, Hahn and his wife found work where they could to defray expenses. He remembers picking apples in a nearby orchard; he remembers late nights, nose in the books.

Dr. Kao remembers too: "Sang Hahn was single-minded in pursuit of his goals. He had a strong desire to learn. And he did it completely on his own. He took advantage of the opportunities we offered, but it was his own hard work that made the difference."

The Fredrickson family had long been befriending international students through their daughters who attended UW-RF. Hahn's family experienced that hospitality as well. On the Fredrickson farm, they could relax and be themselves, get a respite from the pressures of work and school. And the Fredricksons helped Hahn's family with everything from applying for car insurance to traveling with them to Milwaukee to get residency papers and a green card.

After earning his degree, Hahn returned to Texas for a few more courses and to plot a strategy for professional success. Upon leaving River Falls, he sold the family's mobile home for a profit. That would become the pattern that would earn him millions over the next several decades.

"I used all I learned here," Hahn told the audience at his April presentation in Rodli Commons, as he described the research that went into starting his real estate management business. "I owe my success in business to this campus. I used what I learned here to devise a business plan."

He selected the newly burgeoning Silicon Valley as home base for his operations and invested in an apartment complex. He worked 16-hour days to fix up the property. He was gardener, maintenance man, painter, manager and promoter. In a short time he was able to sell the complex for a $300,000 profit, which he immediately reinvested in a larger complex. That became his formula--buy property in a transitional part of town, cut expenses, work non-stop to improve the building, raise rents in small increments, and sell at a profit.

"Because I owe so much to the United States and UW-River Falls, I'd like to return some of my wealth," he says. He was prompted to give to his alma mater a few years back when a student telethon caller from the UW-River Falls Foundation called and asked for a $100 donation. Hahn recalls responding to the student by saying that he would write a check for $5,000 if the student would get him Dr. Kao's phone number.

Since then, Hahn has made that aforementioned $100,000 gift, which he sees helping other students like himself. He's hopeful the money can help the university focus on international students and the globalization of the campus, especially Asian studies.

The campus is alive this Fall of 2006. From the residences to the library, from the athletics fields to the laboratories, UW-River Falls has opened the academic year with vitality and promise. We are building our strategic plan together on the firm foundations of the focused mission, values and vision created last year after the Vision and Values Survey. Hundreds of participants, from the university community to community leaders to alumni, are involved in the process of identifying our goals for the next years and the action plans to achieve them. The level of engagement is indicative of our resolve to set the course of the university in a time of change and possibility, of challenge and accountability. We recognize that this is a moment unlike the recent past. We call this the global century.

This Fall issue of Falcon Features focuses on our supporters, the many of you who include UW-River Falls as a recipient of your philanthropy. We genuinely appreciate your investment in our faculty so that they may continue to be on the cutting edge of their disciplines and contemporary teaching and learning techniques. Your investment makes it possible for many of our students to secure supplementary support through scholarships so that they can pursue their degrees in a timely fashion and graduate to join you in support of the university and its inestimable value to the region, state and beyond. Your sense of loyalty and commitment bolsters athletic teams, undergraduate research, global education opportunities and a host of worthy initiatives in each of our four colleges, our many departments and programs and in the vital support units.

Each gift has a story, a connection between the donor and those here who will directly benefit. Investing in UW-River Falls creates a timeless bond between the institution that has meant so much to so many for so long, and those who choose to make the university’s future a matter of personal interest.

A dear friend, himself a benefactor of many projects including the university that helped shape his life through its values, its quality, its compassion and its importance to the community, expresses his philosophy of giving in simple eloquence. Many years my senior, and one of my personal mentors, he reminded us all that we have the personal responsibility to prepare the way for next generations just like those before us have done. And so he counseled that we should all strive to “leave the wood pile a little bit higher” than when we found it. He certainly did, from playgrounds to university faculty chairs, from bleachers at stadiums to a new floor for the dance studio. His legacy is secure in the minds and hearts of family and friends, and in the enduring vitality of the college he called his second home.

So many of you that I have met are driven by that same spirit. Private giving has never been more essential for UW-River Falls and higher education. State support has been declining for years. As a result, students and their families pay more in tuition and fees. And even though the cost of attending UW-River Falls is among the lowest for comprehensive state universities in the region, it represents a daily challenge for our students and your university. In the long-standing UW-River Falls tradition, we are blessed with faculty whose unique talents and scholarly accomplishments offer our students wonderful opportunities to learn. And they are supported by a highly qualified, exceptionally competent and truly caring staff who create countless learning moments each day in their interaction with students.

We invite you to visit the university often, and to sense the daily commitment to help students learn. We believe that we are educating the next generation of productive, creative, ethical and engaged citizens and leaders, those who will inherit the responsibility of guiding our world through unanticipated challenges. With your support, we can prepare them for what they will surely face, the challenge of change.

No “Auld Lang Syne.” No champagne toasts. But plenty of excitement and resolution-making at the start of the new academic year. In late August it was the faculty and staff’s turn as more than 500 crowded into Abbott Concert Hall for the traditional “opening day” ceremonies. Chancellor Betz welcomed everyone back “to the world we share, the calling to teach, to mentor, to create an atmosphere for learning, and to enrich the power of learning.” He outlined several key initiatives for the coming year: 1) strategic planning guided by our newly redefined mission, vision and values; 2) retention of first and second-year students; 3) a commitment to civic engagement and service-learning; 4) globalization and international linkages; 5) sustainability; and 6) leadership. Then it was the students’ turn, with registration and advising days, move-in on Sept. 3, and several “Weeks of Welcome” events. A record number of first-year students (1,300) are among the 6,100-strong contingent this Fall.

One stop during the two-week tour included a visit to Taipei’s Shih Chien University, which sent seven of its students to UW-River Falls last year to study business economics. An agreement was discussed to have UWRF students visit their institution to study agriculture.

Efforts also included arranging for more faculty exchanges. Attracting Asian students and faculty to campus enhances the learning experience for UW-River Falls students as they experience a different culture and a global perspective, says Greene.

A casual conversation among a few faculty and staff at the chancellor’s residence “literally turned into a huddle that ended with us placing our hands in the middle agreeing to make it happen,” recalls Brent Greene. The outcome? Nine students took part in a unique leadership training course at Dalkeith House in Scotland.

Taught by Chancellor Betz, Brent Greene and leadership coordinator Brent Turner, students earned credits studying various leadership styles from a global perspective. Panel discussions included the Scottish MP Rohna Brankin and a lecture by the Duke of Buccleuch.

Each spring, for the past 40 years, the university has welcomed an accomplished composer to campus to teach classes, rehearse with students and premiere a commissioned piece. It's featured such internationally known composers as Vincent Persichetti, John Cage, William Albright, and Frederic Rzewski.

Conrad DeJong, founder of the Commissioned Composer Program, said: “For most students, music is something that exists on a piece of paper. But this was an opportunity to put a face to the music—a way to bring a new piece of music to life and a way to get students involved in the creative process."

Alumna Lisa Benz is compiling a book on the one-of-a-kind program and she’s looking for your input. Remember some of your experiences with the composers? the concerts? the music? Send her your reflections, memories, comments on the Commissioned Composer Program. Got photos? She could use those, too (and promises to return your prints).

In the coming months, a complete renovation plan for Ramer Field will be introduced to the campus and community. The project will involve a major fundraising initiative by the UW-River Falls athletics department. The transformation will include the enclosure of the existing steel structure, new seating, an accessible press box, and viewing spaces. The lights will be relocated to the exterior side of the bleachers to increase the dimensionsof the field and make the playing space large enough for women’s soccer.

The initial phase includes a tree planting project to surround the stadium with native trees. Wind exposure has always been a challenge. This project will improve these conditions and add to the natural beauty of the location. You can help by donating a tree to the project in your name or the name of a loved one. A contribution plaque inside the stadium will commemorate all participating donors, and a planting day celebration for all participants will take place at Ramer Field in Spring 2007.

Early in this decade, the Chinese government renamed a region in Northwestern Yunnan Province and the Tibetan Autonomous Region “Shangri-La.” The new name results from the government’s interest in boosting tourism in one of the more remote and strikingly beautiful areas of the country. The designation, “Shangri-La,” stems from the region’s superficial resemblance to the mythical Tibetan kingdom described in British novelist James Hilton's Lost Horizon (1933).

In addition to spectacular mountain ranges with peaks over 23,000 feet, the Shangri-La Region is traversed by three of the world’s most storied rivers running in parallel just a few miles apart—the Mekong on its long journey into Laos and Vietnam; the Yangtze, which eventually turns east and runs the entire length of China; and the Salween, which takes a right and flows into India’s Bay of Bengal. With breathtaking scenery, the region is home to 26 Chinese ethnic minorities—including Tibetans, of course—making it one of the most ancient, culturally diverse and intriguing areas in the world. China’s ancient Silk Road, documented by Marco Polo in the 12th century, runs through the region and will be one of the byways upon which our modern travelers will tread.

Pauline’s commitment to education started at an early age. Her father died when she was young. But the principal at Chetek High School, Eugene Brown, who was a River Falls State Teachers College alumnus, urged her to attend RFSTC. Her high school math teacher was an important influence as well. “The teacher I had in high school, Ernest Blato, was so good that every year I could I took math classes from him,” says Pauline.

Pauline also furthered her connections at RFSTC as she worked at the home of Dr. R. A. and Nell Karges, earning room and board and attending cultural and social events with them. “They were like family,” she recalls. Pauline and Bob also stayed with the Kargeses again during the summer while Bob was earning his Ph.D. at the University of Minnesota. “They were generous and genuine,” said Bob, who gave the eulogy at Nell’s funeral.

Through the Koenig’s generous legacy, a few more dedicated teachers will follow in their footsteps and join the ranks of educators who are valued by their students and who will inspire others to become teachers.

Petersons’ Valley View Farm has been in the family for more than 100 years. What started as the farm’s centennial celebration in 1999 has developed into a number of annual events there, including music concerts featuring the St. Croix Valley Community Band led by UW-RF’s Kris Tjornehoj and Menomonie’s Ludington Guard Band. Another event, which Peterson says is “dear to my heart,” provides an opportunity for school children from the Friends School of Minnesota to attend day camp on a real farm. As an “Aggie,” Peterson received one of the first non-teaching bachelor’s degrees from Wisconsin State College-River Falls in 1957. Petersons’ Valley View Farm Scholarship currently provides a substantial annual renewable scholarship to a high school senior who enrolls in the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences at UW-River Falls. The history and preservation of the Petersons’ farm and Wayne Peterson’s support of community and university endeavors play an important role today in providing opportunities for future generations.

Shelby Obershaw grew up in Wisconsin and attended UW-River Falls in the late 1950s, working to put herself through college and become a teacher. She taught elementary school for 21 years in San Bernardino and later served on that city’s school board. In 1999 she co-chaired a successful bond issue that provided $50 million for the district schools. An active volunteer, she’s served on the San Bernardino library foundation board, led the Children’s Dental Health Center, and given her time to a county school for homeless children.

"UW-River Falls has a strong presence in Asia," said Betz. "This visit served to strengthen that presence and will serve to position the intuition more robustly as we move ahead in globalizing the campus and creating rich international opportunities for our students, faculty and staff."

"The residence is a stunning display of Chinese architecture and landscaping that clearly demonstrates the former entrepreneurial and economic strength of China," said Betz. "The economic growth and vitality, so readily apparent, is stunning. The Hu Xueyan residence and the whole of China, will serve as a powerful international laboratory for UW-River Falls students and faculty as opportunities are develop to send students to Hangzhou, throughout China and across Southeast Asia."

The students are journaling their activities each day and reflecting on its meaning. Students Katy Leisch, Katie Bollig, Jessica Kopp shared their impressions on arriving there: "Most homes are in unlivable standards on the inside with walls damaged by saturation and flooding, roofs torn apart, trees toppled over, and as one approaches the mile leading directly to the Coast, complete devastation prevails. One cannot comprehend this destruction until witnessing it first hand. In our experience, we were left completely speechless..... Many of us are new to the tasks assigned, but have learned fast through the graciousness of other volunteers.

The old adage, 'Many hands make light work,' has rung true for our services. Jobs that would take these families weeks to do, we are able to complete in a day. On the grand scale of things, our contributions may not seem like much, however to these individuals they mean the world."

"Immediate needs must be met, but long-term renewal is equally challenging," said Betz in an e-mail to students and staff. "As individuals, small towns, a large city and whole states begin to recover and reframe their futures, I believe that there is a service-leadership role for each of us and for UW-River Falls to willingly embrace."

"I thank you now for stepping up and helping the people at the other end of the Mississippi," said Betz of immediate donation efforts on campus. "We hold them in our thoughts and assist them with our actions and generosity as the coming days will teach us more of the reality none could have imagined only one week ago."

The Art Department  will serve as a central, on-campus donation site for checks and money orders for major relief agencies such as the Red Cross, Salvation Army and Second Harvest. Contact Susie Zimmer for more information.

UW-RF Professor of Social Work Ogden Rogers, who is a regional coordinator with the American Red Cross, will organize a community drive at Dick's Market and Econofoods from 8 a.m. to 8 p.m. Sept. 9-14. Volunteer orientation is set for 7 p.m. Sept. 8 in the Hagestad Student Center. Rogers also urges that those who wish to volunteer their time at the disaster sites do not go to the stricken region  until agencies issue further calls for more volunteers.

"Many UW campuses are offering ways to help college students and others whose lives have been ripped apart by this ongoing disaster," Reilly said. "I believe the resources we can offer as a community of higher education will help many of the victims to recover and move forward."

Reilly noted that several UW campuses are prepared to welcome students enrolled in colleges or universities that are closed because of damage from the hurricane.  For example, UW-Madison, UW-Milwaukee, UW-Oshkosh, UW-Waukesha, and UW-Whitewater are working to help students with opportunities to earn college credits that can be easily transferred to their schools once they reopen, as well as assistance with financial aid and housing arrangements.

"I thank UW campuses for stepping up to offer these students a chance to recover and maintain their footing on the path of higher education," Reilly said. "We are working systemwide to do as much as we possibly can, which is why we've engaged our UW HELP toll-free hotline as a central resource that can respond to inquiries and calls for assistance."

"The students and staff who have been called to help in the relief efforts have the backing of the entire UW System, and we thank them for their service to this worthy cause." Reilly said. "I hope our efforts here in Wisconsin will make these life-altering circumstances a little less painful for the hurricane's victims. Our hearts go out to each of the families affected by this disaster, and we are here to do what we can to help."

Since Monday we have watched and listened in mounting disbelief as the calamity along the US Gulf Coast seems to bring grimmer news with each day. Some of the scenes are reminiscent of Rwanda or Somalia. We are still unable to capture the full spectrum of the situation. To say this is unprecedented in US history appears to be both accurate and an understatement. Thousands of people are in desperate need.

Heinselman are initiating efforts to involve students and to identify ways for all of us to assist. Beyond the emergency, first responder relief that must be provided quickly and efficiently, there will be a more protracted reconstruction process which will last for a long time. Please check the UW-River Falls website and your e-mail often as our response continues and updates are available.

We will identify a school, school district, college, university, library, or college community in need of on-going assistance. We plan to “adopt” or form a brother/sister relationship and work with our new partner over an extended period. Immediate needs must be met, but long-term renewal is equally challenging.

As individuals, small towns, a large city and whole states begin to recover and reframe their futures, I believe that there is a service leadership role for each of us and for UW-River Falls to willingly embrace.

I thank you now for stepping up and helping the people at the other end of the Mississippi. We hold them in our thoughts and assist them with our actions and generosity as the coming days will teach us more of the reality none could have imagined only one week ago.

In March 2006, Evan Johnson's Special Topics in Speech class joined more than 40 students and staff on a service-learning trip to the Mississippi gulf coast. This six-minute video, produced by the class, documents the university students' participation in the cleanup and rebuilding efforts following Hurricane Katrina.

A:  It just started. So far it hasn't been bad. We've just had meetings and a quick practice today. I didn't get too many reps because they wanted to get the veterans in to get them warmed up and everything. It's been good so far.

A:  Pretty good. This definitely is not the same state I left three days ago; it is a lot hotter. I was prepared well. It's nice to come to River Falls and see the facilities and see how nice it has gotten over the years.

Welcome to the UW-RF Dance Theatre photo and video archive. The media available on this part of the website are from the 2002 annual spring concert performances. These concerts are held near the beginning of April. View our events page for concert dates and other Dance Theatre event information.

The videos were recorded during a public performance, hence the audience is audible. The video files themselves are rather large, so they will take a considerable amount of time to download if you are viewing this over a dialup modem connection. Until the video is loaded, it is possible your browser may only show a QuickTime logo.

Welcome to the Wisconsin Governor's Challenge. Working together with the President's Challenge, it's a brand new program designed to help make fitness simple and fun - and in the process, make Wisconsin healthier.

American Heart Association’s website on "Physical Activity in Your Daily Life." This is a great site for all ages, with many different links. Learn tips for exercise success at work, at home, and at play! Learn the benefits from physical activity or just how many calories you burn for a particular activity.

National Heart, Lung, and Blood Institute website. Examples of moderate amounts of physical activity, a guide to changing behavior, and many additional nutrition links. Plan your meal and see how many calories you consume.

Centers for Disease Control and Prevention Body Mass Index website. Body Mass Index (BMI) is a number calculated from a person’s weight and height. BMI provides a reliable indicator of body fatness for most people and is used to screen for weight categories that may lead to health problems.

Center for Disease Control and Prevention website. Information on making physical activity a part of your life, how to get started and change your lifestyle. Learn recommendations and how to measure your physical activity intensity.

Centers for Disease Control and Prevention Nutrition Website. Covers a wide spectrum of related topics. Good nutrition is vital to good health, disease prevention, and essential for healthy growth and development of children, adolescents, and young adults.

Offering the latest in alternative medicine, diet & nutrition, emotional wellness, fitness, health aging, sexuality and more.  Online chat rooms, message boards and resource center. Health topics A - Z.

Although I assumed the Chancellor’s position in July of 2005, I believe that the institution’s values, principles and practices are admirable, challenging and central to excellent universities. River Falls has always been committed to helping students learn. Dedicated faculty and staff work closely with students—in classrooms, laboratories, collaborative undergraduate research, co-curricular organizations and activities. Methods ranging from well prepared lectures to one-on-one conversations to experiential activities to on-line virtual discussions to hands-on practica match students’ different learning styles. Curriculum is grounded in a newly revised general education program that complements students’ majors and minors. An active and expanding undergraduate research initiative allows students to take their academic preparation to the next pre-professional level.

Our students have traditionally served the community and region. Education students teach in area schools, agriculture students do research on farms and regional agri-businesses, arts and sciences majors intern in areas from art to zoology, and business and economics majors assist area enterprises. Student and faculty service is not confined to the St. Croix Valley region. As the world becomes flatter, it’s even more imperative that our horizons expand. Our newly approved international studies major helps prepare students for the 21st century as do our growing range of international study opportunities. The International Traveling Classroom is an innovative international learning experience serving as a model for other campuses.

UW-RF continues its commitment to diversity and inclusiveness through a variety of initiatives championed by many different campus departments. An active understanding of and appreciation for diverse cultures within the U.S. is essential to effective citizenship and to building a just and inclusive society. Our students’ citizenship and leadership skills are nurtured by the campus’ participation in the American Democracy Project and many other initiatives.

In support of these efforts the university’s facilities have grown. A new child care center, a state-of-the-art suite-style residence hall, expanded athletic facilities, and a beautiful garden area now enhance the campus. Ground was broken for the new student center with completion expected in January 2007.

We will be the learning nucleus of the St. Croix Valley. We will act in close collaboration with communities, institutions and private enterprise to create a dynamic economy, sustainable communities and environment, and an optimum quality of life. Our efforts will be firmly rooted in unbounded inquiry and a cultivated sense of civility, public service and creative expression. We will be a highly accessible gateway to explore the full range of human potential. We will inspire and educate citizens and leaders who, guided by core values, will purposefully and ethically serve society. We will link our students and our communities to global opportunities and collaborative relationships in the St. Croix Valley, in Wisconsin and beyond. We will be a life-long learning partner for all those who seek to discover their own potential and the richness and complexity of our multifaceted world.

Alumni take a tour of the university's greenhouse facilities during Alumni Weekend 2005. The two-day event draws approximately 100 former classmates back to campus for tours, special presentations, picnics, a vintage car show, and plenty of reminiscing.

This figure represents the full-time equivalent enrollment of students in Fall 2004. The total fell 2.5 percent short of the targeted goal, but represented an increase over the previous year and progress toward matching optimal enrollment capacity with maximum quality. A total of 342 students of color enrolled in Fall 2004. That figure represents an 80 percent increase over the 1998 number. International student enrollment stood at 64 in 2004, more than doubling the 30 students enrolled in 1998.

Number of recent alumni, responding to the 2005 ACT Alumni Outcomes Survey, who agree or strongly agree that UW-RF offers many opportunities for student involvement in campus activities. That figure compares favorably with a 60% national average. The university supports more than 150 student organizations. Additionally, 61 percent of recent alumni reported that their school experiences had a major or moderate impact on their appreciation for and exercise of rights, responsibilities and privileges as a citizen.

When Jonathan Eisch arrived on campus as a freshman, he expressed an immediate interest in the IceCube Project at the South Pole. He knew that UW-River Falls was the only undergraduate institution in the nation affiliated with the international research team that was building the world's largest scientific instrument. The $272 million telescope involves drilling more than 70 half-mile deep holes in the ice and freezing 4,200 optical detectors in place at the bottom of the world.

Over the past four years, Eisch has traveled to the South Pole twice for extended research work, developed a "briefcase-sized" cosmic ray detector for use with the project, spent a summer working with the project team at the Bartol Research Institute at the University of Delaware, and presented at conferences throughout the United States and Europe.

Each spring the university hosts a Research, Scholarly and Creative Activity Day to showcase the work being conducted by students, faculty and staff. More than 70 posters were displayed at the event in April 2005. They represented research as varied as the study of fresh water sharks in Nicaragua to the effects of stabilizer formulations on the viscosity of yogurt. Students analyzed word usage in the 2004 presidential debates as well as the rotation rate of Minor Planet #8006 Sandler. "More posters were presented than ever before," noted Tim Lyden, faculty adviser to the Society of Undergraduate Research, Scholarly and Creative Activities (SURSCA). "Participants and the audience truly represented the entire range of research, scholarly and creative activities conducted here on campus."

SURSCA is a student organization founded in 2002 after the first group of students to attend NCUR returned home, exhilarated by their experience and wanting to foster greater participation in research and professional activities. The group has actively supported undergraduate research by producing a journal of project reports and sponsoring their own fall "Evening Gala," which features student work in the sciences and the arts.

UW-RF students also present their findings at the annual "Posters in the Rotunda," held at the Wisconsin State Capitol in Madison. There, legislators, university officials, regents and others can see how the UW System is teaching and mentoring "some of the world's brightest young minds right here in Wisconsin," according to System President Kevin Reilly. UW-RF Interim Chancellor Virgil Nylander, who attended the event, noted that "The quality of research by our students was superb. During my university days, this was the kind of research you would have seen at the graduate level. This is a remarkable group of scholars and researchers."

Numerous funding sources are tapped to support student research. For several years now the UW-River Falls Foundation has awarded summer stipends to give students the opportunity to apply their analytical and creative skills. A total of $10,000 was awarded to four students for Summer 2005.

Donors to the College of Arts and Sciences Fund for Excellence supported 17 undergraduate students to the tune of $5,000 during 2004-05. The grants were used to cover supplies, project expenses, research, travel and conference attendance. Many students responded that their research had a positive impact on their graduate school applications and job opportunities.

Also, during the summers of 2004 and 2005, through a grant awarded by the U.S. Department of Agriculture, the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences was able to send 10 UW-RF students to the research university of their choice for research experience. Nick Vreeland worked with doctoral students and the faculty at Iowa State University to collect and analyze 1,500 glacial till samples to detect how the glacier traveled. Tammy Golat worked in the genetics labs at the University of Minnesota to uncover the causes of recurrent exertional rhabdomyolysis, a disease affecting five percent of all thoroughbred horses following their exercise period.

Undergraduate research at UW-RF is also a significant part of the McNair Scholars Program, funded by the federal government to help low-income and first generation college students to go on to graduate school. Fifteen students graduated from the program in May 2005. Through the program, students are paired with a faculty mentor, receive assistance and fee waivers when applying to graduate schools, get travel expenses and fees paid for attendance at professional seminars and conferences, and take advantage of stipends to fund summer research experiences.

"McNair has made a tremendous impact on my education here at River Falls," said 2005 graduate Mary Vang. "I have gained experience with researching, presenting my research at national conferences, and learning about what graduate schools will be best. I feel that being a McNair Scholar opened a lot of doors for me to attend many graduate schools nationwide. It gave me credibility by having experiences that other undergraduates may not have."

Responding to a rapidly changing world where education can't afford to stand still, UW-RF's administration in 2002 charged the Faculty Senate's Academic Policies and Program (AP&P) committee to reconsider the formula for the required distribution of general education courses. AP&P appointed a subcommittee to handle this grand task, and they set to work, under the leadership of history professor Kurt Leichtle.

Starting in the fall of 2005, freshmen entering UW-River Falls were required to take, among other things, a course each in "Multidisciplinary Inquiry," "Ethical Citizenship," "Global Perspectives," and "American Cultural Diversity." Some faculty on the traditional end of the spectrum are not keen about the fact that this program does not require students to take at least one course in history, literature, or a foreign language, and that students can now use a course in statistics to count as their mathematics component. Those looking for more forward-looking changes were equally disappointed that we did not require a course in environmental awareness or 21st century agricultural production.

But no one seems to be complaining about the effort to make general education a slightly smaller part of our students' programs. The students I advise are mostly English education majors, and the time it takes them to complete a major, a minor, and an obligatory second minor in education, plus do student teaching, is typically 10 full semesters, and they earn about 140 credits in the process. Our catalog says that students can graduate with 120 credits, but the average UW-RF student graduates with 134.

Today's college student has different priorities as well. They generally have to work more to meet rising college expenses, and they often need both job experience and internships to make their resumes distinctive in a very competitive job market. Though the GE Committee only managed to reduce the total number of general education credits required from 41 to 38, the fact that most of the 3-credit requirements can be filled with a greater variety of courses will make it easier—and more meaningful—for students to complete their GE program.

The committee’s last charge was to create an assessable program with built-in accountability features. Since I teach courses for pre-service teachers, this stipulation greatly appealed to me. Just ask my techniques students how many times I tell them: "In order to plan successfully, you have to know what you want students to know and do at the end of your lesson, unit, and course. If the kind of tasks you assign don’t really show that students have learned more than a list of facts, you don't know if you're doing your job or not."

Nationwide, accreditation associations are requiring university departments to provide data that demonstrates how well students are learning the essential components of their disciplines. Our graduate surveys reported greater satisfaction with the education students received here than graduates at comparably sized and financed institutions nationwide, but we didn't have standardized graduation tests to prove it, nor did we have the budget to be able to add them.

Instead, we hired Susan Hatfield, an assessment expert from Winona State University, to teach us how to state goals and expectations in measurable ways. Once we can assess student learning within individual courses, we can compile the data from these courses to give us concrete evidence of how we're doing overall. We'll be killing two birds with one effort: holding ourselves and students accountable, and collecting usable data for public reckoning as well.

Up until the point of actually deciding which courses would be accepted into the "new" general education program, working on this committee had been the most interesting and satisfying in my 13 years of committee work at UW-RF. From my first introduction to it in 2003, committee members talked idealistically; we reasoned complexly; we tried hard to achieve consensus on notions of what's essential to the development of a UW-RF graduate without making pitches for our own departments and colleges. Early on in the deliberation, the subcommittee agreed to circumvent "vested interests" by foregoing all mention of specific disciplines (i.e. we could not talk about "history courses" or "biology" or "music"; we did make an exception for "mathematics," since it's both a way of thinking and learning and a discipline) and limit our decisions to the kinds of learning students needed to gain in order to be "good RF grads."

No one has accused the General Education Committee of being lazy. From the get-go we made it clear that every course, no matter how long it had already been taught as a general education course, would have to go through an approval process which ended with our committee (after getting departmental, college and university approval). Adding together brand-new proposals and revised proposals, we considered 64 proposals between September 2004 and May 2005.

In most of the meetings from September through May, all members came with photocopies of one to five course proposals they had read and evaluated. The proposer of each course would be present to answer questions—primarily aimed at determining whether the practices of the proposed course were likely to fulfill the designated outcomes and whether plans for gathering and recording assessment data would be practicable and appropriate.

We were relieved to see that our methods seemed to work rather slickly. That is, until we finished the math and science proposals. It was when we tackled our first proposal from the English department that we learned the pitfalls. That’s not a surprise. If a math teacher has to prove that students are learning how to compute cubic roots, showing papers where students successfully applied the formula and came up with the desired result would do in large part. Add a request that students explain in words how they knew that was the correct procedure, and you’ve established comprehension as well as application.

But ask an English teacher to demonstrate that a student can “write an effective summary,” and you can bet that one reader will love it because of its sublime style, while another will find it superficial. We realized that we needed to listen hard to how teachers outside of our own disciplines determined quality of student work and level of student learning. We had to stretch our own habits of thinking to bend the way that others think.

Faculty reactions to getting proposals rejected the first time they came before the committee were mixed. Some proposers came assuming that we’d find something lacking and then give them advice about how to revise in order to win our approval the next time. They usually went away with their expectations fulfilled—sometimes happy to have further guidance, sometimes dubious that we had clearly articulated what we “really wanted” from them.

Some came assuming that their course had been well taught and well evaluated for years and a committee of “outsiders” (i.e. teachers not in their field) could hardly give them useful advice about how to do it better. Some felt that we were going too far in “dictating” what course content and student assessment should be.

Between October 8 and May 12, the committee approved 35 courses on the first submission, 19 on the second, and 2 on the third. And even though our votes were almost all unanimous, we succeeded, predictably, at not pleasing everyone.

Nonetheless, the General Education Committee would like to believe that everybody will benefit. Even those of us who have to do more work to get course proposals revised and the assessments up and running. I spent a fair amount of time last summer and fall working with Freshman English coordinator Steve Luebke to prepare a proposal for a new course: English 100. As we started to follow the committee’s suggestions, we realized that we were filling holes that should have been filled and becoming more clear and precise in our expectations for teachers who would be teaching this course and students who would be taking it. I believe other faculty are also finding that the process of proposing courses for the General Education program encourages more articulated thinking about their courses and perhaps some meaningful revisions.

One of the aims of the committee was to try to stifle the common notion that "generals" were something "to get done with" rather than a true cornerstone to their growth as citizens, professionals, and leaders. The new "Ethical Citizenship" requirement, for example, provides an opportunity for a student to take a course that’s been around for a while, like Journalism 101–Mass Media, or ESM 105–Environmental Studies. But they will see it in the perspective not just of learning about the mass media or the environment, but of understanding how their personal decision-making is influenced by critical knowledge of fields like these.

Every course that has been approved so far for the new general education program must be reviewed again in one to five years. At that time, proposers will be asked to provide data that demonstrates that students in these courses have achieved the desired aims and outcomes. If the evidence isn’t adequate, the course won't be approved for renewal, and will not be offered for general education credit until a better plan for promoting and/or measuring student learning is devised.

If this process goes well, it means that teachers have to “deliver the goods” on a regular and consistent basis. Not that we don’t right now. But we’ll know and so will everybody else that we’re doing a great job of educating here at UW-RF.

The purpose of the UW-RF General Education Program is to facilitate the acquisition and integration of knowledge, abilities, and ethics in order to form a foundation for lifelong learning. The interdisciplinary foundation includes the ability to communicate effectively; comprehend the inter-relatedness of past and present human experience; apply scientific principles to the human and natural world; engage in inquiry and critical thinking; develop and appreciate the responsibilities of individuals to themselves, each other, society, and the world.

Understanding and actively appreciating diversity is an important value at UW-River Falls and in higher education today. That includes college and university auxiliary services such as housing, food services, security, etc. Each year, the National Association of College and Auxiliary Services (NACAS) presents the “Golden Award” to an individual member, institution or business partner for outstanding campus leadership, activities and/or programs promoting cultural awareness and inclusion. UW-River Falls received the award in 2004 for a coordinated set of campus development programs and student focused initiatives to enhance campus climate, attract and support students of color, and prepare all students to participate effectively in our diverse 21st century society.

During the 2003-2004 academic year, a Minneapolis based diversity training group, 2 Stories, came to campus for several diversity training sessions. More than 250 students, faculty and staff participated in three sessions addressing such issues as power and privilege, student empowerment and collaboration.

Since 1990, the UW-River Falls has provided summer residential programs to encourage students of color and students from low-income families to pursue a college education. Through these two programs, College Camp (serving students in grades 6-8) and Explore (for students in grades 9-12), UW-River Falls informs students about college and the life possibilities which stem from a college education; encourages a love for learning through the development of academic skills; helps students build positive self-concepts; and promotes a greater appreciation, awareness, and understanding of a diverse community. While on campus, students learn about campus culture, college admission requirements, and financial assistance for college.

UW-River Falls continues its successful Upward Bound program, which was funded by a federal TRIO grant in 1999. Through after-school sessions held at the students’ school, the program assists students in building their academic skills, identifying career interests, exploring colleges, and preparing to take the ACT. Students begin the Upward Bound program during their freshman year of high school and continue until graduation.

Upward Bound also provides cultural/academic enrichment opportunities through sessions one Saturday per month. Another opportunity that is offered is the six week summer component which includes one week of service learning, one week of cultural/educational fieldtrip, and four weeks of courses focusing on language arts, math, science and foreign language.

Volunteering and service learning is an important element of the Upward Bound program. After Upward Bound students perform 80 to 100 hours of volunteering per year, every four years they will have paid back to the citizens of the United States one full year of Upward Bound funding via volunteering. This provides avenues for career exploration, developing positive work skills, and helps earn scholarship monies. In addition, a well rounded-portfolio can be created for the student during their transition from high school to post-secondary education.

The program has maintained a yearly retention rate above 94 percent. Since the first graduating class in 2002, 95 percent, or 55 of the 58 students, have remained enrolled in postsecondary education. The third cohort of participants graduated from high school in 2004, with 18 of the 19 graduates accepted into a post-secondary education program. Of the 2005 graduating class, all 18 of the participants were accepted into post-secondary institutions.

Programs such as Upward Bound, the Vincent HS collaboration, and pre-college programs have contributed to steady increases in enrollment of students of color at UW-River Falls. See "By the Numbers" for specific statistics on student of color enrollment trends over the past several years.

The Admissions Office, in conjunction with the Publications Office, enhanced recruiting by creating a new diversity publication, which has text in Spanish, Hmong, Somali, Oromo, Amarec, Vietnamese and English. Additionally, the Admissions Office has translated a multi-purpose fact sheet into these languages, and translation services are available for campus visits and departmental appointments.

UW-River Falls has significantly increased library holdings in Ethnic Studies. Staff, faculty and students collaborated to assess collection development needs across cultures (African American, Native American, Asian American and Latino) and focused resources where the greatest needs existed. Collaboration with the College of Education and Professional Studies since 2000 has resulted in a 9,700 item Curriculum Materials Center focusing on K-12 multicultural materials. The Center serves pre-service teachers, education majors, area teachers, and parents who home school their children.

The Library has worked closely with Multicultural Services to sponsor annual exhibits that correspond to Ethnic History Months: African American History Month, Asian American History Month, Latino/a History Month, and Native American History Month. Other themes have included contemporary fiction by Native American authors, Dia de los Muertos, Puerto Rico, and books on political themes which were banned in various countries throughout the world (many of which were by ethnic authors).

Career Services has focused on an increased involvement with and outreach to multicultural students and student organizations. In addition to mailings sent out two to four times a year, Career Services gives presentations to multicultural student organizations and partners with these groups to put on programs for students of color. Career Services also assists Multicultural Services with orientation to college classes and multicultural retreats. Outreach initiatives such as these have increased the number of students of color using Career Services.

Faculty have been highly supportive and involved in the program, benefiting from opportunities to engage in scholarly activity with highly motivated and capable students. For example, an environmental studies faculty-student collaboration resulted in a campus sustainability plan; McNair funds supported a physics major’s two-week study at a South Pole research station; a McNair scholar focused on genocide in Sudan and developed a rich and significant website on the topic. The program’s presence has also expanded campus networks for student research, resulting in research opportunities for other students not part of the McNair program.

This initiative is designed and implemented by the Faculty and Academic Staff Development Board (FASDB). FASDB offers three full days of workshops and presentations each academic year. Each day has at least one session devoted to diversity issues.

The August 2004 session focused on engaging student learning about controversial social issues such as racism, prejudice, sexuality, sexism and heterosexism. The New Faculty Assistance program promotes a sound knowledge of diversity.

University Food Services, through our food service contractor (Chartwells), has also contributed to inclusiveness through their 2003-04 Diversity Awareness Program. On a regular basis, ethnic dishes are served as part of daily service in residential dining facilities to get students to appreciate foods from other cultures.

Student associations annually host the International Bazaar and the African American Alliance Dinner events with assistance from Chartwells. At each event, approximately 200-350 students, faculty, staff and community members participate.

The Leadership Center organized Unity in the Community, an annual event focusing on multicultural understanding and appreciation. Programs featuring native dance and performances from countries all over the world are emphasized. Each day during that week, Chartwells provides meals from different countries and hosts an outdoor luncheon which features various ethnic foods.

Situated between a changing rural landscape and a growing metropolitan center, the University of Wisconsin-River Falls is in an ideal position to expand its international opportunities for faculty, staff and students.

From the mid-1960s when its first study abroad and exchange programs were founded, the campus has continued to cultivate its cosmopolitan face, bringing the world to its students and its students to the world.

As an interdisciplinary program, the new major incorporates many existing resources such as study abroad options and current classes with an international focus. “The demand for workers with international expertise has increased dramatically over the last decade in almost every public and private sector occupation,” says Chapin.

Students take a core set of courses designed to provide an understanding of critical international issues confronting the world in order to develop the intellectual skills and substantive knowledge necessary for a global perspective. Along with an introduction to international studies, these courses include world food and population, international economics, human geography, origins of the world, international relations as well as a senior seminar and two years of a foreign language. They then select from directed electives that will give them skills relevant to their career goals, such as agriculture, business, economics or political science.

The maiden class of 35 set off for Europe in spring 2005, traveling with Chapin to London, Paris, Munich, Berchtesgaden and Vienna and choosing several courses of independent and “classroom” study. Professor Gorden Hedahl taught a theater course and Dr. Charles Rader taught a geography course to the cohort.

The UW-RF Semester Abroad Europe is one of the oldest study experiences in the UW System. Students live and study in Europe each fall while conducting independent research projects. Typically students are on their own, interviewing people, collecting data and literature, and completing other research. Working under a research advisor, students are responsible for their own course of study, lodging and other arrangements.

Moreover some 35 faculty from all colleges are involved in international teaching, research and service activities each year. From assisting with agricultural outreach initiatives in Bulgaria, Ireland and France to helping develop a yak cheese industry in Tibet to creating curriculum in international humanitarian law for the American Red Cross to use across the globe, faculty spread their knowledge far and wide.

Currently UW-RF has exchange agreements with universities and higher learning institutions in Germany, Mexico, the United Kingdom, Taiwan, China, and Nicaragua and is exploring partnership opportunities with schools in India, Bolivia and other countries.

The American Democracy Project, launched during the 2004 academic year, sought to engage students in civic life through a multifaceted approach: a New York Times reading program; a New Voters Project; Constitution Day; and selected readings and presentations on democracy in the United States.

The program was instituted on campus by Chancellor Ann Lydecker and continues with solid support from Chancellor Don Betz, who was among the founding members of the ADP national movement several years ago.

First chairing the collaboration that pulled many campus projects under the ADP umbrella was College of Arts and Sciences Dean Terry Brown, who this year handed off the program to two co-chairs: political science Professor Tracey Gladstone-Sovell and journalism Professor Colleen Callahan.

Brown notes that the tenets of an institution like UW-RF extend back to the birth of democracy as a civic movement as described by John Dewey, one of the most significant educational philosophers of the 20th century.

The key objective, Brown said, is to ensure students, educated with taxpayers’ dollars, appreciate their obligations to society. “We want them to be morally responsible for their actions and good stewards of our nation. We are trying to accomplish that in a non-partisan way, and I think we’ve done a good job of that,” Brown adds.

UW-RF’s success has led to recognition in a variety of ways, including invitations to present at national conferences. The American Association of State Colleges and Universities, comprising 430 member institutions representing more than half of all students educated at public universities, cited UW-RF's New Voters Project as a "best practice" for developing citizenship.

Professor Callahan notes that extensive reading of the New York Times cuts across numerous academic disciplines. An average of 775 students are reading the renowned newspaper; last spring it was used by 14 faculty members in 21 class sections of 17 courses.

"I usually glaze over the national part of newspapers, but this course forces me to read about things going on in the world. I don't really like the way [it] is written and I like more pictures, but as a whole I have gotten a lot out of reading it."

It accomplished all three and as a result has been cited as a national model, according to Mark Kinders, public affairs director, who coordinated a campus-wide committee of students, faculty and staff.

The NVP also built an extensive Web site that explained the voting registration process of Wisconsin and Minnesota students, while also providing links to numerous non-partisan issues sites as well as to traditional political parties.

Dahlka Garden. This reflective garden on the south side of Kleinpell Fine Arts was dedicated on Oct. 16, 2004, to the memory of Dennis Dahlka, a 1977 graduate of the university. Underwriting for the project came from a $560,000 gift that Dahlka left to UW-River Falls to endow scholarships for Wisconsin students. Dahlka Garden is the only irrigated area on campus and is larger than all other campus garden areas combined. It was designed by Earthworks, a local landscaping company, and features walking paths; numerous limestone slabs; six benches shaded by Honey Locust trees; plantings of spruces, pines and native shrubs; as well as native flowers, which include Blazing Star, Black-eyed Susans, Wild Quinine, Great Cone Flower, Indian Grass, Switch Grass, and Karl Foerster Reed Grass. At the dedication ceremony, Interim Chancellor Virgil Nylander noted that "Dennis loved growing things; the gardens are a wonderful reflection of his love of nature, beauty and art." Dahlka's sister, Diane Hoag, speaking for the many family members in attendance, added: "Our family felt it was important to share Dennis' love of nature by establishing a memorial garden on campus. It is our family's desire that Dahlka Garden become a quiet place for others to relax, tread, contemplate, and appreciate the gifts that nature bestows on us." A standing sculpture and plaque were unveiled at the dedication ceremony, where 12 of Dahlka's former classmates and long-time friends laid roses to acknowledge his profound influence on their lives.

New Student Union. Ground was broken in Spring 2005 for the new $34 million center, funded by student fees, which will bring all food service under one roof and provide space for student life programming. The facility will include an entertainment complex, bookstore, bank, coffee shop, convenience store, banquet hall, theater-style meeting room and conference room. It is being built on the site of the razed Ames Building, in the heart of campus. It is designed to be a hub of campus life, where students can meet, attend meetings, study, eat and participate in activities. The building incorporates features that make it ecologically and environmentally sustainable: maximizing natural daylight, using recycled building materials, recycling construction waste, and storing rainwater for toilet fixtures. It will consume 40 percent less energy than student centers of similar type in the Upper Midwest. Construction is on schedule for a Spring 2007 opening.

George R. Field South Fork Suites. The new $11 million apartment-style residence hall, funded by student fees, was dedicated on May 9, 2005. It can house 240 students in 60, four-person suites. Each wing per floor has a community kitchen, lounge area and laundry room. The building also has several meeting rooms and a high-tech conference room. The building is named for Chancellor Emeritus George Field who led the campus for 17 years from the 1960s to the 1980s. He was an advocate for ensuring that students, as well as faculty and staff, had a voice in setting the future direction of the campus. "Placing his name on this residence hall is a wonderful way to acknowledge his commitment to students," said Interim Chancellor Nylander at the ribbon-cutting ceremony.

Hunt/Knowles Addition. Both groundbreaking for and dedication of the Hunt/Knowles Addition occurred during the 2004-05 academic year. The $2.5 million improvement to the W. H. Hunt Arena and Robert P. Knowles Physical Education and Recreation Center provides 12,300 square feet of additional space, including two new locker rooms, a new training room with 14 treatment tables, a whirlpool room, improved laundry facilities and more office space. In addition to students, many community members take advantage of the Hunt/Knowles facilities, including the Kansas City Chiefs who have made UW-River Falls their summer home for 15 years. Wisconsin Gov. Jim Doyle and numerous Chiefs personnel, including players and coaches, joined the River Falls campus and community for dedication ceremonies on Aug. 1, 2005. Gov. Doyle noted that the facility "will pay for itself many times over," and pointed out that it's "a facility that's going to help this school a lot." The project was a collaboration of funding from the state and program revenue, including Chiefs' revenues, Hunt Arena revenues, and separate student fees.

Tennis Courts. Six new tennis courts were constructed near the Knowles/Ramer Field Sports Complex in Summer 2005. Along with improvements to the Knowles Center indoor courts, the new facilities will have a tremendous impact on the women's tennis program and its ability to compete in the WIAC.

At the start of the 2004-05 academic year, Interim Chancellor Virgil Nylander addressed a gathering of faculty and staff, noting the tragic circumstances that put him at the podium and laying out the number one agenda item for the year.

"One year ago today I was sitting on this stage saying to myself, 'Next year Ann will be greeting all of you and I will be teeing off at 9 a.m. on the golf course.' Obviously it's not happening that way. We lost our beloved chancellor in an automobile accident last spring, but we will not lose our personal memories of her smile, her energy, her love of this institution…." Nylander went on to explain that a national search was already underway for a new chief executive officer. A Regents' search committee and a campus search and screen committee had been appointed and, with the assistance of a national search consultant, were assessing desired characteristics for a new chancellor, holding open forums to collect campus and community feedback, and identifying potential candidates for the position.

Chaired by Terry Brown, associate dean of the College of Arts and Sciences and professor of English, the 17-member campus/community search and screen committee conducted preliminary interviews with semi-finalists and recommended five finalists to the Board of Regents subcommittee in December 2004.

On Feb. 11, 2005, Reilly announced that Dr. Don Betz, provost and vice president for academic affairs at the University of Central Oklahoma, had been selected as the next chancellor of UW-River Falls. Betz previously held several administrative positions, including provost and vice president of academic affairs at Palmer College of Chiropractic, as well as positions at Northeastern State University in Tahlequah, Okla., including vice president of university relations, dean of continuing studies, assistant to the president, director of university relations, and executive director of the educational foundation.

In making the announcement, Reilly said: "I am confident that Dr. Don Betz's diverse background will energize UW-River Falls' faculty, staff and students; encourage continued dialogue with the River Falls community; and invigorate the campus' commitment to excellence."

In accepting Reilly's offer, Betz responded: "It is with enthusiasm and a clear sense of service that I accept the offer to join UW-River Falls and the other members of the UW System. I look forward to becoming a member of the community and university at UW-River Falls, and to building leadership teams to help students learn so that they can become productive, creative, ethical and engaged citizens."

Search committee chair Brown noted that it was Betz's combination of personal qualities, experience and skills that made him a welcome choice for the position. "Dr. Betz was warmly received by our students, faculty and staff, as well as the larger community, when he visited us during the selection process. I know that the Regents' endorsement will be greeted with great enthusiasm on campus as well as in the community and region."

Brown added: "I remember reading a comment from a session evaluation. It said, 'He'll be the engine of the campus.' I think that is a good description. From the first phone conversation through the entire search process, he impressed me as someone who is consistently principle driven. His words are integrated with his behavior. He's about walking the talk. There is no disconnect between what he says and what he does."

"Students represent the greatest hope that we have for Wisconsin, for our communities and for our country," said Betz. "The best investment we can make is in people, and I am thoroughly convinced that Wisconsin students are poised to make an incredible difference."

"UW-River Falls has a great future. I hope to meet with every stakeholder--on and off-campus--and we will continue to be involved in regional development. There is definitely a connection between quality of education and quality of life."

As interim chancellor, my reflections, both personal and professional, are shaped by my 30+ years at this university in the roles of teacher, adviser, administrator and community member. I don’t recall many years that have matched ’03-’04 in the challenges we’ve faced: budget reductions, a racial incident, and, of course, the loss of Chancellor Ann Lydecker. These challenges required a range of responses—from thoughtful, analytical decision making to empathic, supportive grieving and healing. I am so proud of the way students, staff, faculty, alumni, and the River Falls community truly “came together.” People publicly attested to the value of a UW-River Falls education. University departments and units addressed hard budget decisions. Community and campus members shared sorrows as well as developed strategies for a very positive future.

Through pre-college programs, nationally recognized diversity initiatives, steadily growing undergraduate research programs, engaging co-curricular activities, and meaningful service projects, UW-River Falls continues to open doors for all students. Doors are open between campus and community, too. We held community forums and regional conferences on issues such as health care, the digital divide, workforce development and the arts. These illustrate only some of our community, regional and state partnerships which work to everyone’s benefit.

It has been my pleasure this year to work with so many people who are committed to the higher education values UW-River Falls represents. We rarely quote Greek philosophers these days, but Demosthenes was on the mark when he said, “Small opportunities are often the beginning of great enterprises.” Opportunities here are not small; they are many and significant. Most important, this university is a great and growing enterprise that enriches the lives of people and the quality of the St. Croix Valley.

To be bold…to be strong…to be forward looking. These were the challenges facing the campus in 2003-04. Coping with heartache over the loss of a chancellor, combating the ignorance of racial bigotry, and problem-solving the choices required by reduced funding, the people of UW-River Falls found a well of strength and determination to advance the university in trying times.

On the early morning of March 25, 2004, Chancellor Lydecker set off on a drive to UW-Platteville to deliver a talk to students on “Breaking the Glass Ceiling.” Less than 10 miles from River Falls, she missed a stop sign and was broadsided by another vehicle. Help arrived immediately, but Ann was gone. Over the next several weeks, the stunned campus mourned her passing, continued to address student needs, moved forward on a variety of initiatives, and transitioned to new leadership.

The memorial service included brief remarks by state leaders, colleagues, the student senate president, and family members. In the days that followed, as condolences continued to pour in from around the country and the world, the university community took advantage of opportunities to band together for mutual support. Leadership stepped forward in many places and on a variety of levels.

Provost and Vice Chancellor for Academic Affairs Ginny Coombs served as interim chancellor through the remainder of the semester and then returned to her previous duties. On June 1, 2004, Virgil Nylander, recently retired Vice Chancellor for Administration and Finance, returned to campus to serve as interim chancellor throughout the search process for a new chancellor. Mary Halada, who had been serving as interim Vice Chancellor for Administration Finance, assumed those duties on a permanent basis.

Chancellor Lydecker had been chancellor of UW-RF for nearly four years at the time of her death. She had been an educator throughout her career, moving from fourth grade teaching in Ohio to faculty positions at Minnesota universities to university administrative positions in Massachusetts and finally at UW-RF.

A single mom raising two young boys, she earned master’s and doctoral degrees as a non-traditional student and working parent. Upon arrival, UW-RF students found her approachable and accessible. She greeted them by name, remembered their interests, mentored their growth and development. She fell in love with this university and worked tirelessly to advance its mission. She especially sought to broaden the reach of the school, to improve its service to the region through partnership and collaboration. She nurtured a personality, shaped by life experiences, that exuded strength and determination, optimism and forward thinking, openness and empathy, warmth and compassion. Her imprint on the university is expansive and deep.

In the wake of her death, on March 30, roughly 1,000 students, faculty, staff and friends of the university gathered to speak out against intolerance and hatred. Hours earlier, African American junior Mark James walked the most visible areas of campus for three hours straight. It was his way of expressing defiance in the face of the threat. Uniformed security officers stood at building entrances.

The campus child center doors stood locked and guarded, only to be opened by volunteers as parents and children arrived. Campus maintenance staff refrained from working on roofs so as not to startle those walking between buildings below.

It was all part of the university’s two-pronged approach to dealing with the threat—to provide adequate security, and to promote a learning environment that confronted racial prejudice and addressed fears and anxieties of hurting students. On the targeted day, more than 10 campus security officers and three River Falls police officers provided an on-campus presence. Other area law enforcement agencies, including the State Patrol, were stationed throughout River Falls.

On the education front, numerous meetings were held to reassure students about security measures, and to allow students to air concerns and ask questions, to give students an emotional release during the tense events they were experiencing.

UW-River Falls has continued to respond positively and productively to the challenges posed by the budget reductions in the 2003-05 biennium. As part of the comprehensive effort to reduce Wisconsin’s deficit, UW-River Falls dealt with budget reductions of $1.5 million and a loss of 18 positions. Accounts for self-supporting programs were also reduced to enhance student financial aid.

On-going adjustments in daily operations have helped the campus respond with greater efficiency to the budget reductions. Increased automation of our financial aid process and a more decentralized student payroll system has saved time for both staff and students. Implementing an electronic student information system (eSIS) has been a significant effort that assists in the registering and advising of students.

While addressing financial issues, administrators, faculty and staff continued to advance educational opportunities at UW-RF. Faculty and staff have been very successful in obtaining external grants. A record $3.3 million from federal and state sources were garnered in 2003-04. We updated our academic facilities through classroom modernization projects. This on-going effort has resulted in 2/3 of our classrooms equipped with current teaching technology. The campus has been energized by additional facilities, including a new residence hall.

Ground was broken for South Fork Suites in the summer of 2003. This suite-style residence hall for 240 students is scheduled to open in Fall 2005, and it will provide excellent opportunities for creative and substantive residence hall programming.

These were the opportunities seized in 2003-04. Through dogged pursuit of academic interests, diverse programming, and enriching learning experiences, the people of UW-River Falls opened doors to new knowledge, committed partnerships, and life’s potential.

To work hard…to be purposeful…to celebrate success. These were the accomplishments earned in 2003-04. Students, faculty, staff, and alumni demonstrated their drive and commitment to excel—winning national awards, gaining the respect and admiration of peers, proving well-learned abilities, and giving of their expertise.

Actual headcount of students enrolled in Fall 2003. The figure represents a four percent increase over the previous year. The UW-RF student body is 61 percent female; 91 percent are pursuing undergraduate degrees. A total of 346 students of color enrolled in Fall 2003. The figure represents an 80 percent increase over the 1998 number. International student enrollment more than doubled during the past five years.

Number of UW-RF seniors reporting participation in co-curricular activities such as student organizations, publications, government, sports, etc. The figure compares favorably to the national average of 48.3 percent. In addition, UW-RF seniors surpassed their peers nationwide through participation in practicums, internships, field experiences and clinical assignments. They were on a par with their peers nationwide with respect to involvement in community service and volunteer work.

Percentage of UW-RF seniors who complete a culminating senior experience, such as a comprehensive exam, capstone course, thesis or project. This figure compares favorably to the national average of 34.9% and the UW System average of 23%. As part of its general education program, UW-RF requires capstone courses in the humanities and fine arts, social and behavioral sciences, and basic sciences.

Upward Bound is one of three programs designed specifically to target students of color. A similar program is in place at Vincent High School in Milwaukee, where 93 percent are students of color. Coordinated through the Milwaukee Private Industry Council and initiated in 2000, students there work on environmental science issues with high school faculty and the UW-RF College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences.

The UW-River Falls Upward Bound program assists high school students with their academic skills, helps them identify career interests, leads them through college exploration, and prepares them to take the ACT. Founded in 1999, the program consists of afternoon sessions at Arlington High School in St. Paul, Minn., and summer workshops on campus. Key goals of the program are high school graduation; successful college placement, retention and graduation; academic success and effective career advising; social and cultural enrichment; English language assistance; and achievement in math, science, and language skills.

UW-River Falls seeks to develop and maintain a diverse, inclusive and supportive campus climate by increasing the number of multicultural students attending the university. Significant progress has been achieved in the past five years.

Market research reveals an opportunity to serve both undergraduate and graduate level non-traditional students in the region. Several new undergraduate certificate programs have been introduced to address that need. In addition, a redesigned Master of Science in Education program and a new Master of Management degree have enhanced offerings for non-traditional age graduate students pursuing professional advancement.

Professor Janna Cowen has taught economics courses at the university for 25 years and was selected from among 12,000 faculty in the University of Wisconsin System to receive the Regents Teaching Award this past September. Faculty, students and alumni wrote many letters of support, referring to her ability to present information clearly, her open-door policy of advising and mentoring students, and her penchant for remembering students long after they have graduated.

Jennifer Brantley, an assistant professor in the English department, joined the faculty eight years ago and received the 2003 Distinguished Teacher award from UW-River Falls in April. She teaches writing and serves as adviser to Prologue, the campus literary magazine. She brought the national journal Literary Magazine Review to campus and is its editor.

Distinguished Teacher in April of 2002. He teaches juniors and seniors and serves as an adviser to some 50 undergraduates. He also coaches the dairy cattle judging team and is a co-adviser to the undergraduate dairy club.

Students receive expert advising from faculty and staff in order to achieve their degree goals in a timely manner. Most degree programs at UW-RF require a minimum of 120 credit hours. Some majors require a higher minimum.

UW-River Falls undertakes to gauge student success. Retention rates (measuring the percentage of students returning for their sophomore year) are influenced by a variety of factors and offer an incomplete picture of student success.

Choosing a major at UW-River Falls involves a lot more than a roll of the dice. Each year, the Academic Success Center successfully guides pre-major and undeclared students into a degree program, saving students time and money on their way to graduation. Figures indicate that the ASC leads more than 80 percent of students into declared status by the beginning of their sophomore year and more than 90 percent by the beginning of their junior year.

Growing numbers of UW-RF students are working with faculty on undergraduate research projects. The activities foster learning and personal growth for both students and faculty. The campus sponsors a Research, Scholarly and Creative Activity Day each fall and spring to focus attention on the projects.

Career Services professionals work closely with faculty and instructional staff to assist students in their job search. In addition to career counseling and numerous informational workshops, the office routinely surveys students to gauge the effectiveness of its services.

UW-River Falls College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences and farmers in several developing countries are providing opportunities for UW-RF students to work and study abroad in the short term.

In addition, the seeds were planted this past year for a group of students to visit China in the spring of 2004 to help Tibetan farmers in Yunnan province improve the quality of yak milk and learn the basics of cheese-making.

Dairy Science Professor Dennis Cooper said that seeing a microcosm of this chain in Romania has helped him better understand the parts that make up the whole macrocosm of dairy operations in the United States. This lesson is one that translates well in the classroom.

Ranee May, dairy plant manager at UW-River Falls, has brought people from several countries to River Falls over the past 20 years to learn the basics of making cheese. This past year she met with UW-RF Distinguished Alumnus and conservationist Wong How Man to discuss taking a group of students and her knowledge of milk production to Zhongdian, China. She is currently developing specifications for a farmstead facility that will be built there in the next few months. The students will work with local farmers to examine the processes for producing high-quality yak milk that could eventually be made into cheese and sold throughout China.

Diversity Award in 2003 in recognition of its innovative practices to promote diversity on campus. The university was cited for its comprehensive package of initiatives designed to encourage students of color to enroll at UW-RF, to support them academically and personally while enrolled, and to prepare them for success upon graduation.

International Student Enrollment In spite of the challenges emerging from post-9/11 international travel restrictions and increased non-resident tuition, UW-River Falls continues to demonstrate success in the recruitment of international students from around the globe. The presence of these students on campus fosters a more distinctive learning environment.

Stower asked UW-RF for expertise in sorting through more than 20 challenges and opportunities facing the city. Staff from the College of Business and Economics and Outreach and Graduate Studies helped the city prioritize issues and identify stakeholders who could adopt the projects.

UW-RF values its business linkages, too. 2003 brought the electronic newsletter BizNews to local business and industry, providing information on university programs and services tailored to the private sector. In addition to providing well-prepared graduates, CBE, OGS, and the Small Business Development Center offer lifelong learning resources and consultation for small business.

Graduate Studies, the 16- year-old program presents several four-session classes each fall and spring. Program members receive discounted class fees as well as invitations to special events such as field trips, an annual luncheon and other outings. A typical class meets two hours, once a week for four weeks, and includes lecture, discussion, refreshment break and social time.

UW-River Falls has developed eight certificate programs to address specific skill needs of working adults in the region. Three of the programs were added this past year. The Office of Outreach and Graduate Studies continually measures market demand and responds with appropriate educational offerings.

Such bricks-and-mortar projects are visible hallmarks of investment in the university by students and others. Less visible but as important are investments by alumni, faculty, staff, and friends for scholarships and grants to keep the university at the forefront of learning.

Retired librarian Annette Blanchette has established a scholarship in memory of Sally Margis, an assistant to former Chancellor Gary Thibodeau. The first of its kind, the scholarship provides professional education and career development for staff.

UW-River Falls optimizes the availability of resources for students, providing prudent distribution of loans, careful advising, and regular status checking. The university has the lowest loan default rate in the UW System.

UW-River Falls will be better prepared to fulfill its academic and service mission through ongoing building improvements. Students are investing in the future of UW-River Falls by funding a new residence hall and student center. A combination of state dollars and private gifts is providing monies for other significant projects.

UW-River Falls continues to generate increased revenues from external sources by securing federal, state, and local grants from public and private organizations for a wide variety of research initiatives.

Completion of these labs was integral in the move of CBE to its new home in South Hall. Labs include an open access lab, a teaching lab, a computer lab for faculty-directed student research, and a computer networking lab.

Today, more than 5,800 students and 600 faculty and staff members are working hard, turning those gifts into the reality of a changed future for students and the institution. The Foundation knows that through your gift a student may go on to develop new ways to treat a major disease, find a new way to teach a child, write the next best selling novel or develop a new technique in agriculture. Your gift paves the way for students to explore new opportunities and expand their horizons. You help UW-RF provide the best education possible. For allowing us to progress, we are thankful and continue to depend on your help in training the next generation of leaders.

Come visit us on campus and meet the next generation of pioneers; they are in every corridor and every classroom. It is an atmosphere, charged with energy and ideas, that attracts the finest faculty and students to the challenges of our region, state, nation and world.

Membership in this elite group symbolizes a minimum gift of $10,000 or cumulative giving of at least $25,000. Distinguished University Benefactor status is open to individuals, corporations and foundations. Both unrestricted and restricted gifts are eligible. Matching gifts from an employer may also count toward the cumulative total for individual membership.

The Heritage Society recognizes those individuals who have made arrangements for a deferred gift to the university through estate planning. These thoughtful gift arrangements provide a legacy to the university that will allow it to continue its fine tradition of excellence.

Memorial gifts are a very private form of giving and the amount remains confidential. Notification to the family of the deceased, or to the person being honored, is handled in the same way, regardless of the size of the gift. The donors listed below have made gifts in honor of or in memory of a friend or loved one.

Wisconsin-River Falls. Despite our many challenges this year—both at the national level with the tragedy of September 11 and at the state level with our budgetary shortfalls—our students, faculty and staff had many superb accomplishments.

Our undergraduate and graduate students, whether in agriculture, business, education or the arts and sciences, continue the long tradition of unselfish service to the community, the region, the state, and the nation.

Three particular programs merit mention. Graduates of our growing interdisciplinary biotechnology program benefit from strong internships and student research as they enroll in graduate school and launch their careers in the biotech field (see story on page 6).

Students studying computer science and information systems complete “hands-on,” real-world projects in their programs. The newly approved theatre major provides access to creative venues across the nation, but especially within the thriving Twin Cities theatre community.

As I enter my third year as Chancellor, I look forward to continuing to develop partnerships throughout the St. Croix Valley region—with K-12, technical colleges, other UW institutions, businesses, non-governmental organizations, community groups, and government agencies—while still maintaining the excellent undergraduate and graduate programs for which we are known. We welcome the opportunity to reach out and connect with the residents of west central Wisconsin.

I invite you to read this report thoroughly, focusing particularly on how this university touches the greater UW-RF community, review our Web site—www.uwrf.edu— regularly to learn of new initiatives, and stay in contact.

Have the promises of information technology come to pass since the electronic information revolution began two decades ago? Have classrooms been transformed? Has it really changed the way students learn and teachers teach? Yes, but often in unanticipated ways.

A junior majoring in English - Secondary Education, She says her most rewarding experience has been teaching students and faculty in the Hudson, Wisconsin school district how to produce digital video productions using software called iMovie.

Being a member of the TLC allows students to get a head start on their teaching experience. Part of the process requires that the cadre undergo extensive reflection on their teaching method and make suggestions as to how to improve. The effort is to have pre-teachers better prepared to meet the challenges of the classrooms they will be leading after they become certified to teach.

Senior Credence Johnson operates two computer workstations, not unlike a master chess player challenging two opponents. She is monitoring Geographic Information System (GIS) software programs as they calculate data related to an elevation model of the upper St. Croix River Valley.

They want a tool that will easily determine the visibility of man-made structures, such as cell towers, throughout the valley before they are constructed. Johnson is establishing the information they will need.

GIS is a tool to manage, analyze, and display information about areas of the earth. The art and science of map making combined with GIS have transformed the classroom. He says that more than ten years ago Johnson’s project would have taken numerous students an entire semester to achieve the same results.

Such research would probably not be considered without a proposed construction project driving a need. Today, GIS allows students to collect information that results in products that answer questions not yet asked or considered. Land use policies can be created based on this information and developers can be forewarned of roadblocks to their projects before making proposals.

But the real power of GIS is its ability to combine data from other projects into one source of information. For example, Johnson’s sight line data can easily be integrated with another student’s data regarding the nesting locations of bald eagles along the same river way.

Rader prepares new lesson plans each semester to accommodate newly-discovered features and software upgrades. Some students come to class wanting to know only the specifics of today’s GIS software. However, Rader says, that isn’t useful considering how often the technology changes. Years ago, map making was about acquiring the skills of an artisan. Rader recalls an era of opaquing pens, film and registration marks. GIS is the information technology that has changed the way educators approach geography. “Now, I need to be a coach rather than a dispenser of knowledge. I have to get students to think expansively,” Rader concludes.

Bergland says the days of rote memorization of facts and long classroom lectures are becoming ineffective to a student body that is immersed in information technology in and out of the classroom. His software, called Case It, is self-described as “Case-based learning in molecular biology using interactive computer simulations.” Biology 101 students use Case It to analyze human DNA sequences. The software allows participants to play three roles, that of a lab technician, a family member whose DNA is being analyzed, and a genetics counselor. University biology professors Karen Klyczek, Kim Mogen and Douglas Johnson contributed to creating real life scenarios for the software.

The software features discussion groups and student-authored Web pages as tools for critical thinking. Bergland believes his software bodes well for students of today’s role-playing video game culture.

Lundeberg is also instrumental in bringing information and instructional technology to the profession of teaching. “We need to teach students how to think, how to evaluate active learning,” she says. PowerPoint, iMovie, Web pages and electronic discussion boards are tools that K-12 and post secondary educators can utilize for effective teaching.

But who teaches the teachers how to use these tools? University students aspiring to be teachers do by teaching professors and fellow pre-service teachers how to use technology in the classroom. They are referred to as the Technology Leadership Cadre or TLC. Establishment of the TLC is one component of a U. S. Department of Education grant known as PT3–Preparing Tomorrow’s Teachers to Use Technology.

Faculty members across campus have access to PT3 grant dollars for information technology projects as well. Lundeberg, the PT3 grant director, says that faculty members who were skeptical of technology’s usefulness in the classroom changed their minds after implementing a project through the grant.

Information technology has a way of getting people to more effectively participate in group related projects. “In my classes, 20% of a student’s grade is based on participation,” says Tracey Gladstone-Sovell, professor of political science. Gladstone-Sovell was a pioneer at integrating electronic discussion forums into her courses. “In the early days there were just newsgroups and the Web and that was interesting because everybody had access to content,” says Gladstone-Sovell. She refers to a time when people not even remotely related to her class had access to her course content because most of the forums were public. For a pre-law class she was teaching, Gladstone-Sovell recalls how she posted a sample legal brief online.

Not long after, a former student sitting in a law class in South Dakota noticed a printed copy of it in the hands of a classmate who was using it to formulate a debate with his professor. University faculty can now maintain access-restricted learning environments with such courseware as Blackboard and Web CT. These programs feature discussion boards and drop boxes where students can simply place their finished assignments.

Gladstone-Sovell says that courseware gives students who have an aversion for speaking up in class another outlet to express their opinion. In this instance, IT places students ideas on equal footing regardless of their oratory skills.

In addition, today’s faculty can place examples of materials discussed in class on the courseware network. Long after any library is closed a student may access class-related content, “as they tend to do at 2 a.m.,” says Gladstone-Sovell.

Seniors majoring in political science are expected to give a presentation to their faculty and classmates. They all use PowerPoint without much resistance. Gladstone says such software helps students organize their presentations and it keeps the audience engaged. She also notes that grading and general course management is easier today than it was prior to this era. “I don’t know how I did my dissertation without a computer,” she says with a laugh, realizing how much has changed.

Joe Zalusky looked every bit the confident professional as he explained the intricacies of enzyme-linked immuno sorbent assay testing on corn samples. But the 2000 UW-River Falls graduate, who majored in biology and minored in chemistry, allowed later that he was just a little bit nervous during his presentation at BioDiagnostics, Inc., in River Falls. On an August morning he turned lecturer for an exclusive audience of two: Wisconsin Lt. Gov. Margaret Farrow and Secretary Jim Harsdorf of the Wisconsin Department of Agriculture, Trade and Consumer Protection.

Gov. Scott McCallum accompanied by five other departmental secretaries to learn more about western Wisconsin's initiatives to lure and expand high tech industries and their associated higher payrolls.

McCallum’s tour is the latest step in state-wide efforts to reverse a long-term trend that shows Wisconsin seriously lagging behind the nation in per capita income. By comparison, Minnesota, with a population smaller than Wisconsin’s, generates an additional $20 billion in income each year.

Zalusky has worked as a laboratory analyst at the River Falls biotechnology company, testing corn and soybeans for genetic purity or contamination by genetically modified organisms. Among his past assignments, he coordinated BioDiagnostics’ testing activities last year that contributed to a major international product recall when he investigated corn supplies for the presence of genetic traits that would indicate the corn was not intended for human consumption. That corn, which was inadvertently contaminated through cross-pollination from another hybrid, was suspected of having found its way into hundreds of pro-cessed foods sold to restaurants and consumers.

BioDiagnostics, started in the basement of the home of Quentin and Marilyn Schultz just seven years ago, now with the help of UW-River Falls and other government and economic development collaborators, has surged ahead to become the second largest seed testing company in the nation.

Since moving to its new plant in the community’s high tech industrial park, business has tripled. It engages in over 100 tests in corn, soybeans, sunflower seeds, and canola seeds. Its customers come from throughout the Midwest, but it also routinely samples for customers from Europe and Japan.

High demand for science graduates Biotechnology program manager and chemistry professor Mike Keenan says all science graduates from UW-RF are in high demand, not only at agriculture biotechnology companies like BioDiagnostics, but at leading pharmaceutical and medical industry corporations such as DiaSorin, 3M, Protein Design Labs, Gentra Systems, Inc., and the Mayo Clinics.

Biotechnology associate professor Lisa Kroutil adds that the university has listened closely to what industry leaders have been telling it. “They want students who are broadly educated; who are able to communicate both in written form and verbally. We make sure that our students take writing-intensive courses in the sciences and liberal arts. We have our students participate in problem-based laboratory case studies that reinforce their critical thinking skills.

As the reputation of UW-RF’s sciences strengths and the university's success in economic development initiatives have grown in Madison, so have expectations for its contribution to boosting Wisconsin's economy.

These include designation by the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents as a Center of Excellence in undergraduate education in chemistry and physics that supports training of nearly a thousand science majors; a legislative mandate to expand the number of students and faculty in the 14-year-old interdisciplinary biotechnology major; and partnering in the designation of six western Wisconsin counties as a Technology Zone, providing $5 million in tax incentives to attract or expand biotechnology and other high technology industries.

Creating a technology corridor On the horizon are more great expectations: grant funding for UW-RF to partner with the River Falls Economic Development Corp. to study the feasibility of a biotech incubator program in the industrial park. Another initiative is an applied research grant to biology professor Brad Mogen to work with BioDiagnostics to incorporate DNA technology to demonstrate the lineage of soybeans. Mogen’s grant came directly from the Wisconsin legislature because of its potential to show an immediate pay-off by boosting Wisconsin’s economy by breaking new ground in developing protocols to detect the maturity and properties of hundreds of soybean lines.

As biotechnology continues to improve the quality of life by engineering successes in agriculture, medicine and the environment, Interim Dean Steve Ridley of the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences, thinks UW-RF interns and graduates will bring the right balance of science and ethical training to bear.

Lydecker hosted a luncheon for biotechnology industry executives and researchers, a senior administrator noted his major corporation doesn’t hire “gene jockeys.” Instead, he and the other corporate and small business leaders stressed the need for graduates who are well-trained in the sciences with a liberal arts base. “We want employees who are scientifically astute and who know how to learn,” the executive related.

A case study for that solid training is BioDiagnostics’ Joe Zalusky. “In college I didn’t focus on plants,” Zalusky says. “But with broad training, I found that the science is somewhat the same on the molecular level, so I was able to adapt.” He continued, “I like working here very much. It’s the first job I got in the sciences after I graduated and there are great opportunities for advancement. When I talk to Quentin, he knows my name; yet when I interviewed at larger corporations it was with the human resources people, and that was different. I’m being challenged intellectually, and there are many opportunities here,” Zalusky concludes.

Program results in job promotion for student It was a little lonely at graduation, being the only person to receive the master of management degree from UW-River Falls at spring commencement 2002. But Caroline (Carrie) Fisher was first in what is sure to be a steady stream of master’s degree candidates who achieve that goal.

Management program offers 11 courses to develop competencies in the following areas: decision-making, leadership, information management, strategic planning and marketing, project management, communications, and budgeting. It is the first program in the University of Wisconsin System to receive Board approval for service-based pricing.

Also housed within the college are three centers—the Center for Economic Research, the Center for Economic Education, and the Small Business Development Center. Dean Barbara Nemecek has completed her first year as dean of the new college and marks another new beginning as the college takes up residency in historic South Hall. The new location, along with new and developing outreach programs including professional certification programs will enhance the college’s offerings, making it a stronger resource for the regional business community.

Fisher works in the utilities office for the City of River Falls, and while she was taking classes, her office was in a state of transition. A lot of changes in office structure and management necessitated a large amount of retraining for staff. Fisher felt that it would have been difficult to make the transition without the knowledge gained from her classes. And, as a result of her course work and degree, she received a promotion to a management position.

Professors offer real world experience Originally from Ellsworth, Wis., Fisher chose to pursue her undergraduate degree in elementary education at the University of Wisconsin-Milwaukee but soon lost her enthusiasm for that plan. The large school and big city weren’t for her. She also found that many of her undergraduate professors taught conflicting philosophies. In the master of management program at UW-River Falls, that definitely was not the case. “My professors were really focused and up-to-speed with what was going on in the real world [and with] the philosophy you would read about in industry magazines and in management—I was really impressed,” she noted.

And, if the program meets the needs of employers, they’re going to be a lot more flexible with time and more willing to let employees attend. Fisher’s bosses, both the one before and the one after the transition in her office, were very supportive of her efforts.

In addition to the dedication and willingness of faculty to accommodate the students, Fisher related that one of the highlights of her experience was having UW-RF Chancellor Ann Lydecker address their leadership class. She shared personal experiences in setting and achieving career goals and provided motivation.

Potts also was particularly pleased with the way the program has been staffed. The faculty in the program hold doctoral degrees, and all of them have significant experience in industry. When you combine these two factors, you have faculty who are well qualified academically and who have the right attitude toward the program as well.

One unexpected benefit of the program expressed by both Fisher and Potts was the interaction and development of personal relationships among the students. Sitting in the classroom and discussing problems and exploring possible solutions was of great importance. Many students came to class with their own areas of expertise and the instructor was able to guide the discussions so that students learned from each other’s experiences.

Fisher felt that many of her fellow students were experts in their particular fields and she made a lot of valuable contacts. According to Potts, students almost always mention how great it is to have other people from the business community going through the same things they are. Students know and trust each other, and support each other, while faculty facilitate the exchanges.

Student's busy life style considered When asked what her greatest obstacle was, Fisher had to say that it was her schedule and “getting into the swing of things.” Trying to find the balance between family and school was a challenge. Luckily, her professors accommodated students and their varied schedules. Many students worked in the cities until 5 p.m. and it was sometimes hard for them to get to class by 5:30. Fisher did have the advantage of working near the university, so getting to class on time wasn’t as hard for her. But everyone has family obligations—her 13-year-old daughter Ashley might have a band concert the same night that her husband, Eric, would be working the night shift as a police officer in Roberts. Fisher said her last semester “was kind of a blur,” which included moving from Hudson to Roberts, building a new house, graduating from school, and switching the kids, including 9-year-old Krysta and 6-year-old David, around in their schools. She did get pretty organized at home while she was attending classes, but laughingly admitted “it has kind of fallen apart now.” And she claims that good family support from moms and sisters was a factor in getting everything done. She worked full-time and took 8-9 credits each semester—including summer. It’s not a regimen she would recommend.

Fisher is fairly typical of the students who are enrolled in the master of management degree program, though. According to Potts, most students are between the ages of 30 and 35 and working in industry.

Half have their degrees in an area of business, while the other half might hold degrees in anything from medicine to human resources to elementary education, with almost all working in business. Most take one or two classes at a time, but can finish in five terms if they take two to three courses each term. There are only one or two students who aren’t employed and are full-time students.

The majority of students live in Wisconsin but work in Minnesota. Potts said they expected to see a lot more students from Stillwater and Woodbury since UW-RF gets a lot of undergraduates from those areas, but graduate students initially have been from the Hudson and River Falls area. The program currently has more than 100 students enrolled.

Plans are underway to identify a smaller basic core of courses to allow students the opportunity to choose some elective classes. The college is also exploring the possibility of providing on-line undergraduate foundation courses which are required for the program and are currently available on-line from other institutions. As development of the program progresses, excitement grows. According to Potts, the program has not only met but exceeded all expectations. “We were enthusiastic at the beginning, and now it seems we have ‘hit the nail right on the head,’” he said.

Students can meet foundation requirements in finance, accounting and statistics by taking undergraduate courses in those areas while starting their graduate courses in communication or leadership areas. They may also receive credit for prior learning by documenting their expertise in these areas or passing competency tests.

Across the table from Woodworth sit Ricardo and Romualdo, two of the farm’s Hispanic workers. They have been working on the farm from 3 a.m. to 11 a.m., and now they have come for a lesson in English. After that, they will go back to the barn for three to five more hours of work.

Ricardo and Romualdo are learning to speak English through the Workplace English as a Second Language program offered by the University of Wisconsin-River Falls. Woodworth is a recent graduate of the program who is gaining field experience at the farm. Her work and that of others like her is making a difference in peoples’ lives, opening channels of communication between employers and their non-English-speaking employees.

Labor shortage lures workers from other nations At a time when there is a serious labor shortage in Wisconsin and the Midwest, particularly in agriculture, workers are being lured from other countries in increasing numbers. Wisconsin’s workforce numbers, despite the recent economic turn-down, are clear. Men and women are fully employed with no unemployed margin of potential workers of any consequence. Meantime, as the Baby Boom generation begins to retire and leave the workforce over the next decade, there will only be a marginal increase in young people projected to replace them. The bottom line is that Wisconsin is heading toward a chronic labor shortage in the next decade.

One state-wide priority solution is to recruit more immigrant workers from other nations. A substantial portion of them must learn the English language so they can become acculturated and the businesses they work for can operate efficiently. Cathy and other UW-RF students like her are contributing to the Wisconsin economy by teaching English to these workers.

Though census figures are not yet available, experts estimate that approximately 10 percent of the cows in Wisconsin are milked by non-English speaking people, and they are concentrated mostly in the southeastern part of the state. Because the workers don’t speak English, they don’t comprehend directions for operating equipment, and they don’t always understand what is expected of them.

Dairy producers influence ESL program Assistant Dean Terry Brown, College of Arts and Sciences, said the Workplace ESL program was developed to meet requests from area dairy producers for help teaching English to their workers. The result was the Dairy Workers ESL project, a collaborative effort involving the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences, the College of Arts and Sciences and the Outreach office. The ESL project trains tutors to teach English as a second language, then places them with participating farms or other businesses to tutor the non-English speaking workers.

The classes will originate on campus and will be broadcast to three locations in Wisconsin, incluing Barron High School in Barron, Waukesha County Technical College in Pewaukee, and a site near Medford. We hope to attract tutors from around the state through county extension agents, who will also help the tutors find businesses to work with,” she said.

TESOL program last year. He expects about the same number again in 2002. Outreach program manager Katrina Larsen said the goal for the ESL program is 30 graduates per year as the program broadens from a summers-only to a year-round offering.

Woodworth said one of the strategies she learned from the ESL tutoring class was to use activities, such as flash cards and photographs, so she was not just talking to the students all of the time. “I try to keep it fun,” she said, “so they will come back to class! I was also taught to use only English when teaching the English language. I try to do that, and use my Spanish with the workers outside of class.

Recognition and appreciation Being appreciated is important to Hispanic workers, and it is especially magnified for those who are a long way from home. The management at Son-Bow Farms expresses its appreciation for its workers with a large sign in the entry that reads, “Our People are the Difference,” along with a photo of each employee.

Hispanic workers at the farm are paid the same as other workers, and some of them send money to their families back home. Others have brought their families with them. Some have children who were born in the United States and they are in school.

As Jacquie gazed at the black and white print she had just developed in the darkroom, the nearly six weeks of effort in Centennial Science Hall’s biotechnology lab came into focus. The weeks of reading and study, the weeks of tutelage and discussion, the weeks of mastering laboratory technique were finally paying off. She would have data to analyze—new information to add to the body of knowledge surrounding DNA structure and its influences on mutation rates. Knowledge that could help clinical researchers in their pursuit of the causes of such genetic neurological diseases as Huntington’s Disease and Fragile X Syndrome. Senior Jacqueline Kvaas, a biotechnology major, is one of several hundred undergraduates each year who collaborate with UW-RF faculty to conduct research, pursue scholarly endeavors, or participate in some kind of creative activity. The one-to-one interaction embraces every discipline, creating a unique learning experience that benefits student, teacher and the university as a whole.

Collaborative research is usually an extension of a faculty member’s scholarly interests. With the help of students, faculty are able to drive their research forward, expand its scope, subdivide it into manageable projects.

In the process of doing the research, students become important members of the team. They ask new questions, initiate ideas and make discoveries. They develop critical thinking capabilities and learn practical research techniques. It’s a mutually beneficial relationship that often begins as an informal discussion between teacher and student—as in the following cases.

Lisa Kroutil, a chemistry faculty member, has been involved in DNA fidelity studies since her days as a graduate student. When she came to UW-River Falls in the late-1990s, she quickly recruited students into her research, maintaining on average four students each summer (and as many as eight one semester). Because of the time-consuming nature of biochemistry research (the need to maintain cultures and perform lengthy experiments), she has found that full-time summer projects work the best.

From June to August, Kvaas worked full days in the biotechnology lab. She started with extensive background reading in the particular area of DNA research. That was followed by thorough training in laboratory technique from Kroutil. From there, Kroutil provided general direction, but Kvaas was pretty much on her own. “Most experiments ran overnight, so Dr. Kroutil would confirm that the experiment worked or didn’t work each morning. Then I’d start over or run more reactions.

One of the main reasons Tim Lyden joined the UW-RF biology department last year was the opportunity to pursue his research in a supportive environment where he could truly contribute to intellectual growth of undergraduate student researchers.

What he’s found at UW-RF is a highly-motivated student population anxious to tackle the rigors of complex research. One of those students was Harsh Aggarwal, a driven biology major who will graduate in just three years on his way to medical school and a career as a doctor. Aggarwal approached Lyden in pursuit of some research experience. “I found out what kind of research Dr. Lyden was doing through class and thought it was interesting. He was also looking for a student researcher,” recalls Aggarwal of an inquiry made during fall semester 2001. The research involved developmental cell biology of the human placenta. For three hours a day, three days a week, Aggarwal conducted experiments— sectioning tissue, doing cell culture work, adding antibodies to perform immuno-labeling.

He then spent much of January’s J-Term analyzing the data, writing up the results and preparing the poster he presented at the university’s Research, Scholarly and Creative Activity Day as well as at the National Council for Undergraduate Research meeting held at UW-Whitewater later in the spring.

Being able to pay students is another critical aspect when they are trying to decide whether to spend time in the lab (or library or studio) or at a job that keeps them from going further in debt. Some faculty have been fortunate enough to receive outside grants to fund their research. Some grant money is available through the UW-RF Foundation for faculty projects (including ones involving collaborative research) and this year the Foundation established a new $10,000 annual program specifically earmarked for undergraduate research. Often, students will become involved with projects in return for credits toward their degree, as was the case for both Kvaas and Aggarwal.

For faculty, the benefits of one-to-one work with students are priceless. “Apart from the practical benefit that a student helps you progress with your research,” argues Lyden, “there’s a serious benefit to being exposed to a student’s thinking. It’s easy to become absorbed in your own thought processes. But students make you double-check your own thinking.

For the university, a strong undergraduate research program is a quality marker, says Provost Coombs. “It’s an excellent indication that we are not limited to one educational model, that opportunities for learning at UW-RF are wide ranging.” In addition, says Kroutil, the university gains a lot of exposure—at professional meetings and conferences, and among employers who hire our well-trained graduates. “Our students become ambassadors for UW-RF in the workforce,” notes Kroutil.

There’s an old saying in the community of scholars that goes something like this: “If you don’t present it, it ain’t research.” So, going public with your results is every bit as important as conducting experiments, analyzing data and writing reports. For faculty and students involved in collaborative research at UW-RF, that often means a poster presentation—summarizing your project in words and images on a large, printed poster. The poster is then displayed and explained…for a class, at a conference, or during a featured event like UW-RF’s annual Research, Scholarly and Creative Activity Day. With the addition of a large-format color printer on campus this past year, student posters have taken on a more professional appearance, drawing raves at professional conferences around the United States, including the National Council on Undergraduate Research held at UW-Whitewater in April 2002.

More and more professional organizations are recognizing the value of undergraduate student-faculty research. At the 2002 Experimental Biology conference in New Orleans, nearly 80 student teams presented their projects for the American Society for Biochemistry and Molecular Biology, including a UW-RF team mentored by chemistry assistant professor Lisa Kroutil. The poster by summer student researchers Kurt Fleschner, Clayton Carlson, and Mariah Scott won a $100 first prize. How impressive was that accomplishment? According to Kroutil, only 10 of the teams were awarded prizes. “All of the posters were well done; the competition was very intense,” she said.

What happens when 39 UW-RF students travel together to attend a national conference on undergraduate research? Well, for one thing, a lot of excitement gets generated. Then comes action—in the form of a new student organization on campus energized to support and encourage research and creative activities. The Society for Undergraduate Research, Scholarly and Creative Activities will hold an organizational meeting this September. According to Vice President Harsh Aggarwal, the group will focus on fund raising to send a strong contingent to the next NCUR meeting in Utah and look into publishing an undergraduate research journal.

As part of a federal student support services grant, UW-River Falls initiated the McNair Scholars Program in 1999. The program helps first generation college and low-income juniors and seniors realize their dream of attending graduate school and earning a doctorate in their chosen fields. For one aspect of the program student scholars complete a paid summer research internship. The program has graduated 15 students so far. Thirteen are enrolled in graduate programs at such schools as Michigan State University, the University of Massachusetts, the University of Iowa, Mayo Clinic Graduate School, and Bowling Green University.

"Is that good?" asked Jennifer Severson, a UW-River Falls graduate student and Jessica’s clinician. Jessica smiled and nodded in approval, but she didn’t say anything—because she can’t. Jessica suffers from Angleman Syndrome (AS), a rare genetic disorder leaving her unable to speak. Yet, the illness hasn’t stopped Jessica from communicating.

With the aid of a small “output device,” she is learning to select basic objects and activities that she wants. Jessica’s communication board—a small, eight-paneled sound board that holds cards with pictures of objects and simple activities— was conceptualized by Mike Harris, a faculty member in the communicative disorders department and former director of the UW-RF Speech-Language and Hearing Clinic.

Jessica’s special education teachers consulted Harris earlier this year. She would soon be moving from middle school to high school, and they needed help in creating a method by which Jessica could continue to work toward the ability to communicate with her family and friends. Now, they must help her with food, drink and routine activities such as brushing her teeth.

Though Jessica’s condition is rare—there are fewer than 5,000 documented cases of AS in North America—she’s one of thousands with a communicative disorder who have sought assistance from the university’s clinic. The faculty and clinicians at the 40-year-old facility provide therapy, consultation, and in some cases, years of treatment to people with language and hearing difficulties. Clinicians—many of whom are graduate students in the communicative disorders program—work with 45-55 clients each semester on a weekly basis. Some also work with clients during a summer clinic. They also assist about 50 people per week with diagnostic evaluations.

Assistance for all ages The clinic is a service for people with a variety of communicative problems, including cognitive disabilities (mental retardation), articulation phonology, fluency (stuttering), voice disorders that are natural or the result of cancer, and language impairments. Some clients need help with language problems caused by strokes, while others suffer from neurogenic diseases like Lou Gehrig’s disease or Parkinson’s disease. The clinic staff helps people—from toddlers to elders—who need hearing aids, as well as foreign students who need help learning to speak English.

Jessica Christenson’s case is unique. Her clinical treatment is designed especially for her. Diagnosed with AS when she was 15-months old, Jessica has attended the clinic for less than a year. Like most clients, she visits the clinic in the Wyman Education Building once a week, an hour at time, during the school year. Her family enrolled Jessica in the summer clinic. She spent one hour on Wednesdays and Thursdays each week at the clinic for most of the summer.

August therapy session, her mother, Lou, sat outside the small room and watched her daughter’s progress through a one-sided window. “She’s able to communicate some of her needs with me,” Lou said, explaining that the goal of Jessica’s work at the clinic is for her to use picture cards to tell people what she wants.

Jessica sat across the table from her clinician, Jennifer. While Harris watched from a closed-circuit television, Jennifer talked Jessica through the process of making a sandwich. Jessica, whose hearing is not affected by AS, had to select cards with pictures of bread, peanut butter, jelly and a knife printed on them.

She had to select them in the order that she needed them. If Jessica selected the wrong card, or the blank card used as a distracter, Jennifer turned away momentarily and ignored her. This technique is meant to teach Jessica that she won’t be given an object unless she selects the correct card.

As is the case with most clients, Jessica worked with the same clinician, Jennifer, since she started therapy. Jennifer is one of about 30 graduate students in the communicative disorders department. “She’s made a wonderful transition with Jennifer,” Lou said.

On-site training facility There are roughly 90 undergraduate students in the program. Additionally, more than 30 UW-RF students obtain minor degrees in communicative disorders each year. The clinic is an integral part of the communicative disorders department.

The clinic fulfills several university goals—it benefits the wider community through its service component; it offers student-centered learning experiences for majors in the program; and it strengthens collaborative relationships with other regional agencies. “It fits the university’s mission perfectly,” Harris said.

The goal of Jessica’s therapy, as well as that of the other 40-50 clients seen each semester, is to help her to be more independent, regardless of the setbacks brought on by Angelman Syndrome. “If she can get something on her own, of course that’s what we would like to have happen,” her mother said.

Many clients have visited the clinic for years. Jessica has been there only a short time, but Lou said she has seen noticeable improvements in her daughter’s communicative behavior at home. To make Jessica’s therapy more effective, Harris and the clinic staff suggested a communication board be used at the Christenson home by both Jessica and her family, including her father, Gar, and her eight-year-old brother, Griffy. Many cards can be used on the communication board at home, but Lou said because her daughter is still learning the basic technique, the family has kept it simple, opting to practice with only a few cards picturing things Jessica is interested in.

The room pulsates with energy. The names of markets and rows of numbers flash across computer screens. “It was kind of a shock to meet the real world!” says UW-River Falls student Melissa Banick, of her experiences as an intern in the Fixed Income Trading Department at Wells Fargo Institutional Brokerage in Minneapolis.

In the Corridors of Power A summer internship in the office of Gov. Scott McCallum taught UW-RF student Sara Bennett the importance of keeping up with current news. A senior from Milwaukee majoring in organizational and professional communications, Bennett said she reads an average of two newspapers a day now. Bennett worked in the Policy Office, handling letters and phone calls from constituents on topics that related mostly to agriculture, natural resources and justice. The office was fast-paced and upbeat, she said. “The experience was a great opportunity for me,” said Bennett. “I talked to people across the state and tried to help them. It was a different thing every day.

A senior from Oakdale, Minn., with a major in broad area business administration, Banick says dressing in business attire and commuting to downtown Minneapolis to work in a corporate environment has been a major life change for her, but she is loving her challenging job as a trading assistant intern.

A senior from Rutledge, Minn., Orth has a major in marketing communications and a minor in conservation. Until she conducted her internship, she wasn’t sure how marketing and conservation would fit together. She found a combination that was a happy marriage for her between work outdoors and work in the office.

Her office responsibilites involved drafting and distributing press releases, and planning for Riverfest, a Riverway celebration held jointly by three communities along the river with dozens of co-sponsors from business, industry and environmental organizations.

Medical internship accelerates learning Kristy Hammons, a second-year graduate student from Forest Lake, Minn., who is studying to be a speech and language pathologist, conducted a summer internship at Fairview Lakes Regional Medical Center in Wyoming, Minn. The experience she received dovetailed nicely with her studies as a communicative disorders major.

In her internship position, she diagnosed and treated patients with speech and language disorders on both an outpatient and inpatient basis. Her clients were afflicted with a variety of conditions, each of which was the result of a stroke, an accident or a developmental disorder.

Hammons said the internship was the second she has served; her first was for the Stillwater, Minn., School District. She also worked for a full year at the UW-RF speech clinic in the Wyman Education Building on campus.

Hammons said there was a plan in place before she began her internship. She and her university supervisor, along with a speech and language pathologist from Fairview, discussed the goals and expectations for the internship. The supervisor then followed up with on-site visits twice during the 10-week period, to see if the goals that had been set were being reached.

For Regina Schaefer, a senior from Marshfield with a major in agricultural education and a minor in animal science, an internship as a 4-H youth summer agent for Pierce County Extension was an opportunity to see what Extension was all about and to gain experience working with various groups on community events and youth activities.

Schaefer said she became aware of career options through contacts with other Extension agents she met while involved in various UW-RF activities: acting as a chaperone for the State Conference, a leadership event for 4-H youth; judging children’s projects at the Polk County Fair; and keeping stats at the State Mechanical Science Contest in Amherst.

The contacts have provided her with some excellent networking opportunities, but she said she would have to earn a master’s degree in education to qualify for most jobs in Extension. She plans to teach for awhile first.

The collaboration between students, employers and the university clearly is one that is beneficial to everyone concerned. Career counselor Croonquist points out that while universities look to employers for help in training their students, employers sometimes look to universities for their expertise, such as with small business development.

Emergency Phones - Emergency telephones are located throughout the campus. We currently have 20 Emergency Call phones on campus, often referred to as the Blue Phone. These phones have a direct link to Pierce County Sheriff's dispatch center. These phones should be utilized whenever you need help in an emergency situation or when you are in fear or needing assistance.

St. Croix Crime Stoppers  - The Crime Stoppers Reward for information is a Program aimed at reducing crime on campus by enlisting the involvement of members of the community. People who have witnessed a crime can phone in their information to 1-800-303-8477 this call is anonymous. The information, if useful, may lead to the witness receiving a monetary reward.

Community Oriented Crime Prevention - This program involves students, faculty, staff, and visitors looking out for their own welfare, as well as the welfare of others, by taking basic safety and security measures into consideration during their daily routine while they are living, working, or visiting on campus. We hope that by keeping informed through reading information provided through a variety of media resources, the local cable and WRFW radio, people will be more aware of some basic security concepts that can be utilized to protect themselves, their properties, other people and the property of the University. Crime Prevention is not the sole responsibility of the Public Safety Department or local law enforcement entity; it is the responsibility of every member of the community.

Safewalk - The Safewalk Program attempts to provide a safe, comfortable atmosphere to the students, faculty, and other staff of the University community who do not wish to walk alone on campus during the evening hours. Campus Public Safety Officers and members of Sigma Tau Gamma provide the escorts on campus. Any person requesting an escort can call The Public Safety Department at 715- 425-3133.

Residence Hall Security - Crime prevention presentations, also accompanied by brochures, maps, and other printed materials, are made available to residence hall students. The exterior doors to student residence halls are normally locked between the hours of 10:00 p.m.- 6:00 a.m. seven days a week. Access is available to students only by use of their student ID during these times. Guests from outside the building are to be escorted by their hosts in compliance with the Residence Hall contract. Students, faculty, and staff can obtain access to any residence hall with their University ID between the hours of 6 a.m.-10:00 p.m. seven days a week.

Access to Campus Facilities - During the periods of time that the university is normally in operation (this excludes most holidays), buildings and facilities are generally accessible to members of the campus community, guests, and visitors during normal business hours, Monday through Friday, and for limited designated hours on Saturdays and Sundays.

Printed Materials - Printed crime prevention brochures, posters, booklets, and information relating to motor vehicle security, bicycle security, residence hall security, escort services, and personal safety and security issues are widely distributed at crime prevention presentations and at various locations throughout the campus.

Maintenance and Security of Campus Facilities -The University maintains a very strong commitment to campus safety and security. Exterior lighting is an important part of this commitment. Motor vehicle parking lots, pedestrian walkways, and building exteriors are well lighted. Patrol officers conduct surveys of exterior lighting on campus, and reports of outages are documented and acted upon by the Facilities Management Department. A comprehensive survey of all exterior lighting is conducted each year by the campus Safety Manager, and recommendations for improvements or adjustments are forwarded to the Facilities Management Department. Members of the campus community are encouraged to report any exterior lighting deficiencies to the Public Safety Department by calling extension 715-425-3133.

Safety Officers. In addition, door and security hardware operation deficiencies are reported on a daily basis. Public Safety Officers also make note of the grounds of the campus and consult with the Grounds Department to ensure that shrubbery, trees, and other vegetation on campus have been properly trimmed. Public Safety Officers and police officers, both on foot patrol and in vehicles, patrol parking lots on campus and other public areas of the campus.

Public Safety Department maintains a close working relationship with law enforcement agencies, other area college and university police and security departments, state and federal law enforcement agencies, and all appropriate elements of the criminal justice system.

Crime Alert - When special circumstances warrant it, special printed "Crime Alerts" can be prepared and distributed, either selectively or throughout the campus, notifying employees and students of important crime related information.

Student Newspaper - The student newspaper, The Student Voice, publishes a summary of criminal incidents that have been reported to the Public Safety Department and the River Falls Police Department. This summary is prepared by members of the Student Voice staff and includes most reported activity.

The University of Wisconsin River Falls offers educational programs that promote the awareness of sexual assault, acquaintance sexual assault, sexual harassment, and sexual exploitation by a therapist and other sex offenses. All new students attend an educational session during the new student orientation program that explores these issues. Educational programs are also offered in the residence halls and on a campus wide basis.

All students, faculty and staff receive written information about sexual assault and sexual harassment annually that includes the legal definitions of these terms, national, state and campus statistics on sexual assault, a description of victim's rights, a listing of services available to victims and information on protective behaviors to prevent sexual assault and sexual harassment.

The following definitions are to be used for reporting the crimes listed in 34 CFR sec. 668.46 (previously 668.47) in accordance with the Federal Bureau of Investigation's Uniform Crime Reporting Program. The definitions for murder, robbery, aggravated assault, burglary, motor vehicle theft, weapon law violations, drug abuse violations and liquor law violations are excerpted from the Uniform Crime Reporting Handbook. The definitions of forcible and non-forcible sex offenses are excerpted from the National Incident-Based Reporting System Edition of the Uniform Crime Reporting Handbook.

A. Forcible Rape - The carnal knowledge of a person, forcibly and/or against that person's will; or not forcibly or against the person's will where the victim is incapable of giving consent because of his/her temporary or permanent mental or physical incapacity (or because of his/her youth).

B. Forcible Sodomy - Oral or anal sexual intercourse with another person, forcibly and/or against that person's will; or not forcibly against the person's will where the victim is incapable of giving consent because of his/her youth or because of his/her temporary or permanent mental or physical incapacity.

C. Sexual Assault With An Object - The use of an object or instrument to unlawfully penetrate, however slightly, the genital or anal opening of the body of another person, forcibly and/or against that person's will; or not forcibly or against the person's will where the victim is incapable of giving consent because of his/her youth or because of his/her temporary or permanent mental or physical incapacity.

D. Forcible Fondling - The touching of the private body parts of another person for the purpose of sexual gratification, forcibly and/or against that person's will; or, not forcibly or against the person's will where the victim is incapable of giving consent because of his/her youth or because of his/her temporary or permanent mental incapacity.

The Wisconsin Statutes define the serious criminal offenses of sexual assault, sexual exploitation by a therapist and sexual harassment. The following information prepared by UW System Legal Counsel provides a summary of offenses and corresponding penalties.

Sexual Assault Section 940.225 of the Wisconsin Statutes creates four degrees of sexual assault. The degrees are based upon the amount of force used by the assailant and the harm done to the victim. First, second and third degree sexual assaults are felonies; fourth degree sexual assault is a misdemeanor.

Report any incident, even if you are unsure about how to define what happened to you. You may report the incident to the Public Safety Department, Dean of Students, Counseling Center, Student Health Services, River Falls Police, a Resident Assistant, or a Resident Director. Feel free to bring a friend with you for support.

Go to a hospital emergency room as soon as possible if the assault involved a sexual penetration or other physical injuries. The victim SHOULD NOT bathe, change clothes, or do anything that might destroy physical evidence. IMMEDIATE CONTACT with another person who can lend support and assistance is an important first step after an assault has occurred.

Dean of Students Office Options through the Dean of Students Office may include disciplinary action if the offender is a student and a University policy has been violated. The Dean of Students Office will also discuss with you reporting to the Public Safety Department or River Falls Police Department. Campus and community resources available to you will be discussed.

The student disciplinary procedures outlined in UWS 17, Student Disciplinary Procedures, are used to adjudicate campus disciplinary action for sexual assault. The opportunities for students to have the person(s) of their choice present during disciplinary hearings are outlined in UWS 17. The results of disciplinary hearings are communicated to the victim. Possible campus sanctions include probation, resignation or leave for misconduct, suspension or expulsion, written reprimand, and denial of particular university privileges.

Violation of these provisions by a student may lead to the imposition of a disciplinary sanction, up to and including suspension or expulsion, under s. UWS 17.04(g) or (h), Wis. Adm. Code. University employees are also subject to disciplinary sanctions for violation of these provisions occurring on university property or the worksite or during work time, up to and including termination from employment.

Any student who engages in an activity, on campus or at an event sponsored by a center or institution or by the system, that constitutes a violation of ch. 161 is subject to non academic misconduct disciplinary sanctions, as provided by the board by rule. In determining the appropriate sanction, the board or its designee shall consider those penalties (including suspension and expulsion), that will contribute most effectively to maintaining a system environment that is free from controlled substances, as defined in s. 161.01(4).

Disciplinary sanctions are initiated and imposed in accordance with applicable procedural requirements and work rules, as set forth in Wisconsin statutes, administrative rules, faculty and academic staff policies, and collective bargaining agreements. Referral for prosecution under criminal law is also possible. Further, violations of ss. UWS 18.06(13) and 18.10, Wis.

The Uniform Controlled Substances Act, Chapter 961 of the Wisconsin Statutes, regulates controlled substances and outlines specific penalties for the violation of regulations. A first time conviction for possession of a controlled substance can result in a sentence of up to one year in prison and a fine of up to $5,000. (Sec. 961.41, Stats.) A person convicted of manufacturing a controlled substance, delivering a controlled substance, or possessing a controlled substance with the intent to manufacture or deliver, can be imprisoned for up to 30 years and fined up to $1,000,000.

It is against the law for an underage person to procure or attempt to procure an alcoholic beverage, to falsely represent his or her age for the purpose of obtaining alcohol, to enter premises licensed to sell alcohol, or to consume or possess alcohol on licensed premises. (Sec. 125.07(4), Stats.) A first time underage violator of section 125.07(4) can be fined up to $500, ordered to participate in a supervised work program, and have their driver's license suspended.

If you are interested in pursuing an accredited BSW degree, you have come to the right place. We hope you will get the information you need from your visit to this website. If you would like information about the Social Work program, please follow this link. If you have further questions, please feel free to contact Dr. Ogden Rogers, Program Director and he will either answer your questions or connect you with someone who will. Look around and feel free to contact anyone else identified in these pages who you think might be helpful to you in making the decision about whether Social Work at UW-River Falls is the right degree program for you.

Errors may be the result of changes to this Web site in May 2005 to better serve our current and prospective students, community and other lifelong learners. We are sorry for any inconvenience that this may cause you.

DetailsThis course is an overview of disorders of speech-language pathology with an emphasis on current research. The course also provides knowledge of certification, specialty recognition, licensure, contemporary professional issues and standards of ethical conduct.

DetailsA review of basic concepts in audiology and an expansion of information on anatomy and physiology and how audiological findings relate to the etiology, otologic findings, and remediation of the more common pathologies resulting in hearing loss.

DetailsThis course will explore the current research, theories, and best practices which might help practicing teachers, counselors, and administrators understand and improve our American educational system. Practicing professionals will be asked to examine their own notions of the sociology of schooling with a critical perspective. Topics such as social class, ethnic minorities, gender equity, national curriculum standards, urban education, character education, and financial reform will be introduced and examined. Current reform initiatives will also be discussed.

DetailsThis course will provide the student an overall understanding of extended learning programs primarily in public schools. The student will learn about a framework that will provide the building blocks to create an effective program to meet the needs of students in before-after-weekend and summer programs. Prerequisite: TED 730.

DetailsThis course is open to all students in the Counseling Education Program. The course will introduce students to the philosophical and ethical bases for professional school counseling, as well as consider recent developments in diversity, prevention, and advocacy consultation models. Discussions of early intervention, accountability, and program evaluation will be presented.  Pre- or Co-requisite:  COUN 610.

DetailsThis course introduces the student to a variety of theories and practices in career counseling and career development. The use of career assessments and information sources (including computerized career guidance and information systems) are discussed and practiced. Career interviewing and career counseling skills are practiced. Field observations, case studies and program development using the National Career Development Guidelines, as well as comprehensive developmental guidance models are required. Consideration is given to the career counseling and development needs of non-traditional populations.  Prerequisite:  COUN 610.

State certification standards are not identical for all areas of specialization, may vary from state to state, and may change for a given state. To ensure that standards are met, students should consult with an academic advisor in the College of Education and Professional Studies, as well as their content area adviser.

Intern teachers are licensed by the state in which they teach and are paid a partial salary by the school district. They are responsible for a partial teaching load and work closely with an established teacher for one semester. Because of this teacher-intern requirement, early and close liaison with the Director of Student Teaching is strongly recommended.

DetailsThis interdisciplinary course introduces teachers and artists in all disciplines to the theories of creativity as well as strategies for encouraging creativity in self and others. The course will include research on the creative process, the relationship between creativity and psychology, and criteria for the evaluation of creativity. Exercises and other creative activities will illustrate the theoretical material. Co-listed as SCTA and MUS 760.

DetailsThis course examines new trends in Fine Arts (art, dance, music, theatre) education. For example, course topics have included current national and state standards; new research on assessment strategies; teacher leadership issues and new technology for instruction and learning. It provides a unique opportunity for collaborative, interdisciplinary artistic activity to support professional development as an artist and teacher.

DetailsPsychology 751 focuses on the implementation of the processes and materials involved in the diagnosis of learning disabilities. Diagnostic assessment of reading, written expression, mathematics, social-behavioral, cognitive, physical-perceptual and vocational interests and skills will be implemented. Within a public shcool environment, students will administer formal (standardized) and informal tests, score tests, interpret results and write the results of assessment in report form. The interpretation and sharing of the assessment results will demonstrate reflective practice in collaboration with others. Attention will be given to special problems in assessment such as cultural diversity or learning style. The course, in conjunction with PSYC 750 serves as the assessment course sequence leading to certification in learning disabilities. Prerequisites: PSYC 750.

DetailsPsychology 756 focuses on the implementation of educational intervention of students with learning disabilities. At least one individual education program is developed and implemented in collaboration with regular and other special educators, parents and students when appropriate. Emhasis is on implementation of intervention strategies for reading, written expression, mathematics, social-behavioral, study skills and vocational interests and career concerns. Prerequisites: PSYC 750, 751, 755 or consent of the instructor.

DetailsPsychology 778 represents the terminal course in the learning disabilities certification program. The course is designed primarily to provide clinical supervised experience in working with individuals with learning disabilities. The practicum also provides opportunities to work with parents, regular education classroom teachers, community agencies and other professionals (public school personnel as well as agency employees) involved in providing services to individuals with learning disabilities. A special topic project required for the practicum is a problem-solving and conflict resolution strategy designed, and, if possible, implemented during the practicum experience. Prerequisites: PSYC 750, 751, 755 and 756.

DetailsThe course focuses on verbal and nonverbal communication theory and skills essential to building teams, managing meetings, and handling conflict in business and professional contexts. Participants will also develop skills for communicating effectively with people from diverse cultures and backgrounds.

The student has adequate professional experience in each of the business core areas. The applicant will provide the following information and meet with a Master of Management Foundation Committee to discuss the professional experience.

You may meet the foundation requirement by taking appropriate undergraduate or graduate courses at other universities. We suggest you check with us regarding application of courses before you take them. Please contact the Master of Management Director regarding these courses.

DetailsThis course explores and compares Euclidean and non-Euclidean geometries and their axiomatic bases. Euclidean, finite, hyperbolic, spherical, and Taxicab geometries will be included. The approach is designed for teachers, with an emphasis on individual and group projects, applications, and the use of technology to explore geometric ideas. Prerequisite: Consent of instructor.

DetailsThis class will: 1) provide a review of basic statistical concepts and methods; 2) provide a survey of sources for statistical information on the internet; 3) establish a laboratory/experimental approach to statistical instruction; 4) explore the use of the computer not only as a computational assistant but also as an instructional tool; 5) provide a variety of class/student projects for instruction. Prerequisite: Prior course in statistics, graduate standing, or consent of instructor.

DetailsThis course explores topics and "real-world applications from discrete mathematics including graph theory, counting principles both elementary and advanced, combinatorial coding theory and Ramsey theory. The approach is designed for teachers with an emphasis on projects both individual and small group, as well at the use of technology. Prerequisite: Consent of instructor.

DetailsThis course explores topics and applications from probability, including combinatorial techniques, conditional probabilities, tree diagrams and Bayes' Theorem, expectation and variance, density and distribution functions, the Central Limit Theorem, commonly encountered random variables and applications based on these random variables. The approach is designed for teachers with an emphasis on individual and small group projects. Prerequisite: Consent of instructor.

DetailsThe introductory course is designed to acquaint the student in school psychology with a variety of contemporary issues pertinent to the practice of psychology in the schools. Included are discussions of the delivery of psychological services, current practices in school psychology, professional ethics and responsibilities, and controversial issues in the field. Special emphasis is given to the various roles and functions of practicing school psychologists, both in urban and rural settings. The provision of school psychological services to diverse populations is also reviewed.

DetailsThis course provides an examination of the nature and assessment of intelligence with emphasis placed on the school-age population (ages six to adult). Training in the administration and interpretation of individual intelligence tests and achievement tests, as well as in writing psychoeducational reports, is provided. Measures of Direct assessment will also be explored. A major focus of the course is the development of appropriate interventions based on a synthesis of test data, behavioral observations and background information. Test bias and the assessment of minority individuals are examined. Prerequisites: standing as a second-year graduate student or consent of instructor.

DetailsThis course is presented as an introductory or survey course in the field of learning disabilities, fulfilling a dual purpose: first, as a terminal course for regular education classroom teachers and related school personnel (administrators, guidance personnel, school psychologists, teachers of physical education, music, art, etc.) and others who wish to become acquainted with the issues of specific learning disabilities; and second, as the introductory course in the sequence leading to teacher certification in learning disabilities. Development of the field, brief examination of major theoretical approaches, current definitions and terminology used in learning disabilities, issues in diagnosis and assessment, educational adaptations, and techniques and strategies appropriate for use in a regular classroom are emphasized. Field experience, which could be used to meet the human relations component (for education majors only), is a requirement of this course. Prerequisites: PSYC 330/530 and graduate standing.

DetailsThis course is presented as an introductory course dealing with significant problems of developmental disabilities. The definition and characteristics of the learner with mental retardation are examined in depth. Other topics addressed are normalization, deinstitutionalization, rights of the retarded, assessment procedures, family issues, and transitioning into the community. Field experiences are a major component of this course with opportunities for students to observe and interact with individuals with mental retardation. The sites for filed experiences provide for a range of ages and abilities in various settings, not exclusively educational environments.

DetailsThis course is designed to help the student develop skills in individual and group consultation, including inservice presentation and program evaluation. Emphasis is placed on training the student in effective methods of helping others increase their knowledge and skills through collaborative consultation. Students gain knowledge about mental health, behavioral, and other models of consultation. The course is appropriate for graduate students as well as experienced professionals in service-oriented training programs, education, psychology and related areas.

DetailsThe practicum courses provide an opportunity for supervised field experience in the profession of school psychology. The practicum student works a minimum of 20 clock hours a week in the public schools and is supervised by both a university school psychology professor and a certified school psychologist on site. The major requirements of the practicum include engaging in a minimum of 600 clock hours of supervised experience in assessment, intervention, consultation, and group and individual counseling of students.

DetailsThis course provides faculty supervision, as well as supervision by qualified school district personnel, to candidates seeking their initial license in Wisconsin, or to those seeking a limited license in Minnesota. An internship is required in order to apply for listing in the National School Psychology Certification System and to complete the School Psychology Program approved by the National Association of School Psychologists.

DetailsThis course provides an opportunity for in-depth study of contemporary issues, programs, or practices in school psychology. Depending upon the specific topic of study, the content of the course may focus on research findings, theoretical advances, or clinical applications of research and theory as they affect the practice of psychology in the schools. Because of its focus on contemporary issues, the course is appropriate for both students in training and experienced practitioners who desire in-depth training in a specific area. Can be repeated with a different topic.

DetailsThis course will provide a foundation in the complex field of Neurobiology to facilitate an understanding of nervous system functions and dysfunctions. Topics will include cognition, learning/memory, biological clocks, behavior/emotions and neurological disorders. Emphasis will be placed on resources and exercises that can readily be translated to the high school classroom environment.  Prerequisite:  Teacher certification.

DetailsThis course will cover the basic science and clinical topics associated with newly emerging and re-emerging infectious diseases. Topics to be covered will include the basic pathogenesis, epidemiology and public health responses to emerging bacterial, viral and fungal pathogens. The laboratory component of this course will provide the opportunity to learn basic microbiological techniques of aseptic technique, microscopy and staining, classical and rapid methods of identification of microorganisms.

DetailsThis course will focus on field and laboratory study of the flora (bryophytes, lycophytes, horsetails, ferns, conifers and flowering plants) of River Falls, Wisconsin, and vicinity. It will also include an introduction to plant classification, plant taxonomy, plant ecology (including pollination ecology) and local plant communities. Fieldwork will be the major part of daily class activities, but we will return to the lab for specimen handling and identification using dichotomous keys. Students will learn natural history and sight recognition of representative plants in the field. In addition, they will develop personal reference collections for use in their own classrooms.

DetailsThis is a survey course covering the major groups of organic and biochemical compounds of physiological importance. The nomenclature, properties, reactions and roles played by these compounds in humans and other living organisms will be discussed. Selected laboratory experiments, appropriate to the high school/middle school setting, will be completed and adapted by the students for use in their own courses.Prerequisite:  Students must have completed an intro biology or chem course and either must be certified to teach or be close to obtaining certification with instructor's approval.

DetailsPrinciples and analyses of processes that affect the Earth's surface and govern the development of landforms, wind action, groundwater flow and transport, karst and systems, lakes and shoreline processes, and water chemistry and weathering. An important component of the class will be the development of classrooms, laboratory, field, computer, and web-based activities appropriate to secondary earth science education. Prerequisites: Some knowledge of geology is assumed.

DetailsBasic identification of rocks and minerals for science teachers. Lectures, labs, demonstrations, computer simulations, internet activities and field trips developed around the topics of crystals, minerals, igneous rocks, sedimentary rocks and metamorphic rocks. Prerequisites: consent of the instructor. Cannot be taken for credit after completion of GEOL 230 and 231 or equivalent.

DetailsThis course will provide the student with an understanding of how the brain works as it relates to applied learning and how the use of reflection deepens learning. The student will also understand the importance of developing partnerships in the service-learning process, which is an essential component of successful and high quality service-learning. Prerequisite: TED 721.

Learn more about Shared Inquiry Communities by attending an informational open-house session. Meet the program facilitator and other potential members of a Shared Inquiry Community in your area. Refreshments will be served.

DetailsThis online course is the third in the sequence of three technology courses and is offered on a continuing basis. It reviews the background, history and context of technology integration, considers basic principles and practice of technology integration, and deals with both structured and unstructured problems in technology integration.

DetailsA course for in-service elementary and middle school teachers interested in using current technologies in the mathematics classroom. Calculators, computer systems, web-based applications, and imaging technologies will be used to support the teaching of elementary and middle school mathematics. The effect of such technologies on the mathematics curriculum and an assessment will be studied. New curriculum materials will be developed by the class.Prerequisite:  Consent of instructor.

DetailsThe student is actively engaged in understanding the dynamics between the needs and behavior of wildlife in light of human attitudes and behavior. They will be able to critically analyze and propose a combination of alternative management techniques and solutions for game and non-game wildlife species - human conflicts, based on principles of sustainability. Emphasis will be placed on ecosystem-based management, natural resource infrastructure enhancement, limits of population and habitat manipulation, non-traditional visitor experience profiles, wildlife viewing philosophy and ethics, and indicators of success. Besides experientially based assessment in their community/wildlife resource site of choice, case studies will be used to illustrate the typical issues associated with wildlife viewing and nature tourism. Prerequisite: consent of instructor.

DetailsThis course engages students in understanding the comprehensive infrastructure and ecologic sensitivity necessary for effectively and efficiently maximizing the visitors' wildlife viewing experiences; yet, symbiotically protecting the wildlife they've come to see and enhancing the quality of life for the host community. Students will personally inventory the existing wildlife viewing opportunities and quality of those opportunities based on universal design guidelines for viewing sites, trails, signing, visitor centers, day use areas, comfort facilities, public transportation, parking, and accessibility for the diversity of domestic and international visitors. Students will then design a specific wildlife viewing project with supporting documents for their chosen community sites and formally present their designs to public officials and other interested parties. Prerequisites: ESM 620, ESM/BIOL 645, MNGT 655, or consent of instructor.

Theory and Behavior introduces students to perspectives developed to understand and evaluate the functioning of complex organizations. In addition to theories, organizational dynamics such as employee, motivation, the quality of worklife, decision-making, organization change, and development are explored. Students will reflect upon the value of these theories and practices to an organization with which they are familiar.

This course is designed to provide foundational information on leadership and to assist students to enhance leadership competencies in their professional life. The course explores conceptions and theories of leadership, both historical and current, and applies theories through case studies and simulations. Assessment of leadership competencies, practice in utilizing competencies, analyses of leadership challenges, and synthesis of experience and theory will serve to enhance the leadership abilities of students.

The strategy portion of the course covers environment scanning, intra-organizational analysis, positioning the organization so that success is enhanced, and integration of the strategic plan throughout the organization. The marketing portion covers product and service development, pricing, distribution, and promotion. The role of marketing in implementing the strategy and marketing’s relationship to the other functions of the organization are included in extensive coverage of e-commerce.

This course will cover human resources functions in the modern business organization. These functions include recruiting, training and development, compensation, benefits, and planning for future employee needs. It will emphasize the importance of the human resource department’s role in the accomplishment of company objectives. It will provide an in-depth look at the major human resource functions, the strategies and tactics of how those functions are performed and the role and relationship of human resource managers and the rest of the organization. Emphasis will be on the application of the material to real situations that the student will encounter in the organization.

To acquaint practitioners who do not have legal training with fundamental principles and develop core competencies in the areas of labor/employment law and contract law so they may apply them in a business setting. Students will become familiar with collective bargaining principles and laws.

Concurrently, students will become familiar with various employment regulations affecting both the unionized and non-unionized workplace. Students will become familiar with the basic elements of contracts, the many forms of contracts, and how to read and interpret many types of contractual agreements. Students will also gain some knowledge concerning the history and development of each of the areas of law covered.

In this course, students are provided an opportunity to synthesize and draw upon material and competencies gained through the required course curriculum in the completion of an independent research project that incorporates investigative methods and approaches used in organizational research and managerial practice.

Pledge to the accuracy of the information before an official who will witness the pledge (U.S. Government official or Notary Public or Commissioner for Oaths or other public official with authority to validate oaths.

Increased demands on the natural resources of the planet, as well as increased need for environmental protection and restoration, have created opportunities for well-trained individuals. The Environmental Science and Management (ESM) program at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls offers a variety of major/ minor combinations that help students meet their professional goals. The Conservation, Environmental Science, and Land Use Planning majors are designed to provide students with the knowledge, ability, and technical skills needed for effective resource management work.

Picture this. Sophomore Jane Smith needs to fulfill her general education requirements. She signs up for a course held in a newly refurbished classroom on the library’s lower level. When she arrives, there are two instructors at the front of the room—not two historians or two English professors, but a geologist and a political scientist. They are there to present their unique perspectives on world oil production.

By the end of this academic year, the Banks Center for Interdisciplinary Inquiry will be both a place on campus and an idea in the hearts and minds of faculty across campus, inspiring them to new directions in teaching and learning. It’s the perfect match between a donor’s passion and the university’s mission. People coming together to help students learn.

And she did, founding that interdisciplinary field and growing it to the point where most medical colleges now employ literature instructors. Along the way Banks became the American editor of the Virginia Woolf letters and one of the most respected Woolf scholars in the world. It’s been an illustrious and rewarding career. A life of purpose and passion. And now, in the role of benefactor, she’s taking steps to give her life and eventual death added meaning.

Before the trip to Florida, Brown read everything she could by Banks—her books “Healing Arts in Dialogue” and “Congenial Spirits,” articles in Literature and Medicine, a journal Banks founded, and of course her Woolf commentaries. Brown met with her department chairs. Consensus was immediate and complete. The UW-River Falls proposal would seek to match Banks’ life work in interdisciplinary inquiry to the university’s mission.

Decision made, the past several months have included identifying space and planning for the Center—bringing an idea on paper into living, breathing reality. It’s meant first of all taking a hard look at what interdisciplinary inquiry means and the promise it holds for faculty and students.

Although planning for the Center is ongoing, and specific efforts may evolve over time, initial programming will include a public lecture series and support for faculty development in research and teaching.

The space itself, on the lower level of Chalmer Davee Library, is being designed as a welcoming destination, “a place that people will feel drawn to,” says Brown. It will include a director’s office, an inviting meeting room, exhibit space, and a 21st-century classroom, designed by faculty to accommodate the way people teach in different disciplines. “We want it to become one of the most sought after classrooms on campus, so faculty don’t mind leaving their own building to teach there,” says Brown.

The day before he was to take part in the 1990 Twin Cities Triathlon, he choked on a piece of food. While being treated, his esophagus was accidentally perforated and, after being released, he developed an infection in his chest cavity. It required emergency surgery, and his last sight before going under anesthesia was a priest giving him Last Rites.

That risk was to start his own company, The Lacek Group, one that in a few years’ time became international with hundreds of employees and which was ultimately bought for millions. From there, Lacek continued as a visionary businessman in endeavors that have served him well and left him, as they say, very comfortable in life.

In 1999 he and UW-Madison graduate Susan were married, and wedding guests were asked to contribute to a foundation the couple created to help at-risk youth. Inspired by the film Saving Private Ryan—which to them illustrated how much the previous generation gave to its children—the couple saw The Lacek Foundation as a way to help future generations. Less than a year into their marriage, a baby was on the way, and life was good, life was comfortable.

Faith’s Lodge is that purpose—a project designed to give grieving families a place to go, a retreat, on 80 acres near Lacek’s home in Webster, Wisconsin. It is also for parents who have chronically ill children. Groundbreaking took place in June, and the Laceks expect the construction to be finished and Faith’s Lodge to be open in June 2007.

The loss of Faith prompted the switching of Lacek Foundation in name and focus. Today it’s Faith’s Lodge, a public charity, and support is coming in fast and heavy. A sold-out June gala netted $250,000 in donations from some 900 guests. Already $1.2 million in in-kind construction services have been donated and Mark Lacek, successful entrepreneur by all accounts, sees this project as his most important one, beginning with how it helped him and Susan begin to heal from their loss.

These refrains—played out in her life’s work as a music teacher, university instructor, corporate trainer, musician and now president of the Mary Ella Jerome Family Foundation— are her opus in progress. She’s first to acknowledge that her life’s composition has been accompanied by her family, teachers, mentors and friends. Now it’s time for a reprise.

So, she’s making it possible for five UW-River Falls students each year to receive music, agriculture, or education scholarships that honor her legacy of family and strong women who have attended UWRF.

As one of five children of the late Wallace and Marion Jerome, who founded Jerome Foods, an international company that put turkey on dinner tables for more than just Thanksgiving, Mary Ella’s Midwestern upbringing and family roots have shaped her unpretentious philosophies and philanthropy.

Music Professor Emeritus Elliot Wold recalls that Mary Ella was an outstanding student and example for her peers. She was a member of the first concert choir that toured Europe in 1971. The choir, led by Wold, became quite celebrated with several recordings and annual performance tours over two decades to Europe, Canada and the Far East.

As a lad, Wallace started his turkey farm with a persistent chicken hen that hatched one tom turkey, and the enterprise continued to grow while he finished high school, took courses at the University of Minnesota, and graduated from UW-Madison.

While she’s faced health issues the last few years and the death of her father this year, Mary Ella Jerome’s spirit has sustained her and helped put life’s challenges in perspective. She’s on hiatus as an organist at her church, and some of her regular business, community and volunteer activities are on hold.

Check out as many sources as you can find for scholarships. Your high school guidance counselor is an excellent resource. You might also consider visiting your local library or the Internet to find out about organizations offering scholarships. Keep in mind, these resources are free, you should NEVER pay for this information.

Your FAFSA will be evaluated using a standard formula which takes into account you and your family's income, assets, as well as other special circumstances. This evaluation determines the amount you and your family will need to contribute to the cost of your education. The difference between the cost of your education and your family's contribution is called need. This is the amount of financial aid you're eligible to receive.

Within a few weeks, you'll receive a Student Aid Report which lists all the information you provided on the application. Make sure all the information is correct. If not, send any corrections back to the federal processor.

After we receive your results, you'll be notified of all the financial details in an award letter. This letter will show your expected family contribution, as well as the types and amounts of financial aid for which you're eligible.

If scholarships and grants don't cover your expenses, your financial aid package may include a student loan. You may also be eligible for other alternative loan programs designed for all families whether or not they have financial need.

Reciprocity is the agreement that Minnesota has with neighboring states to provide lower tuition for attending public colleges and universities in those states. Minnesota has reciprocity agreements with Wisconsin, North Dakota, and South Dakota.

If you're a Minnesota resident, you're eligible for reciprocity benefits if you attend any Wisconsin technical college, or any two- or four-year public college or university in Wisconsin. If you're a Wisconsin resident, you're eligible if you attend any Minnesota public institution.

Wisconsin students who are enrolled in the College of Medicine, Veterinary Medicine, or Dentistry at the University of Minnesota-Twin Cities or Duluth, and Minnesota residents enrolled at the University of Wisconsin-Madison or Milwaukee medical schools are NOT eligible for tuition reciprocity.

Minnesota undergraduate students attending participating Wisconsin schools pay tuition that's comparable to what's charged at a similar Minnesota school. The reverse also holds true. If you're an undergraduate student from Minnesota and attending The University of Wisconsin-River Falls, your tuition will be the same as if you were attending a Minnesota State University.

You can apply until the final day of scheduled classes each term. If you want to be in the reciprocity program for the entire year, you must apply electronically by the last day of scheduled classes for the fall (or first semester) term. Applications filed electronically after the last day of a term will be processed for the next term.

Orwoll N. Hagen 1964 retired from a 34-year career in insurance and investments. He is now a substitute school bus driver and says his goal is to help make a difference in the lives of children he serves. He resides in Stevens Point, Wis.

Kerry Grippen 1970 was recently honored for 30 years of service as director of Forward Financial Credit Union where he is in his seventh year as chairman of the board of directors. He remains very active in the Niagara community and was awarded the “Lion of the Year” award by the Niagara Lion’s Club in November 2005. He has been retired since 2002, but remains very active and does some substitute teaching. He also writes a weekly column for the new local newspaper. He resides in Niagara, Wis.

Richard Howard 1971 and his wife, Elaine, are both retiring after many years of work in varying fields. He retired May 1 from his most recent position as a design specialist for the Minnesota State Highway Department. His cumulative work experience includes 19 years with the federal government, 26 years with state government, and a few short stints in the private sector. They reside in St. Paul, Minn.

David J. Stone 1978 was recently named worldwide exploration manager for Marathon Oil Company (Worldwide Production). His primary responsibility is directing the oil and gas exploration program for Marathon in North America and select international operations. He resides in Houston, Texas.

Stuart Glaser 1989 recently completed a four-year executive fire officer training program. He has been the Stillwater fire chief for the past five years and has been with the department for 20 years. He resides in Stillwater, Minn.

Kelly Casper 1992 has been the principal for Coleman High School for the past five years. Previously, she was a chemistry and biology teacher for Pulaski High School for seven years. She resides in rural Coleman, Wis., with her husband, Kevin, and their two children.

Jeff Montsma 1992 recently received a promotion to director of member services, member of senior staff. with Alto Dairy of Waupun, Wis. He is overseeing milk procurement, producer services, milk hauling, and field staff. He resides in Waupun, Wis.

Patricia Edelburg 1998 is the director of the Wisconsin Farmers Union and a dairy farmer. She is also on the state board of the Wisconsin Farmers Union and the state board for Wisconsin Citizen Action.

Jason Paukner 1999 is the land planner for Clark Dietz, Inc. He is certified by the American Institute of Certified Planners and has seven years of experience working as a planner in public and private sectors.

Jessica Carlson 2001 has recently changed careers due to recurring layoffs. She was a high school math teacher and is now a billing/invoice coordinator for Werner Electric in Minneapolis, Minn. She resides in White Bear Lake, Minn.

Jeremy Fisk 2001 is the new head girls’ basketball coach at Ellsworth High School. He is also a K-12 physical education and health instructor at EHS. He has also been the assistant volleyball coach the last two years and was an assistant girls’ basketball coach last season.

Jared Leagjeld 2001 recently passed the CPA exam required to qualify for licensure as a certified public accountant. He is a senior accountant with Adbo Eick & Meyers Certified Public Accountants and Consultants.

Jennifer Russell 2001 is an animal agriculture specialist with the Minnesota Farm and Food Coalition. Previously, she was a career counselor/recruiter for the Agricultural and Food Science Academy in Vadnais Heights, Minn. She will be providing assistance to poultry and livestock producers.

Haley Hennlich 2002 is the director of Four Seasons Child Care in Somerset, Wis. She has spent the past nine years in the field of educating children including group child care centers, mentoring, volunteering, an orphanage in Bolivia, and her own in-home licensed family child care. She resides in New Richmond, Wis.

Amanda Clemmer 2006 has been accepted by Teach For America, the national corps of outstanding recent college graduates of all academic majors who commit two years to teach in urban and rural public schools.

In 1981, Boehm joined the Kroger Co., one of the largest retail food companies in the United States, as the director of economic research. He was promoted to vice president of corporate planning and research in 1986 and then to vice president of grocery procurement in 1989.

Falls, said that Boehm is a person of substance. “One of his characteristics is the value he places on being a member of a team, rather than on the recognition of himself, in terms of achievements,” McGinty said.

Babbitt, a 1942 graduate of UW-River Falls, was recognized posthumously for his extensive work in pediatric radiology. Babbitt was known as the world’s leading expert regarding Pancreaticobiliary Maljunction, a disease of the pancreas. His individual research largely contributed to the discovery of the disease. He traveled around the world to speak and present information on the disease and published several articles and other information to books and the American Medical Association.

Beginning in 1958, Babbitt was employed at the Medical College of Wisconsin, serving various roles such as instructor in radiology, associate professor of radiology and clinical professor of radiology.

He's headed up three National Institute of Health grants, worth more than $10 million, that have led to advancements in the early detection, understanding and treatment of cancers and lung disease. Steve has guided a technological revolution in digital imaging that has vastly improved diagnostic capabilities.

He has recently been tapped to head up a quality and safety initiative for the nationwide network of Mayo-owned institutions. The project is designed to make Mayo the world's first high-reliability health care institution, completely eliminating needless injuries and deaths caused by human error.

Incredible advancements are taking place in digital imaging, with significant implications for diagnosis and treatment of disease. Dr. Swensen will present on the state of medical imaging today and forecast future developments (magnets to molecules). In addition, he will address medical quality and safety opportunities (the moon).

An internationally respected humanitarian whose leadership has guided the provision of life-sustaining assistance in food, medical services and security to residents of Third World nations is the recipient of the 2004 UW-River Falls Distinguished Alumnus award.

Distinguished Alumnus Day, this year honoring Sigurd Hanson, an internationally respected relief worker. Sigurd has more than 25 years of experience in managing emergency, rehabilitation and development-related activities, primarily in Africa and most recently in Pakistan, Afghanistan and central Asia.

Hanson will address how people have changed; competing visions for the future; and emerging global trends like the growing gap between the rich and poor, the shifting patterns of governance, increasing conflict, environmental limitations, and the HIV/AIDS pandemic.

President of the China Exploration and Research Society, former photojournalist and expedition leader with the National Geographic Society His boundless curiosity has taken him to the most remote regions of China where, for 30 years, he has photographed the diverse people and endangered species of that nation's compelling environments. His commitment has led to ongoing work to document and conserve the rich heritage of these fragile societies.

For the extraordinary artistry of his work, for the pathbreaking success of his discoveries, and for the international awareness he has brought to his exploration activities, Wong How Man has been named the 2002 Distinguished Alumnus at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

The journey from UW-River Falls student to "China's most accomplished living explorer" (TIME magazine) is a remarkable story, reflecting one man's personal philosophy that "solving a worthwhile problem soothes the heart; using an innovative approach is where the fun and challenge come in."

It was chance that brought Wong How Man to River Falls from Hong Kong in 1969. Having been accepted at three schools, he chose this university because the name conjured up images of a wonderful waterfall beside which he could live and study. While disappointed by the falls, the rest of the River Falls experience was rewarding.

"Turns out to be one of the best choices of my life," he concludes. "My training under those two curricula [he double-majored in journalism and art] provided me with an inquisitive and artistic mind. Today, that training, and the human sensitivity I learned from River Falls, have brought me from journalistic and artistic work to conservation projects with both nature and culture in remote China."

As a student, Wong served two years as president of the International Students Organization, acted in such school plays as "Three Penny Opera" and "Land of the Dragon," and worked in the audio visual department. He also fished in the Kinnickinnic; survived and "learned to love" Wisconsin winters; discovered American football, rodeo and the joys of horseback riding in the fall; and began "drinking milk like water" at Rodli Commons.

Following college, Wong returned to China to take up duties as a free-lance photographer and journalist. Beginning in 1979 his assignments led to exploration of remote China and its minority ethnic populations. Then, from 1982 to 1986, he led six expeditions for the National Geographic Society, one of which studied the Yangtze River from mouth to source, discovering a new source for the river in 1985.

Although exploration satisfied Wong's thirst for knowledge and adventure, he soon found himself charting a more challenging path toward conservation. In a recent Time magazine article that named him a "Hero of Asia," he explained the transition. "Everywhere I went I encountered people and customs that I knew were going to vanish almost as soon as I'd photographed them. I realized that to be an explorer in today's world you can't escape becoming a conservationist."

So, in 1986, Wong founded the China Exploration and Research Society (CERS), a nonprofit organization with a clear mission: to explore remote regions of China, conduct multidisciplinary research, implement nature and culture conservation projects, and disseminate results through education and popular channels.

Wong, innovative ways used to conduct projects can produce the most impressive results. Case in point is a restoration project at a Tibetan nunnery. "The financial investment to cover labor and building materials was relatively insignificant," he relates, "but by hiring local villagers to work hand-in-hand with the nuns, we created an exciting dynamic. For a long time, there had been tension in the community between the nuns and the villagers. Bringing them together to work on the restoration project made them close friends.

His work is regularly featured on international television on such networks as CNN, ABC, CNBC, the Discovery Channel and others. Often hailed as a latter day Marco Polo, Wong How Man has redefined the role of an international explorer for those who would follow in his footsteps. His quest takes him beyond mere discovery to ensure that the world he encounters remains for others to discover as well. In his own words: "As an explorer, I aim to instill the spirit of exploration into new geographic discoveries.

His leadership and playing skills helped the team finish the 1979 season with a 9-1 record, which was the most wins ever at that time. The same year the Falcons earned a berth in the NAIA Div. I playoffs  the first time a Falcon football team had ever appeared in a playoff game.

Knauber, a 1982 graduate, earned four track and field and four cross country letters. In 1978 she was named the team's Most Valuable Performer after she placed second in the 1,000 and fourth in the mile at the indoor championships, and third in the mile at the outdoor championships. In 1979 Knauber placed sixth in the mile and fourth in the two mile at the indoor championships. She had an outstanding meet at the outdoor championships when she won the two mile, helped the two mile relay team to a second place finish and she finished third in the three mile. In 1980 at the indoor meet she placed third in the mile and sixth in the two mile. Knauber helped the mile relay team to a fourth place finish. At the outdoor meet she placed second in both the 800 and 1,500 meter runs and was a member of the two mile relay team which placed fourth. At the 1981 outdoor meet she helped the two mile relay team to a sixth place finish. In cross country, she was the team's Most Valuable Runner in 1978 and 1979 when she was named to the All-WIAC team. In 1979 she placed 15th at the AIAW National Championships and earned All-American honors.

Debra Christensen, a 1986 UW-RF graduate, found a home in the Karges Center pool right out of high school and made an immediate impact for the Falcons diving and swimming team. She earned four letters during her athletic career in addition to numerous individual honors in her area of expertise-diving. Success for Christensen began her freshman year when she placed eighth in the WWIAC and 10th at the AIAW National Championship meet, earning All-American honors in the one-meter event. Success continued for the Oak Park, Ill., native as she once again earned All-American honors her sophomore year after an eighth place finish at the NCAA National Championship meet in the one meter event. Similar success followed Christensen her junior year, but in her final year of competition she really made a name for herself. The senior captain won conference championships in both the one-meter and three-meter events and at the same time set pool records at UW-Eau Claire. She placed third at the NCAA championships in the one-meter event and 14th on the higher board. Christensen, who was named the UW-RF's MVP, represented River Falls in an international competition in Winnipeg, Canada.

Bill Sperling, an employee of the University from 1967-1992, held various positions on campus during his tenure. Sperling was UW-RF's first ever Alumni Director. He followed that position by working in Admissions and finished as an assistant to the Chancellor. Sperling continues his work today as the Public Address announcer for Falcons football games and is in the middle of his 29th season. But football was not his only sport of choice. Sperling worked men's and women's basketball for 25 years, hockey for 10 years and also did public address for track when it was needed. Sperling got his start in athletics as a coach at Webster High School in northern Wisconsin. He was the coach for all varsity sports from 1947-1951. Sperling has also held positions with the Milwaukee Braves, Look Magazine and Reader's Digest.

Among campus advances made under Field were the construction of the Hunt Recreation and Athletic Building, a new football stadium and press box, initiation of a remodeling project at Karges Center and the steps toward approval of the Robert P. Knowles Physical Education and Recreation Center.

After graduating from UW-RF, Haley began teaching and coaching at Birchwood High School. She was responsible for starting the girl's sports program there. She coached volleyball for eight years, basketball for 11 seasons, track for seven years and softball for three years. The 1976 team finished with an 18-2 record and advanced to the state regional finals. The 1980 team finished second in conference play. Her career includes holding the position of her school's supervisor of women's sports for 10 years and health coordinator for the school district for 13 years. She has also been a volleyball and basketball official.

Judy Wilson had an effect on thousands of athletes at UW-River Falls in her position as a teacher, coach and administrator in the Falcons athletic department. She joined the University in 1966 and continues to teach today. She retired as an associate athletic director in 1992.

Page graduated from Madison West High School in 1945 where he lettered in football, basketball, tennis, track and volleyball. He was all Big Eight Conference his junior and senior year in football and basketball while winning the conference singles championship both years in tennis.

After his playing days Jilek was the head football coach for eight years at Clear Lake High School where he teams were 45-26-1 and won two conference titles. He was the head track coach for four years and he led one team to a conference championship and had three athletes compete at the state meet. He served as head baseball coach for five years and two teams won conference titles. He was also the school's athletics director. As a wrestling official he worked four state meets.

Farley coached the Falcon football team for 19 seasons. They were seasons filled with losses, wins and at times disappointment, but also the type of excitement sometimes seldom seen on small college campuses. Farley's 117-71-3 football coaching record is unparalleled at the University.

The 1979 team reached even greater heights by not only winning another conference crown, but also receiving a berth in the NAIA Div. I playoffs. It was the first time a Falcon football team had ever qualified for post-season play. The Falcons' shot at a national playoff was stopped early when Angelo State, Texas, won the quarterfinal game 31-7. The loss was a setback to the team, but from that point on the Falcon football team was nationally known and would remain at the top of the small college football ranks for the rest of Farley's career.

La Crosse jumped to a 14-0 lead and it looked for a while that Farley would have to wait another week for his 100th win. The two-touchdown deficit held into the final quarter. But then a Falcon drive cut the La Crosse lead to seven points.

After holding La Crosse twice, the Falcons got their final chance to score with four minutes to play. The Falcon wishbone offense worked to perfection and consumed all but 48 seconds of the game before scoring a touchdown that put the Falcons behind by one point.

Without a moment of hesitation the Falcons went for the two-point conversion and the win. The Falcons converted the two-point conversion and minutes later Farley was on the shoulders of his players and fans alike celebrating the thrilling win.

His genuine love for his players was obvious from the first time he stepped foot on campus. He challenged them to be the best they could be not only on the gridiron, but also in the classroom. He continually reminded his recruits that what they did in their four or five years at the University would effect how the next 40 years of their lives unfolded. Farley gave his players a chance to succeed and, sometimes even more importantly, the chance to fail.

DeWayne Johnson has had illustrious careers as a player at UW-RF, and as a coach at several high schools. He earned eight letters in football and baseball at UW-RF. He was co-captain of the football team, and was named to the all-District team. He was also a member of the Falcon baseball teams that won two conference titles. He served as baseball coach at New Richmond High School where his teams won two conference and a sectional title. At Plymouth he was head football coach for 10 years and coached four undefeated conference championship winning teams. His teams played in three state playoffs, and won the state title in 1976 and 1978. At Anoka he coached an undefeated conference football team in 1985, and his clubs have made the state playoffs several times.

Bob Schulz lettered four times with the Falcon football team from 1966-69, and was captain of the 1969 team. He also earned one wrestling letter. Schulz is also won of the most successful high school football coaches in the nation. In 16 years at De Soto High School he coached the football team to three state championships (1976, 83, 84). Two other times (1985, 86) his teams were runner-ups in the state playoffs. He has coached six regular season undefeated teams, and has been named a district Coach of the Year three times. His teams have won 12 conference titles, and at one time had the longest winning streak in the state at 37 games. He has also been successful as a baseball, track, wrestling and basketball coach.

Kirby Symes was a high school athletic director and coach for 34 years. He coached track, cross country, football and wrestling. In wrestling his teams compiled a 142-30-2 (.82 percentage) record and won nine conference championships. His teams also won four sectional titles and 12 regional championships. He coached six individual state championships. He is a charter member in the George Martin Wrestling Hall of Fame and is a highly respected Wisconsin sports official.

Fred Mattson played basketball at UW-RF from 1932-35 and was co-captain of the 1934 team. He also played baseball the same years and established the team's highest batting average for a season, a record that stands today. He is a former vice president of the J.A. Baldwin Mfg. Co. and has developed and owns four US patents related to environmental protection.

He has coached soccer, football and baseball at UW-Whitewater. He has coached eight football conference championship winning teams and four baseball conference championship teams at the high school level.

Arnold Feiler competed in football for four years, track for three years and basketball one year. He was an all-conference fullback in 1947 when the Falcons won the conference title. He was vice-president of the R Club when he was a senior. His coaching record includes three high school conference football champions.

Joe Braun played baseball and football for four years, and basketball for two years at the university. He captained the 1932 football team and was named to the all-conference team as an end that year. He was the freshman team's coach as a senior. He was the president of the R Club as a senior. He started the first baseball team at Neenah High School and has been picked as the Fox Valley Coach of the Year. He received the Red Smith award in 1967-68.

Harry Gibbs played football, basketball and golf at the university. He played on the conference championship winning basketball teams of 1947-50. The Falcons competed in the national tournament in 1947-49. He was also an all-conference guard in 1949. He has coached a state high school championship golf team and has seven basketball teams compete in the state tournament. He has been selected to the Wisconsin High School Basketball Coaches Hall of Fame.

Emogene Nelson was on the UW-RF Health, Physical Education and Recreation staff from 1958 until she went on a medical leave. She was the advisor to the women's Recreation Association, advisor to Lambda Phi, chairperson of the physical education department and a member of the universities athletic committee during her years at River Falls. She was also the executive director of the Wisconsin Women's Intercollegiate Athletic Conference in 1977. She was the president of the Wisconsin Association of Health, Physical Education and Recreation and a historian for the Midwest District of the American Health Association.

Ernest Brickner was a three-time letter winner in football at the university in 1932, 33 and 34. The 1933 team won the conference championship and he was elected captain of the 1934 team. He was also named to the all Northern Conference as a fullback in 1933 and 1934. He led the conference in scoring in 1934 and averaged 5.8 yards a carry that year. He coached two high school basketball and baseball conference winning teams at Independence and Ellsworth, a football conference championship team at Colfax and a boxing championship team at Ellsworth.

Newman Benson was a forward on four consecutive conference basketball championship teams from 1946-50 and three state championship teams. He was named to the All-Conference team in 1949 and 1950. At the time of induction he was the eighth leading scorer on the all-time scoring list at the university with 1,118 points. Besides being an excellent basketball player, Benson also played varsity baseball for four years as a shortstop. He won eight varsity letters in the two sports. In 1967, after earning a master's degree from the University of Indiana and coaching at Wisconsin high schools in Hayward, Whitehall, and Chippewa Falls, Benson returned to River Falls to teach in the Physical Education Department and coach.

Walter Herkal earned 12 letters in basketball, football and baseball at River Falls. He was a member of the state and conference championships basketball team in 1937. He was All-Conference in basketball all four years he participated, and was the state's leading scorer for three years. He was at one time, captain of all three teams. Herkal has coached basketball and football at New Richmond High School and came out of the U. S. Navy as a Lieutenant Commander. He has been a member of the Shrine Club of Minneapolis, Minn., a member of the Chamber of Commerce at Van Nuys, Cal., a member of the Kiwanis Club in Billings, Mont., and has helped coach many football, basketball, and baseball youth teams.

Weiss has worked many camps and festivals for the Wisconsin Amateur Hockey Association, coaching both boys and girls. He has coached at the USA Hockey Central District Camp, and he also serves as a USA Hockey coaching instructor.

Stokes was a member of the first ever Falcon varsity team and played for four seasons. She was the captain of the team all four years she played. She also was voted the team's Hardest Worker in all four year she competed.

Walsh has been actively involved in girl's youth hockey in both Rochester and Stillwater, Minn., youth hockey programs, both as a head coach and administrator, for the past 10 years.  He has been head coach of numerous youth girls select  and AAA teams.  He has coached part of the past six summers at Minnesota Hockey Camps, a premier summer instructional hockey camp in Brainerd, Minn.

Amber Lindner returns for her fourth and senior season with  the Falcons. She is the veteran goalie for the team and will be looked upon as  a team leader. She has a career 2.00 goals against average and a .920 saves  percentage.

Jenny Wallace is back for her senior season with the  Falcons. She has earned All-American honors the past two years and is one of  the top defensemen in the women’s game. She gives the Falcons valuable  experience and leadership on the blue line.

High School, Personal: She played high school hockey at Buffalo and made the  all-conference team for three years. She also played for the Minnesota Selects  for seven years, yet she says the highlight of her career is winning the  conference championship three consecutive years. She is the daughter of Richard  and Nancy and has one brother and one sister. Wallace is majoring in business  administration.

Krystin Ralston joins the Falcons for her second year of  collegiate hockey. She played last year at St. Catherine. She could help the  Falcons by playing either forward or defense. She last played with St.  Catherine and had two goals and three assists. She was an assistant captain of  the Birdsville High School boys junior varsity team.  Ralston was a member of the National Honor Society. Her biggest hockey thrill  was being named an assistant captain. She is the daughter of Elaine and Robert  and has one brother and one sister. Ralston is majoring in business.

Stefanie Schmitz joins the Falcons for her first year of  college hockey and plays forward. At Farmington   High School she scored 36  goals and 63 points in 2006. She was a team captain and won the team’s Hegland  Award. Schmitz was voted the team’s Most Improved Player and was named to the  all-conference team. Her biggest high school hockey thrill was playing in the  Minnesota State Tournament. She is the daughter of Barb and Steve and has two  brothers and one sister. Schmitz is majoring in health & human performance.

Stefanie Schmitz started the scoring with a goal at 13:54, she was assisted by Kristen Juven. Penalties plagued the Falcons in the second period, but strong defense held the Blugolds scoreless through the power play opportunities. "Our penalties killed our offense in the second," said Falcon Coach Joe Cranston, "but i think we played really well in the first and third period." The Falcons were one for five in power plays and UWEC were zero for four.

Jenny Schmidt scored at 13:57 of the third period to give the Falcons a comfortable lead, but UWEC kept the game close with a goal at 14:38. Schmidt was assisted by Kelly Jensen and Jenna Scanlon. Schmitz stayed hot scoring for the second time that night and her tenth goal of the season to push the lead out of the Blugolds reach, scoring on a power play at 19:03 with an assist from Schmidt. UWEC pulled their goalie to put one more scorer on the ice, but the empty net resulted in one last Falcon goal at 19:15, securing the win. Abby Sunderman scored the goal with assists from Cassie LeBlanc and Jessie Dyslin.

Schmitz was involved in six of the team's seven goals last weekend and helped the Falcons earn three out of a possible four NCHA points. With the three points the Falcons moved into first place in the NCHA standings.

Schmitz, 5-4, set a school record with four goals in the team's 5-3 win at Finlandia on Sunday. She scored four goals and had one assist. In the first period she scored three times and had one assist. Her fourth goal came in the third period. She also tied the school record for points in a game with five. In the team's 2-2 overtime tie at Superior on Saturday she got the lone assist on the game-tying goal that came with 5:52 left in regulation.

Stefanie Schmitz set the pace for the game when she came out and scored the first goal of the day just 39 seconds into the first period. That was her fifth goal of the season and she was assisted by Jenny Schmidt and Jenna Scanlon. Finlandia answered back at 8:41 with a power play goal, but that would be their last goal fo the period. Schmitz answered back with a power play goal of her own, and her second goal at 9:45 with assists from Jessie Dyslin and another for Scanlon. Dyslin then scored a goal on a power play at 11:18 with Scanlon giving her third assist for the game and Schmitz also adding in the assist. Schmitz scored her hat trick and game winning goal of the evening at 19:07 with an assist from Jenny Wallace.

Scoring slowed down in the second period with neither team scoring. Finlandia ended the dry spell with a goal at 10:17 of the third period, but Schmitz wasn’t done scoring yet, she made her fourth goal of the night and eight of the season at 15:41. Finlandia made one final goal at 19:15 on a power play, but it was too little too late as the Falcons won 5-3.

UWS was first to score late in the first period at 18:36. Both teams battled out in the second period, but the Falcons came out strong in the third to score their first goal of the game. Abby Sunderman scored her eighth goal of the season with an assist from Jenna Scanlon at 7:28. UWS came back at 10:17 to take the lead. But a power play goal by Jenna Scanlon with an assist from Stefanie Schmitz at 14:08 tied the game at two. That was Scanlon’s ninth goal of the season. Both teams battled out the rest of the period and into overtime, but neither team could take the lead before time ran out. Both teams were close in their shots on goal. The Falcons had 33 to UWS’s 35, but UWS held a 9-0 advantage in the overtime.

The Falcons had a tough beginning when a checking from behind penalty left the team one player short for the first ten minutes of the period, but the Falcons played through it and it had "no impact" on the team according to Falcon Coach Joe Cranston. Both teams battled back and forth, but UWSP scored their first goal short handed at 17:59. With seconds remaining in the period, they snuck in one final goal just four seconds before the end of the period to score on a power play. UWSP scored again in the second period at 10:42 on another play and again at 13:03 of the third period, 4-4. Falcon Kristen Juven retaliated a short time later on a break away goal at 13:30. She put up her short handed goal at 13:30 with an assist from goalie Amber Lindner. That was Lindner's first assist for the season and Juven's second goal.

The Foresters were the first team to a goal in the net. They scored on a 5-4 power play at 16:44 of the second period. Power plays played a big role in the game. The Foresters made 12 out of the total 17 penalties, but the Falcons had a hard time capitalizing on their power play opportunities, they were 1-12. "We had a lot of scoring chances that we didn't come through on, but I'm really happy with how we played. I think we out played them all three periods," said Falcon Coach Joe Cranston. Lake Forest was 1-4 in power plays. Falcon Abby Sunderman scored her seventh goal of the year and tied the game at 7:21 on a 5-4 power play of the third period with an assist by Kelly Jensen, her eighth assist for the season. The intensity picked up as neither team wanted to go into overtime, but both teams played strong and the game went the extra period. Jenna Scanlon ended overtime making her eighth goal of the season at 3:04, unassisted.

Overall Cranston is very pleased with his team's efforts. "When you consider we have two lines and four defense and we came back to tie it in the third period and win in overtime says a lot about the heart on our team," said Cranston.

The Falcons started off strong holding Amherst scoreless until late in the first period when Tarasai Karega scored on a power play with assists from Kate Dennett and Kirsten Dier at 19:36. Karega would go on to have an impressive night ending in a hat trick. In the second period Amherst pushed their lead to 3-0 when they scored when Megan Quinn scored at 6:25 and Area had a goal at 8:09 with an assist from Rachel Simon on a power play. Amherst played strong into the third period as they scored back to back goals. Kate Dennet scored at 4:31 on another power play with an assist from Alyssa Chwick and Area scored her hat trick goal and the final one for Amherst a few seconds after at 4:47, she was assisted by Michelle McGann and Dennett. The Falcons didn't leave the ice scoreless, a goal by Stefanie Schmitz, her fourth of the season, with an assist from Renae Bergh, her second, at 17:34 ended the scoring.

The Falcons controlled the game during the first period thanks to an unassisted goal by Jenny Schmidt at 14:53, while also keeping the Thommies scoreless. STU wasn't down long and they came out in the second period with a lot of momentum. They scored first just 32 seconds into the period on a power play and again just a few seconds later at :54. Falcon Jenna Scanlon tied the game up at 3:26 with an assist from Stefanie Schmitz. The Falcons began to lose steam in the third period as UST held the pace. A UST goal at 5:18 ended the scoring and the Falcons were unable to put the game into overtime despite a power play and a pulled goalie at the end of the period. "I'm pretty happy with our efforts," said Falcon Coach Joe Cranston, "We played hard and physical and the fact that we out shot them 27-15 in the third period says a lot about our character."

Forward Jenna Scanlon dominated the first period as she went solo for the first goal of the game three minutes into the period. She also went on to lend her talent in the second goal assisting Jenny Schmidt with what Falcon Coach Joe Cranston called the,"nicest pass ever set up by a player wearing a women's hockey uniform." Schmidt scored at 9:55 of the first period and was also assisted by Stefanie Schmitz. The Falcons gave Bethel three power play opportunities, but remained scoreless in the first period. It looked like the Falcons were going to run away with the lead after Schmitz scored at 7:16 on a power play with an assist from Schmidt, but Bethel turned up the intensity after they scored a power play of their own at 16:43. They kept their momentum going and scored again at 19:16 and put some pressure on the Falcons going into the third period. The third period was a real battle as both teams got scrappy. Neither teamed scored, but penalties were higher in the third period and shooting was low. The Falcons had ten shots on goal in the third period and they held Bethel to five. Overall the Falcons out shot Bethel 42-22.

Freshman goalie Brook Bruggeman got her first taste on the ice as she played 59:55 and marked her first win. She saved seven goals in the first period, eight out of ten shots in the second and five in the third.

Cranston and Bethel Coach Charlie Burggraf have some history. Burggraf used to be Cranston's coach when he played hockey and when asked if it was nice to beat your old coach, Cranston said it was. "Bethel is always a good team and one of the hardest working teams we've played against. He (Burggraf) does a good job of keeping the team motivated and working hard."

Gustavus Adolphus played tough and out shot the Falcons 38-15. The Falcons had four shots in the first period, three in the second, and eight in the third. Gustavus was consistent with 12 in the first period 14 in the second, but Falcon defense slowed down the Gusties to just eight shots in the third. The Falcons played hard all three periods, but a power-play goal by the Gusties at 11:22 of the second period by Andrea Peterson was the difference. The Falcons were 0-3 on the power play and Gustavus was 1-3.

"Kelly played really well and was quick getting down the ice," said Falcon Coach Joe Cranston. In Saturday's game Snedeker was one goal shy of a hat trick and had one assist. Her first goal was at 5:52 of the second period. Her next goal was at 17:53 of the third period. She also had her first assist of the year at 9:28 of the second period. During Sunday's game, Snedeker was the first to score at 5:35 of the first period and that proved to be the game-winner. It was her fourth goal of the season and she now has five points.

In the first period, the Falcon Kelly Snedeker started off the scoring with a goal at 5:35, she was assisted by Kacie Anderson. Six minutes later, Jenna Scanlon took advantage of a power play and scored at 11:33 with an assist from Jessie Dyslin. By the end of the first period the Finlandia had only three shots on goal to the Falcons ten. At 10:05 of the second period the Falcons scored their third goal of the night. Abby Sunderman scored with an assist from Kelly Jensen. After the goal Finlandia switched goalies and went with Annika Danielson who was the starting goalie in the previous night. The switch didn't change anything for the Falcons as they scored two more times in the second period. One goal from Jennifer Wallace at 16:00 on a power play. She was assisted by Cassie LeBlanc and Jensen. Jenny Schmidt then scored just 28 seconds after Wallace at 16:28. She was unassisted. The Falcons outshot Finlandia again with 19 shots to their nine. Scanlon wasted no time in the third period scoring just 37 seconds into the period. She was assisted by Stephanie Schmidt. After that neither team scored, but tensions ran high as Finlandia got more aggressive as the clock wore down. With less then a minute remaining in the game Finlandia had four players in the penalty box and the Falcons had two for either elbowing or roughing. "We really stepped up this weekend," said Falcon Coach Joe Cranston, " we really opened up our offense."

In the first period, neither team scored and Finlandia out shot the Falcons 9-7, but it wasn't because the Falcons didn't have the opportunity. "We played strong all three periods," said Falcons Coach Joe Cranston "we could of scored five goals in the first period too, we just missed several break away opportunities." During the second period the scoreboard really lit up as the Falcons took charge. Jennifer Wallace started of the scoring with an unassisted goal at 1:53. Finlandia answered back shortly after with a goal of their own at 3:09, but it was all Falcons after that as they steadily put up points for the rest of the period. Kelly Snedeker scored at 5:52 with an assist from Raissa Carpenter and Jessie Dyslin scored the next goal at 9:28 with an assist from Snedeker. At 10:42 Kelly Jenesen scored on a power play with an assist from Cassie LeBlanc, then it was Wallace's turn to score on a power play as she nailed a long range shot, making her second goal for the night at 17:53 with assists from Jensen and Dyslin. The Falcons more then doubled Finlandia's shots on goal as they had 19 to Finlandia's eight. Renae Bergh started of the scoring for the third period with an unassisted goal at 3:41. After the goal Finlandia changed their defensive tactics by swapping out goalies right after the goal. It gave the team a quick boost as they scored their second and final goal for the night at 8:04. It was Snedeker who had the final say of the night with an unassisted goal at 17:53. Overall, the Falcons out shot Finlandia 52-25. The Falcons were 2-8 in power plays to Finlandia's 0-5.

UWSP came out strong in the first two periods scoring their goals late in the first period, at on a power play opportunity at 15:10 and again just 28 seconds into the second period. The third period was all Falcon thanks to the scoring effort by Scanlon who put the Falcons on the scoreboard 12:32 into the third period. She was assisted by Kristen Juven. Scanlon scored again a few minutes later at 16:27 on a power play that tied the game up and sent it into overtime. That was Scanlon’s third goal of the season; she was assisted by Stefanie Schmitz and Kacie Anderson. Neither team scored in overtime despite time outs taken by both teams and UWSP having a power play opportunity at 3:52. The Falcons had one shot on goal in the overtime and UWSP had three.

Anderson was the first to score on a power play at 6:51 of the second period. It was her second goal of the season and she was assisted by LeBlanc. UWSP tied the game up at 9:22 of the second period with a power play goal of their own. LeBlanc scored the game winning goal at 14:35 of the third period. That was her second goal of the season and she was assisted by Abby Sunderman and Kristen and Juven. In the third period UWSP pulled their goalie with a minute remaining in the game, but they were unable to score. The Falcons were 1-7 in power plays to UWSP 1-8.

Sunderman scored what proved to be the game winner, with the Falcons on the power play, at 6:12 of the first period. It was her third goal of the season. Jessie Dyslin and Kelly Jensen got the assists.

In the first conference match of the season, the Falcons lost to Eau Claire 3-1. The game started out with a special congratulations to Falcon Coach Joe Cranston for his 100th career win, which happened last Friday against Bethel.

After the first period it was easy to see that this was going to be a close match neither team had scored, both had one penalty and one power play attempt and were close in shooting with the falcons having ten shots on goal and UWEC had nine. That trend continued in the second period as each team scored one goal. UWEC was the first to score at 8:51. The Falcons made their goal at 12:26 on a power play scored by Kelly Jensen who was assisted by Cassie LeBlanc. Shooting was low for both teams as UWEC had four to the Falcons six. The Falcons were one player short for five minutes of the second period, but their tough defense held strong. "It was a defensive battle," said Cranston, "It wasn't our best hockey, we didn't handle the puck well." In the second period UWEC wasted no time and scored just 14 seconds into the period. The Falcons played tough for the rest of period battling back with many close attempts and even pulling their goalie with 1:28 left on the clock. The empty net left the Falcons vulnerable and allowed for a cross-rink shot at 19:53.

The first Falcon goal came in the first period as Falcon Renae Bergh scored on a power play goal at 9:26 of the first period. She was assisted by Stefanie Schmitz. The next Falcon goal came in the second period at 13:28, the goal was scored by Abby Sunderman and she was assisted by Cassie LeBlanc. These two goals and a tough Falcon defense made it impossible for Bethel to come back despite a third period goal by Bethel's Anna Baumgarten which was scored at 3:02 on a power play.

With the third period winding down it looked like the Falcons had this game won, but Hamline wasn't giving up as they set up a game plan during a time out at 17:30. The combined pressure of two Falcons in the penalty box and the pulled Hamline goalie, gave Hamline the push they needed to score at 18:22. Hamline's Melanie Leveille got the goal They kept their momentum going and with only 18 seconds remaining HU's Emily Dusold scored to send the game into overtime.

"We should have buried them by the end of the second period," said Falcon Coach Joe Cranston."When you let a team hang around long enough, something bad is going to happen." Like Friday's game against St. Mary's, the Falcons outshot their opponent 53-28 and had trouble taking advantage of power play opportunities. The Falcons were 1-9. Hamline was 1-7.

Forward Stefanie Schmitz (Fr., Farmington, Minn.) was involved in six of the team's seven goals last weekend and helped the Falcons earn three out of a possible four NCHA points. With the three points the Falcons moved into first place in the NCHA standings. Schmitz, 5-4, set a school record with four goals in the team's 5-3 win at Finlandia on Sunday. She scored four goals and had one assist. In the first period she scored three times and had one assist. Her fourth goal came in the third period. She also tied the school record for points in a game with five. In the team's 2-2 overtime tie at Superior on Saturday she got the lone assist on the game-tying goal that came with 5:52 left in regulation. She is second on the team with eight goals and is tied for the team lead with 16 points.

Forward Jenna Scanlon (Jr., Apple Valley, Minn.) was one of the team's top players in a 3-2 win over Bethel on Saturday afternoon at Hunt Arena. "She battled hard and played with a ton of heart," said Falcon Coach Joe Cranston. Scanlon really stood out in the first period. She scored her sixth goal of the season at 3:00, unassisted. Her second point of the game came at 9:55 of the first period when she assisted Jenny Schmidt with what Cranston called the, "nicest pass ever set up by a player wearing a women's hockey uniform."  It was Scanlon's third assist of the season.

Forward Stefanie Schmitz (Fr., Farmington, Minn.) played a key role for the Falcons in the team's 8-2 win at St. Catherine last week. She scored the second and sixth Falcon goals of the game, and assisted on the team's seventh goal. She has two goals and four points this year. "Stefanie has been one of our team's best back checkers this year," said Falcon Coach Joe Cranston.

Eden Prairie, Minn.) played two strong games last weekend against Eau Claire. "She has been very consistent all year, and she is a team captain and a very hard worker," said Falcon Coach Joe Cranston. Jensen was the only Falcon to score in Friday night's game, on a power play at 12:26 of the second period. That was her second goal of the season. Saturday night she picked up an assist on the game's only goal in a 1-0 Falcon win at Eau Claire. She now has two goals and four points this season.

Joe Cranston, Falcon women's hockey team head coach, says that Snedeker is playing her best hockey ever right now. "I know what I'm going to get out of her, but this year she has really stepped up her game and that's very important this year when we don't have much depth."

Snedeker takes pride in her role as one important aspect of her team. "I like how it is very team orientated: we all depend on each other, but it takes each one of us to step up and get our own jobs done," says Snedeker. Despite the sparse bench this season, Snedeker trusts the Falcons to produce the season that is in their desire. "I want our team to keep working as hard as we have been. We may not have very many players right now, but we do have a lot of talent and hard work, so I just want us to have [confidence] in ourselves and each other and I know we will be able to go as far as we want," she says.

Snedeker sacrificed her senior year of hockey at Osseo Senior High School to play for the Minnesota Thoroughbreds. Making the team was an opportunity for Snedeker to improve her hockey skills in preparation for competition at the collegiate level.  Competing with better players is what Snedeker feels opened up the chance to play at River Falls.  "When I got to high school it did not even phase me to quit, so my parents and I started looking into colleges and I tried out for the Thoroughbreds," explains Snedeker in her plans for college hockey.

Snedeker has been featured as Falcon Player of the Week and NCHA Player of the Week earlier this year. She scored three goals and had one assist in a sweep of Finaldnia. Previously, Snedeker earned all-conference honorable mention and was captain twice during her four years of high school hockey competition.

As a hockey veteran, Snedeker, who has played hockey from her fifth grade year, thinks that people should know something about hockey. "There are so many aspects of the game. Skating, stick handling, knowing the "systems," being mentally prepared. It's not just "get the puck and score" even though it would be nice if it were as easy as it looks," she says.

Hockey like any sport has its perks and downers, and Snedeker tells that hockey can be challenging. "There are so many aspects of hockey and there is always something to improve in the game. You also have to be mentally prepared and confident," she says.

Snedeker recommends two elements to garner success in hockey; having fun and practice. Beyond her own personal excitement for the sport, Snedeker is active involving the community in the aggressive, adrenalin rushed game. "I love promoting hockey! People are always amazed when they hear about women who play hockey especially at the college level and I love to promote that."

Not just a student athlete but a member of the National Student Speech Langue Hearing Association as a communicative disorders major; Snedeker hopes to attend graduate school to become a speech pathologist upon graduating from River Falls. "[A speech pathologist] work[s] with people with speech impediments or who are cognitively delayed due to mental retardation, strokes, etc," explains Snedeker. Snedeker plans on working with elementary students as a speech therapist after graduate school.

With support, Snedeker looks to the people she refers to as "role models," her family and friends, for guidance in her ambitions. "Each person who I come across and I care about help me in different aspects of my life and each one of them wants me to succeed as much as I want to," Snedeker says.

Whether she's playing a game of hockey or the game of life, Snedeker knows she needs a plan. "From experience, when I'm not mentally prepared, I'm behind from the beginning of the game until the end."

"Renae is a hard worker and is a very solid defender," said Cranston. "She has been a very good penalty killer, and this year has done some good things on the power play as well.  When she is healthy, I think she can play as good as any defender anywhere. She has a great shot, and this year is getting more time and space to use it. Renae is big and fast and good, she is probably the fastest skater on our team."

Juven is majoring in marketing communications with a minor in coaching. "I picked this because advertising and the inter-workings of marketing are of interest of mine. I hope to get more into the advertising aspect," she says.

While attending UWRF, Juven enjoys taking classes related to her major including consumer behavior and public relations. After graduating, she hopes to find a job close to the metropolitan area within an advertising company.

Juven claims that UWRF has been a perfect fit for her. Although it is a four hour trip back to her hometown of Moorhead, Minn., she enjoys the community and the attractions it has, including the nature trails for running and roller blading. She loves the big city feel of Minneapolis and St. Paul being so close by, but also enjoys her distance away from the noise.

Originally, she came to River Falls because of the hockey program. Juven has been playing with the hockey team since her freshman year. Returning as a junior, she plays forward but says she moves around from right to left wing to center depending on where the Falcons and Coach Joe Cranston need her talents and skills.

Juven explains that throughout her hockey career she has been lucky to have had good  relationships with all her coaches and teammates. "It is about playing the game but at the same time it is important to create ties with the coaches and your teammates, who you are around all the time," she says.

This year Juven has played in all 13 Falcon games and has one goal and three points. She scored the game-winning goal in an 8-2 win over St. Catherine on Nov. 21. Juven has scored seven career goals and has 20 career points. She has played in 63 games and has scored two power-play goals and two game-winners.

Juven started hockey in the third grade after her parents got her a white set of figure skates.  From what she is told, she walked straight back to her parents and said that she wanted black hockey skates.

Being an athlete and a student, Juven says it is difficult to find free time after practice and class. With the free time she can find, she usually spends it painting and drawing. "I love to do art," she explains. "It kind of ties in with the whole advertising business; it has the creative aspect built in."

"Hockey is a game of winning small battles all over the ice, and Kacie is better at that than any player who has ever played for us," says Falcon Coach Joe Cranston. "It has been a privilege of mine to be her coach."

Anderson has been on skates since she was three years old. "It's like second nature to me." With an older brother, Dane, and sister, Katie, playing hockey, Anderson was inspired to become a hockey player herself. Coaching her brother, Anderson's father, Dane Anderson, has been influential in Anderson's hockey interest.

Having passion is a component of hockey Anderson has found to be beneficial in her drive to succeed on the ice. Passion is something Anderson learned through mentors like her father and is an element she developed as an athlete.

While attending high school prep school at Shattuck-St. Mary's, Anderson aided her team to three consecutive National appearances. Despite the absence of awards throughout her high school career, Anderson tributes Nationals as her best award ever.

As a frequent participant in Wisconsin Select Hockey Camps through the Wisconsin Amateur Hockey Association, Anderson improved her hockey skills and met the coach she would play for in the future. Anderson's experience with Cranston's coaching methods influenced her to become a Falcon during her participation in the WAHA camps.

Anderson does an excellent job on the "home side" as a defense player. Protecting the goalie is a task Anderson handles with proficiency. Speaking of Anderson's force on the ice Cranston says, "Kacie has been a huge part of our success this season and the past two seasons."

Anderson scored her first collegiate goal in the team's 3-0 win over Augsburg earlier this season. She has two goals and four points this year. She has two goals and 12 career points with the Falcons.

Ironically Anderson's quiet demeanor is deceptive of her mentality as a hockey player; "[I am] defensive minded," she says. According to Cranston, Anderson is a hard worker and a leader who defines herself through example.

Although Anderson would like to see women's hockey promoted more on campus, she still thinks it is easy to be distracted from the game. With so much going on around her, Anderson gets herself focused for every game by taking a shower and getting dressed left to right. "I sometimes eat M&Ms or Skittles too."

To other aspiring hockey players Anderson can give this advice. "Make sure you work on and off the ice." Anderson expresses that women in particular should be in the driveway stick handling when they have free time if they want to be a competitive hockey player. She recognizes that at times it can get rough and it is easy to want to give up, but Anderson believes the drive to succeed overcomes the struggle of being a collegiate athlete.

The hardship is worth it to Anderson because she gets to compete in hockey and earn a degree. She hopes her business degree will help her in her aspirations to open a hair salon after she completes college. Anderson's goals are to graduate and to "be happy in whatever I am doing."

She is having another outstanding season this year. She was named the NCHA Player of the Week last Monday when she helped the Falcons win three of a possible four points at UW-Stevens Point, a team that was ranked No. 3 in the country. She allowed just three goals and made 60 saves in the two games.

Lindner is majoring in communicative disorders. Lindner explains that speech systems and audiology are two of her favorite classes that she has taken here on campus. She hopes to enroll in graduate school and obtain a doctorate degree in audiology.

Lindner explains that while enrolled at UWRF, her favorite professor has been Sharyl Samargia.  When asked to explain, Lindner replies, "She is an amazing professor who has the ability to relate to her students and teach in an interesting manner."

Coach Joe Cranston explains that Lindner works just as hard in the classroom as she does on the ice or in the weight room. "Amber has been on the honor roll and the NCHA All-Academic team every year. If more people followed her example, we would be even more successful than we already are."

Cranston is not exaggerating either. Lindner has been named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll for three straight seasons. She was also named to the Dean's List after both semesters in her junior year at UWRF.

Lindner believes a lot of her dedication and hard work comes from her mom, Becky Thibert. "My biggest inspiration is my mom. Through watching her, I have attained an attitude that I can do anything, and I think I am successful because of that," she says.

With such impressive goals for her future, one may wonder just how much time and effort she can give to other activities in her life. Not only has she been playing hockey for 15 years of her life, she also enjoys playing tennis for the "one on one competition" and actually competed in the sport at her high school in Moorhead, Minn. Lindner is a perfectionist who started playing hockey after watching the movie Mighty Ducks.

Lindner, playing goalie for the hockey team,"gives us the ability to know that we could win any game we play," says Cranston."Amber relates well with her teammates and is a leader. She also leads by example with hard work and determination."

As a leader, Lindner explains that the relationship between her and her teammates is a "unique" one.  With new freshmen and two transfer students joining the team this year, she hopes that the women "come together as a team and do what we have the ability for."

Cranston explains that Lindner has improved the most in her career in "overall athleticism." He believes that she is a "complete athlete" and has improved in physical shape and her attitude since her freshman year with the team. Lindner is a "very competitive" player and "can handle the puck as well as many of our other players."

Wallace is a senior and a team captain on the Falcon women's hockey team.  She explains that while many people think she is a "tough girl" because she plays hockey, it's actually the opposite. "I am a huge girly girl," she says. "I always keep my equipment clean and am using Febreze on it after practice. I also am always wearing something pink."

For being a "girly girl", Wallace is a pretty extraordinary athlete on the ice.  "She is a two-time All-American who works to improve her game," says Falcon Coach Joe Cranston. "She can play either forward or defense, depending on where I see her best helping our team."

Wallace has helped the Falcons to a 2-0-2 record so far this year. She has picked up two assists. Going into this season she had played in 78 games and scored 16 goals and 41 points. She has scored nine power-play goals and three game-winners. She was named to the CCM AHCA West All-America team as a sophomore when she scored seven goals and 20 points. Last year she repeated the feat after scoring eight goals and 19 points.

Wallace gives credit to her dad, Richard, and brother, John, for helping her start a hockey career. She grew up watching her older brother play the sport while her dad started taking her to open skating on Friday nights. After moving to a new town, her dad signed her up for hockey to meet new people. Wallace grew up playing baseball and soccer but after joining hockey has loved it ever since.

With hockey being such a team oriented sport, you might wonder how Wallace gets along with her teammates. Cranston says that she has a good relationship with the team because "she tells it like it is" and doesn't "sugar coat" anything.

"Wally", as some call her, feels that college hockey is a more intense and skillful game. She explains that there is more competition to fill spots on the team and if you don't stay on your game, you will most likely lose your spot. She also believes that she has improved in seeing the ice and reading where people are going to be.

Her biggest inspiration in her hockey career has been her family. Each member of the family supports her hockey goals. Her parents have always been willing to drive her to a hockey camps over the summer when she was at a younger age. "My dad always found camps for me when I was younger. He would travel to Canada with me to play in tournaments every summer. It's nice to be able to play hockey and have your family there to cheer you on all the time," says Wallace.

While off the ice, Wallace likes to go out and be with friends or spending time at home with her family. Her parents are Richard and Nancy Wallace. She has two older siblings, a sister, Nikki, and brother, John. They live on a small hobby farm in Buffalo, Minn., with horses, a pony, four cats, and three dogs. Wallace likes the color pink, ice cream, and TV shows like Friends, Sex and the City, Project Runway and Flavor of Love.

She is currently working on a business administration major with an emphasis in management. She plans on going back to school to study hotel management and interior design. "I would like to go to school in another state for awhile and get to experience a different location."

He is the winningest coach in UW-River Falls hockey history and that was accomplished in just six seasons. Freeman needs just one win to reach the 200 career win mark. He became the winningest coach in the shortest period of time than any other UW-RF hockey coach. His teams have averaged nearly 20 wins a season during his tenure. In the NCAA Div.

Freeman, a career coach, draws on his vast coaching experience from stops at the high school, Junior A and college levels to teach and motivate. He previously was a head coach/general manager in the United States Hockey League. He served as head coach at St. Mary's Springs High School where his team won a State championship. He also had great success at Stevens Point High School where his teams made several state tournament appearances. He led his teams to four conference championships. He has also coached select teams in international competition.

Tyler Kostiuk is in his senior season with the Falcons and gives the team solid play as a forward. Kostiuk is one of the top playmakers in small college hockey and has demonstrated those skills game in and game out. He shows his offensive flair in every game and provides the Falcons with offensive spark when it's needed. He has a talent for moving the puck up ice and has the ability to find the open player and get him the puck.  He sees the ice very well.

Jared Sailer returns for his senior season for the Falcons. He plays forward and has shown steady improvement throughout his UWRF career. Sailer is a big, powerful forward who has had two solid seasons. Even though he's one of the biggest players on the team, he has a great touch with the puck. Sailer uses his size and skills to be a regular in the Falcon lineup.

Personal: Harstad attended Moorhead High School where he was named to the all-conference team. He helped lead the team to a second place finish in the Minnesota State Tournament. He lists his biggest high school hockey thrill as playing in the Minnesota State Tournament. Harstad scored 11 goals and dished out 17 assists in 2004 for St. Louis of the USHL. He is the son of Mark and Carla and has two brothers. Harstad is majoring in bio-medical science.

Personal: While playing for Fairbanks of the NAHL in 2004, Usher was named the team’s top defenseman and put up 24 points (7-17). He helped lead the team to the NAHL playoffs. At Eden Prairie High School he was the team's captain in 2002 and a Great 8 participant. He also played in the Minnesota State Tournament. He was the president of the Friends Forever Club - an organization that gathered handicapped students with the general student population. He earned a spot on the Academic Honor Roll and was named to the All-Academic team. Usher also played on the high school football team that won the Minnesota State Championship. He lists his biggest high school hockey thrill as playing in the Minnesota State High School hockey tournament. He is the son of Dave and Randi and has one sister. Usher is majoring in psychology and business administration.

Personal: Hansberry played junior hockey at Wichita Falls of the NAHL. In 2005 he played 50 games and scored 16 goals and 33 points. He was the team's Unsung Hero Award winner in 2004 and was an alternate captain. In 2005 he was an alternate captain and earned honorable mention for the team's Player of the Week award. He lists his biggest junior hockey thrill as scoring two short-handed goals in the first round of the league playoffs against Texas. He is the son of Jeannette and Brian and has one brother and one sister. Hansberry is majoring in business administration.

Personal: Meyers played junior hockey at Bozeman of the NAHL. In 2005 he played in 41 games and finished with two goals and nine points. He won the team’s Best Defenseman award. At International Falls High School he was twice named to the all-conference team and twice won the defenseman Best Plus/Minus award. He earned a spot on the A Honor Roll. Meyers lists his biggest high school hockey thrill as playing in the Minnesota State Tournament. He is the son of Tina and Kelly and has one sister. Meyers is majoring in conservation.

Personal: Robinson played junior hockey at Lincoln in the USHL last year. In 2005 he played in 46 games and scored one goal and finished with two points. Before that he was a captain at Danville, a team also in the USHL. He is the son of Robin and Ron and has two brothers and two sisters. Robinson is majoring in business management.

Personal: Underwood played junior hockey at Helena and was the team's captain. He was named the team's Most Improved Player in his rookie season. He earned the team's Hitman and Most Inspiration awards for three straight years. He lists his biggest junior hockey thrill as scoring a hat trick, with a game-winning goal, in the league playoffs. He is the son of Rachel and Darrell and has one brother and one sister. Underwood is majoring in physics and math.

Tom Flikeid is in his first season with the Falcons in 2006-07 and plays forward. He played junior hockey at Alberni Valley of the British Columbia Hockey League where his was named the Bulldog’s Unsung Hero. He attended Lakeville High School and lists his biggest hockey thrill as playing in the Minnesota State High School Hockey Tournament. Flikeid was named to the all-conference team, named Lakeville’s Most Valuable Player and Offensive Player of the Year. He is the son of Bill and Patti and has one brother. Flikeid is undecided on a major field of study.

Jim Jensen joins the Falcons for his second year of college hockey. He transfers to UWRF from UM-Duluth and plays defense. He played at Waterloo of the USHL where he was the team captain in the 2004-05 season after serving as an assistant captain in the 2002-03 campaign. He earned honorable mention to the all-conference hockey team at Hill-Murray High School. He also earned letters in football and track & field. He lists his biggest high school hockey thrill as beating White Bear Lake in front of a packed house at the State Fairgrounds coliseum to qualify for the Minnesota State tournament. He is the son of Dianne and Jim and has two brothers. Jensen is majoring in journalism.

Mitch Kerns joins the Falcons for his first year of collegiate hockey and will play forward for the 2006-07 Falcons. He played at both Omaha of the USHL and Billings of the NAHL. At Bills he led the team in goals in 2005-06. At Stoughton High School he was named to the All-State team three times and was his team’s Most Valuable Player twice. He led the team in points was named to the first all-conference team three times. He lists his biggest junior hockey thrills as traveling to Alaska and other states and meeting new people. He is the son of Kathy and Richard and has two brothers and three sisters. Kerns is undecided on a major field of study.

Matt Page is in his first year of college hockey and will play goalie for the Falcons in 2006-07. At New Richmond High School he was named to the Wisconsin All-State team for three straight seasons. As a sophomore he was named to the All-Tournament team after helping the Tigers to a runner-up finish in the WIAA Tournament. Page was named to the all-conference team three times. He lists his biggest high school hockey thrill as playing in the state championship game. He is the son of Annette and Kelly Erickson and has one brother and one sister. Page is majoring in business administration.

Tony Stoehr joins the Falcons for his first season of collegiate hockey and plays goalie. At Michigan in the North Ontario Junior Hockey league he was the team’s Most Valuable Player, he was named to the first All-Star team and was named the league’s Most Valuable Player. At DePere High School he was the team’s and conference’s Most Valuable Player. Stoehr was named to the all-conference team and helped his team to the Chicago Showcase championships. He was named to the academic honor roll four times. He lists his biggest junior hockey thrill as winning Game 6 in three overtimes to advance to the playoff final series. Stoehr is the son of Stephanie and Patrick and he has one brother. He is majoring in broad field social studies.

Jeff Stone is in his first year with the Falcons and plays defense. He played junior hockey at both Billings in the NAHL and Sioux Falls in the USHL. He was an assistant captain and was named the team’s Most Valuable Defenseman at Sioux Falls. At Forest Lake High School he was named to the all-conference team, was the team’s captain and was named the team’s Most Valuable Defensive Player. He was named to the academic honor roll for three years. He lists his biggest junior hockey thrills as playing in front of 5,500 fans and advancing to the division playoff championships. He is the son of Kathy and Bob and he has two sisters. Stone is majoring in business administration.

The Falcons were able to kill off the rest of the penalty. UWS then took a minor penalty and Jared Sailer tied the game at 15:02 with a power-play goal. It was his fourth goal of the season and he was assisted by Harstad and Jim Henkemeyer. The Falcons had a 17-7 advantage in the period.

Tyler Kostiuk finally got the Falcons on the scoreboard with an unassisted goal with 4:03 to play in the third period. With goalie AJ Bucchino on the bench in favor of a sixth attacker, Derek Hansberry scored his team leading 16th goal of the season with just 42 second to play. TJ Dahl picked up the assist.

The Falcons scored two goals in the final two minutes of the game. Harstad got his second of the game and fourth of the season at 18:00 with an assist to Mitch Kerns. Hansberry got his 14th goal of the season into an empty net with 50 seconds to play. He was assisted by Dahl.

With 1:56 to go in the first period the Falcons were called for a five minute major checking from behind penalty. They got through the rest of the period with no damage. Then just 14 seconds into the second period, the Falcons picked up a two-minute minor penalty and successfully killed off the UST two-man advantage.

Baldwin scored his first collegiate goal. Mitch Kerns and AJ Bucchino got the assists. BU came back to take a two goal lead with just 22 seconds to go in the third period when the Royals scored their third power-play goal of the game. Kent Bostrom got the goal.

AJ Bucchino started in goal and played two-thirds of the game. Bucchino made 16 saves while only allowing one goal. His record in net matches the Falcon overall record and improves to 11-2-0. Tony Stoehr played the third period in goal for River Falls and made nine saves while allowing one score.

Henkemeyer put the Falcons in front early with a power-play goal 3:54 into the game. Henkemeyer was assisted on the score by Jim Jensen and Tyler Kostiuk. St. Norbert tied the game at one midway through the period via Marc Belanger's power play score. The first would come to a close with the score knotted at one which would be the same score at the end of the second.

The Falcons took a penalty with 2:11 to play and with about a minute to play SNC pulled its goal for an extra attacker. But the Falcon penalty killers kept the Green Knight power-play off the scoreboard.

Both teams went scoreless through the first period but the Falcons had a 19-5 advantage in shots. The second period was when the Falcons did their damage as they were able to jump out to a 3-0 lead. Dahl found the net first 7:30 into the period with a power-play goal, assisted by Jim Henkemeyer. With the score, Dahl has now successfully gotten a point in all nine of the Falcon games. RF scored again just under three minutes later thanks to Jim Jensen's power-play goal. Jensen was assisted on the play by Dahl. Tyler Kostiuk got into the scoring column at the 13:05 mark, assisted by Mitch Kerns. The Falcons skated into the break with the shutout in tact.

The third did not bring much offense to either team yet Lake Forest was able to sneak in a power play goal 12:44 into the period via Tyler Canal. The power play goal was the first allowed by the Falcons in the last 37 opponent power play opportunities.

Tyler Kostiuk started the scoring for the Falcons early with his fourth goal of the season at 5:01. Kostiuk was assisted on the score by Wade Harstad and Jim Jensen. RF went into the break with a 1-0 advantage over the Pointers.

UWEC tied the game at 2:18 of the second period when Mike Schneider scored his first goal of the season. But it took the Falcons just 16 seconds to take the lead back. Derek Hansberry scored what proved to be the game-winner at 2:34 with an assist to TJ Dahl. It was Hansberry's fourth goal of the season. Dahl has picked up at least one point in all seven Falcon games this season.

Despite the win, the Falcons suffered a loss early in the second period when defender Chris Robinson found himself flying head first into the boards. Robinson was on the ice for several minutes before being rolled off on a stretcher to receive ambulance care. Robinson was hit into the boards by SJU's Gabriel Harren who received a checking from behind major along with a game misconduct, removing him from the rest of the game. Robinson left the rink on his own power following the game.

SJU got on the board first in the first period thanks to a goal from Matt Wocken 7:28 in. RF battled back just over three minutes later when Mitch Kerns put in an unassisted goal. Kerns now has two scores on the season.

The Falcons Tyler Kostiuk scored the only goal of the second period on a power play with 2:57 left in the period, assisted by Dustin Norman. Kostiuk's goal is his third of the season and proved to be the game winner.

Dustin Norman got the puck sliding for RF as he knocked in a goal just :24 into the game. Norman's score was his second of the season and it was assisted by Jordan McIntyre and Wade Harstad. The Falcons ended the period with the one goal advantage.

Henkemeyer made an appearance in the scoring column for a second time 8:48 into the third period on a power play. His second score of the game was also his third goal of the season. The goal was assisted by Norman and Dahl. With the insurance goal in the bag, the Falcons skated to a 3-1 win and extend their winning streak to three.

RF jumped out to an early lead when TJ Dahl got his first goal of the season, assisted by Pat Borgestad and Jason Usher. Lawrence would knot the game at one 5:25 later as Aaron LaFave put the puck in the net. The Falcons would take the lead again at 9:41 when Jordan McIntrye scored his first collegiate goal. The Vikings would not go away as they scored again with only three seconds remaining in the period, this time via Masa Takahashi.

Borgestad would put the Falcons back on top 12:05 into the second with his first goal of the year, Dahl and Derek Hansberry were on the assist. RF doubled its lead with 1:37 remaining in the period thanks to Tyler Kostiuk's score, assisted by Jim Jensen and Sean Pettinger. The second would come to a close with a two goal Falcon advantage.

The third period would turn out to be the most intense as Lawerence was able to battle back. Aaron LaFave tapped in a score :22 into the period for the Vikings to cut the RF lead to one. Joe Searl got the equalizer for Lawrence as he netted a goal at 12:16. Following the goal, Falcon goaltender Tony Stoehr was pulled in favor of AJ Bucchino. With Freeman's 200th win in the balance, Falcon veterans took the initiative to find a "W". Dahl scored his second goal of the game at 14:10 which proved to be the game winner. Borgestad and Hansberry assisted on the play, giving Borgestad three points in the game to lead all Falcons. Dustin Norman sealed the deal for Freeman and the Falcons with a rebound goal at 18:22, assisted by Skylar Christoffersen and Wade Harstad.

Stohr played all but 7:44 in goal for the Falcons and did not come out with his best game. He stopped 18 shots while allowing four goals. Bucchino finished the game in goal and tallied three saves. Bucchino's record improves to 1-1 on the season.

EC jumped out to the early lead when Tyler Trudell popped in a goal at 13:02. River Falls battled back five minutes later when Jim Henkemeyer knocked in a power play goal, assisted TJ Dahl. The first period came to a close with the score knotted at one.

The third period brought more scoring early from Evan Byers at 9:21. River Falls made one last attempt on a power play to get the game close and were successful. Mitch Kerns knocked in his first collegiate goal for the Falcons at 11:58. The game would be close the rest of the way but the Falcons came up short of an equalizer.

The main focus this season will be on the Falcons returning front line. Sophomore forward Derek Hansberry leads the attack after leading River Falls in scoring last season. Hansberry recorded 33 points with 18 goals and 15 assists. Eleven of his goals came on the power play and he was named to the first All-NCHA and All-WIAC teams. Joining him will be line mate TJ Dahl who returns for his third season with the Falcons. Dahl was second on the team in scoring with 30, a majority of his points came from assists where he led the team with 21. Junior Pat Borgestad also returns and supplies another scoring threat up front. Borgestad knotted 26 points in 2006 while being second on the team in goals with 13. He earned honorable mention to the All-NCHA team. The Falcons also will see the return of sophomore Dustin Norman who finished the 2006 season with an injury after netting six goals and 17 points.

He finished third in the nation in save percentage and ninth in goals against average. Bucchino will be the only goalie the Falcons have with any experience after the graduation of seniors Dan Meneghin and Andy Scanlon.

The Falcons once young team now looks to pack the punch of a solid and experienced veteran hockey team. With the return of their top four scorers, along with the stellar play of Bucchino in the net, the Falcons look to have not only one of the best squads in the NCHA, but in the nation.

He plays well in both ends of the rink, has had back-to-back outstanding seasons and is one of the team's top scholars. That combination has made him a valuable member of the 2006-07 Falcon hockey team.

"Derek was a big surprise for us last year," said Falcon Coach Steve Freeman. "We knew he was a good hockey player - we just didn't know that he would be able to contribute so well in his first year. He came through in a big way."

"My hockey strengths are that I am a team player and that I work hard in both ends of the ice. I think I also see the ice well," said Hansberry in an interview last Friday. "I want to give a consistent effort every night, score some goals and put my best foot forward in every game."

Hansberry has been a model of consistency for the Falcons. Last year he had the longest point-scoring streak on the team (12 games) and had at least one point in 22 of the team's 27 games. And this year has been much the same as he has scored at least one point in 12 of the team's 17 games to date.

Hansberry is pleased with the way the Falcon season as progressed so far but knows that there are a lot of games left on the schedule. The Falcons are 5-0-1 in NCHA play and in second place, trailing first place UW-Stout by only one point. They are ahead of third place St. Norbert by only one point. The Falcons have eight games remaining.

"Our first game of the year was not good, but after that we knew what we had to do. So far I'm happy with how the season has gone. Every game is huge - it doesn't matter which team we're playing - they all mean two points in standings. We've got to keep working hard each week no matter what happens. We're only as good as our last game."

Hansberry started playing roller hockey at home in Arvada, Col., when he was nine years old. "Eventually I had to chose between playing football and hockey. The doctors told me I wasn't big enough to play football so I played hockey. No one knew at the time how physical hockey was, but it's worked out great in the long run."

He helped the Arvada Midget team win two Silver Sticks National tournament championships. He eventually played junior hockey with Wichita Falls of the NAHL and fondly remembers scoring twice to help his team win a playoff game. Another lasting memory is when he scored midway through the third period against St. Norbert a few weeks ago. That goal tied the game at the time (2-2) and the Falcons went on to beat the then No. 1 ranked Green Knights, 3-2.

"Our goals are to win the regular season NCHA title and I believe that we have a team that can win a national title. We have the talent to do that," said Hansberry of the team's goals this season. Asked to describe the Falcons using just two or three words Hansberry picked, "cohesive and hard working."

Hansberry has hopes of playing more hockey after his days at UWRF are done. "I'd like to play a couple of more years. You can never rule out the NHL, but coming from a small school the chances are slim. But I would like to play at the pro level - to have that experience."

The business administration major says that one day he would also like to open his own gym. Hansberry is a leader in the classroom. He was named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll and earned Dean's List honors after the fall and spring semesters last year. He is the son of Jeannette and Brian and has one older brother, Jerry, and a younger sister, Arlis.

So far in the 2006-07 campaign, Henkemeyer has unloaded on goalies while leading the Falcon power play. Henkemeyer is tied for third on the team with 17 points made up of eight goals and nine assists. He has been a key component of the lethal Falcon power play with seven goals and nine assists. He has 16 power-play points and that leads the team.

Bucchino went on to play juniors at Des Moines where he had a 3.52 goals against average and a .909 save percentage in his first season. Following one year of juniors, Bucchino moved on to play Div. I hockey at the University of New Hampshire. Bucchino went back to Des Moines in 2004 before deciding on coming to River Falls.

"Div. III hockey is the best in the West and that made my decision easy to come to River Falls," said Bucchino. "The coaches were interested in getting me a lot of playing time which let me know that I wanted to be a Falcon."

Bucchino's best memory as a Falcon was the team's recent win over St. Norbert, 3-2. The Green Knights were ranked No. 1 in the country as the No. 6 ranked Falcons showed up and played extremely well, especially Bucchino. He made 36 saves - several came while the Falcons were skating short handed against a St. Norbert power play that entered the game converting on over 30 percent of their power play opportunities.

With only two seniors on the Falcon men's hockey team, the younger players are expected to step up and play big. Luckily for the Falcons, TJ Dahl is one of those younger players and just might have the most talent on the squad.

Dahl grew up in Burnsville, Minn., and was a threat on the ice from the start. In his senior year at Apple Valley High School, Dahl helped lead the team to a 25-1 record while earning honorable mention to the all-conference squad.

"I'll miss the games a lot," said Dahl of what he will miss the most after leaving the Falcons. "But I'll mostly miss the friends I have made and just hanging out with the guys in the locker room everyday and sharing laughs."

So far in his junior season Dahl leads the team in both goals and assists. He has five goals through eight games to go along with 10 assists. His 15 total points thus far puts him well on pace to break his previous season high of 30.

"Being selected team captain was a huge honor for me. I want to be a player who is looked up to and I am really excited about stepping into the captain role and hopefully giving the team great leadership throughout the season both on and off the ice."

Dahl likes to watch and follow the Minnesota Wild. "My brother is the biggest Minnesota Wild fan ever and he's also my roommate. I have to be a Wild fan or else there would be trouble at the house," Dahl joked.

"I want to win a National Championship this year hands down," said Dahl of his season goals. "I am really confident with the core of players we have this year. I would like to win the NCHA tile as well."

"We are a deeper than we have ever been since I have been here," said Sailer. "It is a good head to toe team. It's nice being a senior this year because the leadership role comes into play and we can help the young guys out. They are fitting in really well with this team."

So far in the 2006-07 campaign, the Falcons are 3-1 and going strong. Sailer has played in two games and has yet to crack the box score. Don't plan on this being the case all season as Sailer is an offensive force.

"I'll definitely miss the hockey," said Sailer of what he will miss following graduation. "You never know how much more hockey you're going to be playing. This could be the last year and we will go from there."

Kostiuk grew up in Cranbrook, B.C., and learned the game from his two brothers. There was a hockey rink in the backyard and Kostiuk was part of it. Every moment of free time was spent cutting up the ice and handling the puck.

With Fernie, Kostiuk played brilliantly. He met then Fernie teammate and now Falcon teammate Jared Sailor and formed a bond. The start of juniors was a learning experience for Kostiuk and he was forced to learn fast. As an 18-year-old rookie, Kostiuk's team made it to the National Championship Tournament.

The WIAC Max Sparger Scholar-Athlete Award is the most prestigious academic award given by the WIAC. In order to be nominated for the award a student-athlete must have a minimum 3.25 grade point average, be in the last year of comeptition, or on schedule to graduate this academic year and have competed for a minimum of two years. The award is named after Max Sparger, who served as the WIAC Commissioner for 22 years.

The John Oostendorp Memorial Award was established in 1977 by the Oostendorp family following the death of Dr. John Oostendorp in 1976. Oostendorp, a member of the UW-RF faculty, was one of the team's most dedicated fans, and a scholastic mentor to many members. The award is presented annually to the hockey player with the highest scholastic average.

The Falcons fell behind, 1-0, in the semifinals when Fredonia scored just eight seconds into the game. Brandon Ferraro and Brian Wilson scored first periods goals. Russ Johnson and Jeremy Jeannette scored in the third with Jeannette getting the game-winner. Goalie Ron Gullett made 12 saves and the Falcons had a 46-15 advantage in shots on goal.

The Falcons jumped out to a 3-0 lead in the title game, but it was a close contest after that. Chris Brown and Ferraro scored power-play goals in the first period. Dan Carney made it a 3-0 game in the second period. Greg Christenson also scored in the second, but UWS scored twice, the second with jsut 12 seconds to play, before the period was over. Johnson scored in the third and Wilson netted the final goal to secure the win.

During his 12-year span as an assistant coach, Berkhof has held many responsibilities. He has coordinated the Falcon recruiting efforts, directed the Falcon summer basketball camps, and organized scouting / film exchange. He has also had numerous administrative duties and on the floor coaching responsibilities.

The Hills, Minn., native received his masters of education degree in sport management at the University of Minnesota in 2005. He completed his bachelor of science degree at UW-River Falls with a major in physical education and a minor in athletic coaching in 1994. Berkhof is an instructor in the health and human performance department at UW-River Falls.

Pedro Renta is back with the Falcon coaching staff after spending the past three seasons as the head high school coach at Ellsworth, Wis. Renta was a volunteer assistant for three seasons with the Falcons from 2000-03.

Along with his on-the-floor coaching duties, Renta will be involved with recruiting, scouting, and player development and will coordinate the academic monitoring program. Renta, who has worked various basketball camps throughout the Midwest, will also direct the Falcon summer basketball camps.

The Elk River, Minn. native graduated with a degree in health and human performance from UW-River Falls in 2005 and is currently working on his masters of education degree at the University of Minnesota. Sagan lives in River Falls.

High School/Personal: At Hastings High School Kelly averaged 15 points and six rebounds per game as a senior. He was a three-year letter winner and two-year starter for the Raiders. Kelly was twice named to the all-conference team. He was named to the A Honor Roll all four years of high school. He is the son of Julie and Mike Kelly and has one sister. He is majoring in business administration.

High School/Personal: Pearson attended Memorial High School in Eau Claire and was academic All-Big Rivers and earned honorable mention to the all-conference squad. He is the son of Thomas Pearson. He has two brothers and four sisters. He is majoring in biology.

High School/Personal: Rondeau averaged 10 points, eight rebounds, two assists and three blocks a game at Grand Rapids High School. He helped lead Grand Rapids to two conference titles and a third place finish in the Minnesota State tournament in 2002. He is the son of Kelly and Timothy Rondeau. He has one brother and one sister. Rondeau is majoring in conservation.

High School/Personal: At River Falls High School he averaged 14 points, six rebounds and three assists a game in 2004. The Wildcats won the regional title and reached the section finals. He earned three letters and started for two seasons. He was named to the All-Big River Conference team and played in the Western Wisconsin All-Star Classic. He is the son of Ann and Mike Elling and he has one sister. He is majoring in landscape design.

High School/Personal: Deonte Compton earned All-Minneapolis Conference honors the past two seasons.  Averaged 14 points and six assists per game as a senior.  He led the Tigers in assists and steals in his junior and senior campaigns.  He was one of the team's captains in 2005 and 2006.  Compton graduated with academic honors and participated in the city student government program. Compton is the son of Tabitha Compton. He is majoring in business management.

The Falcons fought hard on the road but were unable to close out Platteville as they lost 65-61. Jontae Koonkaew hit a three-pointer with 37 seconds left in the game that inched the Falcons to within one point at 62-61 but they were unable to score again.

Nate Robertson led the Falcons 13 points and four blocks. He also chipped in seven rebounds. Erik Olson came off the bench to add 12 points on 4-8 shooting from the field. Koonkaew finished with 10 points on 4-9 shooting, including 2-3 from behind the arc. Scott Kelly had a well-rounded game, finishing with seven points, eight rebounds and four assists.

Platteville doubled their lead to 12 points with 10:43 to go in the second half. The Falcons battled back with a 19-8 run capped by a Koonkaew three-pointer that put them behind by just a point with 37 seconds to go in the game. Three made free throws by the Pioneers to close out the game sealed the deal and extended the Falcons losing streak to three games.

Jontae Koonkaew led the Falcons with 23 points on 8-20 shooting. He also chipped in nine rebounds and four assists. Nate Robertson tallied 15 points and ten rebounds for sixth double-double of the season. Tim Pearson started and recorded 14 points and nine rebounds.

Stevens Point came out shooting and never stopped, rolling to a 106-61 victory over the Falcons to remain unbeaten in the WIAC and maintain their #1 ranking on the D3Hoop.com Division III poll. The Falcons fell behind out of the gates and were unable to recover from a three-point shooting barrage put on by the Pointers.

Jontae Koonkaew led the Falcons with 16 points on 5-9 shooting from the field and 5-7 shooting from the line. Courtney Davis chipped in nine points, nine rebounds and two steals. Ryan Thompson added seven points, three assists and two rebounds. Erik Olson led the Falcons with eight points.

The Falcons hit a wall in the shooting department against Stevens Point, an area they are usually very strong in. Coming into the game the Falcons were shooting just a hair under 50 percent as a team, against the Pointers they were only able to shoot at a 35 percent clip. The Falcons made only five three-pointers against Stevens Point. On the season they average nearly nine a game.

Turnovers hurt the Falcons as well as they committed 19 compared to the Pointers six. The Falcons turnovers resulted in 28 points for the Pointers. The six turnovers by the Pointers only resulted in five points for the Falcons.

The improved defense play from the Falcons in  recent games took a hit from the hot-shooting Pointers today. The Pointers shot 51 percent on the night and became the third Falcon opponent to top the 100-point mark. Thirty-six of Pointers 76 shots came from behind the arc. They were able to make 16 of them for 44 percent on the day.

Koonkaew finished with a game-high 20 points, four assists, three steals and three rebounds. After struggling in the first half and going only 1-6 from the field, Thompson emerged in second half to score 11 points down the stretch. He finished with 14 points on 5-11 shooting, including 4-8 from the three-point arc. Courtney Davis chipped in 14 points, three assists and two steals. Nate Robertson enjoyed a good night, finishing with 12 points, nine rebounds and four assists. Erik Olson provided a lift of the bench for the Falcons, hitting some big shots when needed and finishing with 8 points on 3-4 shooting.

The Falcons once again shot well and defended well. They shot 52 percent on the game, and help the Blue Devils to just under 42 percent shooting on the night. The Falcons did struggle on the boards, being out rebounded 38-28, including giving up 15 offensive rebounds to the Blue Devils.

A technical foul on the bench with .4 seconds left on the clock and the Falcons leading 71-69 led to two made free throws by the Warhawks' Anthony Mlachnik which subsequently forced overtime and an eventual 91-86 loss for the Falcons. It was a bad break for the Falcons in which was an otherwise exceptional performance on the road against the defending WIAC champs.

The Falcons were led in scoring by Courtney Davis and Nate Robertson who each totaled 19 points on the afternoon. Robertson added four rebounds and a block and Davis chipped in seven rebounds. Ryan Thompson enjoyed his first double-double of the season, totaling 18 points and 10 assists. He was 6-10 from the field, including 4-8 from the three-point line. Jontae Koonkaew contributed 14 points and Tim Pearson added seven points, three assists and three rebounds off the bench.

Troubled by foul trouble all afternoon the Falcons were forced to play a little more passive than they would prefer at the end of the second half and in overtime. Robertson fouled out in overtime and Koonkaew, Davis and Kelly were hampered with four fouls apiece through much of the second half and in overtime. The Falcons shot 60.7 percent from the field. They had 17 turnovers and gave up 16 offensive rebounds to the Warhawks.

The Falcons rebounded from a tough overtime loss to St. Thomas last weekend and are now just one game under .500 heading into the second half of the WIAC season. They put together a strong game both offensively and defensively Tuesday night at Karges Center in beating Finlandia, 93-54.

UST's Alex McCoy scored what proved to be the winning points with :46 to go in overtime. He hit a lay up and was fouled. He made the free throw to give the Tommies the 87-84 lead. The Falcons had the ball with 11 seconds to play but got only a desperation shot off.

The Golden Bears put on a shooting clinic in front of their home crowd, knocking down 17-23 three-point attempts. The Falcons had five players score in double figures but it wasn't enough against the dead-eye shooting of the Golden Bears.

Nate Robertson led the way for the Falcons with 15 points and six rebounds. Ryan Thompson added 12 points to go along with four assists and two rebounds. Jontae Koonkaew starting for the third consecutive game, scored 12 points on 3-6 shooting from behind the arc. Courtney Davis pulled down six rebounds and chipped in 11 points on 5-6 free-throw shooting. Tim Pearson gave the Falcons a spark off the bench with 10 points and three rebounds.

The Falcons got reacquainted with the win column after three consecutive losses to tough conference opponents. Courtney Davis led the Falcons with 21 points and eight rebounds. 17 of his points came in an electric second half for the Falcons in which they scored a season-high 61 points in a half. It was also the third time the high-scoring Falcons have topped 90 points in game this season. Last year they were unable to reach that mark once.

The Falcons got a balanced effort in a game where every Falcon player received court time. Nate Robertson chipped in 16 points, three rebounds and two blocks. Jontae Koonkaew started for the second time this year had a well-rounded game, finishing with nine points, six assists, six rebounds and three steals. Ryan Thompson and Scott Kelly knocked down three three-pointers apiece while scoring 13 and 11 points respectively. Tim Pearson came off the bench to add six points, four rebounds and one block in 21 minutes of work. 11 players scored for the Falcons in their victory.

The Falcons were only up by four going into the second half but quickly increased their lead to 20 a little under seven minutes into the second half. The Falcons had an all-around great shooting night, both from the line and from the field. They knocked down 22-25 free-throws, 10-19 three-pointers and shot an overall 50.8 percent from the field, including 62.2 percent in the second half. They also stayed away from foul trouble, tallying only ten fouls in the game.

Zach Ryan's layup with two seconds left in the game put the Blugolds up by one and slammed the door on a marvelous performance by Falcons Jontae Koonkaew in the closing minutes. It was a close battle all night in a game consisting of seven ties and nine lead changes. The Falcons Tim Pearson, in his return to his hometown of Eau Claire, played a solid game but couldn't put the icing on the cake with a half court miss in the closing seconds.

Courtney Davis started out hot for the Falcons, scoring 11 points in the first half. He cooled down in the second half, finishing with 15 points on 7-13 shooting to go along with five rebounds. Koonkaew blew up in the final seven minutes of the game, scoring 12 points including a three-point play that put the Falcons up 62-61 with seven seconds to play. He finished the game with 15 points and four assists. Ryan Thompson was hot from the behind the arc all night, making 4-7 to finish with 12 points on the night. Nate Robertson was strong inside with 12 points, six rebounds and three blocks but continued to struggle from the line, going 2-7.

Dan Beyer and Blugolds leading scorer Jared Bardon led the team with 16 points apiece. Zach Ryan finished with 12 points, including the game-winner and three assists. Steve Hoelzel also enjoyed a strong game with six points, nine rebounds and four assists.

The Falcons, led by Davis jumped to an early 24-13 edge with seven minutes to play in the first half. The Blugolds went on a 12-4 run to cut the deficit to 28-25 at halftime. The Blugolds were able to take the lead early in the second half and increase it to eights points with ten minutes to go in the second half. The Falcons took the lead again 53-52 with four minutes to play but weren't able to maintain it in the end.

The Falcons men's basketball team kicked off their WIAC season with a convincing 90-65 victory over Superior on Wednesday night. The Falcons were able to supplement their high octane offense with good team defense and low turnovers in route to their second victory of the season. It was the second time this year that the Falcons were able to tally 90 or more points in a game.

Courtney Davis led the Falcons with 25 points, 7 rebounds and 4 steals. Davis also excelled from the line, knocking down 7-8 free throws down the stretch. Ryan Thompson added 13 points to go along with a game-high 8 assists. Nate Robertson had another strong game in the middle for the Falcons, finishing with 15 points, 8 rebounds and 2 blocks. The Falcons shot a combined 8-18 from three-point range, getting two apiece from Davis, Jontae Koonkaew and Erik Olson. The Falcons also got a very balanced scoring attack, having seven players score eight or more points.

The Falcons led 48-36 at halftime but immediately jumped on Superior to begin the second half. They went on a 10-2 run in the first four minutes to go up by 20 points. A three-pointer by Olson about halfway through the half sealed the deal and increased the Falcons lead to a game-high 33 points.

James Nobles led Superior with 18 points and 14 rebounds. Leonard Cobb came into the game averaging 24.3 points and 11.3 rebounds a game for Superior. The Falcons were able to stiffle Cobb, who ended up with 4 points and 5 rebounds in 16 minutes of play due to foul trouble. As the Falcons went on their second half run, Cobb fouled out of the game, helping the Falcons further their lead.

Jontae Koonkaew provided a spark off the bench for the second consecutive night, scoring 16 points and going 7-7 from the line. Ryan Thompson chipped in 12 points and Tim Pearson added 11 for the Falcons. The Royals jumped on the Falcons early, leading by 27 points at the end of the first half. It was a hole the Falcons were unable to dig themselves out of. The Royals worked hard on the glass, outrebounding the Falcons 35-18. It was truly a tale of two halves for the Falcons as they shot 39 percent in the first half compared to 60 percent in the second half.

The balanced effort the Falcons were able to get last night, the Royals were able to get tonight. They had six players score in double figures, led by Andy Cook's 16 points and 5 rebounds. Guard Cory Laugen also put up a strong game, scoring 14 points to go along with a game-high 7 assists.

The Falcons got off to the quick start they were hoping for with a strong victory over William Penn in their opening game in the Bethel Tip-Off Tournament. Junior guard Ryan Thompson led all scorers with 22 points. Six players scored in double figures for the Falcons while two freshmen played large roles in the victory.

The Falcons found themselves behind the charity stripe often against William Penn, going a combined 36-51. Thompson scored more than half of his points from the line, going 12-16. Freshman guard Jontae Koonkaew provided a spark off the bench for the Falcons, scoring 20 points and shooting 3-6 from behind the arc in his first collegiate game. Freshman big man Nate Robertson also enjoyed success in his first collegiate game, scoring 12 points while grabbing 10 rebounds. Junior guard Courtney Davis added help inside, grabbing 9 rebounds to go along with 18 points. Junior forwards Scott Kelly and Tim Pearson also contributed, scoring 11 and 10 points respectively.

The team will look to start anew after the retirement of Head Coach Rick Bowen and having to replace three starters from last season, including Hans Hoeg, the Falcons leading scorer and rebounder the last two years.

The Falcons hope to rally together this season with strong team chemistry and an influx of new talent. Eight new players will put on a Falcon uniform this season, six of them freshmen. It will be a season of opportunity for many of them to play and showcase their talent.

Bowen hands the baton to interim Coach Jeff Berkhof, a 12-year assistant under Bowen. For the last nine seasons Berkhof has been Bowen's top assistant. He will be looking to place an emphasis on sound defense and rebounding along with an offense that will try to bring out the strengths of his players. Besides having major personnel losses, the team has also experienced a rough stretch the last two seasons. After the memorable 2003-04 campaign in which the Falcons won 20 games in route to their first WIAC Championship in over 50 years, the team has stumbled a bit the last two seasons.

Bowen stepped down this off-season as coach to become the full-time UWRF athletic director. In his 20 seasons as the head coach, Bowen compiled a 265-249 record and a conference title in 2003-04. The last two seasons haven't been as memorable, as the Falcons have went a combined 14-36, including 6-19 last season. Berkhof believes that last year's team was not as bad as the record would imply. "We were a pretty solid team the second half of the season, we just lost a lot of close games and we played a very demanding non-conference schedule early in the season," said Berkhof. The Falcons lost a total of five games last season by three points or less. If the Falcons win those games they are just a hair under .500 on the season. In 2006-07, the Falcons hope to be on the other side of those close games.

Berkhof shares many of the coaching philosophies of Bowen, including the motion offense, but he also wants to infuse a few of his own strategies. He would like to take the concepts of the motion offense and tweak it some. Berkhof feels that the team has got to be fundamentally strong and solid defensively to be successful. "We have to win the games within the game of basketball which to us includes three things: points in the paint, rebounds and limiting turnovers."

So far in practice, Berkhof has noticed many things that have him excited about his first season as head coach. With the loss of eight players from last season, Berkhof has the job of figuring out who his contributors are going to be this year. His two returning starters are locks to play huge roles this year but other than that many players can expect to see time. Even the large crop of this year's freshmen class will be called upon to perform. One thing has been evident to Berkhof this year, all his players are hungry to win and basketball is very important to them.

The team returns two starters in juniors Scott Kelly and Ryan Thompson. Thompson, playing the point position, led the WIAC in assists last season (112) while averaging 6.1 points per game. He was also named the team's Most Improved Player and earned a spot on the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll. He hopes to have a break out season as a junior. Kelly, a 6-5 forward, started 15 games last season, averaging 4.2 points per game. He averaged nearly 20 minutes a game as a sophomore last season and should expect to see that number sprout in 2006. Berkhof will be looking to them, junior forward Tim Pearson and junior college transfer Courtney Davis to serve as leaders this season.

Nathan Robertson, a 6-7 freshman forward from Forest Lake High School, will be looked upon to provide some solid play in the middle early in his Falcon career. A large void was left in the Falcons big man department this season with the departure of center Ryan Zylstra. "Nate's going to be thrown to the wolves this year," said Berkhof.  Junior forward Cory Rondeau will team up with Robertson on the inside.

What the Falcons are lacking in experience they should make up for with speed, hustle and teamwork. Returning players look to lead the younger players by example. "We have a good group of returning players and new guys. We seem to have pretty good team chemistry right now, a close knit bunch of guys who are excited about the season and want to do well together," said Berkhof.

Berkhof has his eyes set high this season. Making the NCAA Tournament is the No. 1 goal in 2006. "That will be our goal every season, everybody wants to play in March Madness." If it takes them winning the WIAC Tournament at the end of the regular season or getting an at-large bid, Berkhof just wants to get there.

So far this season Trimbo has played in seven games, averaging just under a point and .4 rebounds a game. But Trimbo's importance to the team is beyond statistics and minutes. His no quit attitude and commitment to the team lead by example on a very young Falcon roster.

"Rory comes to practice everyday and works extremely hard. He hasn't played much, but he never complains, works hard and does his best to the make the other bigs on the team better," said Falcon Head Coach Jeff Berkhof.

At 6-6 and 250 pounds, Trimbo provides the Falcons with size and depth in the middle. With fellow big man Nate Robertson out to such an explosive start this season and backup Cory Rondeau playing well, minutes have been hard to come by for Trimbo. But with two years of eligibility left after this season, Trimbo's time will eventually come to play important minutes for the Falcons.

Trimbo strongest performance of this season came against Finlandia when he logged six minutes of work, made a very pretty hook shot, snared a rebound and made a tremendous block that brought the crowd at Karges Center to its feet.

Trimbo played basketball on and off as a child but didn't play organized basketball until the eighth grade. The son of Julie and Steve Trimbo, Rory gives his parents a lot of credit in helping him develop his game. "They put me in basketball when I was little but as I got older they left those decisions to me if I wanted to play or not." Once he decided he wanted play, his parents did all they could to assist him in his ambitions.

Only a sophomore, Trimbo is a veteran on this year's makeover roster from last season. He is one of only seven players left from the Falcons 16-man roster from last season. Trimbo is encouraged from what he sees from the new faces on this year's team and sees a lot of potential both this season and in seasons to come for the Falcons.

"I think we have a lot of talent this year and I think we have the ability to able to beat anybody we play. We've played a lot of good teams and we've been with them right until the end," Trimbo said.

Trimbo is also one of nine underclassmen on this year's team who look to provide many great moments for Falcons fans in the years to come. Trimbo thinks this year's class has the ability to do very big things.

The Falcons, who currently stand at 7-9 overall and 2-5 in the WIAC, have lost some very close games that could have gone either way. For a team this young and unfamiliar with each other, it's quite an accomplishment for them to hang around and battle top-rated teams like Whitewater, Stevens Point and St. Thomas.

"As a team we still have a lot of confidence in ourselves. We know that we were right there in those games and we had the ability to take them. We know we have the ability to beat anybody," said Trimbo.

Trimbo is majoring in health & human performance with interdisciplinary studies in athletic training and outdoor education. He aspires to someday be an athletic trainer or do something environmental field, such as working in a state park in Colorado.

No one has recognized that more than Falcon Coach Jeff Berkhof. "Nate's our big guy and he's only 6-7. We'd like to have a 6-9 guy playing his spot. Then Nate could play the 4 man spot. His biggest adjustment to college basketball has been going against bigger players. He's responded well and put up some very good numbers for us," said Berkhof. Robertson has scored in double digits in 13 games and has had five double-doubles.

Robertson understands and has accepted his assignment this year and his work has paid off for the team. But he has hopes that a more typical "big man" will be in the lineup in the future. "I keep asking the coaches, when they go recruiting, are you looking for a big guy? They are and having a big body there will be good for us. I feel out of position at times, but I have the confidence that I can do the job," said Robertson. "Certainly the college game is a lot faster and more physical."

"Nate has a lot of energy and a strong motor - he likes to get after it," said Berkhof. "He's doing what's expected of him on defense and in rebounding. He's been a pleasant surprise on the offensive end. He's doing the job in the paint and drawing fouls," said the Falcon first-year coach.

His oldest brother, Eric, played at Bethel and was a "great player," according to Robertson. His father, Mark, also attended Bethel and was a two-time All-MIAC player. "Games were always competitive and I had to learn to go hard while playing against them."

He is still close to his family and they have been great supporters while he competed at Forest Lake High School and now at UWRF. "Someone has been at every game this year but one. My parents are both in education and they made the trip to Superior on a Wednesday night and then got up at 5:30 a.m. the next morning. My brothers said they owe it to me since I went to their games, but I keep telling them that they don't have to come. It's great to have them there."

Robertson said his basketball strength is when he can play with his back to the basket. "I feel comfortable in the low post. I take what the defender gives me. I think I also have been a presence in rebounding. I was a rebounder in high school and Coach Berkhof saw that and I think that's why he recruited me. I enjoy rebounding - it's me against an opponent and who is going to go get the ball. Sometimes it's just a matter of will power."

He describes himself as fearless on the court. "I can't be concerned about getting a shot blocked or the ball stolen. What every it takes - you have to do it. I like to think I can score against anyone. I don't back down against bigger opponents."

Already this year Robertson has 28 blocks to his credit and is third in the WIAC in that category. "I like coming from the weak side to get blocks - it seems like I've always had the timing - a feel that I've built up. On the ball blocks are a little bit more lucky."

"We're young with no seniors. I understand that we are having trouble closing out games because we are young. But we are gaining confidence and we are learning how to do that. I want to win this year but at the same time this year is not the end. A lot of guys will be back and we will do well. The future looks good for Falcon basketball."

Elling has developed into a stalwart defensive player and nothing shows that better than the work he did a couple of weeks ago when the Falcons played St. Thomas in the championship game of the CHS Cooperatives Holiday Tournament at the Karges Center.

The River Falls native was matched up against St. Thomas' Bryan Schnettler, a talented guard and outside shooter who was averaging over 20 points a game - with most of his points coming from three-point range. Elling played 23 minutes and limited Schnettler to 3-10 shooting from behind the arc. And one of  those three-pointers came off a scramble when the Falcons failed to corral a rebound. Schnettler hit just six of 22 shots overall in the game.

Besides playing great defense, Elling also had a solid all-around game. He scored seven points, going 2-2 from the field and 1-1 from behind the arc. He was also 2-2 at the line. He had one block, turned the ball over just once and had one rebound.

"Jesse plays hard one-on-one defense and has the skills to shut opponents down," said Berkhof. "Overall he is one of our better athletes. We tested the players at the start of the season and he was on top of all the charts. He can hit shots, is very crafty and sneaky to the basket."

Elling knows that his defensive play has helped him get playing time this year. He averages about nine minutes of playing time a game and has played more and more as the season has progressed. "I had played against Schnettler in summer leagues and knew some of the things he liked to do," he explained about his success in the St. Thomas game.

"Being known as a defensive player can be tough, but it's the best way for me to help the team. My teammates and coaches understand that and that's what's important," said Elling about his defensive role.

"Besides defense, one of my strengths is getting to the basket - driving," said Elling. He has shown that in the past few games, especially against North Central when he finished with the career-high 14 points. He is averaging 3.4 points and 1.1 rebounds per game this year. He has been very consistent from the field hitting 16-26 (.615) of his shots, including 4-8 from behind the arc. He is 11-13 from the line. He has four steals and seven assists to his credit.

Part of that hard work came in his freshman season when he injured his meniscus in an early-season practice. He tried to practice after the injury, but was forced to have surgery and missed the entire season. "The rehab was tough at first - just trying to lift almost no weight was even difficult. But you just have to get used to it and keep going." In the 2005-06 season he played in 10 games and scored nine points and had five rebounds.

At River Falls High School he averaged 14 points, six rebounds and three assists a game in 2004. The Wildcats won the regional title and reached the section finals. He earned three letters and started for two seasons. He was named to the All-Big River Conference team and played in the Western Wisconsin All-Star Classic. He was also an accomplished track & field athlete.

Elling, who is majoring in landscape design, shows enthusiasm and excitement for the rest of the 2006-07 Falcon season. "I think we can finish high in the WIAC. We've got some big games coming up and it will be good to play at home. There have been a few games that just haven't gone out way so far."

Elling's family, including his father, Mike, and his mother, Ann, attend most of the Falcons games. "It doesn't matter if the game is five hours away - they help keep me up and give me the confidence I need."

Every successful team needs a player who can come off the bench and perform well in clutch situations. Olson has shown the talents and skills to help lift the Falcon game up at crucial times in games.

"I feel that this year's team has a chance to be more than competitive in the WIAC and has a chance to do some serious damage. It all depends on coming together as a young team. Our team's strengths are just playing a more physical style of basketball and getting up and down the court," Olson said.

"Every team that I was a part of went to state and got past the first round, which I felt was a success," Olson said. "One moment that sticks out was when we made the final four at state and had a chance to go to the title game."

This year's team just has a new attitude and approach compared to last year's team. I feel that Coach Berkhof is a good motivator and gets us to play hard, and we have more of an edge than last year's team," Olson said.

After seven games the former Eau Claire Memorial High School player is fifth on the team in scoring averaging 7.7 points a game. He also averages 3.3 rebounds per outing. He has 15 assists and four steals. He scored a career-high 19 points in last year's game against tonight's opponent, Bethany Lutheran. This year he has recorded a career-high five assists in the game at Superior and a career-high seven rebounds against Macalester.

Pearson always wanted to play college basketball if the opportunity presented itself. He got the opportunity to play at River Falls at the last second and hasn't regretted a minute of it. Although growing up around conference rival UW-Eau Claire he said he never wanted to play there.

"I just like hanging out with friends," he said. "And I spent a lot of time studying."  His study habits have paid off. In high school he was named to the academic All-Big Rivers squad. He also played well on the court and earned honorable mention to the all-conference team. Pearson was named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll after the 2005-06 season.

"Cory is a great guy to have in our program," Falcon Coach Jeff Berkhof said. "He brings us athleticism to our big spot. He jumps well and is a great person. Right now he is fulfilling his role - that is to spell Nate Robertson. As our season goes along his role will increase. Cory is an important player in our scheme."

"I have met some great people in RF. I have met a lot of life long friends that I really enjoy hanging out with on a regular basis. I feel that I have matured a lot throughout my years here," Rondeau said.

The key to this season is that the Falcons have to play together and not turn the ball over in crucial situations. Rondeau also feels that Coach Berkhof is very excited for this season and it has carried over to the players.

"I think we are confident right now. We have lost a couple of games but we have plenty of time to come together and we just have to stay positive and help guide some of our young guys along the way," Rondeau said.

"Ryan loves to play the game and is very driven to do well," said Falcon Coach Jeff Berkhof.  "He is one of our few players that has experience playing college basketball. Naturally, the guys look for some direction from Ryan out on the court and he has done a good job responding to this role."

"I think were going to find some success this season. I think we can really surprise a lot of people," Thompson said. Already this season Thompson has established a new career high in points when he scored 22 against William Penn.

"The new coach brings a great amount of energy. Berkhof is really excited about the opportunity to coach and we have a whole new and great staff that really brings excitement and energy everyday to practice," Thompson said.

"Ryan played the majority of his minutes running the team from the lead guard position last year and he will continue to play there again this year," said Berkhof.  "He will also play some minutes at the off-guard position. He's a nice combo guard in that he can handle the ball if needed and he can knock down shots. He has worked extremely hard on his shooting skills since his freshman season."

Thompson feels that the team's confidence is very high and that it has improved everyday and that will carry into the rough WIAC schedule. But he still feels that the team needs to play better as one unit.

"I think we're as confident, if not more than any of the teams that I have played on in the last two years. We need to start to play and function as one instead of five. I think that's are biggest hurdle right now," Thompson said.

Scott Kelly  is going to be a big asset to the Falcon men’s basketball team this year.  Kelly, in his junior season with the Falcons, is originally from Hastings, Minn.,  and has been playing basketball since second grade.

This  season, Kelly hopes to improve from last year which his coach thinks will  happen. He played in all 25 games as a sophomore and started in 15 of them. He  averaged 20 minutes of playing time and 4.2 points a game.

Off the  court, Kelly is a “strong student,” according to Berkhof. He was named to the A  Honor Roll all four years at Hastings   High School. He is  majoring in business administration with a minor in coaching. His goals are to  graduate, get a job and be part of a coaching staff.

Culver's, is presented to the most outstanding senior from each conference sport during the year who exhibits the greatest combination of performance and achievement in academics, athletics and leadership. The Men's Scholar-Athlete Award was renamed the Max Sparger Scholar-Athlete Award effective with the 1994-95 season.

Hovet works to get the most out of her players both on and off the court. Ten of last season's 12 Falcons earned their way onto the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll. The Falcons have held their own in competing in the tough Wisconsin Intercollegiate Athletic Conference that has produced three NCAA champions and two second-place finishers.

"With five seniors we have a lot of experience and maturity to lead us. This is the strongest senior class I've ever coached and I'm excited about the opportunity they have to put together a really special season," said Hovet.

"Traci (Reimann) and Megan (Lindman) are the toughest post tandem in the league; Krista (Cordes) is versatile and can shoot the lights out; Chan (Melgaard) is a great athlete and competitor and Melanie (Preiner) is one of the best all-around players I've seen. We also have a solid group of young players that will contribute a great deal to our team; they are the future of our basketball program. This team has some great players that are truly exceptional people, I'm proud of them and I couldn't ask for a better group of women to coach this year."

Hovet received her psychology undergraduate degree and coaching minor from UW-Stout. She completed here Master's Degree in kinesiology with an emphasis in sport psychology and sociology at the University of Minnesota. She currently teaches at UWRF in the Health & Human Performance Department along with her coaching duties.

Kathy Holbrook starts her fifth year as an assistant coach with the Falcon women's basketball program. Coach Cindy Hovet says, "Kathy specializes in working with our post players. She's an excellent teacher of the details of the game, and is especially strong working on individual player development. She keeps kids motivated and always looks for encouraging things to say. Kathy truly believes in the Div. III philosophy and is committed to our student-athletes having a great experience. She is professional, competitive and driven to help us become a better team."

Holbrook's athletic background is impressive in both basketball and volleyball. At Doane College in Nebraska, she was selected the school's Outstanding Female Athlete her junior and senior years of competition. She earned All-Conference and NAIA All-District recognition for two straight years for her success on the basketball court. She was inducted into the Doane Hall of Fame in 2003 for her excellence as a student-athlete. She is also in the Hall of Fame at Central City High School in Nebraska.

Holbrook is currently a home health physical therapist for Aspen in the Twin Cities. She earned her undergraduate degree in natural science with a biology emphasis at Doane in 1983. She went on to earn a certificate in physical therapy from the Mayo Clinic's School of Health Related Sciences in Rochester, Minn.

Mike Babler joins the Falcon basketball program for his first season as an assistant coach. Coach Cindy Hovet says, "Mike has a lot of coaching experience and will be a great addition to our staff. He particularly loves coaching the defensive end of the floor and will make us a tougher team at locking down and getting stops on defense. Mike's enthusiasm and ability to break down film for scouting is also a real strength. I'm glad to have him join our staff, he has a lot to add to our program."

In 2005-06 he was the assistant girl's basketball coach at River Falls High School and before that was an assistant junior varsity coach for three seasons. After moving to River Falls in 1982, he coached several local boys and girls youth teams. He started his teaching and coaching career at Hamilton High School where he was an assistant boy's coach. Babler helped lead Hamilton to WIAA State tournament appearances twice in the three years he coached there.

Nick Hall is in his first season as an assistant basketball coach at UW-River Falls. Coach Cindy Hovet says, "Nicholas played on our men's team for four years and clearly understands the game. He's very good at teaching fundamentals and focuses on guard development for us. His energy and enthusiasm for the game and the coaching profession is clear every day in the gym, on the recruiting trail, and in our staff meetings."

Hall is majoring in elementary education at UWRF and working towards a minor in mathematics. He will graduate after the spring 2006 semester. His mother, Terry, is a paraeduactor and his father, Neil, is a physical education and health teacher and coach. He has one brother, Scott, who is a manager of the Falcon men's basketball team, and one sister, Jesa, a senior in high school.

Melanie Preiner returns this year as a team captain for her  senior season with the Falcons. During the 2005-06 season she averaged 11.6  points per game and 4.7 rebounds, which was second on the team in both categories.  That’s especially impressive from the point guard position. She led the Falcon’s in steals with 73 picks,  twice as many as any of her teammates. She led the team in minutes played with  nearly 34 minutes per game. Preiner also led UWRF in 3-point field goals made  with 55 throughout the season. Twenty three-pointers this season would put her second in  the UWRF record book  in a career and  71 made would make her the all-time  leader. Melanie earned All-WIAC honorable mention. Although Preiner at times  doesn’t stand out to the opponent during the game, she certainly stands out to  her teammates clearly making the Falcons a better team when she’s on the  court. She led UWRF in scoring six times last season, and in the WIAC she’s near  the top in multiple categories. She led the league in steals, was second in  3-point field goals made, and sixth in assist/turnover ratio. Melanie is the  daughter of Julie and Tom Preiner. She  is majoring in marketing communications and minoring in mass communications.

Janelle Daniels is in her first season with the Falcons in  2006-07 and she plays the guard position. She transferred to UWRF from UW-Stout  where she played in five games. At Hudson High School Janelle earned three letters  and was a one-year starter. She averaged 5.5 assists per game. Daniels was  named team captain and was the top three-point percentage shooter her senior  season. She also participated in soccer and earned three letters, was a three-year  starter and was selected to the conference honorable mention team. Daniels is  majoring in health & human performance - exercise science with a minor in  health education. She is the daughter of Mike and Cheryl Daniels.

Kelli Hilt joins the Falcons after a stellar career at Lakeville North High School. This season she’ll be one of three Lakeville  graduates donning the UWRF jersey. For the Panthers, she averaged 10 points, four  assists, four rebounds, and three steals per game. She was named team captain and  earned all-conference in the tough Lake   Conference her senior year.  After playing the point position throughout high school Kelli will be seeing  time at the wing during the 2006-07 season. Her toughness and ability to see  and read the floor will really shine through for the Falcons. Kelli is the  daughter of Patti and Brian Hilt. She will be majoring in business  administration.

Krystal Parr enters into her freshman season with the  Falcons coming off of an impressive high school career. At Bloomer   High School, Krystal was  in the starting line up and earned a spot on the all-conference team all four  years of her career. She led her team in  three-point shots, assists, and had the best two-point average as well. Krystal was also chosen to be on the WBCA  All-Star, All-Chippewa   County and second All-Northwest teams. In addition to her  achievements on the court, she also obtained the Fellowship of Christian  Athletes award. Krystal is an elementary education major with a minor in  coaching. She is the daughter of Connie  and Dale Parr.

Falcon Traci Reimann recorded her second straight double-double, and her fifth of the season, in helping lead the women's basketball team to a 47-32 win over Oshkosh Saturday afternoon at the Karges Center.

UWO got to within 11 points twice in the second half. The first time came after Sharpee hit two free throws to make it 29-18 with 17:35 to play. Sharpee hit two free throws with 3:29 to play the make the score 43-32. But the Falcons responded each time to keep the second half lead in double digits. Reimann finished with eight points and seven rebounds in the second half.

The new year got off to a great start for the women's basketball team as Kelsie Flanscha, Traci Reimann and Krista Cordes all scored in double figures to help lead the Falcons to a 74-46 win over Finlandia on Tuesday night at the Karges Center.

Kim Sorenson and Kelli Hilt each started their first game this season for the Falcons. Sorenson scored four points for the Falcons and registered two assists. Hilt scored eight points and registered four assists. Megan Lindman also scored 12 points for the Falcons in the victory.

The Falcons led most of the first half and held a 15 points lead with two minutes remaining in the half. The scoring was spread out in the first half but Traci Reimann lead the team with six points at the half and Chantele Melgaard had five as the Falcons led 31-17.

The Falcons were dominated in the first half as they were outscored 17-3 in the opening 10 minutes of the game. Macalester led by as much as 19 in the first half with five minutes remaining but the Falcons did enough to cut the defecit to 13 at the half. Macalester led 28-15 at halftime.

The Falcons came out in the second half and looked like a different team. The Falcons outscored Macalester 16-4 in the opening nine minutes of play and pulled ahead, 33-32, just before the halfway mark in the second half.

However, Macalester would come back and do just enough to regain control of the game. Although they led by as much as nine following the Falcon comeback Macalester finished with a lead of six over the visiting Falcons, 52-46.

The game was a hard-fought battle and two Falcons put on a show of their own. Kim Sorenson scored a career-high 16 points beating her previous record of 11 at UW-Oshkosh last season. Traci Reimann also showed her aggressiveness around the basket pulled down 14 rebounds, 12 of which were on the defensive side of the court.

The two teams would go back and forth again until Sorenson made two free throws, another jumper and a three-pointer to put the Falcons back into the lead 52-50. Platteville countered by going 4-6 from the line down the stretch to lead 54-52. Krista Cordes had a look a three-point jump shot in the closing seconds of the game but missed. After Platteville blocked the inbound pass following the final Platteville free throw the game ended 54-52 in favor of UW-Platteville.

Despite the loss Traci Reimann turned in a strong performance for the Falcons scoring 21 points and pulling down eight rebounds. Megan Lindman also had a good outing as she scored 13 points in the game.

The Falcons started strong as they opened the game with a three-pointer from Krista Cordes and followed with another basket from Traci Reimann. However, Eau Claire answered with a 9-0 run and the Falcons were never able to recover.

Despite being down by 18 at the half the Falcons came out in the second half looking to mount a come back. The Falcons outscored Eau Claire 19-7 in the opening 13 minutes of the second half to pull within five but that would be as close as they would come. Eau Claire did just enough to put the game away down the stretch outscoring the Falcons 19-14 in the closing minutes of the game to secure the victory.

Traci Reimann led the way for the Falcons scoring 17 points and registering nine rebounds. Chantele Melgaard and Kelli Hilt also had strong performances. Melgaard scored 13 points, pulled down five rebounds and registered five assists. Hilt came off the bench to score 14 points and register six rebounds.

The first half was close as River Falls led by as much as five and the two teams went into the locker room with the Falcons leading, 25-23. The second half was also close as the teams went back and forth throughout. Stevens point led by as much as two but the Falcons went ahead with a three-pointer from Traci Reimann and would never fall behind again.

The beginning of the first half was back and forth but the Falcons went on a 8-0 run to open the game up and take the lead at 14-4. The Falcons would never look back after that run as they followed up their run by outscoring Superior 16-5 in the final five minutes of the first half.

The first half of the game was low scoring, the Falcons led St. Thomas 24-14 at the break. Both teams went on to score 34 points in the second half as the game opened up when St. Thomas was looking to come back late. Chantele Melgaard fouled out with 4:41 remaining and Traci Reimann also fouled out later in the closing minutes of the game.

Melanie Preiner added 13 points and Reimann scored nine while registering seven rebounds. Preiner, Reimann, Melgaard, Lindmann and Krista Cordes all played over 30 minutes in the game with Lindman clocking the most playing time with 38.

The Falcons got off to a fast start with a 9-0 run to start the game. The visiting Pipers didn't score a basket until there was 15:40 remaining in the first half. The Pipers would never recover from the fast start as the Falcons ran away with it as the game progressed.

Kelsie Flanscha set the tone for a big season in her Falcon debut as she played 23 minutes, registered 15 points, seven rebounds and four steals. Chantele Melgaard also had a strong performance in her first game since the 2004-05 season as she played 27 minutes and scored 12 points for the Falcons.

Melanie Preiner and Traci Reimann also had strong outings as they returned to the Falcons for their senior year. Preiner played 27 minutes and contributed 12 points to the big win. Reimann continued her dominance in the post as she registered eight rebounds and six points in 22 minutes played.

Hamline was led by Shelby Hyllengren who scored 18 points and she had eight rebounds. Britta Schwartzhoff scored three points and had 10 rebounds and Jessica Heinen scored nine points with 10 rebounds.

Quality athletic programs don't rebuild year to year; they reload. This is the only way to describe the talented group that will be taking the court this year for the UW- River Falls women's basketball team. The Falcons finished 12-14 overall (8-8 WIAC) last season but look to make their mark this year with a balance of experienced seniors and talented freshmen.

The four seniors who did play for the Falcons are also looking to have strong seasons. Megan Lindman is back for the Falcons after she registered 24 blocks last season bringing her career total to 86; just 16 short of Patty Saxton's record set 25 years ago.

Also looking to have another stellar year is Melanie Preiner. Preiner's ability to excel both on offense and defense showed last season as she finished with 73 steals and made 55 three-pointers last year. Also returning is Krista Cordes who brings outstanding shooting ability.  Cordes shot 35 percent last year from three-point range.

Also promising for the Falcons is talented sophomore guard Kim Sorenson. After missing her freshman year due to an injury Sorenson returned to the Falcons for her sophomore year and made her presence known. Averaging 18.5 minutes per game and registering 34 steals and 42 assists for the Falcons Sorenson established herself as a key player for the Falcons. "[Sorenson] is one of the very good players in the league and is looking real good so far this year," Hovet said.

There are also a number of new faces for the Falcons this year. Kelli Hilt and Katie Sheets are both graduates of Lakeville North High School in Lakeville, Minn., and both come to River Falls with an outstanding list of accomplishments. Hilt and Sheets were both named all-conference in high school. Sheets was named to the St. Paul Pioneer Press All-State team in 2005. Hovet is looking forward to seeing how both Hilt and Sheets will perform this season. "They will see a lot of minutes early, they are both smart and tough," Hovet said.

Kelsie Flanscha will also be a new face for the Falcons but she is no stranger to River Falls. Flanscha attended River Falls High School where she earned four letters and was a three-year starter. Flanscha also brings her own credentials to the Falcons as she was named All-State honorable mention in high school.

With a talented mix of experience and raw talent the Falcons have understandably high expectations. "Expectations are sky high in our program, we will be much better than people expect," Hovet explained.

From the time she was in fourth grade, Benitz has been playing ball and she hasn't quit since. With her father as her coach from her fifth grade year until her high school years playing for the Blue Devils of Plum City, Benitz described her experience as a coach's daughter as something that brought her and her father together. "He wanted me to be involved in something and wanted to be the parent that coached," says Benitz of her father.

As a four-year letter winner and three year starter on the Plum City High School basketball team, Benitz was named to the all-conference team three years and was the team's captain for two seasons. In her sophomore season, Benitz's team won the conference title. During her last season as a Blue Devil, Benitz was selected to play in the Northwest All-Star game.

Basketball being a family affair, Benitz has what she would call the best fans ever. Her family has never missed a game in her 12 years of playing and even goes as far as to change the milking schedules at their dairy farm to ensure they will be court side at her games. Benitz describes her family as an "unique closeness."

"[Basketball] has changed me as a person," says Benitz who believes people "don't have to bow and be submissive to adversity." The challenge of basketball is the mental aspect according to Benitz. "[The] hardest thing to overcome as a college athlete is to stay mentally tough," she says.

Benitz's journey as a collegiate athlete has not been an easy one. After being cut from the basketball team at UW-Stout, Benitz transferred to River Falls. A knee injury last March left Benitz with a torn ACL and the endless struggle to get back on the court to compete alongside her teammates for her second season with the Falcons.

"Jana is a tough kid that's been working really hard to get back from her knee injury last season," says Falcon Coach, Cindy Hovet. "It's a process that has its ups and downs but Jana keeps working and stays as positive as can be expected," explains Hovet.

With the second half of the 2006-2007 season quickly approaching, Benitz waits to see if she will get to lace up her shoes with the intention of playing. Benitz has recently learned that she may be out for the rest of the season due to complications from her knee injury.

Benitz realizes she may be stuck on the bench this season, but she hasn't let her injury stop her from promoting Falcon basketball. As a member of the Student Athlete Advisory Committee (SAAC), Benitz is active in recruiting fans. Sending out letters with the season schedule and telling her classmates about upcoming games are tactics Benitz practices.

An innate competitor sets goals and Benitz has goals for herself this season. Besides winning the coveted WIAC title, Benitz says she will "show up everyday and give my best. Being the best teammate and helping out where ever I can" is necessary according to Benitz. She advises it is not about perfection, but about the motive within an athlete. "You can be the best player, but have the worst attitude; who will play you," suggests Benitz who says accomplishment starts with a good work ethic.

Benitz's "go-getter" philosophy is an attitude she brings into the classroom. Pursuing a degree in elementary education and a minor in coaching is the foundation for Benitz's plans for her future. Benitz, who is an advocate for physical activity, hopes to promote sports and games to children to get them involved in healthy activities. Coaching a high school girl's basketball team and teaching in the Wisconsin area are Benitz's plans for her near future.

Benitz's aspirations and interests do expand beyond the local borders of her community and the basketball court. "I would love to travel and help underprivileged children in orphanages," conveys Benitz who says that is what she would do if she had the money.

Now matter what role she plays in the future, Benitz main focus of the present remains her passion for basketball. "[My] faith has helped me to keep a positive attitude and the desire to get back on the court," Benitz says. Only time will tell if desire or injury will prevail.

Hailing from Blaine, Minn., Kim Sorenson is a vital part of the Falcons on and off the court. "She has really stepped into a position where we need her to play a lot, and there is no tougher kid on defense," Falcon Head Coach Cindy Hovet said about Sorenson, a 5-4 guard. "She's my little gnat because she's always out there bugging people," Hovet added.

There's more to Sorenson than just the player who averaged 18.5 minutes per game and registered 42 steals last season. "She is a sweetheart off the court, she's always bringing the team together, a real team builder," Hovet said.

Before coming to River Falls Sorenson was a two-sport athlete at Blaine High School playing basketball and soccer. "Soccer was a blast, especially summer soccer. The kids were so much fun to be around and I still keep in touch with some of them now, which is really nice," Sorenson said. Apart from playing basketball and soccer in high school Sorenson was also a local mentor for middle school students in the area.

Family is also very important to Sorenson, providing her with memories as well as motivation for her success in basketball. "My dad [Ron] got me into basketball. He signed me up and has been coaching me ever since. He has been my inspiration through it all. He has always believed in me and always taught me the importance of having fun," Sorenson explained. "He works so hard at everything he does in his life and he lives each day through his heart. He has never given up on me or my sisters and has always pushed us to be the best we can be. With a house full of women, that can be a tough job," Sorenson explained.

Apart from basketball Sorenson also has many fond memories with her family. "If I can pick out a few it would have to be the vacations we have taken over the years. Mexico and Florida were my two favorites," Sorenson said.  Family and friends remain a big part of Sorenson's life despite going away from home for school. "I like to get home every once in a while to see my family and friends. I love my hometown," Sorenson explained.

Apart from her commitments to basketball Sorenson finds time to work at the local YMCA and play intramural softball. She is also a member of the Student Athlete Advisory Committee an organization on campus designed to improve the college experience for student-athletes as well as promote involvement within the community.

While she is only a junior Sorenson explained what experiences she feels will be what she remembers when her time at UWRF is over. "I think that first and foremost, some of the people I have met. The different friendships and relationships I have established will always stay with me because they have been very important to me," Sorenson said. The relationships she has built at River Falls are clearly important to Sorenson as she named teammate Mel Preiner as her idol. "She is an amazing athlete and an unbelievable person. She is a true point guard and gives everything she has every day on that court. There aren't very many players like her these days, and she is a one of a kind individual," Sorenson said.

Sorenson also pointed to a psychology class she is enrolled in at UWRF as an important experience for her. "I also have learned a lot from my psychology of coaching class. I think have I learned so much in it as far as not only the coaching aspect, but also just growing as a person as well," Sorenson said. Growth is something that is very important to Sorenson as she described herself as always growing. " I honestly learn something new about myself every day," Sorenson said.

Growth is also a goal for Sorenson while on the court this season playing for the Falcons. "I want to become a more versatile player. I want to establish myself on the offensive end of the game too. I tend to be stronger at defense," Sorenson explained.

Sorenson's hard work is already paying off this season for the Falcons. She has started four games and is averaging 19.6 minutes per game. Sorenson has also already registered 29 steals this season as she is on pace to surpass last season's total of 42. She is averaging 4.3 points per game.

Cordes plays an important role for the Falcons as she brings her athletic ability as well as her character to the team. " Krista has a great personality and she brings a lot of energy to our basketball team. She's always positive and works hard," Falcon Head Coach Cindy Hovet said of Cordes. Hovet's description was reinforced by Cordes herself when she described herself as energetic above all else.

Athletic success is something that Cordes became accustomed to long before she ever stepped foot on campus. In high school Cordes was a standout on her high school basketball team at Farmington High School. Aside from being a three-year starter on the  high school basketball team Cordes was also named all-conference twice. In her senior season Cordes averaged 16 points and five rebounds per game. She also scored over 1,000 points in her high school career, an accomplishment Cordes mentioned as one of her favorite athletic moments.

While she experienced her share of success on the basketball court, Cordes was a three sport athlete in high school participating in basketball, volleyball and golf. She registered a hole in one in a golf tournament in high school, another accomplishment she mentioned as a favorite.

While her success on the basketball court would lead one to believe that basketball was always a part of her life, Cordes' explanation does not paint that same picture. "It was that my friends were in basketball and I didn't like to skate when I was younger so my parents put me in basketball instead of hockey," Cordes explained.

Family plays an important role for any student-athlete and Cordes is no different.  "My parents, John and Teri, and my older sister, Kelle, were always very supportive with everything I did," Cordes explained. She also mentioned that her parents were very influential in her decision to continue playing sports throughout her life. "My parents always kept my sister (Kelle) and I in sports," Cordes explained.

Basketball was what brought Cordes to UWRF. However, besides participating in athletics Cordes is majoring in business with an emphasis in marketing. However, she is still unsure what she plans to do with her major after graduation.

The experience of being on a collegiate basketball team is also something Cordes said would stay with her long after her days as a Falcon are over. "Definitely playing basketball will stay with me, it is such a big part of my life and I have made some great friends through playing here," Cordes explained. Aside from remembering her days on the court with her teammates, Cordes mentioned living with her some of her teammates has been the experience she will remember most from River Falls.

The Falcons are off to a 5-1 start this season and are 2-1 in conference play.  Already this season Cordes has started every game for the Falcons. She is also averaging nearly 23 minutes, 7.3 points, and 2.5 rebounds per game. "Krista is one of our most versatile players," said Hovet. "A big key for our team is how she plays defensively and her rebounding."

Hailing from Lakeville, Minn., Melgaard has always seen athletics play a role in her life. " My parents, Chip and Dawn, were very into slow-pitch softball so my brother Trevor and I grew up at the ball fields with them and their friends," Melgaard said. Melgaard recalled times spent with her family at home centering on vacations and softball tournaments. " We went to Wisconsin Dells a lot and that's always a blast. We also traveled a lot because I played fast pitch softball growing up and we always had tournaments during the summer weekends," Melgaard said.

While times with her family might have revolved around trips Melgaard mentioned what her household becomes when it's Christmas time. "My dad decorates the outside of the house with Christmas lights and my mom decorates the inside. Our house is kind of crazy around Christmas time, we're like the Griswalds," Melgaard explained.

Melgaard pointed to her family as her inspiration for everything she does. "They have supported me through everything and have been at all my athletic events growing up. They have helped me so much and I owe a lot to them," Melgaard said.

Melgaard's family's support enabled her to be an important part of two of Minnesota High School Basketball's greatest teams. Melgaard played her high school basketball at Lakeville High School. In both her junior and senior year Lakeville won the 4A state title. Her senior year they went 28-0, an accomplishment Melgaard said was her most memorable from high school. " My high school coach, Andy Berkvam, is one of my favorite people in the world. He is a great coach and also a great friend to have. He taught me a lot about being a basketball player and also a lot about being a good all-around person," Melgaard said of her high school coach. Melgaard also garnished a spot on the all-conference team and a place in the Minnesota All-Star game by averaging 10 points, two rebounds, and three steals per game in her senior year.

Melgaard was recruited by Falcon Head Coach Cindy Hovet after Hovet saw her play in the state tournament her senior year. Hovet has not been disappointed in the development of the player she recruited. "She is a great athlete; she adds a lot of anticipation to our defense and is a critical part of our team," Hovet said of Melgaard.

Melgaard has also earned her share of awards at the college level as she was named to the All-WIAC Defensive team after the 2005 season prior to taking a year off to have her daughter, Jordan Marie Melgaard-Torrez.  "I think her having a year off gave her a whole new appreciation for playing competitive basketball," Hovet said.

While playing basketball, going to school, and raising her daughter is not an easy task Melgaard is quick to point out that she is not doing it all by herself. "My mom and dad have helped me out tremendously with Jordan and have made it so easy for me to be able to put so much time into basketball. But I owe this season to my boyfriend Dan (Torrez)," she explained. " If it wasn't for [Dan] I wouldn't have been able to play this year. I really appreciate everything he does for me and I owe him a lot. He is a great dad and deserves a lot of the credit," Melgaard said.

Melgaard also added that her daughter Jordan has become part of the Falcon basketball team already. "My teammates love having her around and are very good with her. I am extremely lucky to have such nice friends and family members who are willing to help me out. I don't think anyone is really complaining, Jordan is such a good baby and it helps a lot that she is the cutest baby in the world!" Melgaard said.

Both Hovet and Melgaard mentioned that having Jordan has changed the way she approaches the game. "We have seen her grow up about 10 years in the last year and I think her gentleness as a mom affects the way she is able to communicate with the team," Hovet said. Melgaard, on the other hand, said that her daughter has changed the way she reacts after a game, particularly if she has a bad game. "Before if I had a bad game I was angry after and would be crabby for the night, but now I can't be because when I walk off the court and see her crawling after me with a huge smile on her face, I can't help but be happy. She makes me realize that it's just a game and life goes on," Melgaard explained.

While having a child may have ended the careers of some athletes Melgaard was determined to continue playing basketball at the same level. " I started playing basketball again about six weeks after I had Jordan. I knew that I really needed to work hard to get back into basketball shape if I was going to be on the team again," Melgaard said.  Clearly Melgaard has been able to return to that level as she is already averaging 8.3 points, two steals, and 26 minutes per game so far this season.

Melgaard has high hopes for this season for both herself and her team. She hopes to once again be named to the All-WIAC Defensive team and lead the league in steals.  Melgaard also set a goal to earn at least honorable mention to the All-WIAC team. For the team she hopes they will win the conference. "I really believe this team can do that," Melgaard added.

Playing basketball is one of the main reasons Lindman chose to attend River Falls. When choosing where to go for college, she had to choose between UW-Eau Claire and UWRF. She chose River Falls after feeling that Head Coach Cindy Hovet did the best job recruiting her and made her feel welcome in the River Falls environment.

Here at River Falls Lindman is working on her degree in broad area English and will be certified to teach English in grades 6-12. Although she is a senior on the basketball court, Lindman will not graduate until May 2008. She will finish up classes in December of 2007 and student teach in the spring before she graduates.

Since she is an English major, Lindman likes to spend her spare time relaxing by reading and writing. But she also likes to shop and sing. In fact, before Lindman came to River Falls she used to sing in church choirs and school choirs as well.

This season, the women's basketball team is going to be a force to be reckoned with and Lindman is just one of the players who will help lead the players off and on the court. Following last season, the Falcons only lost two seniors and they got another player back, so they're fairly even to where they were last year.

She went on to talk about how the team isn't just going to be relying on the five starters this season. All the players up and down the bench will be a factor in the team's success and Lindman will be along to do her best, wherever she can.

Lindman is the team's leading scorer with a 14.3 points per game average. Throughout her career she has been a dominating payer in the defensive end of the court. She is an intimidating player who has outstanding shot blocking skills. She has led the Falcons in blocks the past two seasons with 24 in 2006 and 35 in 2005. She currently has 87 career blocks and needs just 16 more  to set a Falcon career record.

Traci Reimann has been a key player for the Falcon women's basketball team since her freshman year and shows no signs of slowing down entering her fourth and final season in a UWRF uniform. Reimann has started in every game she has played in since her very first game at UWRF.

Reimann was quick to point out that her first game experience as a Falcon was one of her fondest athletic memories ever. "It was my first college game, going down to the locker room not really seeming real that I was about to play in my first college game and then finding out that I was starting the game as well. Then after the game finding out I had somewhere around 17 rebounds," Reimann explained. Reimann did in fact register 17 rebounds in her very first game as a Falcon and duplicated that performance last season versus Superior.

She lived an active childhood, growing up with two siblings and her mother Kathy. "Things I did when I was younger was play outside, build forts, make obstacle courses, play football, bike, watch movies, I was always on the go," she explained. Her family also plays a big role in Reimann's daily life. "My family is my inspiration. They are there for me 24-seven whenever I need them and they make it to as many games as possible. They would do anything for me and support me through thick and thin," she said of her family.

Playing basketball at UWRF has allowed Reimann to find a family away from home, and that is what she says will stay with her after her days as a Falcon have passed.  "Knowing you have a team on your side 100 percent of the time is great to know. I find that if I have a bad day, or am struggling with school, coming to practice to see my teammates can cheer me up and turn my day around," Reimann said. "My best experiences [at UWRF] are probably from basketball, the girls on the team are some of my best friends," she added.

While Reimann admits she was unsure for a long time about where she wanted to attend college it was Hovet's influence that brought her to UWRF. "Coach Hovet started talking to me about playing basketball at UWRF and I came on a visit and really liked the size of campus and the looks of it," Reimann explained. Her decision to attend school at UWRF paid off for Reimann as she has experience a great amount of success on and off the court.

Academically she has been named to both the Dean's List and the Academic Honor Roll. Reimann's major is health and human performance, a popular major among athletes at UWRF.  "I hope to work in a fitness center, then to eventually get certified and become a personal trainer," she said of her future plans.

Apart from basketball and academics Reimann is also involved in the Student Athlete Advisory Committee, an organization on campus that strives to encourage involvement of student-athletes in campus and community projects, as well as set in motion programs that encourage academic achievement, health promotion, social responsibility and general awareness.

There is more than meets the eye that makes up who Melanie  Preiner. On the court she is a vital part of a Falcon team that has high hopes  for the upcoming season. Off the court she is a person who uses her past experiences  and support of her family to excel in everything she does.

Falcon Head  Coach Cindy Hovet’s description of Preiner matches the success she has had.  “She is a player everyone should want on their team, she is really a genuine,  personable, tough kid, and someone everybody should get to know,” Hovet said. While Preiner is best known for her work on  the court her life off the court consists of the same kind of excellence.

Hailing  from Stillwater, Minn., Preiner has always had athletic  influences around her. She recalled her childhood as one filled with sports and  competition. “We would play every sport that existed; baseball, basketball,  football, street hockey and kickball,” Preiner said. Going along with her  childhood Preiner also relied on her siblings to help shape her into the person  she has become today. “I couldn’t have asked for a better childhood! I had an  older sister, Jess, and a younger brother, Jake, who I hung out with a lot  growing up,” Preiner said of her childhood.

While  everyone has influences that help shape who they are Preiner first pointed out her  sister as her idol. “My idol is my older sister, Jess. She is an amazing  athlete; she played at St. Cloud   State on the softball  team. And she’s just an all around great person,” Preiner said of her older  sibling. Aside from her sister Preiner pointed out her closest relatives as her  inspiration. “My inspiration is my family, especially my parents, Tom and  Julie. They have always been there for me and are very encouraging in  everything that I choose to do,” Preiner said.

Preiner  eventually cut down on the number of sports she played and focused on softball  and basketball while attending Stillwater   High School. While she  ended up playing basketball in college Preiner recalled her best athletic  memory from her days on the softball field. “We beat the No. 1 ranked team in the state two times in a row  to go to state. The last game went 17 innings and we won on a close call at  home,” Preiner said as she recalled the epic affair.

Since she  first step foot on campus basketball has been a top priority for Preiner. “The  main thing that brought me to River   Falls initially was  basketball,” Preiner said. Hovet is definitely happy that Preiner decided to  attend UWRF and be a part of the team. “We have good team chemistry; Preiner is  an honest, straight up and good person,” Hovet said. The compliments didn’t  stop there as Hovet continued praising her senior standout. “Preiner is a great  and steady player, she makes both our offense and defense go,” Hovet said.

Besides  playing basketball Preiner is majoring in marketing communications and hopes to  work in the television or advertising industry someday. Apart from academics  Preiner couldn’t say enough about the memories and friends she will remember  most after she leaves UWRF. “Playing on a team and the people I have met will  definitely stay with me forever. I have met some of my best friends here and  they are the ones I will remember the most,” Preiner said. “Oh yeah, and of  course the education,” she added.

Apart from  the athletics and academics Preiner still manages to maintain a zest for life  that is seldom seen. Preiner pointed to a rather motivational quote as her  favorite. “Losers reflect on what could have been, while winners prepare for  what can be,” she said.

While she is a fierce competitor on the court Preiner also  chose “carefree” as the word that would best describe her personality. “I enjoy  listening to music and hanging out with my friends. I also really love to dance  and sing,” Preiner added.

Henderson's coaching experience covers just about every level of swimming competition from summer recreation to elite, Olympic trial qualifiers and from high school junior varsity to NCAA Div. I competition. His swimmers have garnered over 50 national Top 16 rankings in club swimming, over 20 high school All-American rankings, and more than a dozen junior college All-American rankings. He also coached junior college water polo in California for 12 seasons.

Before coming to UWRF, Henderson served as a volunteer assistant at Cal Poly, San Luis Obispo where he worked with old friend, Richard Firman. During this time he also served as head age group coach for the San Luis Obispo Seahawks. He was the head coach of men's and women's swimming and diving at Foothill College as well as the head coach of women's water polo team. Before that he was the head coach of men's and women's swimming and diving teams at Solano Community College and head coach of the men's water polo team. He also served as head coach of the Sierra Marlins swim team, a year round swim club, from 1984-1995. During this time he coached the Sierra College men's water polo team from 1985-93.

As a competitor, Henderson was an age group national champion and top five finisher more than 20 times. He garnered high school All-American honors at Rio Americano High School in Sacramento, Calif., and junior college All-American honors at American River College. He was captain of the Cal State University of Sacramento swim team his senior year. In 1997 he was Pacific Masters champion in the 1650-yard freestyle and finished second in the nation in the master's rankings that year.

Ashley Ryan Hawke joins the coaching staff after an outstanding career as a Falcon swimmer. The former captain of the men's team scored at the conference finals all four years and was a member of two team record-setting relays. Coach Bill Henderson feels that his familiarity with the program will be a true asset to this year's team.

Pudgie Siverling begins her second year as a volunteer assistant on the coaching staff after two outstanding years competing for the Falcon women's team. Coach Bill Henderson is very glad to have Pudge as part of the program.

Alyssa Adair joins the Falcons for her first year of collegiate swimming and will be primarily a sprint freestyle swimmer and should help the relays tremendously. She is the daughter of Brian and Gayle.

Joanie Aube is on an exchange program from Canada and will compete for the Falcons for the fall semester only. She will focus on the IM events. She is the daughter of Daniel and Monique. Aube is majoring in political science.

Tracy Crane joins the Falcons for her first year of college swimming and Coach Bill Henderson has high hopes for Tracy in the butterfly events. She is the daughter of John and Terri. Crane is majoring in physics.

Jaynell Feider is in her first year of college swimming with the Falcons and she will be the lone diver on this year's team. She was an All-American in diving at Woodbury High School as a freshman and the addition of a quality diver to the team should make the team much stronger overall. She is the daughter of Jay and Donell. Feider is undecided on a major field of study.

Sarah Foster joins the Falcons for her second year of college swimming after taking a year off last season. Coach Henderson describes Foster as "one of the most versatile swimmers we have." She is the daughter of Jeff and Marie. Foster is majoring in speech communications.

Sarah Johnston is in her first year of collegiate swimming and will compete in the breaststroke and backstroke events for the Falcons. She is the daughter of Dave and Kathy. Johnston is majoring in biology (pre-dental).

Angie Kolpanen joins the Falcons for the first time in 2006-07. Coach Henderson saw swimming during a class and felt she would have a super breaststroke. She is the daughter of Jeff and Cathy. Kolpanen is majoring in health & human performance.

Jill Lambach is in her first year of collegiate swimming and should be primarily in the freestyle and backstroke events. She is the daughter of Greg and Donna. Lambach is majoring in marketing communications.

Bethany Locke joins the Falcons for her first year of college swimming and will compete in the freestyle events. She was a member of the 2005 Falcon women's cross country team. She is the daughter of Susan and Jonathan. Locke is majoring in French.

Rachel Merrier joins the Falcons for her first year of collegiate swimming. Coach Henderson feels that Merrier should be one of the more versatile members of the squad this season. She is the daughter of Jerome and Linda. Merrier is majoring in elementary education.

Martha O'Brien is in her third year of collegiate swimming having previously competed for UW-Eau Claire. She will concentrate on the IM events but shows strong versatility. She is the daughter of Mike and Mary. O'Brien is majoring in chemistry.

Anna Peterson joins the Falcons for her first year of college swimming and will compete in the butterfly and backstroke events. She is the daughter of Kathleen. Peterson is majoring in elementary education.

Deb Schmelzer returns for her third year with the Falcons and will swim the distance freestyle and backstroke events. She will join the Falcons in the second semester. She is studying abroad during the fall semester. She is the daughter of Larry and Linda. Schmelzer is majoring in economics.

Ashley Swenty returns for her second season with the Falcons and will compete in the sprint free and backstroke events. She was named to the UWRF Dean's List after the spring semester. Swenty was also named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll for the 2005-06 school year. She competed in the state meet all four years at Tomahawk High School. She finished second at state her junior year and was a captain her junior and senior year. She is the daughter of Scott and Ann. Swenty is majoring in dairy science.

Rachael Westlund is back for her second year with the Falcons and concentrates primarily on distance freestyle events. She was named the team's Swimmer of the Week on Nov. 21 in the 2005-06 season. She attended Flambeu High School and was awarded Most Valuable senior and Most Consistent awards by her teammates. She is the daughter of Drew and Debbie. Westlund is majoring in psychology.

Tyler Campbell is in his first year of college swimming with the Falcons and will compete in the free and backstroke events. He is the son of Mike Campbell and Marcie Gorfain. Campbell is majoring in physics.

Sean Gamlin is back with the Falcons for his second season and will compete in the breaststroke events. He was named to the UWRF Dean's List after the spring semester. He is the son of John and Cindy. He is majoring in physics/mechanical engineering.

Jake Moe returns to the Falcons for his third year of college swimming and will compete in the freestyle and breaststroke events. He was named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll after the 2005-06 school year.  Coach Henderson describes Jake as "one of the hardest workers we have and a pleasure to coach." He is the son of William and Barbara. Moe is majoring in conservation.

Anthony Orlando joins the Falcons for his first year of college swimming. Coach Henderson feels that he shows great versatility and could prove to be a major contributor to the team this season. He is the son of Tony and Debra. Orlando is majoring in physics.

Tyler Ormson is in his second year of college swimming after transferring from St. Thomas. He is a versatile swimmer but will see most action in the freestyle events. He is the son of Mitchell and Patricia. Ormson is majoring in English.

UWRF is an outstanding public university with a proud tradition of academic excellence. When considering where you will attend college keep in mind that the best place is usually where you feel the most comfortable. Remember, you will most likely be spending at least four years of your life at the college or university you choose, so choose a place where you feel at home. UWRF is a relatively small campus where most students feel very welcome and at ease.

If you are interested in the UW-RF Swimming and Diving team, please take the time to email me (william.henderson@uwrf.edu) and tell me a bit about yourself, your academic interests and your events and times/scores. If you are about to start your senior year I hope you'll send along your high school meet schedule so I can possibly get by one of your meets during the coming season.

Falcon Ashley Swenty led the women finishing first in the 100 backstroke and second in the 100 freestyle. Danielle Mandich, Sara Cannady and Alyssa Adair consistently finished in the top places for their events swimming with great endurance throughout the December Invitational.

The men had stiff competition and battled it out in the higly competitive meet. The Falcon men started the meet swimming in the 200 medley relay finishing eighth in a time of 154.03. Falcons Tyler Ormson, Mikhael Keyser, Anthony Yarusso and Anthony Orlando led the men's team.

Ormson earned top place honors finishing fifth in the 200 backstroke with a time of 2:21.99 followed closely by teammate Keyser who finished sixth in 2:22.11 minutes. The men faced up to 25 competitors in some events but made strong personal showings.

The men's and women's swimming and diving teams lost their first away meet of the season to Lawrence. Out earning the Falcons in points, Lawrence totaled 168 points for the women and 130 points for the men. The Falcon women earned 125 points while the men totaled their earnings for a score of 101 points.

For River Falls, Sara Cannady swam to a third and second place finish in the 200 yard IM and the 100-yard breaststroke earning the Falcons five points toward the team's total score. Falcon Diver Jaynell Feider did well diving into second place out of 4 competing divers and scored 209.95 altogether for four more team points.

For the women's team Falcon sophomore Danielle Mandich won two events the 100 and 200-yard freestyle. Diver Jaynell Feider managed to beat out her competitors in one round of the 1 meter dive and give the Falcons help with needed diving points.

Swenty has been swimming since she was in fifth grade. Growing up on Lake Nokomis near Tomahawk, Wis., she has always loved to swim. With a love for the water motivating her, Swenty took her own advice as a swim competitor.

For four years as a state competitor for the Tomahawk High School swim team, Swenty accomplished what some athletes only dream of. She served as captain of the swim team for three years representing her team as a leader. Her junior year Swenty was honored as an All-American. Nomination for All-American is based on athletes' academic, athletic, and community involvement.

Without regard to her success as a high school competitive swimmer, Swenty didn't plan on swimming at River Falls until she was preparing to move to campus. "When I was packing up my stuff, I said, I might as well try it," remembers Swenty. "You can only [swim] for so long."

Before Swenty competes in the sprint freestyles and backstroke, she partakes in a routine before every competition. "I go off by myself and think about my race, every turn and stroke," shares Swenty. "I figure out what I want my splits to be and my finishing time."

She enjoyed receiving the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll award last season for her ability to maintain her G.P.A. throughout the 2005-06 swim season. Swenty feels she has just enough time to relax despite her involvement on campus as a student, athlete and club member.

With five "wild cards" to use throughout the swim season and a sense of organization, Swenty manages to accomplish what is required of an active student and a busy student-athlete. She says that Henderson understands the Falcon swimmers' priorities. The "wild cards" are given to each member of the swimming and diving team as a free pass to miss a practice at necessary times.

"It gets hard and frustrating at times," says Swenty of her responsibility to manage all of her commitments. As a dairy science major Swenty is a member of the Dairy Club, Pre-Vet Club, American Women in Agriculture organization and Sigma Alpha, a professional agriculture sorority.

Swenty's grandparents, Arnold and Lou Swenty, have their own meat farm in Coleman, Wis. They inspired Swenty to follow in their footsteps. "We didn't buy any of our meat from the store," says Swenty about her youth.

Dancing since she was in kindergarten, Swenty has learned the moves to many styles of dance including the salsa, the cha cha, ball room dancing and lyrical. When it comes to dance Swenty says, "I want to learn everything." She isn't taking any lessons at the moment, but Swenty hopes to get back into dance soon.

"I want to be able to see different cultures," she states. Swenty, who has been to Germany and Mexico, wants her next expedition to be to the African jungles. She feels that experiencing the tribes and how they live would be a supreme opportunity.

Swenty encourages those people who want to become involved with swimming on campus to try it. She says that all ability levels are welcomed by the team even if the reason for joining is just to stay in shape.

Competing in collegiate sports is an accomplishment for any athlete, but for Keyser it is a special feat. After losing his leg to a rare form of cancer, Ewing's Sarcoma, at 4  years old, Keyser has practiced courage, skill, and strength overcoming his physical limitation. He doesn't swim because it's easy, he swims because swimming "allows you to compete everyday in practices and meets against yourself, and your teammates," says Keyser.

As a native from the Lake Placid, Fla., Keyser has faced some of the strongest swimmers in the nation. To put it into perspective Keyser says, "swimming is so competitive at all ages [in Florida]." Keyser was a four-year state qualifier as a member of the Lake Placid High School swim team before graduating in 2002. He earned the Rookie of the Year award his freshman year and held the MVP honor for holding the most points during a swim season. Lake Placid has won approximately 10 out of the last 12 district titles.

Swimming in high school was only the beginning for Keyser. Keyser went on to become a member of the U.S. Paralympic team and broke the U.S. record in the 50-meter freestyle in December of 2003. That same year he met Henderson on a trip with the team to Edmonton, Canada. Henderson encouraged Keyser to consider coming to River Falls to compete on the swim team. In 2004 while at the University of Minnesota for the Paralympic Trials, Keyser decided to apply at River Falls.

After the trials at Minnesota, Keyser headed to the 2004 Paralympics in Athens, Greece, an experience he says, "was amazing." Keyser says in regard to trying for the chance to compete on the U.S. Paralympic team again will depend on if he can get the time to train.

In spring of 2005, Keyser became a Falcon.  Keyser was selected as one captain of the men's swim team by his teammates this season and Henderson says, "He always works hard and that is a part of the reason he is one of the men's team captains." Keyser feels honored to provide leadership for his teammates stating, "It was an honor to be nominated and an honor to be selected."

The biggest challenge of his sport is not his physical limitation, but "knowing that you have to go [swim] every single day," explains Keyser. At the stroke of 2:15 p.m. Keyser drops whatever he is doing and finds himself at the pool. His attitude is what helps him to get through practice, Keyser says, "workouts are is hard as you make them."

"Coach pushes me," says Keyser. "I get treated just like everyone else on the team." He emphasizes that some workouts are harder for him than the other swimmers, but that there are workouts that are easier for him and harder for the other swimmers.

Helping people to push themselves to make themselves better is the philosophy Keyser instills as an advocate for children with disabilities, a personal trainer and a coach. Keyser is passionate about finding children with disabilities and encouraging them to participate in swimming so that they can realize their potential. "Keep at it, keep moving, don't let yourself down, don't let anyone tell you that you can't do it," advises Keyser.

"I enjoy seeing other people reaching their goals and improving themselves." For three years, Keyser coached swimming in Lake Placid serving as a mentor to young swimmers. Keyser believes that by challenging himself as a swimmer, he challenges other swimmers to be better. He says it is an exchange between people that shows "people they can push themselves."

Keyser doesn't mind being pushed by his teammates or pushing them either. Although he does have a different balance in the water than other swimmers, Keyser says it is only a small hindrance. He has trained himself and developed a pull stronger than a lot of other swimmers.

With his graduation from River Falls approaching in a little over a year and a half, Keyser pursues his major in health and human performance with a minor in health education. He hopes to use his degree to coach swimming at the high school level in the future. In the meantime, he works as a personal trainer at Bally Total Fitness in Little Canada, Minn.

Yarusso is a key competitor on the Falcon squad and his presence gives the team a boost both in and out of the water. Falcon Head Coach William Henderson enjoys having Yarusso on the team, "Anthony is a very popular member of the team and his personality helps keep the team loose," he explained.

Yarusso, originally from St.Paul, Minn. where he attended Johnson high school, attributes his great physical condition to competing in meets throughout high school and now on the college level. "Swimming has turned me into a better person, more physically active especially over winter when you can't go outside," Yarusso explains.

Yarusso resides in May Hall and when he isn't busy swimming he enjoys hanging out with friends and playing video games and "studying a bit". After practices he is tied and retires to his dorm. "I just want to sit and do nothing for the rest of the night," he jokes.

Swimming has played a dynamic role in Yarusso's life for quite some time. As a result, he plans on sticking with it long after he finishes his career as a Falcon. "It has been a part of my life for so long that I don't ever want to give it up, hopefully I can coach and continue to swim daily," he said.

Henderson admires Yarusso's progress throughout the three years that he has coached him. "He has become a stronger and stronger breaststroke swimmer . As he has gotten in better shape and stronger overall he has improved each year."

One thing that Yarusso would like to see change is fan interest. "People should try to make it to meets more often and expand our fan base. I do want to thank those that do for their support," he explained.

Falcon swimmer Danielle Mandich has spent a lot of her life in a pool. Since she started competitively swimming in the seventh grade, she has spent at least one season a year for seven years on a swim team. This season with the UWRF swimming team marks her eighth year of competitive swimming.

Mandich, a sophomore, has gained a lot of talent and knowledge of the sport because of all the time she has dedicated to it. Some of her greatest achievements are being named all-conference three times in her high school years, going to state her last three years of high school, and being Most Valuable Performer of her swim team in her junior and senior years.

"He was voted captain by the guys last spring and I think they made a super choice," says Head Coach Bill Henderson about Fritchen and his role as a team leader. Fritchen is a freestyle swimmer for the team and is a tough competitor in those events. Henderson believes Fritchen "is one of the stronger free swimmers at every distance."

Giving credit back to his coach, Fritchen states that part of the reason he came to UWRF to pursue swimming was because, "We have a really good coach who is very good at recruiting and very persuasive."  "I like the people that participate in the sport and the workout is strenuous," says Fritchen in reason why his is attracted to the sport. He expresses that swimming does more than satisfy his desire for entertainment, but that swimming "taught me dedication and [how] to concentrate on the things I care about."

Swimming for Washington Park High School, Fritchen was named MVP his senior year. He enjoyed the honor of being named the team's Most Improved after his freshman year at River Falls. That was the season Fritchen experienced what he calls his best accomplishment in his swim career to date. Fritchen dropped at least two seconds in all of his events.

Fritchen's mother, Maureen, and older brother, Joe, were two main influences in his decision to pursue swimming as a form of competition. He says that other people who may be considering swimming as a sport should "[be prepared] to work hard and be ready to tough it out; it's tiring. As long as you know how to swim, you have the potential to be a really good swimmer," says Fritchen.

Going to winter training camp last season in Florida is one of Fritchen's best memories of his swim career. He enjoyed practicing with the team there and spending his free time at the Florida beaches playing volleyball. Fritchen looks forward to his second year of winter training camp in California this season.

As he competes through the season, Fritchen will be using his "laid-back" personality to stay relaxed during his meets. He explains that is better to swim when the body is relaxed; which, in exchange helps the swimmer to compete with loose rather than tight muscles.

As the president and founder of the UWRF water polo club, Fritchen promotes recreational competition two times a week. Making time "for swimming to give me a break from all the classes and homework," is part of the work of balancing his role as a student-athlete. Ultimately, Fritchen says that academics come first.

Fritchen, a Racine, Wis., native, is passionate about art. He decided to turn his passion into a career and is in his third year of pursuing an art major and a minor in coaching. Painting and drawing are hobbies of Fritchen's and he hopes these hobbies will someday help him to accomplish his goal of "having a successful career in painting or drawing." Art is not only Fritchen's career choice, but also a way for him to let out whatever is on his mind. "I see art as a stress reliever and a good way to express myself," he says.

Last season Dornseif qualified for the finals in the 200 backstroke at the WIAC championships. He added his name to the Top 10 Falcon times in that event, dropping 30 seconds off his best time to finish with in 5:31. Dornseif could not figure out why Henderson was "going crazy." Henderson had told him "don't try to swim too fast, you're already fast," before he started the race at the WIAC Meet. So, Dornseif just swam the race and finished with one of his best memories; something he "jumped up and down and screamed about."

In order to prepare for the physical and mental toughness he needs to use in meets, Dornseif does a few things before he swims. He puts together a new "meet mix" for every meet and listens to his I-pod while doing 15 minutes of yoga before he swims. If it is a home meet, he walks to the River Falls High School pool where the meets are held. Other than that Dornseif does a lot of "laughing" and "talking" before he swims.

To improve his swimming technique Dornseif watches Olympic gold medalists Lenny Krazelberg and Aaron Peirsol. Both Krazelberg and Peirsol are "backstrokers" and Dornseif believes they are "great personalities."

Even though he has to work "extremely hard," Dornseif is addicted to swimming and has begun to believe that he does more than promote UWRF swimming through word of mouth. "I am some days a walking advertisement; I have a lot of swimming apparel."

For Dornseif the satisfaction of implementing a hard work ethic and building friendships is a contribution of the team atmosphere swimming creates. "The friendships are forever; I haven't forgotten about one friend from swimming," he stated.

As much as Dornseif loves swimming it is two hours of his life on average days. School is Dornseif's priority. He manages to balance his dedication to school and commitment to swimming "very carefully." Dornseif also has the responsibility of managing his floor as a resident assistant at McMillan Hall.

Dornseif is currently pursuing a degree in art with an emphasis in secondary education. "I love all aspects of art," he says. And, with "1,000 useless Superman facts," he has a fondness for the super hero.

"I'm a pretty easy guy to get a long with, I can talk with people and I'm helpful," says Dornseif. He likes to help people solve problems and refers to himself as a "problem solver." Beyond his passions of playing guitar, his family and friends and baseball, Dornseif plans to one day be a youth minister.

Dale Stiles, Dornseif's former youth minister, inspired him to pursue the path. Dornseif was at a 7 th grade retreat as a "SALT" leader when he realized that youth ministry was something he wanted to do.

If Dornseif could, he would start his future or as he says "life" right now. He wants to start teaching and build his own home on his own land anywhere but in a big city. Dornseif has many goals  - among them to "be a good artist, person, friend, husband and teacher."

Head Coach Bill Henderson describes her attitude as, "positive" and "can-do." Cannady stands just five-feet, two-inches, but when it comes to size it really does not matter in Canady's case. "Her best quality is her quickness. She is cat-like in her reactions and very strong for her size," he explains.

Cannady enjoys swimming for several reasons. "I love the feeling you get after a hard workout and feeling the accomplishment you get when you push yourself past your limits. Both in practices and workouts, achieving something you dreamed about. And I love the smell of bromine/chlorine and hanging out with the team," Cannady explained.

Cannady is a Christian and lives with her parents, Marie and Rick, and her two younger brothers, Chris and Patrick. She is extremely close with her family. "They mean more than anything to me. They have supported me through everything and I don't know what I would do without them," she explains.

Cannady has made many accomplishments throughout her academic career at UW-River Falls. She has made the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll and Dean's List every semester. She has also received scholarships for academics and leadership. Last year the swim team named her Most Inspirational and to top it all off she will graduate with her undergraduate degree in three years.

The memories of being on the swim team are what Cannady will reflect on most when her career comes to the end. "What you will remember aren't going to be the times and places, it is the memories you made along the way. It is the friendships you make and the goofy and crazy things you do," Cannady said.

Cannady plans on graduating next year with a degree in communicative disorders and a minor in coaching. She plans on sticking around to complete two years of graduate school at UW-River Falls. After that she would like to be a speech therapist at a nursing home, elementary school or a hospital.

Felts was born in South Korea and was adopted along with her twin sister, Tiffany, and older sister Tami at three months old. Richard and Judy Felts of Shawano, Wis., brought Felts to the United States giving her parents, but also introducing her to swimming; something that would change her life. Felt's parents enrolled Felts and her sisters in swimming lessons as babies and she says, "it came naturally."

Now a junior, Felts transferred to River Falls from the Milwaukee School of Engineering after her freshman year of college. MSOE does not have a swim team and after Felts realized that River Falls has a swim team, she said, "I'm swimming. I missed it way too much," says Felts.

Felts was named one of the captains of the women's team this season. "I watch out for the team and make sure they are doing what they are suppose to," she says. Bill Henderson, head coach of UWRF swimming and diving, says that Felts is already showing strong leadership abilities. "Tia is one of the hardest working and most selfless members of the team," says Henderson.

Beyond doing her best as she competes in the IM and backstroke this season, Felts expresses that she has responsibility as a member of the team. She says that she and her teammates will be "working hard" and giving "all effort" this season. Most importantly, Felts says that "being a team, cheering each other on and building [each other's] self esteem," is a key component of the swim team's success. According to Felts, it is about "building trust."

Besides helping Felts to eat healthy, Felts credits swimming for her grades. Having too much time on her hands after swim season can be a problem for Felts, but during the season she practices time management and manages her workload. Majoring in biology with a minor in math, Felts believes swimming has "taught me discipline and responsibility."

Felts uses these attributes as a member of the Student Athlete Advisory Committee. She and a few other River Falls student athletes will be attending the Chicago convention for Div. III schools in a few weeks.

Coaching swimming is something Felts may like to do and she shares advice with those who want to become involved in swimming. "If you want to be a swimmer, take swim lessons and be a part of a club," she advises, "Don't give up and the more you do, the more you will accomplish."

When she is not swimming her self or watching Olympic swimmers Amanda Beard and Michael Phelps swim, Felts turns to her second passion music. Playing the viola has been a part of her life since she was two years old and Felts says that if time would allow she would be in the community orchestra.

Regarding her future, Felts plans on attending graduate school and getting a job at a hospital somewhere in the Midwest. She would also love to travel back to her birthplace in South Korea and explore Europe and Australia.

But for now Felts says, "I would like swimming to be promoted more on campus, swimming can be exciting. I don't think people know how much heart and dedication it takes," she expresses, "swimming is viewed as easy, but we have to work our butts off to get there."

Since her arrival, both programs have shown many improvements from points scored at the conference meet to national qualifiers. She looks forward to continued improvements and success for both programs in the up-coming season.

In addition to her coaching responsibilities, she teaches in the UWRF health & human performance department. Some of the classes she teaches are exercise leadership, physical activity behavior, track coaching and individual sport.

Before going to Texas A&M, she coached at the University of Iowa and at Louisiana State University as a graduate assistant. At Iowa she was responsible for the women jumpers, throwers and multi-event athletes. She also coached a women's 400-meter hurdler All-American. She also was the team's strength and conditioning coordinator. At LSU she worked in the athletic department compliance and marketing departments and with the senior women's administrator. She also assisted with ticket office and event management operations.

Syverson's athletes earned championship honors in the distance medley relay at the 2006 indoor WIAC  meet also earning a provisional time for the national meet. Syverson's athletes have set two UWRF records for men and have set seven school records on the women's side.

Torrion Amie is in his ninth season as the Falcons jump coach and this year will also coach the male sprinters. He has coached many conference champions, national qualifiers and several All-Americans including school record holders in the high jump, long jump and the heptathlon.

In addition to his coaching responsibilities, he is the Upward Bound Coordinator at UW-River Falls, partnering with Arlington High School in St. Paul, Minnesota. Some of Amie’s duties include assisting inner city young adults in tutoring, passing Minnesota standards tests, exposing students to cultural field trips and leadership conferences and college visits.

From 1998 to 2006 Amie was an ad hoc teacher at the University in the department of health & human performance, teaching physical education and dance classes. Since 1997 he has choreographed for the campus dance theatre program. Since 2000, he has been the advisor to the UWRF dance team. Amie runs dance clinics all over the nation and internationally in Japan.

Amie received his masters of education degree in kinesiology, with an emphasis in sports management, from the University of Minnesota. He holds a bachelor of arts degree in music and a minor in dance from UW-River Falls.

Perkins is a firm believer in the basics of the game and teaches them to her athletes. She also believes that getting along together as a team (on and off the field), working, cooperating and having fun are keys to success. "Being involved in athletics is much more than winning and losing. It is learning about yourself and how to get along with others. Athletics can be an important part of a person's educational experience. The lessons that you learn on the field can be just as valuable as the lessons learned in the classroom. I want athletic participation to be a positive learning experience for my players as well as for myself and the entire coaching staff," Perkins said.

As a coach, I believe it is my responsibility to prepare my student-athletes to be successful both on the field and in their lives. Learning softball skills (such as hitting, throwing, and fielding) is important but you won't be successful without learning how to work hard, being persistent, not giving up, and getting along with others. So, as a coaching staff, not only do we focus on sport specific skills but we also work on trusting your teammates, communication skills, learning how to deal with conflict, and becoming a better person. These skills will help you be successful whether it's on the field, in the classroom, or in the workplace.

My assistant coach, Jody Gabriel, and I compliment each other quite well. I'm a "big picture" type of person and Jody is a "detail" type of person. Jody played softball at UW-River Falls for three years, knows my coaching style and the caliber of play in the WIAC. We both played college ball so we understand the demands placed on our student-athletes and know the commitment that it takes to be successful. Together, I feel that we cover all the bases (excuse the pun!).

Obviously, I want players who can play ball AND be successful in the classroom. That doesn't mean that you have to be an all-state player and a merit scholar finalist. But it does mean that you have to be willing to work hard at becoming a better ball player AND a solid student. Since softball is a team sport, I also look for players who bring a positive attitude to the team.

One way to measure the success of the program is to look at the number of players who have earned post-season awards. I am proud of the number of softball players who have been named to all-conference and all-regional teams. I am also extremely proud of those softball players who have been named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll, WIAC Softball Scholar Athletes, and NFCA All-American Scholar Athletes. These awards show that we truly can combine the student-athlete philosophy.

Our primary goal will be to win the WIAC Championship. In order to achieve that, many other goals will have to be realized, such as players and coaches giving 100 percent, getting along together as a team, and working hard in the classroom. All the little things have to happen in order for the main goal to be achieved.

I have always believed that the only way to get better as a team is to play teams that really push you. With the WIAC being one of the toughest conferences in the nation, along with playing some of the top teams from the Minnesota and Iowa conferences, our schedule is always TOUGH! We don't have to drive far to play teams ranked in the top 20 of the nation! In the long run, that will only make the Falcons a better team.

State, honored Perkins and nine other former Cyclone greats including an Olympian and a former player from both the NBA and NFL. The athletes were also honored at halftime of the Iowa State - Northern Illinois football game on Saturday afternoon. Perkins was joined by her family and by two of her biggest influences, her fifth grade teacher and her high school coach.

"It was a truly humbling experience to be inducted with all of the other athletes, which included Olympians, professional athletes, and national champions," said Perkins. "It was incredible to be included in such a group of outstanding athletes."

This was in the early 1970s before girl's sports were prominent in high schools. When Perkins was a sophomore, the high school added softball and track & field for girls, so Perkins joined both teams. During her senior year, the school added basketball, which Perkins joined as well. Perkins excelled at all three sports, but was recruited to Iowa State to run track & field.

States shall, on the basis of sex, be excluded from participation in, be denied the benefits of, or be subjected to discrimination under any educational program or activity receiving Federal financial assistance."

Before this was passed men had many more opportunities to play sports and also enjoyed many perks such as athletic scholarships. Title IX made sure that these opportunities were available to the women as well as the men. Perkins attended ISU just when these changes were taking place and was actually one of the first women to receive one of these scholarships.

She has led the Falcon softball team to seven WIAC West Division championships, two WIAC conference championships, and will coach the softball team for her 16th year beginning this spring. Perkins is the winningest softball coach in the WIAC with 312 wins. She is a full professor at River Falls and is also the assistant chair of the Health and Human Performance department.

"Jody has been a great fit for the team. She knows the UW-RF program, understands my coaching philosophy, and is very familiar with the caliber of ball in the WIAC. Her strengths are working defensively with first and third base, and working offensively with the team. Her coaching experiences, leadership and organizational abilities have been great assets to the team and coaching staff, " Coach Faye Perkins said.

Saufl was second in scoring for the Falcons. She had 10 goals and eight assists for 28 points. She finished her career with 15 goals and nine assists. Saufl was named the team's Offensive Player of the Week twice during the 2006 season.

The Academic All-America  program honors male and female student-athletes annually who have succeeded at the highest level on the playing field and in the classroom. Individuals are selected through voting by CoSIDA, a 2,000 member organization consisting of sports public relations professionals for colleges and universities in the United States and Canada.

Sperstad finished the season with two goals and four assists for eight points. She now has six goals, nine assists and 21 career points. Sperstad was named the team's Defensive Player of the Week once during the 2006 season.

Amy Jensen returns for her senior season with the Falcons and will play one of the midfield positions. She is a talented performer in both the offensive and defensive ends of the field. Entering her final season she has 23 goals and 60 career points.

High School, Personal: Jensen earned all-conference and all-conference honorable mention honors at Bloomington Kennedy High School. She was also named to the second All-Metro team. She was a member of the National Honor Society. Jensen's high school coach was Art Seplack. She lists her favorite soccer moment as winning the WIAC Championship. She is the daughter of Susan Woolard and Wayne Jensen. Jensen is majoring in elementary education.

Ashley Peterson is one of the top all-around soccer performers in the WIAC. She has the talent and skill to play any position on the field. She has started many games at either forward or defense, and moved to the other position at critical moments. Peterson will be among the leaders in goals, assists and points when her career is over. Entering the 2006 season she has 20 goals, and 16 assists for 56 career points.

High School, Personal: Peterson was named to the first all-conference team for three straight seasons and earned honorable mention once. Four times she was named Forest Lake High School's Most Valuable Player. She likes to hang out with friends and family, playing soccer and tennis, watching movies and bowling. Her favorite soccer moment was winning the 2003 WIAC Championship. Her high school coach was Jeny Hurd. She is the daughter of Gail and Bob. Peterson is majoring in health & human performance.

High School, Personal: Dudley earned a Raider award at Park High School. She was named her school's Athlete of the Week and earned the Coaches award. Her hobbies include reading, doing crossword puzzles and sudoku and hanging out with friends. Her role models include her sister, Sonja, a former Falcon soccer player, and Briana Scurry. Her favorite soccer moment was beating Stevens Point and earning her first collegiate shutout against Augsburg. Her high school coach was Greg Juba. She is the daughter of Deb and Caroll. Dudley is majoring in history education.

High School, Personal: She was voted Champlin Park's Most Dedicated player in 2003. She is the daughter of Linda and Jeff. Her role models are her sister and parents. Her hobbies include being with friends and family, watching movies, listening to music and being active in anything involving soccer or other sports. Her high school coach was Chris Osbourne. Pengra is majoring in marketing communications.

Amy Piersak is in her third year with the Falcons and will play defender. She has outstanding range and can cover a lot of the field. An all-around excellent athlete, she is also a member of the Falcon indoor and outdoor track & field teams.

High School, Personal: Piersak was named to the all-conference team in 2003 and earned all-conference honorable mention in 2002 at Mounds View High School. She also earned All-State Honorable Mention honors in 2003. She earned four letters. Piersak played in the High School Senior Classic. She was also a member of the track & field team and earned four letters. She gained All-State honors and was the team captain. She was a member of the National Honor Society and earned four academic letters. Her hobbies include reading, hunting, fishing and camping. Her role models are her parents, her high school soccer and track & field coaches and Brandi Chastain. Her favorite soccer moment was when the Falcons defeated Stevens Point last year in two overtimes in the WIAC playoffs. Her high school coaches were Sharon and John Swallen. Her sister, Kelly, is a member of the team. She is the daughter of Debra and Robert. Piersak is majoring in biology secondary education.

High School, Personal: Sperstad was named to the all-conference team as a senior at Eau Claire Memorial High School. She also twice earned all-conference honorable mention honors. She helped lead the Old Abes to the WIAA State Tournament. She was a member of the Partners Club and a Link Leader. Her favorite past time is hanging out with her friends. He role model is her Mom. Her favorite soccer moment was when the Falcons defeated Stevens Point. Her high school coach was George Oien. She is the daughter of Rita and Kris. Sperstad is majoring in health & human performance.

High School, Personal: Hermes earned all-conference honors in soccer and track & field at Prior Lake High School. She was the soccer team's Most Valuable Player and Rookie of the Year and won the team's Golden Boot award. Hermes earned three soccer letters. She was named to the conference's All-Academic track & field team and was a member of the school's Honor Roll. Hermes earned four track & field letters. She is the daughter of Colleen and Lannie. Her high school coach was David Graham. Her hobbies include being with friends and going up north with her family. Her role models are her parents. Her favorite soccer moment was when the Falcons defeated Stevens Point at home in 2005. Hermes is undecided on a major field of study.

High School, Personal: Merritt competed at Totino-Grace High School. She also played three seasons of hockey. Her favorite past time is playing on the Hockey Ministries International team. Her role model is Krissy Wendell. Her favorite soccer moments were defeating Stevens Point twice in 2005. She was a member of the UW-RF lacrosse club team and the Women's Initiatives committee. Her high school coach was Jeff Dennehy. She is the daughter of Joan and Lance. Merritt is majoring in marketing communications with a minor in Spanish.

High School, Personal: Peterson earned four soccer letters at Holy Family Catholic High School. She was the team's captain in 2004 and earned the team's Rough & Tough Award in 2003. She earned honorable mention to the all-conference team in 2003 and was named her team's Most Improved Player in 2002. A good all-around athlete, she also earned four letters in track & field and two in basketball. Peterson was a member of the Student Council for three years and received the Mary Award, which recognizes school achievement, in 2004. She likes to read in her spare time. Her role models are her parents. Her high school coach was Jorge Oconitrillo. Her favorite soccer moments were beating Stevens Point in 2005 and scoring a goal off a corner kick in her team's first game of her senior season. She is the daughter of Ann and Jim. She is majoring in elementary education.

High School, Personal: She earned four soccer letters and honorable mention to the all-conference team and was the team's Most Improved Player in 2004. In 2005 she was the team's captain, was named to the all-conference team and was a Gatorade Will to Win Athlete. She also earned three track & field letters and was the team captain. She earned honorable mention to the all-conference team in the 300-meter hurdles event. She is the daughter of Debra and Robert and they are her role models. Her favorite soccer moment was defeating Stevens Point in double overtime in the WIAC playoffs in 2005. Her sister, Amy, is also a member of the Falcon soccer team. Her hobbies include playing soccer, being outside, camping, watching movies and hanging out with her friends. Her high school coach was Sharon Swallen. Piersak is majoring in biology.

High School, Personal: Straub earned the Lake Conference honorable mention award while playing at Rosemount High School. She earned three letters and won the Irish Award. Straub was a member of the National Honor Society and also a member of the Spanish National Honor Society. She was on the A Honor Roll for four years. Her favorite past time is spending time with her family and friends. Her role model is her family. Her favorite soccer memory is scoring her first goal, off a header, in college in 2005. Her high school coach was O. J. Okello. She is the daughter of Linda and Vince. Straub is majoring in biomedical science.

High School, Personal: Bartyla was named North Branch's Best Offensive Player four times. She was a member of the B Honor Roll. Her favorite past times include watching movies and hanging out with friends. Bartyla's favorite soccer moment was having her best game against rival Chisago Lakes. Her high school coach was Irv Geary. She is the daughter of Coreen and Matt. Bartyla is undecided on a major field of study.

High School, Personal: Cook was Washburn High School's leading scorer and was named to the 2006 All-State team. She helped lead the team to the WIAA sectional finals. Her favorite past times include listening to music, meeting new people, playing sports and being active. She is the daughter of Dori and Glen and they are her role models. Her favorite soccer moments were being named to the All-State team and seeing her high school team progress and advance to the section finals. Her high school coach was Olaf Kirsten. Cook is undecided on a major field of study.

High School, Personal: George played two seasons at Hopkins High School. She also competed in lacrosse and also earned a letter in cross country skiing. She was on the B Honor roll and did volunteer work at an elementary school. Her favorite past times include playing sports, hanging out with friends and spending time on the lake. Her role models are her family and friends. Her favorite soccer moment was winning three straight summer league titles. Her high school coach was Keith Palvelka. She is the daughter of Wendy and Bill. George is undecided on a major field of study.

High School, Personal: Larson was named to the all-conference team in 2003, 2004 and 2005 at Winona Cotter High School. She also earned a Leader award. She was a Laws of Life essay contest class winner. Her favorite past times include spending time with friends and family, working out, listening to music and being on the river. Her role model is her family. Her favorite soccer moment was tying Rochester Lourdes in 2005 for the first time in school history. She is the daughter of Jenelle and Chad. Her high school coaches were Craig Junker and Gabe Manrique. Larson will major in either biology or health & human performance.

High School, Personal: Potter earned the Blackshirt award at Waukesha South High School. Her favorite past time is going o movies. Her high school coach was Pete Byrn and he is her role model. Her favorite soccer moments were all of the random, funny things that happened during her high school soccer career. Potter is the daughter of Jodi and Mark. She is majoring in communicative disorders.

High School, Personal: Rasmussen earned Kasson-Mantorville's Hustle award. She also competed in track & field. She was the team's captain, was named to the all-conference team and was a state champion. Her favorite past time includes hanging out with teammates before and after games. Her role models are her Mom, Dawn Miller, Meg O'Neill and Jen Bradford. Her favorite soccer memory is toilet papering the coach's house before the first game of the season. She is the daughter of Sally Rasmussen-Wright and Barry. Her high school coach was Chris Soderberg. Rasmussen is majoring in chemistry.

High School, Personal: Scott played at Kiel High School and was named to the first all-conference team in 2006. She was the team captain and was twice named the team's Best Offensive Player. She was named to the second all-conference team in 2005 and earned honorable mention in 2004. She was also named the Rookie of the Year and was the Comeback Athlete of the Year in Manitowoc county. Scott was a member of the academic honor roll, secretary of the Pep club and a youth soccer coach and referee. Her favorite past time is coaching youth soccer players. Her role model is her sister, Deja. Her favorite soccer moments include scoring 29 goals in 2005, being a team captain and having a close knit team that finished second in the conference. Scott is the daughter of Marcia and Daniel. Her high school coach was John Adema. She is majoring in social work.

High School, Personal: Stieler was a scholar-athlete at Andover High School. She was a member of the National Honor Society and earned academic All-State honors. Stieler's favorite past times include outdoor activities and spending time with family and friends. Her favorite soccer moment was when she and a teammate "shirted" a ball during a game. Her role model is her Mom. Her high school coach was Chad Moore. She is the daughter of Carolyn Oakes and Brian Stieler. Stieler is majoring in communicative disorders.

The Academic All-America program honors male and female student-athletes annually who have succeeded at the highest level on the playing field and in the classroom. Individuals are selected through voting by CoSIDA, a 2,000 member organization consisting of sports public relations professionals for colleges and universities in the United States and Canada.

Jensen's goal, her fifth of the season, came at 73:24. Kim Saufl picked up the assist on the play; it was her seventh of the season. Pointer goalie Meredith DeCaluwe made a save on a Saufl shot but Jensen was there to bang in the rebound.

Ashley Peterson got the Falcons on the scoreboard first with a goal at 8:01 with assists to Dianna Hermes and Amy Jensen. It was Peterson's team-leading 13th goal of the season. Hermes picked up her first assist of the year and it was Jensen's fourth assist of the season.

Peterson, a 5-2 forward, played a key role in the Falcons two conference victories against Stout (3-0) and Platteville (3-2). Peterson recorded three goals and three assists over the two-game span. She scored twice, and had one assist, at Stout and came back with a goal and two assists against Platteville. She was involved in every Falcon goal. "I think playing with Kim (Saufl) up front makes it fun for her," said Falcon Head Coach Sean McKuras. "We are seeing a lot of benefits since moving Ashley up front." She currently leads the team in scoring with 12 goals and 33 points. This is the second time this season that Peterson has been named the conference offensive player of the week - she earned the honor on Sept. 25.

Peterson then scored what proved to be the game winner at 74:55 off a penalty kick. It was her team leading 12th goal of the season. UWP did not give up and made it a one goal game at 85:20 when Allie Metcalfe scored. But the Falcons played well in the final five minutes to get the win despite being outshot, 8-7, in the second half.

Saufl would add a goal to her stat line six minutes into the second half. Saufl's goal is her sixth of the season. The score was assisted by Peterson to record her second point of the game. Peterson was not done yet as she put in an insurance Falcon goal at the 66:32 mark. Peterson leads the Falcons in scores this season with 11 goals.

Oshkosh increased their lead in the second half to two when Amanda Matze knotted a goal at 69:15. River Falls made an effort to get back in the game when Terry put in the first Falcon score at 71:41. Terry's goal was assisted by Ashley Peterson and would be the only Falcon goal of the afternoon.

Peterson led the offense scoring three goals in each contest. Against Superior she scored the team's first three goals; her second goal was unassisted and was the game-winner. Against St. Catherine she scored the team's first, third and sixth goals. She also picked up an assist on the team's fourth goal.

Peterson got the first goal of the contest at 10:45 with an assist to Kelly Piersak. It was Peterson's team leading ninth goal of the season and Piersak's first assist. Jensen scored what proved to be the game-winning goal at 31:42 with assists to Peterson and Kim Saufl. She scored into the lower left corner to give the Falcons a 2-0 lead. It was Jensen's fourth goal of the season. Peterson and Saufl each picked up their fifth assist of the year. They lead the team in assists. Saufl led the team in shots with three and two were on goal.

River Falls jumped out to an early lead following Peterson's first score of the game six minutes in. Scoring was limited until the Falcons' Julie Sperstad netted a goal at 29:28. Sperstad was assisted by Amy Jensen who played a key role the rest of the game.

Peterson knocked in her second score of the game at 47:01. The Falcon lead was at three and there were no signs of them slowing up. Jensen scored her first goal of the game at 49:23, assisted by Peterson. Kim Saufl was the fourth Falcon player to score when she put in a score at 50:51. Peterson scored her third goal of the game at 55:04, assisted by Jensen. Peterson and Jensen reversed roles on the next and final goal as Jensen scored her second goal of the game at 77:48.

All the scoring came in the first half and the Falcons had to stage a comeback to get the win. UWW's Lindsey Kohlbeck opend the scoring with an unassisted goal at 19:11. It was her first goal of the season.

The Falcons battled back and tied the game just 49 seconds later when Ashley Peterson scored her second goal of the year with an assist from Kim Saufl. It was her second assist of the year. The game-winner came at 31:00 when Kim Saufl scored her team-leading fourth goal of the year. Peterson picked up the assist - it was her third assist of the year.

The final shots total were nearly even - the Falcons had eight and the Warhawks seven. UW-RF had four shots in each half while Whitewater had three in the first and four in the second. UWW did hold an 8-3 advantage in corner kicks. The Falcons had 11 fouls and Whitewater nine.

The Falcons had a slight, 15-14, advantage in shots for the game. Both teams had good scoring chances that were either stopped by the goalie or a defender or the shot sailed wide. The Falcons put a push on in the final minute of overtime and had three shots from 15-20 feet in front of the AC goal that were blocked by defenders. AC had 10 corner kicks and the Falcons four. Both teams were called for 12 fouls.

Larson scored what proved to be the game-winning goal in the team's 7-0 win over Northland. She scored her first collegiate goal at 15:45 from just inside the box off a corner kick. "Jessi started both games and came up with a big goal against Northland," Falcon Coach Sean McKuras said.

Macalester, ranked No. 10 in the pre-season D3Kicks.com poll, dominated the first half of play out shooting the Falcons, 9-2. Grace King scored her second goal of the season off a long run at 14:02. With just under two minutes to play in the half, the Scots grabbed a 2-0 lead when Maggie Yates scored her first goal of the season with an assist to Rachel Oman. Yates scored on a header off a cross.

The Falcons had a much better second half and out shot the Scots, 9-7. Amy Jensen led the Falcons with four shots. Falcon goalie Emily Stieler made seven saves. Macalester goalie, Jenny Lee, stopped five shots to earn her second win and second shutout of the season. Annie Borton led the Scores with five shots - all coming in the first half. Kim Saufl, Ashley Peterson and Dianna Hermes each had two shots in the contest. The Scots out shot the Falcons, 16-11 and both teams had 11 fouls. The Scots had seven corner kicks and the Falcons three.

UW-RF goalie Emily Stieler recorded her second straight shutout of the season. This one was a little easier than in Friday's match - she wasn't required to make a save. She has now played 200 minutes without allowing a goal.

Defense: Midfielder Jen Terry (Shoreview, Minn. Totino-Grace HS) had two more excellent games for the Falcons last week. She scored the team's only goal in a 2-1 loss at Oshkosh on Saturday. She also had a shot in the match against Carleton. Jen has had to change positions a few times for us but always finds a way to contribute. She played a solid defensive game against Carleton and helped in transition at Oshkosh where she scored," said Falcon Coach Sean McKuras. This year Terry has three goals and seven points. She has had nine shots during the season.

Defense: Defender Betsy Straub (So., Rosemount, Minn.) was one of the team's defensive leaders in the Falcons two wins last week, including a 4-1 WIAC win over Superior. The Falcons allowed only one goal in the two games. Straub, who has started all seven matches for the Falcons, kept the opponents offense off balance throughout both matches. "Betsy continues to be one of our top players," said Falcon Coach Sean McKuras. The Falcons have allowed only four goals in seven games.

Offense: Midfielder Dianna Hermes (So., Prior Lake, Minn.) played well in two games for the Falcons last week. Against Macalester she started and recorded two shots in a 2-0 loss. She also started against Augsburg and had two shots. "Dianna has been working hard in making the transition to the outside midfielder position," Falcon Coach Sean McKuras said.

Midfielder Amy Jensen and defender Ashley Peterson lead the list of returnees. Peterson has been named to the All-WIAC team in each of her three previous seasons while Jensen has been named to the team twice before. Peterson has scored 20 career goals and has scored 56 career points. Jensen has scored 23 career goals and has 60 career points. Jensen led the 2005 Falcons with 10 goals and she is the top returning scorer. Seven of the team's top eight scorers are back. Kelly Piersak had a great first season for the Falcons scoring six goals and she finished with 17 points. She was third in scoring. Transfer Kim Saufl made an immediate impact last year. She finished fourth in scoring with five goals and 11 points.

Defender Amy Piersak will be look at for leadership in the defensive end. The Falcons lost two defenders to graduation. Sarah Peterson and Tracy Olson are other defenders returning. Jensen, Saufl and Julie Sperstad give the Falcons lead a talented group of midfielders. Sperstad scored two goals and had six points. Other midfielders back include Dianna Hermes, Lindsey Merritt and Betsy Straub. Other forwards back include Jennifer Pengra and Jen Terry. Andrea Dudley returns in goal. She played in two games in 2005 and had a 1-0-0 record.

Straub feels the same way about her teammates. "I love all the girls," says Straub. "Without one of the girls, the game wouldn't work. And I know I can rely on each and every one of them. That's what makes the game so neat."

Straub is majoring in biomedical sciences and hopes to be a physical therapist for sports rehabilitation. She someday hopes to run her own practice. "Betsy is a great student," says McKuras. "Academics come first to her."

Straub started playing soccer in fourth grade, moving on to a traveling soccer team in eighth grade. "I started because a bunch of my friends and I, including my younger sister, decided to start playing," she says. "I've loved the game ever since."

She believes that playing on a collegiate team is much more competitive compared to the high school level. "The game is faster, the girls are stronger and more determined, and overall, are more skilled," she says.

She explains that her brother, a marine who has been to Iraq twice, is her biggest inspiration because he works for everything he has and doesn't let things affect his life in a negative way. "He is still the same brother I have always known," she says.

"It wasn't until one of the scouts called me and asked me if I was interested in playing soccer at college that it got me hooked onto River Falls," said the 5-1 midfielder. "The first time I visited, it felt like home."

"What is so cool about her is that she played on the first women's soccer team at the University of Minnesota," said Terry. "What I didn't know until she told me was that she was also No. 7 and played as a center midfielder."

"I have learned so much from Sean," said Terry. "The most important thing that I learned is that throughout the season there will be changes made on and off the field and there is a good reason for them. It is for the good of the team and learning to trust those decisions was really hard for me at first."

Hermes attended Prior Lake High School and was a key member on the soccer and track & field teams. She earned all-conference honors in each sport and earned three soccer letters. Not only was Hermes good on the field, she also was great academically as she made the all-academic team.

"I have learned to put the team first," said Hermes when asked what she has learned from McKuras. "We need to play to the best of our ability and at the position that helps the team out the most. He has taught me how to really become part of the game."

Hermes' favorite game with the Falcons was a 1-0 double overtime win over Stevens Point in last year's WIAC Playoffs. The game allowed River Falls to advance to the semifinals to face Eau Claire. The Falcons lost the game but the road to get there was exciting.

Head Coach Sean McKuras loves her drive for the game. "Jennifer has developed as a player over the past few years. She has become a much more physical player with a stronger role on the field," McKuras commented.

It is no surprise that her favorite movie at the moment is "She's the Man", featuring Amanda Bynes and the theme of the movie is... you guessed it, soccer. While Pengra would like to get involved in other clubs and organizations on campus, she just doesn't have the time. She if fully committed to her sport, "Soccer takes up so much time," she reflects.

Originally from Champlin, Minn., where she attended high school, Pengra is close with her family. She describes her sister, who is six years older than her, as her role model and best friend. Even though she recently moved to Arizona to pursue a teaching job the two remain close. "I really look up to her and seek advice," she said.

Pengra has enjoyed every moment playing for the Falcon team. "The girls and the coaching staff are amazing, being on the team brings out the best in you," she gushes. Pengra feels that playing on an organized sport makes you well-rounded and teaches athletes how to work well with other people.

McKuras first saw Olson play as a junior for Rosemount High School. McKuras recruited Olson as a senior "I liked her as a player, but once I met her, she is a great person," says McKuras, "the kind of person that makes your team better."

Olson starts for the Falcon soccer team as an outside defender and helps to direct the team defensively. McKuras believes that Olson closely resembles Tony Sanneh , a member of the United States men's National team, as a "smooth-styled" soccer player. Olson is credited as one of the reasons the Falcon soccer team has been successful. McKuras says Olson "believes in making our team better."

Last year Olson helped to lead the Falcons to the team's first win over Stevens Point in the history of the soccer program. Olson assisted on the winning goal and that snapped a 15-game losing streak to the Pointers.

In the mean time, Olson and her teammates are working to prepare for one of their hardest games of the season against WIAC competitor Eau Claire. Eau Claire is undefeated in WIAC play in the 2006 season so far and Olson says it will be "our biggest game so far."

Olson has been playing soccer for as long as she can remember but it was just as a neighborhood sport at first. It was not until a neighborhood friend bet her that she was better than she was that Olson began seeing soccer as a competitive sport. From that point on Olson liked soccer and has been playing ever since.

A captain of her high school's soccer team in her junior and senior years, Olson earned all-conference honors. She says that even though her high school soccer team did not win many games, she still had fun playing the game. "It is a complicated sport, when everything is meshing well it is probably the most fun sport to watch and play," says Olson about soccer.

When it came to college soccer Olson knew that she wanted to play but she did not know if she would get the chance. Not only does Olson play, but she is a member of the Student Athlete Advisory Committee, as the secretary and a representative for soccer.

Soccer can be challenging according to Olson. Olson says soccer is "mentally tough" and that it is important that "you can handle criticism." Being able to play consistent is also a key, the Falcon soccer team has many players who do not have subs and are out on the field for 45 minutes.

McKuras says Olson's consistency in every category of soccer has been one of her "difficulties." Because Olson is a well-rounded player and good at everything, she has missed out on WIAC recognition up to this point. However, this does not stop Olson from "excelling at all parts of the game," says McKuras.

A social work major, Olson describes being a student-athlete as "definitely difficult," and although she has 8 a.m., classes everyday, she says soccer helps her to manage her time by keeping her on a "strict schedule." Time management is important and reading instead of watching movies during the long bus rides to and from soccer games is a way Olson manages to get her work done.

Olson also manages to make time to be a "big sister" as a member of the Big Brother, Big Sister program. She devotes at least one hour a week to eat lunch and play at recess with her little sister. Olson shares that her little sister is a "hard working and caring individual."

Olson enjoys competing with her team and many of them play intramural sports together. Those people who have not seen her play soccer can catch Olson playing basketball, broomball or co-ed softball. "I have always played a lot of sports," she says.

"The cool kids," a name given to Olson and a group of her teammates by McKuras, prepares for every game with a simple routine. Olson and her "cool kids" all wear sweatbands on their arms and before every game they make sure, they "hit [their] sweat bands together."

"My parents are my No. 1 fans and they would drive or fly where ever they need to go to cheer on their girls," exclaims Olson. She says that the fans and parents of the soccer team are "amazing" and that they never miss any of the games. According to Olson, "that's pretty special."

This season, Peterson is playing forward for the Falcons and has made an impressive impact for the team. Already being named the Falcons Offensive Player of the Week twice this season, she was also named the WIAC Offensive Player of the Week on Sept. 26.

When asked about the difference between high school and college soccer, Peterson states, "The level of competition and time commitment has gone up. Every team in our conference is good and on any given day can come up with a win. I think that I have become better at reading the game on and off the field. I attribute this to good coaching and many years of playing."

McKuras agrees stating that Peterson has a sense of the game where she can set and keep the tempo. In the 2005 season, Peterson was named the team's Most Valuable Player and the Most Valuable Defensive Player. Because she was primarily playing defense, she did not score goals like previous seasons but still was a team leader starting all 19 games and finishing with two assists. As of Oct. 5, she has scored 31 career goals and 85 points.

Peterson has a great relationship in and out of season with her teammates saying she can have a great time with them on and off the field, especially in their intramural soccer team known as "The Cool Kids."  She will continue supporting her teammates after her career by showing up at the games to cheer them on.

While off the field, she likes to bowl, play tennis, and spend time with her boyfriend, family and friends. Peterson enjoys watching Family Feud, which she one day hopes to be on. She likes pizza and watching the movie The Sandlot.

She played the midfield position and was responsible for creating scoring opportunities for her teammates and play strong defense to keep opponents off the scoreboard. She proved to be proficient at both tacks and did her share of scoring too. Last year she finished fourth on the team in scoring with five goals and 11 points. She was credited with 50 shots and 25 were on goal.

In her spare time she enjoys hanging out with friends and family. She has an older brother and sister as well as her twin brother. She describes her relationship with her brother as close- knit, adding that he comes to her games and offers his support.

Saufl, a team captain in 2006, is laid back and easy-going off the soccer pitch, and she likes to go out and eat, especially fettuccine alfredo . Her favorite color is green and it's not surprising that she is a Green Bay Packer fan. She also enjoys watching the Minnesota Twins play.

Saufl looks forward to graduating in December of 2008. "It is going to be weird not playing soccer my last semester. I am just so used to it," she explains. Her plans for the future include taking the certified public accountant exam. Upon passing she plans on heading to the Twin Cities to work in the field.

The 5-5 midfielder from Plymouth, Minn., came to UW-River Falls because she was attracted to the elementary education program. But before she made the journey from Plymouth she was busy making a name for herself back home.

Jensen began playing soccer like many youngsters do. "When I was four my mom signed me up and I've loved it since then," said Jensen. She learned her basics before stepping into her role as the high school three-sport athlete playing golf and hockey also.  During high school she earned all-conference and all-conference honorable mention honors at Bloomington Kennedy High School and was also name to the All-Metro team.  She also worked hard academically as a member of the National Honor Society.

Jensen started as a freshman at UW-RF wasting no time helping her team. She finished tied for second in scoring helping the Falcons win the WIAC championship. She started and played in 20 games and earned the team's Offensive Player of the Week award for her game-winning goal on a penalty kick against Con.-St. Paul in overtime.

She continued to improve through her sophomore year earning a sport on the first All-WIAC team and finishing third in scoring. She played and started in 16 games. Twice she was the team's Offensive Player of the Week and continued her academic work ethic she had in high school by being named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll and to the UW-RF Dean's List after the spring semester.

Falcon Coach Sean McKuras sees his star midfielder as, "fresher, smarter and more team orientated" this year. "She has great vision and can see the play ahead." Jensen also has great leadership skills with her strong mental and physical presence. "She is a strong leader. She sets the tone on and off the field. She's always in the mix," said McKuras.

Jensen sees her leadership role as something that comes from having a connection with her teammates. "We all have a good relationship and have fun which makes it easier.  Working hard during practice shows the girls what it takes to be a leader," said Jensen.

But when Jensen is not scoring goals, you can find her at the on-campus day care where she has worked for the past four years. "I want to be a kindergarten teacher after graduation," said Jensen, "and maybe one day coach soccer for little kids; I like that primary age group."

During the past four years, Jensen has had a major impact on this team both on and off the field, but what is important to Jensen is that she knows she's walking away from the field with something that will last long after the season is over.

Carlson led the Falcons and the WIAC in scoring in 2005. She scored nine goals and had 10 assists for 28 points. She scored three game winning goals against St. Scholastica, Superior and Stevens Point. She scored goals in seven games and added assists in seven games. She twice scored five points in a game - she scored twice and had one assist against St. Scholastica and she scored a goal and had three assists against Superior. She played and started in all 19 games.

Gibbs most recently was an assistant volleyball coach at Gardner-Webb University in the 2004 and 2005 seasons. She held responsibilities for team travel, recruiting and practice organization. She also served as the school's volleyball camp program director.

The WIAC Scholar-Athlete Award is presented to the most outstanding senior from each conference sport during the year who exhibits the greatest combination of performance and achievement in academics, athletics and leadership. The women's Scholar-Athlete award was renamed the Judy Kruckman Scholar-Athlete Award effective with the 1998-99 season.

"Kat is very deserving of the WIAC Scholar-Athlete award. She excels in all areas of her life," said Falcon Coach Patti Ford. "She exemplifies the true meaning of a Div. III student-athlete. She is a great student, a great athlete and she is committed to UWRF through her involvement in several University activities."

Tressa Gustafson gained valuable experience last season as an outside hitter, but this year her duties are going to be primarily targeted on the defensive end of the game. A very gifted passer and defensive force, Gustafson will upgrade the Falcon defense with her versatility and exceptional communication skills. Coach Patti Ford is anticipating that Gustafson's experience and presence will anchor the defensive core. In 2005, Gustafson finished the season with 153 kills, 331 digs and 37 aces.

Kathryn Krtnick returns for her senior season as one of the top setters in the WIAC. She possesses a work ethic that is second-to-none and a vast knowledge of the game. Technically, Krtnick has all the tools to be a prominent WIAC setter, but this year she looks to improve the tactical aspect of her game. In 2005, Krtnick was named to the All-WIAC first team with 1,067 assists, 178 kills, 50 aces and 396 digs. She was voted the team's Co-Player of the Year and won the Hardest Worker award for the second consecutive season. Coach Patti Ford is confident that Krtnick is the right person to have in a leadership role and ensures that she is the agent that keeps the Falcons successful.

Lindsey Mace enters this season as the Falcons starting libero. Coach Patti Ford boasts that Mace is one of most stable liberos in the WIAC. Last season her defensive prowess was evident as she led the team with 510 digs (4.18 per game). The steadiness and consistency of Mace's passing and defense will guide the team in the backcourt and will aid in making UW-RF one of the premier defensive teams in the conference. In 2005, she was awarded as the team's Defensive Player of the Year for the second straight season and is hoping to continue this legacy as a senior.

Kate Thompson is the central offensive force of the Falcons frontcourt. She brings extreme power to the outside hitter position and is one of top players in the WIAC and region at her position. Her explosive approach and daunting arm swing have provided the team with outstanding statistics. Last season Thompson finished second on the team in kills (453), third in digs (391), third in blocks (52) and led the team in aces (53). She also earned All-WIAC honorable mention and voted as the team's Co-Offensive Player of the Year. Coach Patti Ford compliments Thompson's capability of commanding opposing defenses to concentrate on her and her desire to go hard all the time.

Molly Thompson is a finesse player who possesses all the skills to be a solid outside hitter for the Falcons. Last season she played right side, but Coach Patti Ford is certain that moving her to the outside will enhance the team's offensive output. As an outside hitter, Thompson offers a tremendous array of shots and has the potential to emerge as one of the top players in the conference. In 2005, she finished with 212 kills, 143 digs and 21 aces.

Susie Ingalls returns to the Falcons after having a breakout season last year. As a sophomore, she was voted as the team's Most Improved Player, and she served as one of the team's starting middles, recording 103 kills and 63 blocks. With extraordinary athletic ability and a relentless yearning to succeed, Coach Patti Ford foresees Ingalls as having another sensational season for the Falcons. Her solid blocking skills, her adaptability, and her aptitude in adjusting to the quick pace of game will enhance not only her game, but also the play of all her teammates.

Krista Russell is fierce competitor who not only loves volleyball, but has a great understanding of the game. This fervent passion combined with her athleticism will help her vie for a position on the right side this year. Coach Patti Ford is looking for Russell to take another step forward to enhance the team's core and to fill many roles as the season progresses.

Courtney Schroeder has an innate gift for keeping the game alive with her defensive instincts and athletic ability. Her lack of court experience won't faze her this year as Coach Patti Ford is hoping to utilize her competitiveness and establish her in a role very early in the season. Although she will mostly contribute to Falcons as a defensive specialist, Schroeder is able to come into the game and give the opposition a different look as an outside hitter. In 2005, she was honored with the team's Super Sub award winner.

Nina Cooper brings charisma and competitiveness to the Falcon volleyball court. Her spirit and well-developed skills make her a great contributor to the squad. Though Cooper did not play in any matches during her freshman season, she made exceptional strides during the spring. Coach Patti Ford anticipates that Cooper will develop into an eminent player for the Falcons sometime in her career. She is the type of player who can function in many roles and is an ideal teammate on and off the court.

Drew Hample is a tremendous athlete who leads by her industriousness and enthusiasm. As a freshman, she concentrated primarily on fulfilling defense roles for the Falcons, but this year she will also train as a setter. Coach Patti Ford strongly believes that Hample's eagerness and self-discipline will compel her to develop into an exceptional setter for the team. Loyalty and commitment to both her teammates and the game of volleyball are apparent in her disposition on the court.

Shelby Sand adds a great depth and understanding of the game to the Falcon lineup. She was plagued with injuries last season, but Coach Patti Ford is optimistic that she will be healthy for this season. Sand is a solid player who will challenge for a starting position in the middle or right side. The experience level she brings into the gym is very high, and her prominent blocking skills and ability to run a fast tempo will augment the offensive productivity of the Falcons.

Ali Busby is a middle hitter by trade but will probably use her blocking and stability to help the Falcons on the right side. Coach Ford boasts about Busby's adaptability, but says that Busby will use this year to learn from the upperclassmen and find her role. Busby is a great competitor and determined athlete who brings a great wealth of athleticism and talent to the court.

Personal: She is the daughter of Carl and Shawn...majoring in health and human performance...at St. Croix Falls High School was named to the all-conference team her senior year and received honorable mention her junior year...also an all-conference performer in both basketball and track & field... in track & field she was conference champion in the 400-meter dash for three years...awarded the WPCA Award of Excellence in track & field...prep coach was Steve Magnuson.

Gina DeRosa is another impact player for the Falcons. An athletic and a mobile middle blocker, DeRosa blends very well with the Falcons offense. "She presents a wide array of options in the middle that will enhance our offensive output," said Coach Ford. DeRosa is also a standout blocker and her tremendous range will only get better.

Personal: She is the daughter of Mike and Judy...majoring in elementary education with a Spanish minor... at North St. Paul High School was named to the all-conference team and Academic All-State team...prep coach was Alyssa Larson.

Emily Hagen is an exceptionally versatile player who knows the game very well. She is an outside hitter by trade, but has taken on a setting role for the Falcons. Coach Ford is very confident that Hagen could step in the game and run the show at any time and is amazed at how quickly Hagen has adjusted to the setting position. A perfect fit for the Falcons, Hagen possesses a great work ethic and a true passion for the game. Hagen will definitely be able to help the Falcons in a variety of situations this season.

Personal: She is the daughter of Randy and Ann...majoring in marketing...at New Richland-Hartland-Ellendale-Geneva High School was named all-conference both her junior and senior years in volleyball and basketball...Named to the all-conference team all four years in softball and named to the All-State team as a senior...prep coach was Jackie Schultz.

Brittany Johnson is solid in every aspect of her game as an outside hitter. Coach Ford is excited to see her develop into a prominent player as her career progresses. In addition to having a great court sense, Johnson possesses a wide array of shots and steady backcourt play. She relentlessly pursues the ball both in the frontcourt and backcourt, adding immense depth the Falcons outside hitting core.

Personal: She is the daughter of Rich and Claire...majoring in elementary education...at Mounds View High School was voted all-conference and most inspirational...played Junior Olympics for Minnesota One Volleyball Club...prep coach was Tom Weko.

Kelsey Scheele is a great addition to the Falcon lineup. Coach Ford is very impressed with what Scheele has to offer the team. One of the best defensive players on the team, she is a confident sideout passer and is very crafty with the ball. Playing at the highest level with her high school and club teams, Scheele's transition to the college game will be smooth. As well, Scheele provides the Falcons with great depth at the outside hitter position. She thrives on the pressure of hitting against a big blocks and utilizes a great array of shots.

Personal: She is the daughter of Scott and Cheryl...majoring in accounting...at Mayer Lutheran High School was named all-conference and all-area both her junior and senior years...Named to the All-Tournament team in the 2005 State Tournament...decorated track & field athlete in the long and triple jumps...prep coach was Joelle Grimsley.

Justine Speckle is a great surprise for the Falcons. Though she hasn't played for a year, Speckle has an exceptional understanding of the game of volleyball. Her hard work ethic and blocking skills have impressed Coach Ford. Ford says that Speckle will continue to gain strength in the middle hitter's position as the season progresses and will help the Falcon lineup immensely. Speckle is also a member of the Falcon women's basketball team.

Personal: She is the daughter of Tim and Patty...majoring in biology with a minor in Spanish...at Buffalo High School she earned all-conference honorable mention honors...all-conference performer in basketball...also played softball...prep coach was Dennis Axel.

Amber Starr is a developing collegiate player who will evolve into a strong setter for the Falcons. Coach Ford compliments Starr's athleticism, her ability to see the court and her experience on successful high school teams. Starr will use this year to learn the Falcons offensive schemes and transition to the college game. With a yearning for competition and for her team to win, Starr will also contribute her defensive abilities to the Falcons backcourt this season.

Personal: She is the daughter of Jeff and Julie...majoring in international studies...at Mosinee High School was awarded with second team all-conference honors after her senior season...State Tournament participant in both volleyball and basketball...named to the all-conference track & field team for three years...prep coach was Cathy Reichert.

Becca Troop is an excellent athlete who originates from a prominent high school program. Her desire to keep the ball alive provides energy on the court for the rest of her teammates. Coach Ford asserts that Troop is a solid and steady libero for the Falcons and will contribute in key defensive situations in the backcourt. Troop is also an accomplished softball player who will play for the Falcons in the spring.

Personal: She is the daughter of Jeff and Martha...majoring in health and human performance with an adaptive PE minor...she helped Lakeville North High School place third in the 2005 State Tournament...prep coach was Milan Mader.

Andria Vetsch will evolve into a very dependable right side player for the Falcons. She has a tremendous desire to compete and improve her skills. A very potent force in the front row, Coach Ford compliments Vetsch's ability to hit a heavy ball. Vetsch is an intimidating factor at the net with her powerful arm swing and strong hands for blocking.

Personal: She is the daughter of Terri...undecided on a major...at Richfield High School was named to the all-conference team as a senior and earned honorable mention as a junior...played for the Club Tonka Junior Olympic volleyball club...prep coach was Monica Shaw.

The Falcon's final match was very back and forth as each team switched off the lead and the momentum. In the first game the both teams started out strong, but a late four point run followed by a five point run left the Falcons too far behind to catch up. In the second game, the Falcons regained the momentum by chipping away at the UWP lead until several bursts of points gave them the win. It was back and fourth in the third game with each team going on runs, but it was UWP who pushed out the win in the end. The fourth game was just like the first three with both teams scoring in bunches, but the Falcons won in a final three point run. In the final game the Falcons hung with UWP till the end, but UWP came on top with a late run of their own. Leaders for the Falcons were Andrea Geehan who led in 21 kills and solo blocks with three, Kat Krtnick had 51 assists, and Kelsey Scheele with four serving aces and 18 digs.

In the first game, the Falcons started out strong and won by 15 points. They went on several four and five point runs that caught Eau Claire off guard. The Falcons quickly lost their edge in the second game, as UWEC built up their momentum and took a strong seven point lead that the Falcons couldn't recover from. Hitting errors also plagued the Falcons in the second game as they had eight errors and 10 kills. UWEC brought that same momentum into the third game, and despite the Falcons bringing the game within three point, UWEC played strong and took the win. In the final game the Falcons wore down as UWEC went on a six point run, followed by a five point run that the Falcons couldn't come back from. Errors were big again for the Falcons in the fourth game as they had eight errors to nine kills. Leader's for the Falcons were Molly Thompson with 12 kills, Kat Krtnick with 32 assists, Lindsey Mace with 20 digs and Andrea Geehan with three block assists and one solo block.

In the first match of the day against Bethel, the Falcons came out strong and built up a tough lead that Bethel couldn't catch up to. The last time these two teams met, the Falcons lost to Bethel in five games, but this time the Falcons came out big and won the first game, 30-19. In the second game, Bethel was awake and ready for business, but the Falcons rallied back and pushed the game into extra points and came back to win 31-29. The Falcons held a small lead for most of the third game, but Bethel never let the game get too far out of their reach. The Falcons went for a small run where they pushed their lead to five points, but Bethel made it close with a run of their own very late in the game. Finally a strong spike from Gina DeRosa and an error by Bethel finished the match 30-28. "We played very well," said Falcon Coach Patti Ford, "We controlled the serve and maintained the momentum." Leaders for the Falcons include Kelsey Scheele with 20 digs, Gina DeRosa with four block assists, Molly Thompson with two serving aces, Kate Thompson with 18 kills and Kat Krtnick with 43 assists.

In the second match the Falcons played a tough first game against Superior, but the final two games were quick kills for the Falcons. The first game was the second time the Falcons came from behind to rally to a win. With UWS one point from winning the game, the Falcons rallied from behind and went for a five point run to be one ahead. UWS then called a timeout to stop the Falcon momentum and then tied the game at 30, but a hard hit from Geehan and an error by UWS put the Falcons in the winning column. They wasted no time jumping to an early lead in the second game and maintained it by a large margin. An eight point rally mid way through left UWS unable to catch up and a Krtnick-Geehan block finished the game 30-20. The final game would be the Falcons biggest win as they finished 13 points above their opponent. "Our serving is our strength and we have good hitting," said Ford, "if we focus on the little other pieces, everything else will just fall into place."

"We played really good volleyball this weekend and we need to carry that momentum into next week's play," said Ford. Next week the Falcons start the first round of the WIAC Tournament against Stevens Point. They play at Stevens Point on Tuesday with the match beginning at 7 p.m.

In the second match against Millikin both teams started out strong, each going point for point until the Falcons pulled ahead pulled ahead on a five point run that Millikin couldn't recover from. Millikin went on a five point run of their own late in the game, but it wasn't enough as the Falcons pulled in a 30-26 win. Millikin suffered a long string of errors in the second game as they cracked under Falcon pressure. A late run by made the game close as Millikin laid down several unanswered points, but a hard hit from Kate Thompson ended the game, 30-25. The Falcons wasted no time in the third game by jumping to an early lead and never giving it up. They soundly defeated them 30-18. "Our tough serving and tough defense took them out of the match,"said Ford "I'm very pleased with our efforts." Leaders for the Falcons include Andrea Geehan with 15 kills, Krtnick had 40 assists, Kelsey Scheele led in digs with 18, and Molly Thompson had three ace serves.

In the first game UST got off to an early four point run and the Falcons were slow to catch up.  It wasn't until late in the game the Falcons began to fire up and put some points on the board and put the game within one point.  UST held the lead the entire game and won 30-28.

The second game started off with a little more aggression as both ends played tough, but Falcon errors and hard hitting from UST wore them down fast.  UST grabbed a nine point lead which the Falcons were not able to recover from.  Setter Kat Krtnick tried to fire up her team with some scrappy defense, but was unable to get her team to victory.  "Kat played a gifted game," said Ford "a lot of times her efforts go unnoticed, but she stepped up her defense which shuts down the other team's hitters."

The Falcons walked into the third game with something to prove as they took and held the lead for the first time in the match.  Middle hitter Andrea Geehan slammed down some big points, as she was able to get on top of the ball.  Tough passing prevented Geehan from getting some solid hits in the first two games.  "She uses her strategy to tip and push the ball when she can't get a good swing," explained Ford.  During the last ten points of the game, every strategy from both players and coaches was called upon.  Three time outs were called and the game was tied up five times before a solid spike by Geehan ended the game at 27-30.

The Falcons brought their momentum into the fourth game as they brought the level of play up one notch and began to play their game.  "We really came together and streamlined our play," said Ford.  They played hard offense and tough defense and this time it was a kill by Kate Thompson that sent the match into game five.

UST jumped to an early five point lead, then a time out put the momentum back on the Falcon's side as they went on a four point run.  The Falcons then tied the game up at seven as the lead switched back and fourth until a hard spike by UST ended the game 15-12.

Leaders for the Falcons include Kate Thompson who was again the team’s top hitter with 14 kills. Andrea Geehan had the only solo block, while Gina DeRosa and Molly Thompson had three block assists; Molly also led in aces with two. Setter Kat Krtnick had 25 assists and Kelsey Scheele led the team in digs with 19.

UWO is ranked 9th in the AVCA. Despite their tough play earlier in the month, the Falcons were unable to put up big numbers. Leaders for the Falcons were Kate Thompson who led in kills with 15 and had one ace. Lindsey Mace also had an ace as well and led in digs with 15. Kelsey Scheele wasn't too far behind her with 12 digs. Kat Krtnick led in assists with 34 and Gina DeRosa led in block assists with five and had the only solo block for the team.

Kate Thompson had 14 kills, hit .611 and five aces. Geehan added 12 kills, hit .545 and had two block assists. Krtnick led the team with 45 assists and she had six digs. Molly Thompson had four kills and four aces. Mace had four aces and five digs.

Kate Thompson kept her hot hitting streak alive by leading the Falcons wtih 19 kills. She also had five block assists. Andrea Geehan controlled the middle of the net with 15 kills, one solo block and six block assists.

La Crosse was quick to score in the first game as they jumped to a three point lead, but the Falcons kept the game close and were never more than a few points behind.  They came back to an 8-7 lead and held on tight.

The Falcons went on a five point run to give themselves a comfortable lead, but with one point to go till the game was done La Crosse bounced back with a four point run of their own to make it interesting.  The Falcons played tough, however, and defeated UWL 30-24.

The second game was a lot like the first with UWL jumping to another three point lead with the Falcons battling back and staying just a few points behind.  UWL then went on a six point run that the Falcons couldn't recover from and they trailed the rest of the game, despite their own last ditch efforts in a five point run with UWL just one point from finishing the game.  UWL pulled out a win, 30-25.

The Falcons are playing tough and are looking forward to being on the road for the next couple of weeks. "We also have a lot less unforced errors, which plagued us in September," said Ford "We take our matches one by one and don't overlook what's in front of us."

UWP stepped up their game in the second game keeping the lead for the first half . The Falcons kept it close, however and were able to make a six-point run that gave them a 25-18 lead. UWP kept battling however, but the Falcons were consistent with their passes, which allowed the Falcons to win 30-26. "Lindsey Mace had a great game which keeps the hitters going," said Ford.

They are hoping for similar results as they play another home WIAC match on Saturday against La Crosse at noon at the Karges Center.  "Relax and pass" is the team's mantra as they plan to "keep the ball on our side and play our game."

The Blugolds are ranked No. 5 in the AVCA, and the Falcons wasted not time proving they could hang with them. In the first game the Falcons jumped to an early 9-1 lead, but the Blugolds chipped away, tying the game up at 12. The lead went back and forth with both teams playing hard, but an ace serve by Lindsey Mace finished the game at 30-25. "The first game was the best we've played as a group," said Falcon Coach Patti Ford.

The Falcons carried their momentum into the second game with a lot of fire and holding the lead for the first nine plays, but the Blugolds were far from giving up as they fought back to take the lead. A block for a point by the Falcons tied the score at 28, but the Blugolds squeaked out a win with an ace serve of their own.

Like the first two games, the third proved to be a battle for every point. The Falcons held a steady lead, but the Blugolds were never far behind. With the teams tied at 20 a real struggle for the lead began as the teams fought for every point, but it would be the Blugolds who came out on top with a 30-26 win.

Finally it seemed like the Falcons ran out of energy as the Blugolds went on a six point run that left them cold. At a 27-15 lead the Falcons couldn't make a come back as they fell 30-18 in the fourth game. "We wore down in the fourth game," said Ford. "Our mental toughness didn't stay with us and we broke down in all areas."

Hitting for the Falcons was on the positive, however, as Molly Thompson and Andrea Geehan did an impressive job of splitting the block as well as the back court. "I feel like we got our groove with hitting," said Ford "Andrea has such an impact that teams have to defend her which opens hitting up for everyone else."

The first game was a battle with each team working hard for every point, but the Falcons were just warming up before going on a nine-point run.  UWS battled their way within six, but a solo block from Gina DeRosa finished the game in a 30-19 win.

For the final game against Waldorf, the team really came together and put up some big numbers. Out of the four matches they had their highest team hitting percentage of .287 and highest team total in digs with 102.  Their strong team efforts helped them beat Waldorf 28-30, 30-17, 30-16, and 30-23.  Geehan reclaimed the top spot in spikes with a total of 15 kills, she also led in blocks assists with three, and tied with Krtnick with service aces at three apiece.  Krtnick made her greatest amount of assists for the tournament with a team leading 45 and once again it was Mace leading in digs with 28.

Outside Kate Thompson (Sr., Forest Lake, Minn.) helped lead the Falcons to a 4-1 week. She was named to the River Falls All-Tournament team after helping the Falcons win all four matches played. The Falcons won all four matches in three games. Thompson had 89 kills and averaged 5.23 kills per game. She had a .266 hitting percentage. She finished with four aces and 34 digs. " Kate has had very strong efforts overall," said Falcon Coach Patti Ford. "Her serving is tough and when she plays in the back row, which isn't often, she still gives it her all."

Geehan has played volleyball with teammate Kat Krtnick for eight years. They feed off of each other very well and are very comfortable on the court together. It's always a plus when two stars are on the same page.

The team chemistry was put to the test this summer when the Falcons competed in a summer volleyball league. When the tournament began nobody predicted that River Falls would make any noise, but that is just what they did. They ran with the underdog role and took first place in the tournament and that is precisely what they are aiming to do during the collegiate season.

"Last season was tough on us as a team; we lost some matches that could have gone either way. Finishing in the bottom half of the WIAC may make us the underdogs this year, but I don't think many teams will look past us, as we have a very talented veteran team on the court this year."

She hopes to one day work as a probation officer in Ramsey or Hennepin county. She also really enjoys coaching youth volleyball. This summer she coached for an Adidas Club team consisting of 17-year-old girls. She got to travel to Georgia and Colorado with the team.

Gustafson's No. 1 goal this year is to do all she can to maintain positive energy for the team. "I try to create positive energy on the court and make my teammates feel comfortable around me," said Gustafson.

"Being a super sub this year is going to take a lot of pressure off our defense. When someone is struggling in the back row, I'm glad that I can be the person who our defense can rely on to get us back on track," said Gustafson.

Gustafson began playing volleyball in sixth grade and later went on to star at North Branch High School. Gustafson earned all-conference honors at North Branch and also earned the team's Most Spirited and Most Improved awards in 2002.

She is majoring in marketing communications and has a minor in speech communications. She hopes to one day work in sports marketing. A couple of her favorite teams that she would like to work for are the St. Paul Saints and the Minnesota Twins.

A setter's primary responsibility is to get to the ball on the second contact and deliver it to a teammate for the attack. It is a position that demands a vast knowledge of the game and the ability to think and move fast. Ford refers to it as the quarterback position in the sport of volleyball.

"As a setter, my goal is make all my teammates better. Whether that be turning a bad pass into a great set or covering all my hitters, I just want to enhance our team in any way possible," said Krtnick.

Being a setter and having to outmaneuver opponents and create options and opportunities for your teammates is a very difficult but an extremely important position in the game of volleyball. Krtnick has taken on the position with no regrets, even though she did not originally come to River Falls to play setter.

Krtnick attended Totino-Grace High School for one year before transferring to Fridley High School, where she starred in volleyball and basketball for three years. In volleyball, she was named to the all-conference team for three seasons at Fridley. She also led the metro area in digs, was her team's Most Valuable Player and twice was the team's captain.

Besides showcasing her athletic talent on the volleyball court, Krtnick also brings her abilities to the track where she is a sprinter for the Falcon track & field team. She competes in the indoor 55 and 200 meter races and in the outdoor 100 meters.

Krtnick is a member of the Student-Athlete Advisory Committee and the HHP Facilities Committee. She also serves as the chair of the Recreation Committee and is an athletic representative for the Student Senate.

This summer Krtnick worked with the Kansas City Chiefs summer training camp for the second consecutive year. This year she worked as a sideline reporter for the Public Affairs office, covering the Chiefs offense. She also did reporting for the Associated Press.

Mace was a multi-sport athlete as she balanced basketball, track & field and volleyball with her studies. She chose to stick with volleyball because that's the sport where she had the most fun times. If she were to choose another sport to play in college it would definitely be basketball.

Thompson got her first volleyball experience after her mom forced her to play. Thompson remembers crying the whole way to the court, but also remembers the love that formed shortly after learning the game.

A change in position for some athletes can make things difficult and hinder the player from performing at the highest level possible. But Thompson's skills and savvy will allow her to make the adjustment without skipping a beat.

Tvrdik's accomplishments in the classroom have been just as impressive. She majored in psychology with a minor in sociology and maintained a 3.795 grade point average. She was a four-time member of the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll and was named to UWRF Dean's List every semester at the University. Tvrdik earned an academic scholarship from the school's psychology department. Tvrdik was a member of Psi Chi National Honor Society and served as its vice president. She also worked with autistic children.

O'Grady is a firm believer in education and helps all UW-RF students in pursuit of collegiate degrees. In his career as head coach, 166 of 167 Falcon football players, who have completed four seasons of eligibility, have earned undergraduate degrees. Several have gone on to highly successful careers in education, coaching, business.

O'Grady is well known as a speaker and clinician throughout the midwest. He has spoken at the Wisconsin Football Coaches Association spring clinic several times and has addressed participants at the Indiana Wishbone Coaches Association clinic. He has been invited to give clinics in Wisconsin, Illinois, Pennsylvania, Indiana and Minnesota. For the past 16 years he has worked with former Falcon football player and teammate, Darryl Herrick, at a football clinic in Gilman, Wis. The clinic was established by Herrick, who is the superintendent of the Cedarburg school district, in memory of a nephew who was killed in a hunting accident.

I would hope that academic interest would be the most important factor in making a decision. If a young man knows what his interests are then he should eliminate any school that cannot offer him the degree he wants. If he is not sure then he should consider schools that offer a wide variety of majors. We do that here at UW-River Falls. If facilities are important I think we can show off for the first time in a while. We have an NFL grade training and locker room complex. We have a new apartment style residence hall. We will open our new Student Center in the spring of 2007. We are also going to renovate our stadium that will include a new field turf surface. Upwards of $5 million has been earmarked toward a $30 million physical education facility that we hope will be built in the near future. UW-River Falls has always been known for its people. Our campus is overflowing with professors, teachers, custodians, secretaries and others who care about our students. We are a teaching institution! Our best teachers teach - they don't spend all of their time on research.

I have been fortunate to be a part of a program that has developed an abundance of great teachers and coaches. In 2002 we had three of our graduates win State football titles. I was there for all of them! That is a special experience. In 2000 two of our graduates went head-to-head for a State title. One of them won and the other, of course, lost. Following the game it is tradition that both teams take team photographs. When this was completed, something very unique occurred. Both teams joined together; coaches, players and managers. A picture was taken with opponent standing next to opponent and rival coaches standing side by side. This is River Falls at its best. Where else can you find this kind of camaraderie?

Our 1995 and 1996 teams developed such tremendous confidence in their collective abilities that when they walked on the field they truly expected to win! We have lost that feeling lately. We are trying to get our players to believe in themselves and their collective abilities as we did in 1995 and 1996.

There are so many reasons for a change in our offensive system. This was something that I've been considering for almost two years. The bottom line is this: our offense, as of late, has been turnover ridden (76 fumbles; 45 lost in the last three seasons) and that must change. This new style should reduce our lost fumbles. This alone should improve our chances of winning.

We think this style fits our talent and abilities best. We don't have, and can't get enough, big, mobile defensive linemen. This defense allows us to play with more linebacker types. We have more linebackers than we have defensive linemen and this is the case in most of college football.

We spend at least 25 minutes everyday on special teams. I don't know if any other college puts as much time into this as we do. Special teams play can win and lose games. Blocked punts are as sever a blow to your ability to win a game as any other disaster. You must practice these things. We won a game in overtime last year (13-10 vs. Oshkosh). We won because our defense played well, our offense didn't make too many mistakes and when it came down to it our snapper made a great snap, our holder a great hold, our kicker a great kick and out protectors did their job. It all looks easy when done right! Getting it done right takes repetitions in practice.

This team needs to develop a true feeling of confidence. We are not a confident group right now. They have little proof from our most recent seasons. Everything we do will be about developing confidence in themselves and their collective abilities.

This is the most exciting schedule we've had for many years. St. John's - I am now reading a book (The Sweet Season by Austin Murphy) that was written about their 1999 season. All of our alumni and fans should read it! For 10 years we have not backed down from any challenge (24 games vs. scholarship schools). We have played a predominantly Div. II non-conference schedule. From this experience I hope our players can go to Collegeville with complete respect for our opponents, but also a belief and confidence that we will compete against one of the best coaches and programs that college football has had! Ironically in 1999 Pacific Lutheran won the National title and defeated St. John's, at St. John's, in the playoffs. We are 1-1 (28-24 loss in 2004, 45-14 win in 2005) against them the past two years. I admire that program as I do St. John's. Their players compete; but it is not a life and death issue. When the game is over, we shake hands and thank them for playing a game that we all love with great intensity and desire! St. Francis is a tough NAIA school. We have our work cut out for us. Their speed and skill is beyond ours. We must play sound, fundamental football. If we do, it will come down to the fourth quarter.

"Jovin has won a fantastic award and he has been a phenomenal student-athlete," said Falcon Coach John O'Grady. "When he first came here I thought he was going to be blown over in wind at Ramer Field. He couldn't catch the ball and he just was not a good punter. But he became a starter for us and got better and better and better every year. He's always been a great student. He is one of a few of our players who over years have won this award and I've very proud and happy for him."

Kroll, an English education major who is working toward a minor in athletic coaching, has been involved in several campus organizations throughout his career. He has a 3.915 cumulative grade point average. He was a staff member of Prologue, the UWRF student literary publication and was a student representative in the English department's 2006 technical writing professor search and screen committee.

He has been named the team's captain for 2006 games against St. Francis, Stevens Point and Whitewater. He has worked at the UWRF writing center tutor for three years. Kroll has experienced several hours of tutoring, observing and teaching in area public schools in the teacher education program.

Kevin Bullis is entering his 11th year with the Falcons as the club's defensive coordinator. He has helped the Falcons become one of the top defensive teams in the WIAC. His main responsibility is with the defensive linemen.

For the past two years he has been an assistant football coach at Western Illinois University. In the 2005 season he coached tight ends, in an offense that averaged 32 points per game. He also worked with the special teams. In 2004 he worked with the WIU offensive line. During his years with the Leathernecks he worked as an assistant strength and conditioning coach.

Kotelnicki, a Litchfield, Minn., native, earned his undergraduate degree from UW-RF in health & human performance in 2004. He earned his master's degree in kinesiology from Western Illinois and is also a certified strength and conditioning specialist.

Kotelnicki will coach defensive backs and special teams during the 2006 season. He will also work as the University's strength and conditioning coach and lecture in the health & human performance department.

Personal: At Rushford-Peterson High School he earned 14 letters in football, track & field and wrestling. He was captain of the football team that won a State Championship. He was twice named to the all-conference football team. He helped lead the wrestling team to a sectional title and he was named to the all-conference team twice. He earned all-conference honors three times in track & field. He was also named to the academic all-conference team. He is the son of Wendy and Glenn. His high school coach was Jim Reinhardt. He is majoring in elementary education.

Personal: At Marinette High School he was named to both the all-conference and all-area teams at linebacker and running back. He earned honorable mention to the all-area team. He was his team's Most Valuable Player in 2003 and was the team's Offensive Player of the Year twice. He was also named to the first all-conference baseball team. He is the son of Steven.  His high school coach was Chad Shraufnagel. He is majoring in health & human performance.

Personal: Beguhn was named to the second all-conference team while playing at Menomonie High School. He is the son of Audrey and Jeffery. His high school coach was Joe Labuda. Beguhn is majoring in horticulture.

Personal: Bisch earned all-conference honors in football playing at St. Croix Central High School. He competed in track & field in the high jump, long jump, 200 meters and 4x100 meter relay team and earned all-conference honors. Bisch also competed in basketball and lettered. He is the son of Stacy Hoehn and Mack Bisch. His high school coach was Tony DiSalvo. Bisch is majoring in health & human performance.

Dan Buker returns for his fourth and final season with the Falcons. The talented player lines up at one of the linebacker positions. Buker was one of three Falcons who earned honorable mention to the 2006 Football Gazette pre-season All-American team.

Personal: At Somerset High School Dabrowski was twice named to the all-conference team. He was named to the all-district and all-state teams in his final season. He earned the team's Best Blocker award. He graduated with academic honors. He is the son of Deborah and Bart. His high school coach was Bruce Larson, a UW-RF graduate. He is majoring in health & human performance.

Personal: Danielson was named to the all-area team in 2003 and 2004 while playing at Luck High School. He was also named to the all-conference team twice and was the team's captain in his junior and senior seasons. Danielson was a member of the physics club and the class vice president. He is the son of Sherry and Judd. His high school coach was Josh Hetfield. Danielson is undecided on a major field of study.

Personal: DeMotts earned four letters at Baldwin-Woodville High School where he was named to the first all-region defensive team after his senior season. He earned all-conference first defensive team and honorable mention offensive team honors. DeMotts earned four letters and was a team captain. He earned an Academic Incentive award. He is the son of Tammie and Rick. His high school coach was Wade Labecki. DeMotts is majoring in broad field physical science.

Personal: At Green Bay East High School Dorner was named to the all-conference team as a linebacker. He is the son of Marlene and Richard. His high school coach was John Kolstad. He is majoring in accounting.

Personal: Fedie was named to the all-conference team at Durand High School. He earned honorable mention to the All-Northwest team. He was named his team's Defensive Player of the Year. He is the son of the Bernice (deceased) and Dennis. His high school coach was Dan Lerum. He is majoring in agriculture studies.

Personal: Goebel was named Centennial High School's Lineman of the Year and was a team captain. He holds the school's power clean weight lifting record. He is the son of Linda and Fred. His high school coach was Mike Watson. Goebel is majoring in mechanical engineering.

Personal: Graves was named Grantsburg High School's Offensive and Defensive Lineman of the Year after his senior season. He was a team captain and earned all-conference offensive and defensive honors. He was also the basketball team's Most Valuable Player and captain. He competed in the WBCA All-Star game and was the Area's Most Valuable Player. Graves was a member of the National Honor Society. He is the son of Diane and Richard. His high school coach was Keith Lehne. Graves is majoring in pre-physical therapy.

Personal: Grover was twice named to the all-conference football team while playing at Milton High School. He was a team captain and earned a Special Team award. He also earned four letters in track & field. He holds the school record in the 300 hurdles and was a regional champion in that event. He was captain of the team and the team Most Valuable Performer. Grover was a member of the Honor Roll and Spanish Club and was the Student Council president. He is the son of Teresa and Russ. His high school coaches were Jerry Schliem and Jeff Bachinski. Grover is majoring in health & human performance.

Personal: Hansen was the team captain and was named to the all-conference team while playing at St. Croix Central High School. He was also the captain and earned all-conference honors in track & field. He is the son of Pam and Cliff. His high school coach was Tony DiSalvo. Hansen is majoring in math education.

Personal: Hansen earned three football letters at Grantsburg High School where he was named the team's Defensive Player of the Year twice. He was a co-captain and named to the all-conference team three times. Hansen was named to the all-area team twice and was the All-Area Most Valuable Player after his senior season. He also earned three basketball and three baseball letters. He helped lead the basketball team to a runner up finish in Division 3. Hansen earned four academic letters and was on the A Honor Roll for four straight years. He was an officer in the National Honor Society and a science club team leader. He was a volunteer in several community programs. He is the son of Patty and Richard. His high school coach was Keith Lehne. Hansen is majoring in landscape design.

Personal: Hanson was named to the all-conference team as a defensive back at River Falls High School. He also earned honorable mention to the team as a running back. He was named to the 2003 All-Northwest team as a defensive back and earned all-conference honorable mention in 2002. He was named his team's Most Valuable Player in 2003. He is the son of Rita and Jeff. His high school coach was John Bennett. He is majoring in business administration.

Personal: Harmon was named Altoona High School's Most Valuable Player in football and basketball in his senior season. He earned honorable mention all-conference honors as a quarterback after his junior and senior seasons. Harmon was also named to the second All-Northwest team. In basketball, he was named to the first all-conference team. He is the son of Cindy and Scott. His high school coach was Gary Pszneiceny. Harmon is majoring in broad field social studies.

Personal: Hasse was twice named to the all-conference team at Norwood Young America High School. He was named the school's Athlete of the Year and was co-captain of the football team. He was also named to the all-section football squad. He helped lead his team to a State runner-up finish. Hasse earned an academic letter and is an Eagle Scout. He is the son of Melanie and Lee. His high school coach was Clay Anderson. He is majoring in the pre-chiropractic program.

Personal: Hoglund was named Big Lake High School's Most Valuable Player after his senior season. He holds the school record for career tackles (473) and the record for most rushing yards in a game (273). Hoglund was twice named to the all-conference team and he was named to the all-section team as a fullback three times. He is the son of Pam and Kevin. His high school coach was Brad Schmidt. Hoglund is majoring in accounting.

Personal: Jacobson earned honorable mention to the all-region team after his senior season at St. Croix Falls High School. He was also named to the first all-conference team. He is the son of Kay and Scott. His high school coach was Steve Ruble. Jacobson is majoring in health & human performance.

Personal: Johnson was named to the all-area team after his senior season at Renville County West High School. He was a team captain and was named to the all-conference team. He was also named to the all-conference baseball team and was that team's captain. Johnson was an Honors graduate. He is the son of Kathy and Dan. His high school coach was Jerry Walskog. Johnson is majoring in business.

Personal: Johnson was the team captain and named the team's Most Improved at Stoughton High School. He earned honorable mention to the all-conference team. Johnson was a member of the academic Honor Roll and earned Perfect Attendance honors. He is the son of Jan and Gary. His high school coach was Sean Stokes. Johnson is majoring in secondary education.

Personal: Koehn earned all-conference first team honors as a center while playing at Adams-Friendship High School. He helped lead the DECA team to a third place finish in the district. He is the son of Becky and Mike. His high school coach was Jim Kuchta, a UW-RF graduate. Koehn is majoring in management information systems.

Personal: At Barron High School he was the captain of both the football and hockey teams. He was named to the second all-conference team as a senior after earning honorable mention as a junior. He won the Coaches Choice award in hockey and also played baseball. He was the FFA president, the senior class vice president, a member of the Student Senate and a member of the senior band and choir organizations. He has been named to the UW-RF Dean's List and earned a CAFES scholarship. He is the son of Lynn and Keith. His high school coach was Ken Mueller. He is majoring in biology.

Personal: Kolstad played for his father, John, at Green Bay East High School. He was the class valedictorian with a 4.0 grade point average. He was named to the first all-conference team as a quarterback and defensive back and to the first all-area team as a defensive back. He also earned all-State third team honors. He is the son of Patricia and John. He is majoring in math education.

Personal: At Durand High School he was named to the all-conference team twice and to the all-region squad. He was his team's Top Tackler and Defensive Player of the Year. He competed in the WIAA State track & field meet in the shot put and discus events. He graduated with academic honors. Larson has made the Dean's List in every semester. He is the son of Linda and Robert. His high school coach was Dan Lerum. He is majoring in math education.

Personal: Martell earned honorable mention to the All-State team as an offensive and defensive lineman after his senior season at Somerset High School. He was also named to the all-district and all-conference offensive and defensive teams. He won the team's Most Improved and Best Blocker awards. In wrestling he was named Most Improved and earned the Most Pins award. In track & field he earned the Spartan Award. Martell was an Honor student. He is the son of Robin and Randy. His high school coach was Bruce Larson, a UW-RF graduate. Martell is majoring in health & human performance.

Personal: Miller was named to the All-State team as an offensive lineman at Hemphill High School in Texas. He was also named to the first all-district team. He is the son of Lisa Owens and Steve Miller. His high school coach was Larry Upshaw. Miller is majoring in geology.

Personal: Morken was the football team captain in his senior season at Spring Grove High School. He was named the special teams Player of the Year and was twice named to the all-conference team. He holds the school record for single season passing yards and is third in career passing yards. Morken was named to the all-conference basketball and baseball teams for three years. He was the baseball team's Most Valuable Player twice. He earned the school's Triple A award, was a member of the National Honor Society and earned Academic All-State honorable mention honors. Morken earned academic all-conference honors 11 times. He also attended Boys State. He is the son of Deb and Bob. His high school coach was Brad Groth. He is undecided on a major field of study.

Personal: At Sibley East High School he was named to the football and basketball all-conference teams and was named his school's Athlete of the Year. He was named the team's Most Valuable Back-Receiver. He is the son of Lisa and Thomas. His high school coach was Randy Walsh. He is majoring in health & human performance.

Personal: Mueller earned honorable mention to the All-State team after his senior season at Edgar High School. He was named to the first all-region team as a linebacker. Mueller was named to the first all-conference team in 2004 and to the second team in 2003. He was named his team's Most Valuable Defensive Player. He was a member of the National Honor Society, a member of the Student Council and the FFA president. He is the son of Mary and Jerry. His high school coach was Jerry Sinz. Mueller is majoring in dairy science.

Personal: Neumann was named to the all-conference team while playing at Lakeville High School. He was also named his team's Most Valuable Defensive Player. He is the son of Peggy and John. His high school coach was Larry Thompson. He is majoring in sociology.

Personal: Nolechek was named Thorp High School's Most Valuable Player. He was a captain and was named to the all-conference team as a wide receiver and cornerback. He also played baseball where he was the team's Most Valuable Player, RBI leader and was named to the all-conference team. He is the son of Laurie and Kelly. His high school coach was John Goodman. Nolechek is majoring in business.

Personal: Novacheck was named Hillsboro High School's Defensive Most Valuable Player in 2004. He was named to the first all-conference team as an offensive tackle and defensive end. Novacheck was an FFA officer for two years. He is the son of Donna and John. His high school coach was Eric Auel. Novacheck is majoring in agriculture education.

Personal: Olson played at New Berlin High School. He was a member of the 600 club and was active in the Leadership Council. He is the son of Nancy and Tom. His high school coach was Jeff Setz. Olson is majoring in business administration.

Personal: Ostertag was a team captain and was named to the all-conference team while playing at Farmington High School. He also played baseball and was named to that all-conference team. He placed fourth in the national weight lifting championships. He holds school squat and overall total lift records. He is the son of Lisa and Tom. His high school coach was Mark Froehling. Ostertag is majoring in health & human performance.

Personal: At Caledonia High School he was named to the all-conference football team in 2001 and to the all-conference baseball teams in 2001 and 2002. He earned two basketball, three football and four baseball letters. He was a member of the National Honor Society and graduated with academic honors. He is the son of Julie and Robert. His high school coach was Carl Fruechte. He is majoring in conservation.

Personal: Robinson earned four letters at Lincoln High School. He was the football team’s captain in 2004 and was named the team’s Most Improved Offensive player. He also earned three letters in track & field and competed in the state meet in the 4x100 relay. Robinson twice placed third in the state power lifting meet. He was a member of the Student Council and earned a spot on the Honor Roll twice. He is the son of Deanna Kent and Duane Robinson. His high school coach was Tony Biolo. Robinson is majoring in criminal justice.

Personal: Simonson was named to the first all-conference team while playing at Ogilvie High School. He holds the school single season receiving yards record. He was a team captain of the football, basketball and baseball teams. Simonson was named the basketball team’s Most Valuable Player. He was named to the basketball and baseball all-conference teams. The football team was a two-time winner of the state academic championship. The baseball team won the same award four times. He was the vice president of the senior class and a member of the National Honor Society. He is the son of Geri and Jerry. His high school coach was Gene Stritesky. Simonson is majoring in business administration.

Nathan Tenut plays guard in the offensive line and is in his fourth year with the team. Tenut was one of three Falcons who earned honorable mention to the 2006 Football Gazette pre-season All-American team.

Personal: Tenut was named to the all-conference team as an offensive and defensive lineman while playing at Phillips High School. He was a member of the National Honor Society. He is the son of Trudy and Alan. His high school coach was Jeff Schillinger. He is majoring in health & human performance.

Personal: Vanderveren was named Pulaski High School’s Male Athlete of the Year after his senior season. He was named to the all-conference teams as an offensive and defensive lineman. He also earned honorable mention to the all-area defensive team. Vanderveren was captain of the football and baseball teams. He was also named to the all-conference wrestling team and was a two time state qualifier. He was a WIAA Scholar and a member of the National Honor Society. He earned a conference Scholar Award and served as the outdoor editor of the Pulaski News. He is the son of Christine and Luke. His high school coach was Phil Morgan. Vanderveren is majoring in conservation.

Personal: Ward was named to the first all-conference team as a running back in 2002 and the second team in 2001 while playing at Mondovi High School. He also competed in track & field and was named to the first all-conference team as a member of the 4x100 relay team. He was named to the second all-conference team in the 100. Ward was a class officer and a member of the Art Club. He is the son of Mary Birschbach. His high school coach was Tom Bauer. He is majoring in health & human performance.

Much like they have all season long, the Warhawks answered back quickly with a three play 60-yard drive, which was capped off by a Justin Jacobs to Matt Gifford touchdown pass from 14 yards out to make the score 10-7 Whitewater after the first quarter.

After another RF three and out Jovin Kroll punted the ball 41 yards and Mrkicka returned it nine yards, but fumbled the ball and Robby Nesvig returned it five yards down to the Whitewater 30. Aided on a 16-yard personal foul and the Falcons set up shop at the Warhawk 14. The Falcons could not move the ball so with only two seconds left in the half they settled for a 32-yard Spasimir Bodurski field goal to make the score 31-10 at recess.

After a Beau DeBruin fumble at the Falcon 40 yard line the Warhawks scored again. It took them only three plays to do so and Gifford caught his second touchdown pass of the game from Jacobs from 3-yards out to make the score 41-10 after the third quarter.

The Falcons were led by DeBruin who ran for 59 yards on 16 carries. Wolff ran for 43 yards and threw for 124 yards on 13-29. He threw two touchdowns and two picks. Grover caught two touchdown passes and seven passes for 73 yards. On defense, the Falcons were led by Bruce Baillargeon and Ben Arata who both had nine total tackles. Shane Hanson had four total tackles and an interception.

Later in the first quarter, UWL struck again this time putting together a 34-yard three play drive which was capped off by another Geldernick touchdown run this time from nine yards out to make the score 14-0.

The Eagles ended the first quarter in dominating fashion putting together another touchdown drive. The Eagles scored through the air on a 12-yard John Schumann laser to Ted Everson to make the score 21-0 after the first quarter. The drive covered 47 yards and it took six plays.

UWL got the ball back early in the second quarter and they wasted little time getting on the board as they scored two plays later on a 66-yard Dan Hall dash that made the score 28-0. The drive took only two plays and it covered 79 yards.

The Falcons finally got on the board with 4:31 left in the half on a three-yard fourth-and-goal Beau DeBruin touchdown run. The drive covered four yards and it took four plays. The score was set up when Falcon linebacker Dan Buker recovered a UWL fumble at the La Crosse four.

The Falcons got on the board midway through the third quarter on a 45-yard Spasimir Bodurski field goal. The drive covered five yards and it took four plays. The field goal was set up when Bruce Baillargeon recovered a La Crosse fumble at the UWL 33.

UWL ended the third quarter in style with another scoring drive. They went 41 yards in 10 plays and Rude capped the drive off again with another field goal, this time from 22 yards out, to make the score 41-10 going into the fourth quarter.

The Falcons were led by Wolff and DeBruin as they ran for 59 and 58 yards each and one touchdown apiece. Wolff was 6-10 passing for 62 yards. On defense the Falcons were led once again by Andy Kolstad who had nine solo and 12 total tackles. Baillargeon had nine and Jamie Bisch chipped in with seven total tackles. Buker added five total tackles and one sack.

UWP answered right back later in the quarter with an equally impressive drive that went 66 yards in 13 plays which was capped off by another Genslinger one-yard touchdown. The drive took 4:52 off the clock.

After another Wolff interception the Pioneers wasted little time in scoring. Genslinger burst up the middle for an impressive 69-yard touchdown run to make the score 28-10 UWP. That ended the scoring.

On defense the Falcons were led by Nathan Renk who had nine solo and 10 total tackles. Andy Kolstad had seven tackles and Ben Arata added five tackles and one interception. Shane Hanson also had an interception.

Midway through the third quarter the Blue Devils forced a Nathan Anderson fumble at the Falcon 26-yard line. Stout scored on the next play going through the air this time with a 26-yard Kattre to Jesse Wendt pass to take a commanding 20-7 lead with 3:54 to play in the third quarter.

To begin the fourth quarter the Falcons set up shop at their own 15-yard line. After a heavy dose of Anderson the Falcons moved the ball all the way down to the Stout one-yard line. After failing three times to punch it in the end zone the Falcons decided to go for it on fourth down and Wolff came through with a 1-yard quarterback sneak for the touchdown to make the score 20-14 Stout.

Later in the fourth quarter, with only 4:08 left in the game, Stout lined up to punt and the Falcon special teams came up big with a Bruce Baillargeon blocked punt. The punt rolled out of bounds at the Stout two and the Falcons scored one play later with a two-yard Wolff plunge to make the score 21-20.

Stout's last chance came with just under three minutes left in the game. They moved the ball all the way down to the Falcon 43-yard line, but came up short turning it over on downs. The Falcons downed the ball and picked up a huge 24-20 comeback win.

The 6-0, 180 pound defensive back had nine solo and 13 total tackles to lead the Falcons. He broke up a pass, forced a fumble and recovered a fumble. With the Falcons winning 20-10 in the fourth quarter, Baillargeon forced a UWSP running back to fumble and the defensive back jumped on the loose ball to stop a Pointer scoring drive. Baillargeon leads the team in tackles with 26 solo and 53 total stops.

Jeremy Wolff gave the Falcons the lead when he scored on the first play of the second quarter on a 4-yard run. It capped off an impressive 14 play, 75-yard drive that took seven minutes off the clock. Add the Spasimir Bodurksi extra point and that made the score 7-0. The touchdown was the first for the Falcons offense in over two games.

The Falcon special teams came up big in the third quarter with a fumble recovery on a punt return by the Pointers. Ben Arata recovered the fumble and the Falcons took over at the SP nine. The Pointer defense stiffened and Bodurski kicked another field goal, this time from 30 yards out, to make the score 20-10 after the third quarter.

On defense, the Falcons were led by Bruce Baillargeon who had nine solo and 13 total tackles. Jamie Bisch added eight tackles and Robby Nesvig added seven stops. Nathan Renk added one sack and Gregg Neumann and Ryan Agrimson added half a sack each.

After another RF punt, the Blugolds went to work right away on offense to begin the second quarter. UWEC went 65 yards in 10 plays which was capped off by another Kolb field goal this time from 27 yards out to make the score 6-0.

In the third quarter, UWEC used the momentum they got at the end of the first half and brought it to the second. After a Falcon turnover at their own 27-yard line the Blugolds drove three yards on four plays which was capped off by a another Kolb field goal this time from 41 yards out to make the score 16-3. After an RF interception, UWEC put the icing on the cake on their next possession with a one play Paulson to Evensen hookup for a touchdown to make the score 23-3. That ended the scoring.

RF was led by Nathan Anderson's 83 yards on 25 attempts. Jeremy Wolff threw 13 times, completing six of those for 76 yards. Connor Graves led the team with three catches for 30 yards. On defense the Falcons were led once again by Bruce Baillargeon who had five solo and 10 total tackles. Gregg Neumann chipped in with two sacks and Andy Kolstad added an interception.

The first quarter made clear what the end result of the game would be. Both teams fizzled out on their first possession but Oshkosh capitalized on their second. Following a 2-yard punt return by the Titans' Steve Stoltz to the River Falls 45, UWO went on a mission to find paydirt. The anticipation did not last long thanks to Titan running back Andy Moriarty's 34-yard rumble to the RF 11. Moriarty would finish what he started three plays later on a 3-yard run for the game's first score.

The Falcons were forced to turn to the passing game due to minimal gain on the ground and proved to be somewhat successful. RF quarterback Jeremy Wolff locked in on reciever Josh Grover for much of the game. On the Falcons third possession on the game, Grover made his biggest impact with a 47-yard reception to bring RF to the Titan 47.

The drive continued into the second quarter, eventually ending in a Wolff toss up to Grover that was intercepted in the end zone by UWO's Ryan Radtke. Grover held the most impressive Falcon stat line of the night as he hauled in five receptions for 113 yards. Only two Falcon receivers caught passes, the other being Jake Jenson who caught a seven yard dump off from Wolff in the second quarter to pick up a first down.

Falcon running back Nathan Anderson was RF's only force on the ground as he closed out the half with three consecutive runs. Anderson rumbled to 101 yards in the game on 31 carries. It was his 13th 100+ yard rushing game of his career.

The second half did not prove to be any better for the Falcons. Behind by 17 following a UWO 57-yard touchdown reception by Steve Stoltz coming with 4:56 remaining in the third, RF was forced to rely on Wolff's passing arm. Wolff finished 6-20 passing for 120 yards. The Titan defense forced Wolff out of the pocket for much of the game and forced the senior quarterback to make plays on his feet. UWO kept Wolff on a leash and held him to only 18 yards on seven scampers. Wolff looked for Grover most the night and was unsuccessful on numerous attempts to get receiver David Ubbelohde the ball.

RF trailed by 17 going into the fourth and the Titan offense shattered any hopes of a Falcon comeback. RF was led in tackles by Ryan Agrimson, who racked up 11 in the game, seven being solo. Agrimson also knotted a sack; one of two the Falcons had; the other being split between Gregg Neumann and Scott Kane.

The Falcons kept it close in the first quarter forcing an Eric Hooks interception on St. Francis' first possession. RF took over at its 42 yard line and drove the ball 43 yards in 11 plays. The drive stalled at the 15-yard line and Spasimir Bodurski missed a 32-yard field goal attempt.

In the second quarter, USF started out quickly scoring on the first play with a Hooks to Ryan Kauchak pass for 12 yards. On their next possession the Cougers went 54 yards in six plays which was capped off by a Hooks to Brian Schultz pass for 10 yards to make the score 14-0. The Cougers ended the half strong scoring another touchdown with only 32 seconds left. This time Hooks connected with Zach Rainey for 11 yards to make the score 21-0 at recess.

In the third quarter the Cougers picked up where they left off scoring on their second possession of the half on a Doug Wasylk run that covered 49 yards. After a Jovin Kroll 39-yard punt, the Cougers scored two plays later on a Jeff Wedding 50-yard pass to Bo Thompson. After another stalled RF drive Kroll's punt was blocked and returned to the Falcon nine-yard line. On the very next play Hooks ran nine yards for another touchdown to make the score 42-0. On RF's next drive Jeremy Wolff went back to pass and was sacked for a 12-yard loss and Joe Piwoszkin picked up the Wolff fumble and ran it back 22 yards for a Couger touchdown.

USF was led by Hooks who threw for 165 yards and three touchdowns. He also ran for one and had 66 rushing yards. Wasylk added 112 rushing yards and one touchdown on nine carries. Thompson led the Cougers with three catches for 92 yards and one touchdown.

Taking the ball on the Falcons’ 30-yard line following a fumble recovery, the Lutes scored in two plays. Junior quarterback Brett Gordon connected with Craig Chiado on a 21-yard scoring play. It was the first collegiate pass thrown by Gordon. Later in the quarter and following a Brent Frank interception, the Lutes added three points in Pat Burke’s 25-yard field goal.

UW-RF stretched the advantage to 21-10 after Gordon was sacked and fumbled. Nathan Renk recovered at the PLU 8-yard line for the Falcons, who scored three plays later on Wolff’s one-yard scoring run. On the ensuing kickoff, PLU ran some trickery on the return when Chase Reed threw across the field to Brent Frank, who raced down the left sideline for an apparent score. The play was called back, however, when it was ruled the Reed’s throw was an illegal forward pass.

The Lutes got back into the game, driving 64 yards on eight plays and scoring early in the fourth period on Gordon’s 25-yard pass to Reed. In their final four possessions, however, the Lutes punted twice, threw an interception and turned the ball over on downs.

The Johnnies opened the game up quickly scoring on their first possession. Mike Patnode scored on a six-yard run, which capped off an eight play 88-yard drive. Midway through the first quarter the Falcon defense stepped up and scored a touchdown on Jamie Bisch's 39-yard interception return to make the score 7-6 after a missed Spasmir Boduski extra point. The score after the first quarter was St. John's leading 7-6.

St. John's scored quickly in the second quarter after a botched punt attempt. Patnode scored on the next play this time from six-yards out to make the score 13-6 after a missed extra point. On RF's next possesion Jermey Wolff through a pass that was intercepted by John Cloeter and returned to the 34-yard line. The Johnnies scored three plays later on a Alex Kofoed pass to Mike Lofboom from four yards out to cap off a three play 34-yard drive to make the score 20-6 SJU. Shane Hanson recovered a Lofboom fumbled punt return with 18 seconds left in the first half. Bodurski's 25-yard field goal with one second left in the half capped off a three play seven-yard drive to make the score SJU leading 20-9 at recess.

Nathan Anderson led the way for the Falcons with 111 yards on the ground. Wolff passed for 59 yards on 5-13 throwing with one interception. Andy Marx had two catches for 23 yards. Andy Kolstad led the way with 15 total tackles with four solo. Hanson had six total tackles with five solo. Tony Dorner and Nathan Renk combined for a sack.

The Falcon defense, under third year coordinator and Assistant Coach Kevin Bullis, will use the same schemes for the third year. But Head Coach John O'Grady has made a major change in the Falcon offense.

No longer will the Falcons run the wishbone offense. The Falcons will run a zone offense that means there will be a balance between running and passing. The Falcons have used he wishbone offense since midway through the 1973 season. But a change was needed, according to O'Grady who starts his 18th year with the Falcons. "Our offense has turned the ball over way too much the past few years," said O'Grady. "We need to cut down the number of turnovers and I think this is the way to do it." In the past three years, the Falcons have fumbled the ball 76 times and lost 45. In turnover margin, the Falcons are -10 in the past three seasons. "This program needs to take some steps forward. We need to limit scoring and the offense needs to limit turnovers. We're making this offensive move for many reasons - one is that we must cut back on fumbles," said O'Grady.

Nine starters return. Leading the way is running back Nathan Anderson who was a unanimous selection to the All-WIAC team in 2005. He rushed for 1,265 yards and averaged 4.5 yards per carry. He scored six touchdowns and came out of the backfield to catch three passes for 36 yards and one score. Anderson will get most of the rushing attempts this fall. "He has an innate ability to find the hole. He does not have tremendous speed. But he's big, strong and can run fast enough," said O'Grady. Also back is quarterback Jeremy Wolff who O'Grady says has a strong arm and the talents to get the ball to open receivers. "He has as much talent to do the things at quarterback as anyone we've had." He rushed for 970 yards and scored eight times last year. He averaged 6.2 yards per carry. He completed 44-123 passes for 579 yards and six touchdowns. He threw six interceptions. He will cause defenses to not only defend the pass, but to honor his skills as a runner. Dave Affeldt (34 carries, 211 yards; nine receptions, 122 yards) is back with talents to run and catch the ball. He has been moved to wide receiver. Zeke Secrist (33-146 rushing yards) also returns. Joining Anderson in the backfield when the Falcons use two backs will be either B.J. LeRoy or John Ward. Wide receiver Josh Grover returns after catching seven passes for 102 yards and one touchdown last year. Others who will line up as wide outs are Chad Nolecheck and Mark LaScotte. Up front the Falcons have four starters back. Tackle Jordan Miller, guard Nathan Tenut, center Scott Witte and tight end Andy Marx lead the way. Mark Fedie and Dylan Dabrowski will compete for a guard spot while Pete Kolpack and Brad Vanderveren will play at a tackle spot. Ryan Hansen will play tight end also. "The offensive line will be very big," said O'Grady.

"We still will run the ball 60 per cent of time time and if we can do that successfully we will be okay. When defenses put seven or eight guys in the box it makes it very difficult to run the ball. Wolff has the talent to do what we want. We have confidence in him - he's the best athlete we've got," said O'Grady.

"I think that in this defense you will see many more sacks - I'm expecting  more," said O'Grady. "Overall we want to make it much more difficult for offenses to drive the ball. We have said that you can't give up a lot of big plays. In today's game, you'll give up some, but you can't give up easy touchdowns. We have done that. But offenses have learned to be patient - get first downs - we have not done a good job of preventing that. Our scheme will do more of that and I think opponents will have shorter drives and  punt more. I'm excited about the scheme in general. We have a good group of players who can do what this defense asks them to do."

Four decades of Falcon football have been transcribed from 16-millimeter film (or video tape) to a DVD format.  Several games are available now.  Whenever possible, a team roster will be included for your reference.  Note the names in parentheses.  Those individuals underwrote the $50 costs involved in producing the master copy.

Hailing from Janesville, Minn., Wolff was raised in a family of athletes. Athletics seemed to run in the family as Wolff had two older siblings who both excelled in athletics. "My brother (Chad)) and sister (Mandi) were always great athletes so my childhood consisted of me trying to keep up with them," Wolff said of his siblings.

Wolff's athletic ability was definitely attractive to the staff of the Falcon football program. Head Coach John O'Grady is very pleased with the way the talented freshman he once knew has evolved into an experienced leader on the team.

"He has improved extremely well, he shows improvement every game," O'Grady said of Wolff. O'Grady also pointed out the adjustments Wolff has had to make during his career at UWRF. "Physically he's gained about 20 pounds and has changed positions from halfback to wishbone quarterback to a different style of quarterback," O'Grady mentioned. Above all the athletic talent O'Grady mentioned that what Wolff brought most to the team was his attitude and demeanor. "His best asset is his personality, he is well like by his teammates," O'Grady said.

Football wasn't the only thing that brought Wolff to River Falls. Growing up on a farm, Wolff always had an interest in agriculture. Through his childhood Wolff became accustomed to the outdoors."I worked for my Dad on our farm and did a lot of hunting and fishing with my older brother and friends," Wolff said.

Majoring in agricultural economics and marketing was an easy decision for Wolff. "I grew up with an agricultural background and my Dad wanted me to study agriculture so coming to River Falls was for both of us," Wolff said.

Without jumping too far into the future, Wolff is well aware that there is still one game to be played this season and is hopeful of the possible outcome. "I just want to finish strong, we have a great class and I just want everyone to feel like they laid it all out there for the last time," Wolff said. When asked what his fondest memory from this season the answer almost seemed obvious. "By far our comeback win against Stout for Homecoming," Wolff replied.

Wolff has had an outstanding career for the Falcons, changing his play and always finding ways to succeed. Wolff can only hope to add to the staggering statistics he has achieved at River Falls. With a total of 2207 yards of total offense gained for the Falcons in his career, Wolff has been an important part of the offensive attack.

Apart from the athletic achievements Wolff also hopes to take more away from his time spent at UWRF. "I think the thing that will stick with me the most are my friends. I've made so many life long friends and there are so many memories with them," Wolff said. While Wolff admits his idol is his father, Mike, his inspiration comes from a broader range."My family and close friends are my inspiration, I want to make them proud," Wolff explained.

Entering his fourth year with the Falcons, Brett Hanson looks to put the injuries he has experienced in the past behind him. Since his first year as a Falcon, Hanson has been plagued by injuries but has still managed to have an impact on the team whenever possible.

Hanson's first season was cut short by an injury, allowing him to only participate in half the season, but Hanson still managed to earn a letter and was named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll. The following season went well for Hanson as he played in six games and earned his second letter.

However, Hanson's 2005 season was ended before it began by an early season ACL tear and he was given a medical red shirt. The beginning of the 2006 season appeared to be more of the same as Hanson missed the first five games of the season as he continued to experience problems with his knee. However, since his return against Stevens Point, and his debut at his new position of tight end, Hanson has appeared to be adjusting well and staying injury free as he has two receptions in as many games played so far this year.

"He's a great young guy who has worked though multiple injuries and obviously loves the game," said Falcon Coach John O'Grady. "We had some injuries at tight end and when you move a defensive lineman to tight end it diminishes the risk of knee injury."

Hanson has caught two passes for 18 yards at his new postition. "So far he's doing great, he's still limited by the knee a little bit and wears a brace. Our top two tight ends are out with injuries so I'm glad we have him there."

Raised in La Crosse, Wis., Hanson attended Central High School where he played football, baseball, and participated in downhill skiing. Athletic success was nothing out of the ordinary for Hanson in high school where he garnished his football team's Hustle Award as well as the Scout Player of the Year award. Hanson also was named to the second all-conference team in high school.

Aside from being a three sport athlete in high school Hanson always cherished the time he spent with his family around Thanksgiving and deer hunting season. "With sports going on all the time, it was really time we could spend together," Hanson explained.  Family meant more than just hunting and gatherings to Hanson.

Hanson hopes to pursue a career as a timber buyer after he graduates from UWRF. For those not familiar with the timber buying business, Hanson explained that a timber buyer is someone who works for a lumber company and goes out to buy standing trees from people. Hanson said that it was an internship over the past summer that made him decide to pursue a future in timber buying.

Hanson's hopes for the season rest on the confidence of the team as a whole.  Hanson described himself as someone who is not very vocal, but leads by example, and he hopes to do so as he continues to master his new position and lead the Falcons to a strong finish.

"I have made many life long friends here at River Falls. I have learned that dedication and hard work leads to success on and off the field and being part of the football team means a lot to me. RF has always had a great football tradition and it is an honor to be on the team," Renk said.

Renk, who went to Caledonia High School, was named to the all-conference team in football and baseball in 2001 and 2002. He earned two basketball, three football and four baseball letters. He was also a member of National Honor Society and graduated with academic honors. He is the son of Julie and Robert and he is majoring in conservation.

He feels that the offense puts up more points and maintain good ball control, much like they did against Stevens Point and Stout. "The Stevens Point and Stout games were big wins for us. The offense moved the ball, the defense limited big plays, and our special teams gave us great field position in both games," Renk said.

Larson, 6-0 240 pounds, is a bit undersized for the defensive line, but he uses his quick burst to get in the backfield and disrupt plays. "Mike has a strong work ethic in the weight room; he's a good role model for our younger players," said Bullis.

Larson is the perfect definition of a student-athlete. Since his sophomore year Larson has been named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll every year. "Mike brings a smart mentally to the team. He is a true scholar-athlete," said Bullis.

This season the defense has been at the forefront because of the huge plays that they have given up to their opponents. Larson feels that if they eliminate the big play then they will have a chance to win some games.

Kolstad is majoring in secondary education mathematics. After graduation, he plans on traveling for a bit before he moves back in his home area of Green Bay to find a high school teaching and coaching job.

In his sophomore year, he carried the ball for a career high 68 times for 114 yards. He completed 13-26 passes for 208 yards, two touchdowns which were all team and career highs. Unfortunately, his season ended prematurely because of an injury.

With Kolstad switching positions on the field and starting at such an impressive spot his freshman year, O'Grady states that this doesn't happen too often in football and really says something about the player.

This season, Kolstad hopes to "start a new era of football at River Falls" with his teammates. His personal goal is to be remembered for a long time at River Falls. "I want to go out the best way I can," Kolstad says.

Since he started playing in seventh grade, Kolstad thinks that the difference between high school and college football is amount of physical demand and the amount of knowledge needed to play. He explains that college football is faster and more physical.

When Kolstad isn't working on schoolwork or at practice, he likes to lie on the couch with his roommates and watch television, especially the show Hogan Knows Best. His favorite movies are the Pirates of the Caribbean series.

For Robby Nesvig sports and competition have been a part of his life as long as he can remember. Hailing from Gaylord, Minn., a town of roughly 2,000 people, Nesvig could always count on two things; athletics and motivation from his older brother and his three cousins who lived down the street.

However, despite the motivation he received from family members Nesvig's most cherished childhood memories were family reunions in northern Minnesota. "We'd just get together with all of the family, aunts, uncles, cousins, it was great," Nesvig said recalling times gone by. Family is also a big inspiration for Nesvig, and he idolizes his family in that regard. "When I was younger it probably would have been my cousins (Matt, Steve, Tim) and my brother (Eric), but now I'd say my Dad, he has his own business, and had a family," Nesvig said of who his idols are.

At Sibley East High School  Nesvig was a three sport athlete. Competing in football, basketball, and baseball, he was a standout earning all-conference awards in football and basketball. On top of excelling in each of his sports individually, Nesvig also garnered the Athlete of the Year award while in high school, an award that is given to the top athlete overall that particular year. Nesvig said he had many fond memories of his football playing days in high school but singled out one particular game that happened to be his school's second playoff win ever as his favorite.

Nesvig decided to attend school at UW-River Falls initially because of the recruitment letters and his desire to continue playing. However, Nesvig will admit that UWRF's excellent reputation for those seeking education careers played an important role in his decision.

However, Nesvig has since left the education program and changed his major to health and human performance. "Right now I'm going to be a personal trainer, but I don't want to do that forever," Nesvig said of his future. "I'm hoping to go back to school and get my business degree later, someday manage my own gym," Nesvig continued.

Nesvig will be the first to tell you that he has gotten more from his time at UW-River Falls than simply playing football. Nesvig said that being an athlete at UW-River Falls teaches the value of hard work as well as how to have the right attitude. "We don't get the biggest, strongest, or fastest guys like some other places, we don't have the same athletes, so we have to work harder," Nesvig added.

Apart from the work ethic developed Nesvig also said that meeting everyone on the team has been one of the perks as well, especially since Nesvig is one of 13 seniors on this year's team. When asked what his most memorable moment of his career at UWRF would be he replied without a doubt last year's exciting 13-10 overtime win at Oshkosk that culminated with a game-winning field goal as well as the game that gave the Falcons their first WIAC victory last year. Nesvig remains positive for the future of this year's team despite their 1-4 (0-2) start. "5-2 has won the conference before, 4-3 has won the conference before, we just need to avoid any injuries," Nesvig said of the remainder of the season.

"Rob is always committed to working very hard," said Falcon Defensive Coordinator, Kevin Bullis. "He not only plays strong safety but he helps us with his play on several special teams units. He played free safety lass year but has made the smooth transition to strong safety. Rob is a team player and has made a great contribution in representing UWRF."

Nesvig is a model of motivation and a hard-worker all around. When asked what he thought was his inspiration that allowed him to make it this far competing athletically Nesvig replied youth sports and competition. "It makes you appreciate what sports can do for you at a young age, and my parents did everything they could to help me succeed."

Jovin Kroll has been a cornerstone for the Falcon special teams the last few years and performs one of the key components of the game as the punter. Besides punting, he also holds for extra points and field goals.

"Kicking coach Tom Caflisch has given me all the fundamentals necessary to become a better punter. I also feel that just gaining as much experience as possible has also helped along the way," Kroll said.

Kroll, who went to Maple-Northwestern High School in Poplar, Wis., was named first team all-conference as a punter and won the team's Coaches Award. He also earned all-conference honors in baseball for three straight years.

"I expect improvement this year in our conference games. I won't predict anything, but with all the effort we've given this offseason there is no reason we shouldn't be successful. The special teams units are the strongest they've been since I've been here," Kroll said.

Last season he carried the ball 17 times for 54 yards, but this year is most known for being the lead blocker for Falcon tailback Nate Anderson. In four games to date Anderson has  rushed for more than 100 yards three times so LeRoy has done his job as a lead blocker.

"Blocking for Anderson is really fun. I feel lucky to block for the best back in the conference and I know for a fact that he does not need me in front of him to gain yards and do well," a humble LeRoy said.

Ever since joining the football program in 2003, LeRoy felt that RF was the place for him. After coming to a football camp at UWRF in high school he decided then that he wanted to play for the Falcons.

"River Falls has given me the opportunity to meet a lot of great people and I have made a lot of great friends along the way. Playing football here has been a privilege and has taught me how to always give 100 percent in everything that I do in life," LeRoy said.

He has learned a lot about the game of football since joining the Falcons. He has been a hardworking player and now that is showing on the field. "B.J. is one of the hardest working players on the team. He puts all his effort into getting better and that shows when we play on Saturdays," O'Grady said.

"He is one of the reasons for our improved play on the offensive side of the ball. It has taken some time for the players to get used to our new offense, but we have made some good strides," O'Grady said.

"I was lucky to play on some good high school teams with a lot of good players. The one moment that stands out from high school football was my junior year when we shutout Green Bay Notre Dame 42-0," LeRoy said.

LeRoy feels that the Falcons can turn it around and make some noise in the WIAC this season. He feels that with hard work and fewer errors anything can happen and the Falcons will have a shot at contending for the conference crown.

"I feel that if all three areas of the team play well, then we have a chance to beat anybody on any given day. I feel that this season we have a great chance to make some noise in the conference," Bodurski said.

"UW-RF has meant a lot to me personally. I have made a lot of life-long friends and I feel that the work ethic football has brought me will only help me in the real world when I graduate," Buker said.

"If we cut down on the mental mistakes and play smarter I think we have the chance to win any game in the conference. Many of the games will come down to the fourth quarter and I hope our mental toughness will prevail," Buker said.

As a wrestler he was named all-area three times and finished third at state in 2002 at 171 pounds. He also graduated with academic honors. He has continued his academic success and has been named to the UW-RF Dean's list four times.

The Falcons expect to make some noise this season in the highly competitive WIAC and make their mark. Buker hopes and feels that the Falcons will have a good chance of contending for a conference title.

"Dr. Don" Leake starts his sixth year as an assistant coach with the Falcons. He joined the coaching staff in 2001 after serving as a volunteer coach for the Falcons in 2000. A self-taught student of the game, he brings over 30 years of tennis playing experience to the court.

Leake began playing tennis in junior high school on the windy plains of Oklahoma. A two-year letter winner at his high school in Columbia, Mo., he qualified for the state tournament his senior year (1970). He honed his tennis skills throughout college and perfected his backcourt game in Africa while serving as a Peace Corps volunteer.

Tim Thum is in his sixth year as assistant woman's tennis coach. Thum played varsity tennis at South Dakota Technical College where he received a degree in mechanical engineering in 1984. He has worked at UWRF as an engineer in the facilities management department since 1989. He was the Project Manager for the new tennis complex that was completed in August of 2005.

Thum has been an avid tennis player for the past 28 years, has assisted Head Coach Lee Lueck on a voluntary basis at both the high school and collegiate levels, and been a member of Lueck's USTA 4.0 league tennis team for seven years. He is married to Marilyn and has three children. His oldest daughter Michele, attends UW-Platteville and is majoring in engineering; daughter Kristin is a sophomore at UW-Stout and son Kevin is in middle school.

Her hobbies include hanging out with family and friends. Her future goals include earning a masters degree as a reading specialist and coaching middle or high school tennis.  She comes to the Falcons from Marshfield, Wis., and is the daughter of Tim and Mary Jo and has one sister.

Becky Briese returns for her senior season with the Falcons. She is the team's captain and has a career singles record of 33-15 and a career doubles record of 27-22. In 2005 she had a 9-6 record playing most of the time at No. 3 singles. She had an 8-7 doubles record. She was twice named the team's singles player of the week and twice named the team's doubles team of the week. She likes to play both singles and doubles. Her favorite tennis player is Elena Dementieva. Her most memorable high school tennis moments were road trips. Her college tennis goals are to have fun, play hard, and have no regrets. Her favorite musicians are Joe Adams, Jack Johnson, Rod Stewart, and Joan Jett. Her favorite actress is Julia Stiles and her favorite color is black. Her hobbies include kayaking, hunting, fishing, welding, playing cards, hanging out with friends, and fixing her 1978 CJ5 Jeep. Briese's career goals are to take a week or two to go on a kayak/camping trip after graduation, then find a good job, get married, and start a family. She is the daughter of Bruce and Gail and she has two brothers. Briese is majoring in agricultural engineering.

Alex Albrigtson is in her first year with the Falcon tennis program. She prefers to play singles and lists her best stroke as her backhand. Her favorite tennis player is Mike Laurel. Her most memorable high school tennis experience was making excuses to get out of classes to watch tennis playoffs. Her collegiate tennis goals are to make the varsity and win some matches. Her career goals include getting a job in research. Albrigtson's favorite musical group is U2 and her favorite song is Last Night on Earth. Her favorite actor is Anthony Hopkins and her favorite color is green. The etymological dictionary is her favorite book. Her hobbies include reading, playing all sports, organizing, astrology, dancing, and buying books and plants. She is the daughter of Wayne and Joey. She is majoring in physics and math.

Katie Lynn Anderson returns for her second season with the Falcons. She had an 8-8 record playing mostly at No. 5 singles. A most memorable college tennis moment is getting lost on trips to meets and the Chinese fire drill. Favorite high school tennis moments were making it to state and spray painting a grocery cart and using it as a ball hopper. Her college tennis goals are to get her serve to a steady and hard to return pace, be a consistent player, and to have a game plan. Anderson's hobbies include running, reading, shopping, and hanging out with friends. Her favorite musical groups/songs are; Panic, At the Disco, Cartel, and The Fray. Her favorite color is green. She prefers to play singles and her best stroke is her forehand. Her favorite tennis players are Maria Sharapova and Andre Agassi. Her career goals are to become an elementary school teacher and then return to school to eventually become a principal. A most recent funniest lifetime moment was driving to Florida during spring break. She is the daughter of Carroll and Julie and has two brothers. Anderson is majoring in elementary education and psychology with a minor in math.

Danielle Huper is in her second season with the Falcons. She had a 1-2 record in singles play and a 3-3 record in doubles play in 2005. She was twice named the team's "Doubles Team of the Week". Her most memorable high school tennis moment was beating St. James to go to state as a team and qualifying for the state meet with her doubles partner, Erin Allis. Huper prefers playing doubles and lists her best stroke as her backhand. Her favorite tennis player is Roger Federer. Her tennis goals are to have a consistent serve and top spin forehand. Her hobbies include playing basketball, softball, tennis, volleyball, reading, and roller blading.  Huper's favorite music is country and her favorite colors are orange and green. Her favorite movie is Coach Carter and her favorite book is the Sisterhood of the Traveling Pants (all three). Her funniest lifetime experience is in her senior year when her team returned from an outing and the hotel toilet had overflowed. Huper's career goals are to start her own landscape design business, have a family, and live in the country. She is the daughter of Dave and Marlene and she has two siblings. Huper is majoring in horticulture (landscape design) with a business emphasis.

Mindy Rudiger is in her second season with the Falcons. In 2005 Rudiger placed second at No. 6 singles in the WIAC Tournament. She finished with an 11-2 record. Rudiger was twice named the team's singles player of the week and three times was part of the team's doubles team of the week. Mindy was also named the Most Improved Player in her 2005 season. She is also a member of the Falcon softball team and earned honorable mention to the All-WIAC team in 2006. Her most memorable high school tennis moment was playing in the WIAA State tennis tournament in her senior year. She prefers to play singles and lists her best stroke as her backhand. Her favorite tennis player is Roger Federer. Her tennis goals are to win a conference championship. Her hobbies include camping, spending time with family and friends, and roller blading. Her favorite musician is Tim McGraw and her favorite movie is Dennis the Menace. Her favorite color is pink and her favorite book is It's Not About the Bike: My Journey Back to Life by Lance Armstrong. Her career goals are to become a teacher and someday have a family. She is the daughter of Steve and DiAnn and she has two siblings. Rudiger is majoring in elementary education.

Shannon Amans is in her first season with the Falcons. She prefers to play doubles and her best stroke is her backhand. Her favorite tennis player is Andy Roddick. Her collegiate tennis goal is to improve her singles game and her most memorable high school tennis moments were team trips and watching the state tennis meet. Amans' favorite color is blue and she enjoys reading mysteries. Her favorite musical groups are Rascal Flatts and Lifehouse and her favorite song is Hanging By a Moment. Her career goal is to get a job she loves. Her favorite movie is Tristan + Isolde. Her favorite lifetime experience is when she laughs uncontrollably with her friends. Her hobbies include playing tennis, lifting weights, watching tennis, and hanging out with friends. She is the daughter of Dave and Pam and she has two siblings. She is majoring in business marketing.

Tracey Boyle joins the Falcons for her first season of collegiate tennis. She prefers to play doubles and lists her best stroke as her backhand. Her favorite tennis player is Robbi Genepri. Her most memorable high school tennis moment was winning her first match at the WIAA state meet and spending time with the team. Her collegiate tennis goal is to improve her singles game. Boyle's hobbies include playing sports, watching movies, and hanging out with friends. Her career goals are to be an elementary school teacher and coach. Her favorite movies are Miss Congeniality, How to Lose a Guy in Ten Days and Signs. Her favorite book is My Sister's Keeper by Jodi Picoult. Boyle's favorite color is red. She is the daughter of Michael and Sandra and has two siblings. She is majoring in elementary education.

Samantha Frazier starts her first year with the Falcon tennis program. She prefers to play doubles and she lists her best stroke as her backhand.  Her favorite tennis player is Andy Roddick. Her most memorable high school tennis moment was earning a letter her freshman year. Her collegiate tennis goal is to improve her volley. Frazier's favorite movie is Iron Will and her favorite book is the Bible. Her favorite color is navy. Her hobby includes playing sports. Her career goal is to become a high school physical education teacher. She is the daughter of Curt and Karen and she has two siblings. She is majoring in health & human performance.

Allison Nickel is in her first year with the Falcons. She prefers to play doubles and her best stroke is her backhand. Her most memorable high school tennis moment was beating Mankato West. Her collegiate tennis goals are to make good friends and have fun. Her career goals are to work in forensic psychology. Her favorite color is purple and her hobbies include reading, drawing, and painting. Nickel's favorite musical group is Me Without You and her favorite song is Catch for Us the Foxes. Her favorite movie is Bone Collector and her favorite actor is Angelina Jolie. Her funniest lifetime experience was when her doubles partner got sprayed by a toilet. She is the daughter of Linda and she has one sibling. She is majoring in chemistry and psychology.

Kathryne Ostrowski is in her first year with the Falcon tennis program. She prefers to play singles and lists her best stroke as a semi-western forehand. Her favorite tennis players are Rafael Nadal and Kim Clijster. Her most memorable high school tennis moments were playing in the section semi-finals and finals. Her college tennis goal is to improve her topspin backhand. Her favorite musical group is Savage Garden and her favorite movie is Ever After. Her favorite color is blue and her favorite author is Nora Roberts. Ostrowski's hobbies include playing tennis, reading mysteries, playing with her nephews, and hanging out with her friends. Her funniest lifetime experience came in eighth grade when she changed her mind on the type of shot she was going to hit and hit herself, cutting and breaking her nose. Her career goals include doing research and working with animals. She is the daughter of Robert and Jan and has two siblings. She is majoring in biochemistry and Spanish.

Cassi Wood joins the Falcons for her first year of collegiate tennis. She prefers to play singles and lists her best stroke as her backhand. Her most memorable high school tennis moment was when she went undefeated and qualified for the state tournament at No. 4 singles. Her college tennis goals are to make good friends and improve her game. Her favorite musical group is The Fray and her favorite movie is The Titanic. Wood's favorite tennis player is Anna Kournikova. Her favorite actors are Jake Gyllenhaul and Rachel McAdams. Her favorite book is Ishmael and her favorite color is pink. Her hobbies include playing tennis, basketball, golf, running, biking, and swimming. Her career goals include having a good job, being happy and getting married. She is the daughter of Tom and Cindy and has two siblings. She is undecided on a major field of study.

The Falcons women's tennis team is coming off yet another 3-3 finish in the WIAC in 2005. It is their third consecutive season finishing with that record and with a fourth-place standing in the conference.

Head Coach Lee Lueck has been trying to break into the upper tier of the conference for seven years now. Whitewater, La Crosse and Eau Claire have controlled the top three spots for five consecutive seasons.

In order to break into that top group teams have to start beating the teams in that group. The Falcons consistently beat the bottom three teams in the conference but have yet to be able to beat the big three at the top.

Megan Knoblauch and Leah Baron, the top two players from last season graduated and left a gapping hole in the Falcons lineup for this season. "We lost two great seniors and great leaders," said Lueck.

Lueck strongly feels that the team is one good recruiting class away from breaking into the upper echelon of the WIAC. They return three strong sophomores from last year's class and have a handful of talented freshmen this season.

This year's freshmen class consists of a lot of talented young players. The one expected to play the most prominent role on this year's team is Katie Ostrowski. Lueck has her all but penciled in at the No. 2 spot this season.

Lueck loves the competition for the single spots. He calls it a challenge ladder that is great for creating competition. "Stay away from the sixth spot because you are constantly fighting competition from the junior varsity girls who want their turn," said Lueck.

Lueck always tries to maintain positive energy and a fun attitude with the team. He realizes that if it's no fun for them, there is nothing holding them to the team. He really strives to make it a fun experience for the women and as something that adds to their college career.

One thing Lueck really likes is seeing former players stay involved with the team beyond their college career. "It's important that we are family and that we build relationships that last long beyond college," said Lueck.

Mulligan, a two-year team captain, helped the Falcons to a fourth-place finish in the conference standings in 2001 with a pair of third-place finishes at the WIAC Tournament. She finished third at No. 2 singles and No. 2 doubles. The fourth-place finish by the Falcons is their best since the 1991 season when they finished third.

Briese explains that the Falcons are a young team this year and as a captain, she is looked up to by her teammates. "I want to set a good example," says Briese. "I'm not much of a talker and I don't give speeches; I try to lead by example."

In 2005, she was named the team's single player of the week twice and was also the team's double team of the week twice. She had a 9-6 record playing most often at No. 3 singles and an 8-7 record playing doubles.

Briese and her teammates have a great relationship in the eyes of their coach, Lee Lueck. Lueck says Briese's teammates love and respect her. "They work for her and they can go to her for insight and advice," says Lueck.

She says that the love of the game is what separates college and high school tennis. "In high school, we played to have fun," says Briese. "If you won, that's great. If you lost, you still had fun. It was just a great way to have fun with your friends."

Lueck explains that Briese made some significant improvements during her years at UWRF. "She can now execute every stroke and is in excellent physical and mental shape. She also keeps the team fit and in shape," says Lueck.

Briese explains that she has all the strokes she needs to win. Her coach now has her working on believing in herself and her ability to win. Lueck says that Briese has set goals for herself and will follow through with them. He explains that her shot making ability has improved and she has developed the tools to outlast her opponents.

According to Briese, making No. 1 singles and doubles has been her greatest achievement in her tennis career. She has always loved playing singles and has started to love playing doubles. "I have always been a singles player," she says.

Briese started her tennis career in seventh grade. After coming home from a family vacation in Montana, Briese was persuaded to join the tennis team by her friends. Though she actually wanted to play volleyball, Briese explains that she was shy and the volleyball girls were popular, so she decided to stick with her friends and give tennis a try. "I didn't know anything about tennis and had to borrow a wooden racket for the first day of practice," she says.

Briese enjoys kayaking in her free time. During her sophomore year, Briese and her boyfriend bought kayaks and she has loved the activity ever since. Last year, she learned how to fly fish and enjoys going ice fishing in her time away from the courts. Hunting is also one of her favorite activities. Briese recently went duck hunting on the last weekend in September.

Briese is majoring in agricultural engineering with a minor in agricultural business. After graduation, she plans on taking a two week camping and kayaking trip. She hopes to find a good job and "just go with the flow." Eventually, Briese hopes to move back north by her hometown or Roseau, Minn.

Originally from Forest Lake, Minn., where she attended high school, she came to UWRF as a singles player. Falcon Coach Lee Lueck, saw Anderson's talent immediately and thought that she would better serve the team as a doubles player.

Her family structure is strong. Her parents are still happily married and she has two younger brothers. Her family has been a significant contributor to her successful career thus far. They attend most of her matches, and the ones that they do not make it to they call immediately after to see how she did. "My family is very close-knit and they help motivate me." Anderson explains.

Anderson had a deep passion for tennis. She played basketball in high school until a bad experience drew her away from the game and focused her attention elsewhere. She feels that tennis is a sport that will interest her throughout her entire life.

Anderson is a strong Catholic who enjoys commuting home every Sunday to attend Mass with her family and eat a hearty, home-cooked meal afterwards. Lueck explains, "I could tell that Katie grew up in a good family, she is always so pleasant and appreciative and her manners - she is just so polite."

Anderson is majoring in elementary education and her minor is in reading language arts and coaching. In the future she hopes to teach and someday become the principle of an elementary school and coach tennis.

Sekelsky coached for four seasons as the cross country and track distance mentor at Baldwin-Woodville High School. Before that he coached for two seasons at Oakland Junior High School as the head girl’s track & field coach. He also coached distance runners at River Falls High School.

Leading the Falcon women is nothing new for Jordahl as she has been one of the elite runners for the Falcons all season. While she is only a freshman Jordahl has had her share of success this season as she led the way for the women in every meet she ran. Not only did Jordahl lead the women in most meets she also finished thirrd overall at the WIAC Championships fending off stiff competition from two schools in particular, La Crosse and Eau Claire, who both finished in the top five at the regional. "She ran her best at the big meet," Coach Don Glover said of Jordahl's performance.

Coach Don Glover said that he was impressed with the women's performance, in addition to Jordahl, Kozicky, and Michaud Glover mentioned Leah Korf and Carly Eggert registered their best times of the year. The Falcons finished 11th overall out of 38 teams in the race won by Washington.

While both the men and the women turned in impressive performances on Saturday they were up against the best of the WIAC including the La Crosse men and women teams who both finished first overall in their respective races.

Falcons Katie Kantrud, Courtney Swanson, and Alana Peterson ended day one in similar circumstances. Katrud shot the best of the three tying for 41st after day one with 100 strokes. Kantrud managed to claim 39th place shooting for a total of 198. Swanson had a nine-stroke improvement from day one and shot for a total score of 209 day two and moved into 43rd place from 45th place after day one. Peterson finished with 220 strokes enough for 48th place.

Eau Claire leads the tournament after day one with 319 strokes. Eau Claire has golfed well throughout the 2006 season and is a prospect for a national invitation this spring. Oshkosh holds second place with a score of 332 and Whitewater trails slightly with 335 strokes into day two of the tournament.

Falcon Jenna Gutzwiller leads the Falcons with a five-way tie for 22nd place shooting a 92 on the first day. Torie Ives of Eau Claire shot one of the all-time top scores in the WIAC with 73 strokes (the course is a par 72) that swung her into first place for individuals heading into day two. Jessica Thompson of Eau Claire follows Ives with 76 strokes and Stephanie Campbell of Whitewater holds third place with a score of 78.

Jenna Gutzwiller finished well shooting a 44 on the front nine and a 46 on the back nine giving her a score of 17 over par 90. Gutzwiller leads the team into the second day of the tournement and is tied for 18th place.

Kantrud, who is a goalie for the Falcon hockey team, picked UWRF for its hockey program. She did not plan to play golf at the college level until she found out that RF had a golf team. She recently drafted Megan Sandell, a freshman at RF, to join the team.  Kantrud hopes that the word will get out about the golf program at RF, something her golf Coach Reid Perry agrees with. "[I look] forward to a growing program for the future," he says.

Since her 8 th grade year, Kantrud has been playing golf competitively. Kantrud's older cousin Chelsey introduced her to golf and because it meant doing something competitive and spending time with her cousin, Kantrud gave the sport a shot.

While attending Fergus Falls High School, Kantrud participated in golf, soccer, and hockey. She was awarded three soccer letters, four golf letters and five letters for hockey.  In hockey, she was the team's Most Valuable Player and the Best Defensive Player award winner. She was named to the all-conference team.

Kantrud says that she tells her teammates, "don't get too frustrated."  She likes to help her teammates take their minds off the game by helping them to think of other things.  Most importantly, "to realize there is more to life than golf."  One of Kantrud's latest ventures involving her teammates, or as Kantrud refers to her teammates as "nut friends," was a trip to Wal-Mart where they bought little kids sandals to put on their putters.  According to Kantrud, it was just to "keep it interesting."

Although Kantrud calls the hole in one she shot at Clifton Hollow last year "lucky" she has advice for those who may be interested in becoming involved with Falcon golf. "It takes time to develop and no one is perfect. You've got to stick with it." Kantrud says she golfs better when she gets a Snickers bar and Powerade at the turn between the front and back nine.

Kantrud's attitude about the approach to athletics is something she gives credit to her cousin and a childhood friend. She says that they are "driven to improve and value hard work, which is hard to come by these days." Kantrud's attitude is reflective of Perry's attitude of golf as a "demanding sport that requires discipline."

Athletics is a passion of Kantrud's and she believes they are a part of who she is.  Fittingly Kantrud is pursuing a major in health and human performance and a minor in coaching. She hopes to teach physical education at the elementary or high school levels and to coach at least one sport at the high school level.

Kantrud wants children to learn something when they are active whether it is about a sport or about life because she believes that it affects a person's future. "Athletics are fun and good for you, not a lot of people get outside - there is more to the world than television," she says. Kantrud says athletics/activities help to prepare a person to work well with others and to be effective in getting tasks done.

She is a Student Athlete Advisory Committee (SAAC) representative for golf and hockey. Currently Kantrud is trying to balance golf practice, captain's practice for hockey, lifting weights, classes and homework. She says that it is important for her to take advantage of available time, not to sit around too much, and be willing to stay up late to be successful at her role as a student-athlete.

Studying elementary education, Gutzwiller's plan is to do just what her second grade teacher, Mrs. Shelly, did for her. It was up until second grade that Gutzwiller hated school, but Mrs. Shelly provided her with another perspective on school and ever since then she has been inspired to learn and desires to help other children develop into good students.

Visiting schools throughout Minnesota, Gutzwiller helps struggling students. Putting in a minimum of 40 hours a semester, she fulfills her responsibilities as a Northwest Suburban Educators of Tomorrow Scholarship recipient. She says, "[I have benefited] by interacting with different cultures and different schools."

Golf may be second on her agenda, but Gutzwiller enjoys the game of golf as she learns not to take the game too seriously.  She did not start out golfing competitively and it was not until her neighbor introduced her to the game when she was in sixth grade that she became interested in the sport.

With no intention of playing college golf, Gutzwiller was approached by former Falcon Coach, Jeff Berkhof, who asked Gutzwiller to join the team. It did not take much for her to decide that golf would be something that she could do and she figured that golf would keep her busy and that she could meet people.

With a team of six members, the Falcons are "short staffed," according to Gutzwiller.  Besides promotion of the golf team around campus and in the community, she wants people to recognize that golf is a "fun sport" that anyone can succeed at if they "come ready to learn."

Perry believes that Gutzwiller has the potential to be, "one of the better players in the conference." He says, "if [Gutzwiller] stays focused and makes some changes in her swing," she could accomplish just that, and for Gutzwiller this could mean breaking her all-time best score of 81.

The WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll requires that students carry a minimum GPA of 3.0 while participating in a sport. Gutzwiller has done well balancing her role as a student-athlete and has earned a spot on the WIAC Honor Roll. Perry says that his golfers "are students first and athletes second."

According to Gutzwiller, the team brings their homework and their lap tops on the road and makes the time to do their homework in the hotel. With no hesitation Gutzwiller says, "I [would] choose missing a tournament," when it comes to the responsibility of being a good student or participating in a golf tournament.

Beyond her success in the classroom, she says most people would be surprised to know is, "that I still get nervous at every tee." However, teammate and friend Katie Kantrud is who she relays on to get her through the stress of a match. Because Gutzwiller is the most experienced on the team her coach looks to her to lead the team and to set a good example.

Perry's previous research in biomechanical kinematics change in golf swings is knowledge he is sharing with Gutzwiller and the rest of the team. Perry hopes that this, and his work towards a Ph.D. in the motor learning of golf, will eventually make the Falcons a strong team.

The sacrifices and dedication it will take to improve the RF program is something Gutzwiller is well aware of.  She believes that being patient is also a key factor in the success of a competitive golfer.

When Gutzwiller is not golfing or busy with school, she enjoys watching professional golfer Adam Scott and loves when her parents, Ray and Sue, younger brother Bryan (a freshman at RF), and her friends come to watch her play.

Playing poker, writing, and relaxing are a few of Gutzwiller's hobbies. She sees herself living in a small town teaching, playing golf with friends and family, and maybe even going back to school to pursue a master's degree in special education in the future.

The UW-River Falls athletic training staff provides on-site medical coverage for 18 varsity teams. Services provided by the athletic training staff include prevention, evaluation, treatment, and rehabilitation of athletic injuries.

Individual tickets are for admission to any regular-season athletic event on the UW-Rive Falls campus in which admisison is charged. Tickets are not good for any post-season or conference tournament contests.

The University of Wisconsin - River Falls Athletic Hall of Fame is established to pay tribute, give deserved recognition, and enhance school tradition by honoring former athletic award winners, coaches and others who have shown distinctive, unique or exceptional athletic ability, or who have made positive contributions to the athletic programs of the University. It is hoped that this type of recognition will be a constant reminder to the students and public of the athletic and civic accomplishments of the individuals honored. This type of accomplishment is largely responsible for creating the excellent athletic tradition of the University of Wisconsin - River Falls.

Scholarships don't require repayment either. They're usually awarded on special ability, academic achievement, religious affiliation, ethnic background or special interest and are available through a variety of business, schools and community organizations.

Work Study This federal program gives you the opportunity to earn money for school, and gain valuable work experience. It's available to both undergraduate and graduate students with financial need. The amount you earn depends on several factors: need, other aid received, and availability of school funds.

Unsubsidized Loans are offered to undergraduate and graduate students regardless of financial need. You are responsible for the interest that accrues on the loan while you are in school. You can either pay it as you go, or choose to have it added to your principal balance.

Catcher Margo Taylor (Jr., Forest Lake, Minn.) won the team's Most Dedicated award for the second straight season. She played in 24 games and finished the year with a .138 average and two RBIs. She has been the team's top pinch hitter for the past two seasons. She started two games behind the plate and handled 15 chances without an error. She was one of three juniors on a team that had no seniors.

Michelle Kelley returns for her third season with the Falcons and plays the outfield. She was the Co Most Improved Player in 2005. She hit .214 in 31 games. She scored six runs, had one double and one triple. She stole nine bases and had two RBIs. She finished with a .321 slugging percentage and a .312 on-base percentage. She was named to the 2005 WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll and was a NFCA Scholar-Athlete. Her favorite past times include going to sporting events, wakeboarding, water and snow skiing, spending time with family and friends and helping small children. The people she admires most are her Mom and Aunt Jayne. "They are both huge influences in my life! They are extremely strong willed and are willing to put everything and anyone before themselves. They have showed me the true meaning of life!" Her team goals are to win the conference championship, stay a close-knit team and to support each other. Her individual goals are to gain speed, improve her on-base percentage and steal a lot of bases. Kelley is majoring in elementary education. She is the daughter of Maureen and Mark Kelley and has one brother and one sister. Her future plans are to teach first or second grade. Favorite Quote: "The price of success is hard work, dedication to the job at hand, and the determination that whether we win or lose, we have applied the best of ourselves to the task at hand." - Vince Lombardi.

Breamber Syverson returns to the Falcons for her junior season and plays second base. She has a .275 career batting average and hit .238 in 2005. She had one double and four RBIs hitting out of the lead off spot as a slap hitter. She had a .322 on-base percentage and led the Falcons with 13 stolen bases. She had a .925 fielding percentage. She was named to the 2005 WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll. Syverson's team goals are to be at the top of the WIAC and move up in the WIAC tournament. Her individual goals are to hit well and steal bases. The person she admires most is Green Bay Packer quarterback Brett Favre. "He is amazing! He is such a leader and throws everything on the line for the team. Talk about a born legend." She is the daughter of Julie and John and has two brothers, a sister "on the way (due May 2)." Her high school coach was Jeff Stenroos. She is majoring in Spanish education. Her future plans include studying abroad during the fall 2006 semester and to someday teach Spanish and coach at the collegiate level. Favorite Quote: "I don't know what we're yelling about!!" - Brick in Anchorman.

Margo Taylor is back with the Falcons for her third season and plays catcher. Taylor is a graduate of Forest Lake High School. She played in 14 games in 2005, mostly as a pinch hitter and came up with some big hits at important times. She had four RBIs.  She was a WIAC Scholar-Athlete and earned NFCA Scholar-Athlete honors in 2004 and 2005. She was voted the team's Most Dedicated Player in 2005. Her individual goals for the season include becoming a better overall player, bring something new and positive to the team every day and to contribute to the team's success in any way possible. Taylor's team goals are to win the WIAC title and play together as a team. The person she admires most is her Mom, Shelley. "She has taught me so much in life and she is one of the hardest workers I know. She is always there for my sisters and I. She is the biggest reason why I'm the person I am today. I can not thank her enough for that." Her pastimes include playing other sports, coaching, bike riding, swimming and spending time with family and friends. She is the daughter of Shelley and has two sisters, Leah and Kelsey. Her future plans are to be a sports announcer or a videographer. Taylor is majoring in broadcast journalism and marketing communications with a minor in coaching. Favorite Quote: "Shoot for the moon, even if you miss you'll land among the stars."

Jenny Cordy is in her first year with the Falcons and plays the outfield. In 2005 she played eight games at UW-La Crosse. At Hortonville High School, Cordy earned three letters in softball and was twice named to the first all-conference team. She earned third team All-State honors in 2004. In her senior season, she was the team's captain and was named the team's Defensive Player of the Year. Cordy was twice named to the all-district team and to the first all-area team after her senior season and to the second all-area team after her junior year. She won her team's Hustle Award in 2002. Cordy was a member of the National Honor Society and was her class valedictorian. At UWRF she earned Dean's List honors after the 2005 fall semester. The person she admires most is her brother, Nick. "He has been a great example and taught me a lot about softball. Without him, and my parents, I wouldn't be where I am today. They have also supported and helped me get through many obstacles such as breaking my ankle and tearing my ACL." Her favorite past times include spending time with friends and family and participating in all sports, especially running. Her team goal is to win the WIAC championship. Her individual goals are to recover from ACL surgery and to support the team. She is the daughter of Betty and Jay and has two brothers. Her future plans are to either go to graduate or medical school for speech pathology/audiology. Favorite Quote: "To give anything less than your best is to sacrifice the gift." - Steve Prefontaine.

Emily Howlett is in her first year with the Falcons and plays third base. She played last year at Northern State where she led the team in hitting (.357). She also led the team in doubles (16) and home runs (4) after starting all 41 games. At Eagan High School she was named to the All-State, All-Region and All-Conference teams. She was her team's Most Valuable Player and Offensive Player of the Year. She also earned Rookie of the Year and Wildcat awards. Howlett was a member of the National Honor Society and a member of the A Honor Roll. Her favorite pastime is spending time with family and friends. The person she admires most is her cousin Carrie. "She has been my role model since I was little. We have the same goals, values and interests. I hope to live up to her." Her team goals are to work together and to achieve common goals. Her individual goal is to make an impact on the team and to do her role to help the team succeed. Her future plans include having a family, be a teacher in a small farming community and coach high school softball and to have a small farm of her own. She is the daughter of Beth and Rick Howlett and has three brothers and two sisters-in-law. Howlett is majoring in health & human performance and health education. Favorite Quote: "Be the best you can be." - Kirby Puckett.

Ashley James returns for her second season with the Falcons and plays catcher. She started all 41 games for the Falcons behind the plate and hit .207. She had two doubles and seven RBIs. She had a .967 fielding percentage. She threw out 20 of 46 base stealers. James earned UWRF Dean's List honors and was named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll. She also earned NFCA Scholar-Athlete honors. Her favorite past times are hanging out with family and friends, reading, watching movies, singing along with her Ipod, knitting and being outdoors. "I admire my parents and grandparents because of their constant support over the years." Her team goals are for the club to improve physically and mentally and to ultimately win the WIAC title. Her individual goal is to improve her batting statistics. James is majoring in finance. Her future plans are to earn a master's degree and work at a bank or business. She is the daughter of Karen and Doug (Larry) James and has one brother, Cory, and sister-in-law Angie. Favorite Quote: "The only way of finding the limits of the possible is by going beyond them into the impossible." - Arthur C. Clarke.

Amanda Peters returns for her second year with the Falcons. She missed most of the 2005 season with a shoulder injury. At Pepin High School she earned three softball letters and was named all-conference for three seasons. She was her team's co-captain and won the team's Golden Glove Award. She was a member of the senior All-Star game roster. Peters was named to the Red Wing Republican Eagle first All-Area team and to the all-district squad. She also earned three letters in basketball and two in volleyball. She was a captain of both of those teams. Peters was on the B Honor Roll for four years and earned Lions Club and Pepin Ambulance Scholarships. She was a vice president of the Lund Covenant Youth Group. Her favorite past times include four-wheeling, hiking, swimming, fishing, playing any kind of sport, and spending time with family and friends. Her team goal is to win the WIAC championship. Her individual goals are to hit the ball hard and field the ball cleanly. "I admire my family members, my high school softball coach, Mr. Haines, and God." Peters is majoring in health & human performance options I and III. She is the daughter of Maureen and Dave Peters and has two sisters, Krista and Hanna. Her future goals include becoming a K-12 health and physical education teacher and to be a head coach. Her favorite quotes include: "It's suppose to be hard; if it wasn't hard everyone would do it. That's what makes it great! - A League of Their Own. "Obstacles - are those frightful things you see when you take your eyes off the goal."

Brittany Rathbun is in her second year with the Falcons and is a pitcher. She was named the team's Co-Most Improved player in 2005 and she earned honorable mention to the All-WIAC team. On the mound she had a 5-6 record and four saves. The four saves is a single season record. She had a 2.57 ERA and pitched 90 innings, mostly in relief. She appeared in 34 of the team's 41 games. She walked 17 and struck out 67. Rathbun was twice named the team's Pitcher of the Week. Opponents hit .251 against her. She also helped the team at the plate hitting .387 with seven RBIs and three doubles. Rathbun was named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll and earned Dean's List honors. She also earned NFCA Scholar-Athlete honors. Her favorite past times include spending time with family and friends, watching movies, roller blading and playing pick up basketball. The people she admires most are her parents. "They have been there for me during my best times and worst. They helped me celebrate my achievements as well as helped get me through the rough times." Her team goals are to come together as a team and achieve a conference title. Her individual goals are to improve her batting statistics as well as her pitching numbers. She is the daughter of Sue and Rick (Chopper) and has one sister, Marissa. Rathbun is majoring in marketing communications. Her future plans are to graduate and work for the Minnesota Twins while coaching softball on the side. Favorite Quote: "Do not let what you cannot do interfere with what you can do." - John Wooden.

Amanda Wojnowiak returns for her second season with the Falcons and plays in the outfield. She had a great first year for the Falcons in 2005 when she was named to the first All-WIAC team and was named to the NFCA All-Great Lakes Region first team. She led the Falcons with a .420 average. She also led the team in doubles (12), triples (2) and slugging percentage (.526). She stole nine bases, had 16 RBIs and had a .425 on-base percentage. Wojnowiak had a perfect fielding percentage. She was twice named the team's Player of the Week and was named the team's Offensive Player of the year. Her team goal is to have an awesome season playing with a team that in the end gave it their all. Individuals who inspire her include God and her family. "No matter what, they are always there for me to count on and keep me going." Her hobbies include anything active and outdoors - snow boarding, wake boarding, skiing, camping and basketball. She is majoring in psychology with a minor in criminal justice. Her career goals include graduating from UWRF and then attending graduate school at the University of Minnesota. Favorite quote: "Lots of people want to ride with you in the limo; but what you want is someone who will take the bus with you when the limo breaks down." - Oprah Winfrey.

Keri Feller joins the Falcons for her first season of collegiate softball and will play both catcher and first base. At Austin High School she earned the team's Most Valuable, Best Defensive and Best Offensive Player awards. Feller earned honorable mention to the all-State team and was also named to the all-area team. She was named to the all-conference team three times and to the all-section team twice. She was team captain twice. Her favorite pastimes include listening to music, playing any sport, boating, horseback riding and spending time with family and friends. The person she admires most is her Mom. "She has taught me to be independent because circumstances and people change. My Mom has been a pillar for me my whole life, even when things in her life weren't so great. She is the most determined and courageous person I've ever known, and some day I hope to posses those same qualities. She has sacrificed so much in her life to make mine as good as it can be, for that I am very grateful." Her team goals are to have a winning record and to make it to the national tournament. Her individual goal is to have an important role that contributes to the success of the team. She is the daughter of Scott Feller and Deb Feller and she has one sister, Lauren. Her future plans are to become a successful speech pathologist and have a wonderful family. Her high school coaches were Steve Knox and Todd Waterbury. Feller is majoring in communicative disorders. Favorite Quote: "When you get to the end of your rope, tie a knot and hang on." - Franklin D. Roosevelt.

Rachel Mathias is in her first year with the Falcons and plays the outfield. She earned honorable mention to the All-State team in 2005 at Ripon High School. She was named to the first all-area team in 2005 and was twice named to the first all-conference team. She was her team's captain won the team's Defensive Specialist award twice. She was a member of the National Honor Society for three years and was on the High Honor Roll. She was also Miss Riponfest. Her favorite pastimes are playing sports, hunting, swimming, riding horses and hanging out with friends. The person she admires most is her older sister. "She has always had a positive influence on me. She has taught me a lot about family, friendships, sports and life in general. I will always look up to her." Her team goals are to win the WIAC title and keep good chemistry. Her individual goals are to have more confidence in her playing and to help the team as much as possible. She is the daughter of Gretchen Tolsma and Lyle Mathias. She has one sister, one half-sister and five step brothers. Her future goals include being an elementary education teacher and staying involved in softball either coaching or playing. She is majoring in elementary education. Favorite Quotes: "Attitude is everything." - Unknown. "Take every challenge and make it a simple ask." - Unknown.

Cassie Peterson is in her first year with the Falcons and plays second base. She played at New Richmond High School under coach Jim McCullum. Peterson helped lead New Richmond to the conference softball championship and was the team's captain. She was twice named to the all-conference team in softball and once in volleyball. She was on the academic honor roll for four years and was the school's Homecoming queen in her senior year. Her favorite pastimes include playing softball and volleyball and coaching youth volleyball. Her team goals are to win the WIAC championship and to have a team GPA of 3.2. The people she admires most are her parents. "They have supported me in everything that I have done. They are great role models and my Dad's been a great coach." She is the daughter of Debbie and Brian and has two sisters, Rachelle and Megan. Peterson's individual goals are to improve her batting, keep a good balance between academics and softball and to continue to improve her fielding. Her future plans are to graduate from UWRF with an education degree and coaching minor and to become an elementary school teacher and coach softball and volleyball. Peterson is majoring in elementary education. Favorite Quotes: "When you pull on that jersey, the name on the front is a heck of a lot more important than the one on the back." - Herb Brooks. "It's not whether you get knocked down; it's whether you get up." Vince Lombardi.

Angie Quance joins the Falcons for her first season and plays the outfield. At Totino-Grace High School she was named to the Minnesota All-State team and was voted to the all-conference squad. She was the team's Best Offensive Player. Quance was a St. Paul Pioneer Press Athlete of the Week. She was named to both the all-state and all-conference academic teams. She was a member of the National Honor Society and was named to the A Honor Roll for eight semesters. She was named to the UWRF Dean's List after the fall, 2005 semester. Her favorite past times include spending time with family and friends, watching movies, eating Chinese food and Chipotle and listening to music. The person she admires most is her Mom. "She has constantly supported me throughout my life and encourages me to keep going, even after I have lost hope. She is a wonderful person with a strong heart that she shares with everyone she meets. My Mom has helped me to become the person I am today and I am grateful to have her in my live." Her team goals are to have an understanding and supportive team atmosphere, with strong team unity, and to work hard and make it to the NCAA Championships. Her individual goals are to play to the best of her ability in every game, to keep an optimistic attitude, to never give up and to have fun. She is the daughter of Sue Quance and has two sisters and five brothers. Her future plans are to find a career she loves and to travel the world. Quance is majoring in pre-professional programs. Favorite Quote: "Risk more than others think is safe - Care more than others think is wise - Dream more than others think is practical - Expect more than others think is possible." - Unknown.

Kelly Quinn is in her first year with the Falcons and will pitch. At North St. Paul High School she helped the Polars to the 2005 State Consolation championship and to the 2004 State Runner-Up spot. In 2004 the team earned sectional academic honors. She was a member of he National Honor Society and earned a Presidential Award for Academics. The person she admires most is her Mother. "I really admire my Mom for always showing me how to do the right thing, and for being one of the most caring people I know." Her team goals include having a team GPA of above 3.0 and to finish in the top quarter of the WIAC. Her individual goals are to improve her pitching by working hard, and keep the opponents' batting average low. She is the daughter of Patty and Gerald Quinn and has one brother, Chris. Her future plans include working in the print journalism field in the Twin Cities. Her high school coach was Sean Hall. She is majoring in journalism with a minor in history. Favorite Quote: "Nothing great was every achieved without enthusiasm." - Ralph Waldo Emerson.

Mindy Rudiger is in her first year with the Falcons and will help the Falcons as a shortstop and pitcher. At Menomonie High School she was named to the all-conference team four times and was captain of the team for two seasons. She also was a two-time all-conference player in tennis and a state qualifier. She also was captain of the tennis squad. She competed in basketball and earned 11 varsity letters in her athletic career. She was a member of the Student Council for three years and a Student Council officer. She was a class representative for three years. Rudiger is also a member of the Falcon tennis team and placed second at No. 6 singles at the 2005 WIAC meet. Her pastimes include spending time with family and friends, roller blading and camping. The people she admires most are her parents. "They have taught me everything I need to know about life, they have made me who I am today, and someday I hope to have the same influence on my children." Her team goals are to finish above .500 and have team unity. Her individual goals are to hit .300 or better and be in the starting lineup. Rudiger is the daughter of Steve and DiAnn Rudiger and has two sisters, Tina and Heidi. Her future plans are to become an elementary school teacher and to coach high school softball. Her high school coach was Katie Hamilton. She is majoring in elementary education. Favorite Quote: "Seven days without laughter makes one weak." - Joel Goodman.

Amber Dohlman will be the team's manager for the 2006 season. The sophomore, from Riceville, Iowa is majoring in animal science equine and health & human performance option II. Her favorite past times include horse riding, playing and coaching softball, showing Simmental cattle, watching movies and working in the Falcon sports information office. She admires her family, for "supporting me throughout the years", and the pioneers in women's sports who "bared the hardships society tossed at them so that we are able to play the sports we love today." Her team goals are to have good team chemistry and finish in the top half of the WIAC, and to have fun. Her individual goal is to help the team any way she can, and to learn as much as possible from the Falcon coaching staff. After graduation she would like to go to graduate school, coach college softball and raise livestock. She is the daughter of Marge and Lowell Dohlman and has two sisters, Carrie and Carmen. Favorite Quote: "Never let the fear of striking out keep you form playing the game you love" - Unknown.

Peterson played in 12 games and was 3-8 at the plate for a .375 average. She scored six runs and was the team's top pinch runner throughout the season. She had five RBIs and stole one base. She handled three chances in the field without an error. She had a .500 on-base percentage. Peterson had one multiple hit and one multiple RBI game.

UWO scored two runs on three hits and made one error. RF had three hits and made two errors. The Titans scored single runs in the fourth and fifth innings to get the win. Emily Howlett was 2-3 at the plate and Ashley James was 1-1. Brittany Rathbun started on the mound for the Falcons and took the loss. Her record is now 3-8. She worked four and two-thirds innings and allowed two earned runs. She walked two and struck out five. Ashley Bertrand worked the final one and one-third innings and allowed no hits or runs. She didn't walk a batter and struck out all four batters she faced.

The Falcons opened with a 10-0 win over Stout in five innings. That was an important win because the loser of the game was eliminated from further play. The Falcons then lost a 1-0 decision to Eau Claire. But they rebounded to take a 6-4 win over La Crosse.

The Falcons faced elimination again in their next game, but came out with a 6-4 win over La Crosse. UWRF scored six runs on 11 hits and made no errors. UWL scored four runs on 11 hits and made three errors. UWRF scored four runs in the first inning when Feller hit a grand slam home run to left. The Falcons added single runs on the fourth and sixth innings.

The Falcon softball team won and tied in a double header at St. Mary's on Wednesday afternoon. Coach Faye Perkins picked up her 350th career win when the Falcons won the first game, 3-1. The two teams tied, 2-2, in a game that was called after five innings due to darkness.

In the first game the Falcons scored three runs on seven hits and they made no errors. SMU scored one run on eight hits and they made three errors. RF scored all of its runs in the sixth. Amanda Wojnowiak led off with a double and advanced to third on an infield out. Amanda Peters reached first on a fielder's choice and advanced to second on an error. Wojnowiak scored on the play and Peters picked up the RBI. Margo Taylor reached first on a fielder's choice and later both Peters and runner Angie Quance advanced a base on a wild pitch. After another out, Rachel Mathias delivered a two-run single to center to score Peters and Quance. USM scored its run in the sixth. Breamber Syverson was 2-3 and Wojnowiak was 2-4 at the plate. Ashley Bertrand started on the mound but did not figure in the decision. She worked five and one-third innings and allowed five hits and no runs. She struck out two and didn't walk a batter. Bertrand hasn't walked a batter in her last three games. Brittany Rathbun picked up the win in relief to improve her record to 3-6. She allowed one earned run and three hits. She walked one and struck out one.

In the second game the Falcons scored two runs on five hits and made no errors. St. Mary's scored two runs on seven hits and made one error. UWRF scored single runs in the first and second while the Cardinals scored twice in the third. Emily Howlett hit a solo home run, her third of the season, in the first to give the Falcons a 1-0 lead. RF grabbed a 2-0 lead in the second when Peters singled with one out. After another out, Ashley James walked to put runners on first and second. Mathias then singled to center and Peters scored on the play on an error. St. Mary's scored two runs in the third on three hits. Mathias was 2-2 at the plate. Bertrand started on the mound and worked the first three innings. She allowed four hits and two earned runs. She struck out one and didn't walk a batter. Rathbun worked the final two innings and allowed three hits and no runs. She struck out two and didn't walk a batter.

In the first game the Falcons scored four runs on six hits and they made two errors. UWS had three hits and made six errors. UWRF scored two runs in the first and single runs in the sixth and seventh. Emily Howlett was 2-4 at the plate and Amanda Wojnowiak was 2-3 with two runs scored and one RBI. Keri Feller was 1-3 with one RBI. Breamber Syverson was 1-4 with a run scored and Mindy Rudiger scored the other Falcon run. In the first with one out, Syverson and Howlett both singled, but Howlett was thrown out on the play in a run down. Syverson advanced to third. Wojnowiak then singled to score Syverson with the game's first run. She then stole second and scored when Feller singled. The Falcon run in the sixth was scored by Wojnowiak, who scored on a wild pitch. In the seventh, Rudiger reached first on an error and stole second. Wojnowiak singled and Rudiger scored on the play on an error. Ashley Bertrand picked up the win on the mound. She worked six innings and allowed three hits. She walked one and struck out five. Brittany Rathbun worked the final inning and threw 10 pitches in retiring the side in order.

In the second game, UWS scored two runs in the eighth to get the win. UWRF had two runs on five hits and made no errors. UWS scored three runs on seven hits and made two errors. UWRF scored single runs in the third and eighth. Stout scored its other run in the fourth on a homer to center. Howlett was 1-3 with a RBI and Feller was 1-4 with a RBI. Rudiger, who was 1-2, scored both the Falcon runs. The Falcons took a 1-0 lead in the third when Rudiger walked and stole second. Howlett doubled to center to score Rudiger. In the eighth, Rudiger led off with a walk and advanced to second on an error. With two outs, Feller singled home Rudiger with the then go-ahead run. But Stout scored one run on a homer in the eighth and the winning run on three straight singles. Rathbun started on the mound and worked the first four innings. She allowed three hits and one earned run. She walked three and struck out four. Bertrand took the loss and is now 11-8. She allowed four hits and two earned runs. She did not walk a batter and struck out seven.

In the first meeting, the score remained at 0-0 until the fourth inning when RF got on the board. The Falcons scored two runs in the inning and never looked back. Michelle Kelley and Amanda Wojnowiak scored when Amanda Peters knocked a single into left field. Peters went 2-3 at the plate and recorded her 19th and 20th RBI on the season. Peters is third on the team in that category behind Wojnowiak's 27 and Emily Howlett's 21. Ashely Bertrand throughout the first four innings for the Falcons and improved her record to 14-10. Brittany Rathbun cleaned up the final three and made her eighth save of the year.

Game two was a different story and Superior made their mark. The Falcons lone run came in the fourth inning when Wojnowiak homered to left field. UWS spread out their runs over several innings. Three of their runs came in the fourth when Becky Crane homered to drive in Erin Kegley and Katie Moench. The Yellow Jackets added three more runs in the fifth coming of an RBI single from Kegley and a two RBI double by Jamie Lovstad. UWS added an insurance run in the seventh when Lovstad singled to knock in Kegley.

In the first game La Crosse dominated the play scoring 12 runs on 14 hits. The made no errors. UWRF scored one run on three hits and made three errors. UWL scored a single run in the fourth and added five in the fifth and six in the sixth. The Falcons scored their run in the sixth. Mindy Rudiger was 2-3 and scored the team's only run. Margo Taylor was 1-1 and Emily Howlett was 1-2 with a RBI. With one out in the sixth, Rudiger singled and advanced to second on the play. Taylor, pinch hitting, singled to center to advance Rudiger to third. Howlett then hit a sacrifice fly to center to score Rudiger. La Crosse scored five runs in the fifth on five hits. The Eagles added six runs in the sixth on five hits. The Falcons made all three of their errors in the inning. Ashley Bertrand took the loss on the mound. She worked four and two-thirds innings and allowed three earned runs. She allowed six hits, walked one and struck out three. Brittany Rathbun worked one inning and allowed three hits and three earned runs. She struck out two. Kelly Quinn worked one-third of an inning and allowed six runs, but only one was earned. She allowed five hits and walked one.

The Falcons rebounded for an important win in the second game. UWRF scored five runs on nine hits and made one error. UWL scored three runs on six hits and they committed three errors. The Falcons scored three in the second and two in the third while UWL scored a single run in the fourth and two in the sixth. Rudiger was 2-4 with one RBI. Rachel Mathias was 2-3 with a run scored and three RBI. She doubled home two runs in the second. Keri Feller was 2-3. Amanda Peters was 1-3 and she scored twice. Angie Quance was 1-2 and she scored once. Breamber Syverson was 1-3. Bertrand picked up the win in game two and she is now 13-10. She worked five and one-third innings and allowed four hits. She allowed three runs, two were earned. She struck out six and didn't walk a batter. Rathbun worked the final one and one-third innings and picked up her seventh save of the season. She allowed two hits and no runs. She struck out two and didn't walk a batter.

In the first game the Pioneers scored three runs in the eighth inning to break a 4-4 tie and get the win. The Falcons were able to get one run back in the bottom of the eighth but it wasn't enough. The Falcons scored five runs on seven hits and made four errors. UWP scored seven runs on 10 hits and made two errors. UWP scored two runs in the second and seventh innings and three in the eighth. UWRF scored a single run in the fourth, three in the fifth and one in the eighth. Mindy Rudiger was 2-4 with a run scored and two RBIs. She hit her second homer of the season, a solo shot, in the eighth. Emily Howlett was 2-4 with a run scored and one RBI. She hit a solo homer, her second of the year, in the fourth. Trailing 2-1, the Falcons took a 4-2 lead with three runs in the fifth. Keri Feller led off the inning with a single to left and she advanced to second on an error. Amanda Peters singled to right to score pinch runner Rachel Mathias. Peters advanced to second on a sacrifice by Angie Quance. Ashley James then singled to right to score Peters. James was moved to second on a sacrifice by Michelle Kelley. Rudiger then singled to left to score James. UWP scored three runs in the eighth on three hits and a Falcon error. The big hit in the inning was a two run homer to left center by Nikki Hansen. Ashley Bertrand started the game, was relieved by Brittany Rathbun, but returned to the game and took the loss. She worked five innings and allowed eight hits. She allowed five runs, three were earned. She walked two and struck out five. Rathbun worked three innings and allowed two hits and two unearned runs. She walked one and struck out six.

In the second game, the Falcons scored six runs on 10 hits and made no errors. UWP scored two runs on six hits and made two errors. UWRF scored twice in the first, three times in the third and once in the sixth. UWP scored single runs in the first and fourth innings. Amanda Wojnowiak had the hot bat for the Falcons in the second game. She was 2-3 with two runs scored and five RBI. She hit two homers - the first was a two-run shot in the first to left and the second was a three-run drive to left center in the third. They were her second and third homers of the season. Peters also hit a homer for the Falcons. She hit a solo shot to left to lead off the sixth. It was her first home run of the season. Howlett was 2-3, including a triple, with two runs scored. Feller was 1-3 - she hit her fourth doubled of the season in the first, and Ashley James was also 1-3 and she hit her fourth double of the season to lead off the fourth. Bertrand went the distance on the mound to get the win and improve her record to 12-9. She allowed six hits and two earned runs. She walked two and struck out eight in working her fourth complete game of the season.

Game one was a low scoring affair and was highlighted by pitching. St. Scholastica jumped out to an early lead in the first when Laura Heise singled to knock in Kristi Erickson. River Falls was not able to battle back until the fourth inning when they put two runs on the board. The runs were scored by Emily Howlett and Breamber Syverson when Amanda Peters reached second on a fielder's choice. Ashley Bertrand pitched four innings for the Falcons and recorded three strikeouts in her 10th win on the season. Brittany Rathbun pitched three innings in relief and knotched three strikeouts while extending her Falcon single season saves record to six.

St. Scholastica regained control in the second game. The Sainst opened up the first with three scored to take the early lead yet again. Runs were scored on a leadoff homerun by Erickson, Heise scored on an Erica Bond double, and Bond eventually found home when Kelly Cordie doubled. The Falcons got on the board in the bottom half of the inning when Howlett hit a solo shot to left field. The Saints added to their lead in the third when Bond scored again, this time off a RF throwing error. St. Scholastica put the Falcons away in the fourth when they tallied nine runs. RF made three errors in the inning which lead to the defeat. Bond and Erickson lead the Saints with three RBI each in the game followed by Andrea Thomas with two. RF cut their losses in the fourth and scored two more runs. The runs came on a Ashley James single which brought home both Angie Quance and Rathbun. The Falcons added one more in the fifth when Howlett scored on a Amanda Wojnowiak single. RF used three pitchers during the game including; Rathbun, Bertrand, and Kelly Quinn. The Falcon staff combined for two strikeouts in five innings of work.

River Falls did not get off to the start they wanted in the opening game. Eau Claire opened up the game with six runs in the first. The first four Blugold batters were able to get on base, most notably Mallory McKinney who hit a three run homer from the three spot. The Falcon offense was able to cut into the EC lead by scoring one run in the bottom half of the inning off a Mindy Rudiger RBI double. Both teams were quiet until the fourth inning where EC recorded four more runs. McKinney added to her already stellar stat line by hitting another three run jack. The Falcons faced an up hill battle for the rest of the game and were not able to rally against No. 8 in the country ranked Blugolds.

Ashley Bertrand started pitching for the Falcons and only made it through one out when she was pulled in favor of Brittany Rathbun. Falcon pitchers allowed nine hits and 10 runs on the night. In the loss, Rathbun was able to record four strikeouts.

In game two EC kept the momentum. Much like the first game, the Blugolds were able to jump out to a lead in the first when Casey Leisgang trotted home on a wild pitch. EC added to their lead in the second when Leisgang hit an RBI single to knock in Bri Strum. The Falcons finally got on the board in the fourth Amanda Wojnowiak doubled to send Emily Howlett home. EC had their third one run inning in the fifth when Leisgang jacked a solo shot. RF battled back in the bottom half of the sixth with two runs of their own. The Falcon runs came when Howlett doubled to knock in Syverson, shortly followed by an Amanda Peters RBI single to send Howlett around. The Blugolds put the Falcons away late with four runs in the top of the eighth. Mandy Techernach doubled to score Jill Janke. Shannon Barone and Megan Ellenbecker scored later when Terisa Syvertsen reached on a Falcon error. McKinney Made it around the bases as well thanks to a Leisgang double.

In the first game the damage was made in the third inning. Keri Feller opened the inning with a single. Angie Quance was then sent in to pinch run and would eventually score the first run. Both Quance and Amanda Wojnowiak scored when Hamline made an error while trying to field a Emily Howlett hit. The score would be cut in half two inning later as Hamline's Holly Wiborg scored on a Grace Weinreich double. The fifth inning was the beginning and the end of Hamline's offense as River Falls shut them out the rest of the way. Falcon insurance runs were added in the bottom half of the fifth when Howlett knocked in Mindy Rudiger, shortly followed by a Amanda Peters single to send Wojnowiak home. Rudiger totaled two runs while averaging .666 in three plate appearances.

Ashley Bertrand pitched four and a third innings for the Falcons while recording three strikeouts and her eighth win on the season. Brittany Rathbun finished off the game and recorded her fifth save of the year. Rathbun's fifth save surpasses her previous team record of four in a single season.

Game two wasn't much different, except this time the Falcons kept Hamline out of the run column. River Falls wasted no time and scored two runs right away in the first. Following a Rudiger single, Breamber Syverson hit the sweet spot on the bat and knocked the ball into left field. Syverson not only knotched an RBI with Rudiger scoring, she also trucked her way around the bases and recorded the in the park homerun. Both teams bats were kept at bay until Wojnowiak ripped one over the outfield fence in the sixth for a round tripper. Ashley James was a standout of the game as she went 3-for-3 with the stick.

In the first game the Falcons scored four runs on seven hits and made no errors. UWW scored two runs on nine hits and made one error. The Falcons scored a single run in the first and three in the third. UWW scored single runs in the fourth and seventh. Mindy Rudiger went 3-3 with two runs scored and a double. Breamber Syverson was 1-2 with a run scored. Emily Howlet was 1-3 with two RBI and a run scored. Rachel Mathias was 1-3 with two RBI. Brittany Rathbun was 1-3. Rudiger led off the game with a double and later scored when Howlett grounded out. The Falcons got three in the fourth. With out out, Rudiger and Syverson singled. Howlett also singled to scored Rudiger. After an out and an error, Mathias singled to scored Syverson and Howlett. Ashley Bertrand started on the mound and got the win to improve her record to 7-5. She worked four innings and allowed four hits and no runs. She walked only one and struck out three. Rathbun picked up her fourth save of the season. She worked the final three innings adn allowed five hits and two earned runs. She struck out four and didn't walk a batter.

The Warhawks scored two runs on eight hits and made one error. UWRF scored its run in the fourth. Syverson reached first on an error and was sacrificed to second by Howlett. She scored when Amanda Wojnowiak singled. Amamda Peters was 2-3 and Ashley James was 1-3 with a double. Bertrand started on the mound and worked the first four innings. She allowed five hits and one earned run. She walked one and struck out four. Rathbun took the loss in relief. She worked two and two-thirds innings and three hits.

In the first game that lasted five innings, the Falcons were handed their worst loss of the season. UWO scored three in the first, single runs in the second, fourth and fifth and two in the third. The Falcons were limited to just two hits; a double by Amanda Peters in the fifth and a single by Emily Howlett in the fourth. UWO scored eight runs on 12 hits. UWRF had two errors and UWO one. Ashley Bertrand started on the mound and took the loss. She is now 6-5. She pitched one and one-third innings and allowed four runs, three were earned. She allowed four hits, walked two and struck out one. Brittany Rathbun worked two and two-thirds innings and allowed three runs, two were earned. She allowed six hits, walked none and struck out four. Kelly Quinn worked the final two-thirds of an inning and allowed one earned run and two hits.

The Falcon softball team welcomed Northwestern University to River Falls for their first home games of the season. The Falcons showed complete dominance in the both games of the double header as they won, 27-0 and 40-0.

River Falls opened up their bats in the first inning and never looked back. The first score came from the Falcons Mindy Rudiger as she strolled home following a wild pitch. NU's bad luck would continue as countless River Falls batters were able to get base knocks and walks. The team totaled 16 hits and 10 walks compared to NU's one hit, one walk, and 11 strikeouts.

River Falls' Amanda Peters was the gem of the highlight reel as she batted .800 in her eight at bats. Peters accounted for six of the falcon runs with three scores and three RBI. Other key plays from the Falcons 27-0 win came from Rudiger again and Ashley James. Both players were able to smash the ball over the fence to record a homerun.

The Falcons Amanda Wojnowiak had the number five in her mind in the second game. Wojnowiak went 5-for-5 from behind the plate and scored five runs; she also added four RBI. This effort was common throughout the whole River Falls lineup as the game turned into the blowout.

They lost their first game to Central, 5-1. Central scored one run in the first inning, two in the fourth and two in the fifth. The Falcons scored their run in the fourth inning. They made one run off of five hits and made three errors. Mindy Rudiger had the only double. Breamber Syverson, Emily Howlett, and Angie Quance all had one hit. Brittany Rathbun also had a hit and the team’s only run. Ashley Bertrand took the loss, pitching the first three and one third innings. She allowed four hits, three runs and two earned runs. She walked one and struck out one. Rathbun pitched the final three and two thirds innings allowing three hits and two runs, one was an earned run. She walked zero and struck out seven.

The Falcons came back to win their final tournament game 2-1 against Cornell. Cornell scored their run in the third inning. They had one run off of six hits and made no errors. The Falcons scored in the third and sixth inning. They mad two runs off of eight hits and made no errors. The winning run for the Falcons happened in the sixth when Feller had a base hit single, Cathy Peterson came in to run for her. Rathbun had another hit, which advanced Peterson to second. Both Rathbun and Peterson advanced on a wild pitch. Peterson made it home on a ground out to second, hit by Michelle Kelley.

For their first game they lost 8-2 to William Penn. Penn scored eight runs in ten hits. Four of their points came in the second inning, two in the third and two more in the sixth. The Falcons scored two runs off of five hits, scoring their first run in the first inning and the other in the fourth. The Falcons also had six errors, the highest for a game so far this season. Hitting for the Falcons, Mindy Rudiger was 2-3 up to bat and scored one run. Angie Quance was 1-1 with one run scored. Brittany Rathbun was 1-3 and had one RBI and Breamber Syverson was 1-2. Ashley Bertrand took the loss, pitching one and one third innings. She allowed four hits and four earned runs and one walk. Her record is now 4-3. Rathbun pitched the remaining five and two third innings, allowing six hits, four unearned runs and one walk.

The Falcons took on Mt. Mercy for the second game and defeated them 4-0. The falcons scored four runs on seven hits and made one error. They scored in one run in the first and third inning and two runs in the sixth. Mt. Mercy had three hits and three errors. Emily Howlett was 2-3 and had one RBI. Rudiger was 1-4 with, hitting a double and knocking in two RBIs. Syverson went 1-3 and scored two runs, and Quance was 1-2 with one run scored. Bertrand pitched the first four innings and allowed one hit, two walks, and two strikeouts. Rathbun pitched the final three innings and had her third save of the year. She allowed two hits, two walks and four strikeouts.

In the win against OC the Falcons scored four runs on seven hits and they made three errors. OC scored three runs on eight hits and they made one error. The Falcons scored single runs in the first, fourth, fifth, and eighth innings. OC scored all of its three runs in the fifth inning.

The Falcons scored the winning run in the eighth using the international tie-breaking rule. Cassie Peterson was put on second base and was sacrificed to third by Emily Howlett. Ashley James singled to center field to score Peterson with the winning run.Keri Feller was 2-3 with one RBI. Michelle Kelley was also 2-3. Mindy Rudiger was 1-3 with a run scored. James was 1-3 with a run scored and an RBI. Brittany Rathbun picked up the win in relief. She pitched the final three and one third innings and did not allow a run. She allowed two hits and struck out five. Ashley Bertrand started on the mound and worked the first four and two thirds innings.

In the 5-4 loss to McDaniel the Falcons scored four runs on 10 hits and made one error. MC scored five runs on nine hits. UWRF scored single runs in the second and sixth innings and added two in the fourth. MC scored two runs in the fourth and sixth innings and scored once in the second.

MCLA was limited to just two hits and they made two errors. The Falcons scored three runs in the first and third innings, a single run in the fourth and seven in the second.Amanda Wojnowiak led the Falcons going 3-3 with two runs scored and five RBI. She had a triple. Breamber Syverson was 2-3 with two runs scored and Amanda Peters was 1-3 with two runs scored and two RBI. Keri Feller was 3-3 with two RBI and Angie Quance was 2-2 with two runs scored. Ashley Bertrand started on the mound and worked the first three innings to get the win. She allowed one hit and struck out one. Kelly Quinn worked the final two innings and allowed one hit and she struck out two.

UWRF scored once in the second and twice in the fourth. They scored seven runs in the third inning and 10 in the fourth. Mindy Rudiger was 4-5 with two runs scored and two RBI. Feller was 2-2 with two runs scored and three RBI. Ashley James was 3-4 with two runs scored and one RBI. Both Feller and James had triples. Wojnowiak was 4-5 with three runs scored and three RBIs and she had a double. Michelle Kelley was 3-4 with three runs scored and two RBI. Bertrand started on the mound and worked three innings to get the win. Brittany Rathbun worked the final two innings. Both allowed one hit and struck out two.

Against F&M Bertrand started on the mound and pitched the first four innings. She struck out three and walked one. Rathbun, who picked up her second save of the season, pitched the final three innings. This is the second no-hitter by the Falcon pitching staff this spring. Rathbun pitched a complete game no-hitter on March 1 against Carlton, a 4-0 Falcon win.

Cortland scored single runs in the third and fifth innings. The Falcons had just two hits: a lead-off double by Mindy Rudiger in the first and a single by Kelley in the second. Cortland scored two runs on eight hits.

Bertrand took the loss on the mound. She worked four innings and allowed one earned run. She allowed three hits and struck out five. Rathbun worked the final two innings and allowed one earned run. She allowed five hits and struck out two.

The game against Rowan went into extra innings. Rowan scored seven runs on six hits and they committed one error. The Falcons scored three runs on five hits and made three errors. UWRF scored single runs in the second, third, and fifth innings. Rowan scored three times in the fourth and four times in the eighth. Mindy Rudiger was 2-3 at the plate and she scored twice. Emily Howlett was also 2-3 with one RBI. Amanda Peters was 1-3 with one RBI. Ashley Bertrand started on the mound and pitched four innings.

She allowed three runs, two were earned. She allowed four hits, struckout two and walked three. Brittany Rathbun also worked four innings and took the loss in relief. She allowed four runs, only one was earned. She allowed two hits, struckout three, and walked one.

The Falcons had one hit and made one error. Plattsburgh had two hits and made three errors. Rudiger's single in the sixth inning was the only Falcon hit. Bertrand took the loss on the mound pitching six innings. She allowed two hits and one earned run. She walked one and struckout four.

On Monday, the Falcons opened with a 6-2 win over Benedictine. UWRF scored one run in the first and five in the third. Benedictine scored both of its runs in the fourth. The Falcons scored six runs on 12 hits and made no errors. Benedictine scored two runs on six hits and made two errors.

Quinn picked up the win on the mound. In her first college game she pitched four innings and allowed two earned runs. She allowed four hits and walked one. Bertrand started and pitched the first three innings. She did not allow a run, allowed two hits, walked one, and struckout three.

UWRF had three hits and made no errors. RI scored one run on six hits and made no errors. Rudiger was 1-3 including a double. Breamber Syverson was 1-2 and Rathbun was 1-3. Rathbun started on the mound and took the loss. She pitched the first four innings and allowed one earned run. She allowed three hits, struckout one, and didn't walk a batter. Bertrand pitched the final three innings, allowed three hits, struckout three, and walked one.

Rathbun faced 22 batters, just one over the minimum. She set down the first nine batters she faced before walking the lead off batter in the fourth. The only other batter to reach base came in the seventh on an error and she was thrown out trying to steal. Rathbun, who picked up a save in the first game, struck out seven. Rathbun did not allow any Carleton batters to hit the ball to the outfield. The last Falcon no-hitter was thrown by Amy Brooke on April 19, 2001 in a 4-0 win over Superior.

In the 3-1 win, the Falcons scored three runs on four hits while Carleton scored one run on just two hits. UWRF scored single runs in the first, fifth and sixth innings and Carleton scored its run in the first. Ashley Bertrand started on the mound and worked five innings to get the win. She allowed two hits and one unearned run. She didn't walk a batter and struck out nine. Rathbun picked up the save, her fifth of her career, working the final two innings. She didn't allow a hit, walked three and struck out two.

The small part comes in the fact that of the 15 players on this season's roster, only eight are returnees. The team is made up of six freshmen, six sophomores, three juniors and no seniors. "It's kind of scary, but exciting," said Perkins. "We are very talented, but lack experience. We have to rely a lot on returnees and on our freshmen to step up for immediate impact."

Sophomore Ashley James who caught for the entire season last year will be looked to protect the plate again this year She hit .207. Sophomore Margo Taylor is also in the wings ready to step up when needed.

Junior Breamber Syverson will be the only familiar face in this year's infield as an entire new group is taking shape. Last year Syverson played in all 41 games and will be looked to help out at shortstop if needed. She had a .238 average and stole a team high 13 bases. Freshman Mindy Rudiger will be looked to help in the shortstop position as well. If Syverson is asked to play shortstop, freshman Cassie Peterson will be looked to fill in at second. At first base sophomore Amanda Peters will look to take control with Keri Feller ready for back up. Sophomore Emily Howlett will be looked to hold down the third base position.

Amanda Wojnowiak will be one of the leaders in the outfield. She lost some playing time last year due to a leg injury but is ready for a new season. Last year Wojnowiak earned All-WIAC and NFCA All-Great Lakes Regional first team honors. She played both right and center field and had the team's highest batting average of .420. She led the team with 21 runs scored and had a team high 12 doubles and two triples The 12 doubles is second in a single season in the Falcon records book. She had 16 RBIs and stole nine bases. She had a perfect fielding percentage.

This year the team starts the season a few weeks earlier then usual with its first game on Wednesday against Carleton. "This is the earliest we've ever played, but it will help provide some stronger focus in our practices," said Perkins.

Brittany Rathbun (So., Rochester, Minn. Mayo HS)  pitched in three of the team's four games last week. She set a school record picking up her fifth save of the season in the team's 4-1 win over Hamline. She also holds the school record for career saves with nine. For the week Rathbun pitched 14.1 innings and had a 1.88 ERA. The right-hander allowed 16 hits and only three earned runs. She walked only two and struck out nine. She pitched all eight innings in the team's 7-3 eight-inning loss to UW-Eau Claire on Friday. In that game she allowed seven runs, but only three were earned. She walked two and struck out three.

Second baseman Breamber Syverson (Jr., Prescott, Wis.) started all four games for the Falcons at the Coe Classic tournament where the Falcons finished 2-2. She was 5-9 at the plate for a .555 average. She scored two runs, stole two bases and had three sacrifices batting in the No. 2 spot in the lineup. In the field she had a perfect weekend with 10 putouts and six assists.

Keri Feller first learned to love the game of T-Ball at the age of five. Softball did not come into the picture until two years later. Her parents, Scott and Deb, helped her to love the game by consistently playing catch outside and playing other sports.

After her years of youth sports, Feller moved on to Austin High School where she was a two sport athlete while playing softball and basketball. Feller was the softball team's Most Valuable Player and one both Offensive and Defensive awards. She was honorable mention on the All-State team and made the All-Area team as she captained her team for two seasons.

In her first season with the Falcons, Feller played in 27 games and made as much of an impact as a freshman could. She hit .307 and recorded 27 hits while batting in 19 runs. She had five doubles, two triples and a home run. With early numbers like that, the Falcons can look to an even better season next year from the up-and-coming Feller.

Feller has learned some valuable lessons in her season with the Falcons under Perkins. "Things aren't always black and white, there is some gray area and all problems can be figured out as long as people compromise."

After playing years of softball, Howlett entered high school in Eagan. She was a two sport athlete and participated in both softball and hockey.  While playing softball, Howlett was named to the All-State, All-Region, and All-Conference teams. Aside from her softball awards, Howlett was also an active member in the National Honor Society and consistently was on the A Honor Roll.

Following a stellar high school career, Howlett moved on to the college ranks and played for Northern State. Howlett lead the team in batting average with .357, doubles with 16, and homeruns with four. Although her career was well on it's way at Northern, Howlett looked at the bigger picture and decided to transfer to UW-River Falls.

"It is a lot different coming in as a transfer student. You aren't a freshman yet you have never played here before. You don't have to work on being a student athlete and balancing everything but you do have to adjust to this new schedule. You are also an outsider to the team and you need to try and fit in with what is already there."

Her first season at UW-La Crosse, Cordy broke her ankle chasing a fly ball. After only eight games she was shelved for the rest of the season. Then, after transferring to River Falls, she tore her ACL while practicing slides and was done for year without being able to play in one game.

Through it all, Cordy remains determined to make a big comeback next season. Coming back from such devastating injuries can be a very daunting task. Cordy has approached the situation like she approaches everything in life, with hard work and determination.

Cordy tries to be a part of the team in any way that she can, including going to all home games to help out with charting and keeping stats. She is restricted from going to practices because that would cost her a year of eligibility, but she does try to participate in some activities like weightlifting with her teammates.

Cordy has very much earned the respect of Falcon Coach Faye Perkins. "Jenny is not a quitter, many people would have hung up their cleats, but Jenny came back to softball and has worked incredibly hard. She is one determined person."

When healthy, Cordy defensively provides a spark for the team as an outfielder with a lot of speed and an abundance of hustle. That speed also comes in handy when at the plate where she primarily is a lefthanded -slap hitter who utilizes her speed to reach base.

Cordy is a hustle player who puts forth her best effort on every play. Coincidently, she feels her injuries are a result of her aggressiveness on the field. A player for the Minnesota Twins, Nick Punto, is similar because he often gets hurt while trying to make spectacular plays. They both sacrifice their bodies to make the play and help their team win. One thing for sure with Cordy, you will never see her giving up on a fly ball, if it's in her vicinity she's going to go for it.

At Hortonville High School in Wisconsin, Cordy was twice named to the first all-conference team. In 2004 she received third team All-State honors. In her senior season, she was the team's captain and was named the team's Defensive Player of the Year. Cordy was also named to the all-district and first all-area teams after an impressive senior season.

In the classroom, Cordy has impressed as well. In high school, she was a member of the National Honor Society and was her class valedictorian. She has continued that success at UWRF, being named to the Dean's List in her first semester.

Cordy transferred to River Falls to major in communicative disorders. She was previously majoring in physical therapy at La Crosse, but with her rash of injuries she felt she had seen enough physical therapy to last a lifetime. She hopes to attend graduate or medical school for pathology and audiology after she completes her undergraduate degree at River Falls.

Coming from a family of baseball enthusiasts, it was no surprise that Cordy became a softball player at a young age. With her father being a baseball coach, and her two older brothers playing baseball it seemed natural for Cordy to play softball. Both of her brothers played through high school and one went on to play in college at St. Norbert. The person she admires most is her brother, Nick.

"He has been a great example for me and has taught me a lot about softball. Without him and my parents, I wouldn't be where I am today. My family has given me great support through these tough times with the injuries."

Cordy loves to spend time with her friends and family, playing and watching other sports, and babysitting. She loves the Milwaukee Brewers and is very excited about their chances this season. One very interesting thing about Cordy is that she has never had a soda. She prefers to drink only juice, water and milk. She has a unique summer job - she works at a landfill near her hometown.

Peterson has been playing softball for a long time. "I started playing softball with a plastic bat as soon as I learned to walk. I was at the ball park every weekend of the summer, from the day I was born, watching my dad play," said Peterson. She started playing in city league in Eagan when she was seven. "One of my funniest memories of softball is from that league - we were in the middle of a game and one of my team mates was running to first base, she came to a screeching halt and said, 'time out, I dropped my barrette!'"

Peterson has a lot of personal motivation and love for the game that keeps her coming back year after year, but her family has also been a huge part of her enthusiasm. "I think having my parent's coach and stay active in sports makes us a better family. I feel sports have helped me really get to know my parents and my sisters."

With all her experience in volleyball as well as softball it was a tough decision for Peterson to decide to continue playing softball and not volleyball. "Softball has always been my favorite sport and I guess I thought at the college level I was a bit on the short side for volleyball. I still debate if I should go out for it next year," said Peterson.

"Cassie is an extremely dedicated and hard-working player," said Perkins, "She has worked hard on her hitting and fielding. Even though she has seem limited playing time, she has been a positive contributor to the team in every aspect."

When she has been in the lineup she's shown she has the talents and skills to make plays both in the field and at bat. Her best games came in a double header sweep over North Central when she had two hits in the first game and scored two runs and had four RBI in the second contest.

With the season winding down, Peterson says she thinks that it is going great so far. "We have defense and offense - we just need to hold on to our wins and stick together as a team and we should have a strong finish to our season."

Much like the attitude of all of the team players, Quance is excited about the present and future of Falcon softball. "We have gained each other's trust and use it when we play. We have come a long way since the beginning of the year and will continue to build upon that."

This year's schedule has provided some tough talent for the Falcons to match up with, including nationally ranked teams. Quance feels that these tough opponents only make the Falcons that much better. Although losses are always tough to take, she feels losses to tough opponents provide the team with a chance to learn from mistakes and provide fuel for future games.

"It requires a combination of sacrifice and persistence in order to live a healthy and balanced life. Weekends have to be sacrificed to play games, to do homework and studying, and thinking about how each choice you make can affect the team."

Quance has also displayed persistence and hard work in the classroom. In high school, she was named to both the All-State and All-Conference Academic teams. She was a member of the National Honor Society and was named to the A Honor Roll all four years at Totino-Grace. She has kept that success up at River Falls, being named to the Honor Roll in her first semester.

The person Quance admires most is her mom, Sue. "She is a wonderful person with a strong heart that she shares with everyone she meets. My mom has helped me to become the person I am today and I am grateful to have her in my life."

"I have had some great games and some not so great games. However, one thing that is for sure, and that is that I'm never satisfied. I believe that there are always things to improve on, which is why practice is so important."

Only a junior, Michelle Kelley is now a veteran on a very young and talented 2006 UWRF softball team. So far this season, both offensively and defensively, she has taken full advantage of her opportunity to play everyday and be a leader.

Kelley is one of only four Falcons who have started all 24 games to date. She spends most of her playing time in right field, but has also started four times in center field. She has batted any where from sixth to ninth in the lineup and gives the team an added punch at the plate no matter what spot in the lineup she holds.

Equipped with outstanding speed she has the ability to cover a lot of ground in the outfield and swipe bags while on the base paths. One of her main goals this season is to increase her on-base percentage so that she can create havoc for opponents while on the bases both in stealing bases and scoring runs.

Kelley's team goals are for the Falcons to be in the top three of the highly competitive WIAC. She thinks this year's team has the athletic talent and chemistry to go as far as their drive will take them.

"Being one of the older players on the team, I have to make sure that I am a positive role model for the younger players. I have to make sure that I am giving 110 percent through everything that I do," says Kelley.

Kelley began playing softball when she was nine-years-old. She attended Century High School in Rochester, Minn., where she actually starred as a second baseman. It wasn't until college that she switched positions. Perkins felt that her skills were better suited for the outfield.

Kelley is the daughter of Maureen and Mark Kelley and has one brother and one sister. She greatly admires her mom and her aunt, Jayne. "They are both huge influences on my life. They are extremely strong willed and are willing to put everything and anyone before themselves and have really shown me the true meaning of life."

Kelley came to River Falls to play softball and also because of the school's strong elementary education program. She loves kids and hopes to one day teach first or second grade. Currently she works at the YMCA where she gains valuable experience working with kids in the summer youth programs.

Her favorite sports team is the Minnesota Twins and her favorite athlete is the Twins centerfielder Torii Hunter. Her favorite movies include Sandlot and Fever Pitch which both happen to be about baseball. She loves Italian food, which is one of the most popular eat-out destinations for this year's team.

"Rachel has been a nice addition to the softball team," said Falcon Coach Faye Perkins.  "At Ripon she was a standout centerfielder receiving all-conference honors her junior and senior years and being named first team all-district and all-state honorable mention her senior year." She was also her team's captain and won the team's Defensive Specialist award twice. She was a member of the National Honor Society for three years and was on the High Honor Roll.

Mathias has played in 17 games and started 10 times. She is hitting .308 and leads the team with two home runs. She hit her first homer, a three-run shot to center field, in a win over North Central on April 4. That was the first home run by a Falcon since the 2004 season. She also had two doubles in that game. He second homer was a solo shot in the second game at Oshkosh on April 8. She has knocked in eight runs and scored 11 times. She has two doubles and a .615 slugging percentage.

She was hitting in the No. 9 spot in the lineup early in the season, but has moved to the No. 6 spot lately. Mathias has been in left field for most of the season, but did start one game in center. Her best game was a 3-5 effort against North Central. She scored three times in that game and had five RBIs.

"I started playing softball really early, probably in second or third grade in the t-ball leagues," said Mathias. Her parents and older sister were big contributors to her early interest in softball. "I would have to say my whole family got me interested. My older sister played and both my mom and dad either coached or played on a team. I think my biggest roll model was my sister. When I was younger I always wanted to be just like her. I think I looked up to a lot of the older girls on my teams also, I wanted to be just as good if not better than them, so I pushed myself to improve."

Mathias was also a member of her school's volleyball and basketball teams. Her other hobbies include being outdoors as much as possible. "I try to get out as much as possible to hunt, fish, swim, camp, just play, or whatever. I also like to ride horses."

"The nice thing about Rachel is that she's an outfield specialist and not an infielder learning how to be an outfielder," said Perkins. Her experience in the outfield began her sophomore year in high school. In middle school and in summer leagues she played third base before moving to the outfield.

"I like this position because there is so much ground to cover. You really get to use your speed. I also like to throw long distances. I don't like that we don't get many balls. The infield is involved in almost every play. We, as the outfielders, are involved also but we just mostly back the infielders up."

Mathias decided to come to UW-River Falls because she liked the teaching program that was offered and knew she wanted to play softball. "I'm getting an education, but I am also making good friends on the team. Being part of the team atmosphere is something I really enjoy. I like to be around people with the same interests and goals." Her goals in the outfield go along well with the team's goals. "She knows what she's doing in the outfield, is always in the right place, and has added depth to our outfield," said Perkins.

The transition from high school ball to college has been a fairly smooth one for Mathias. "In high school we worked hard in practice like we do in college but the work outside of practice in college is much more intense.

"When you get here people don't know who you are or what you did in the past. You are an equal with all the rest of the new players. It is time to give it your all and make these new people and coaches see what you have to offer."

Mathias is not just involved with softball, but is also a member of Big Brothers Big Sisters.  She is planning on majoring in elementary education and getting a minor in psychology.  Her plan for after college is to teach kindergarten or first grade. "I want to stay involved with softball after college. I will either coach a team or join a community team, or both, who knows."

At eight years old with a tennis ball and a glove, Rathbun began her softball career by playing catch off the garage with her dad. This preparation prepared Rathbun for her first fast-pitch softball game four years later.

Her dad is her biggest influence when it comes to sports. "My dad was a big athlete in high school and college. To be honest, without my sister and my involvement in sports, my parents would have troubles with keeping busy; they devote their lives to us and our sporting events."

"Brittany is a solid asset to our team, we look for her to throw in some big games this season and play a key role," said Perkins about Rathbun who is a Rochester, Minn., native. She attended Mayo High School.

She started the season with a bang when she threw a no-hitter in the team's 4-0 win over Carleton on March 1 at the Rosemount Dome. Rathbun faced 22 batters, just one over the minimum. She set down the first nine batters she faced before walking the lead off batter in the fourth. The only other batter to reach base came in the seventh on an error and she was thrown out trying to steal. Rathbun, who picked up a save in the first game of the twin bill, struck out seven. Rathbun did not allow any Carleton batters to hit the ball to the outfield. She also combined with Ashley Bertrand to throw a second no-hitter in a 4-0 win over Franklin & Marshall at the Rebel Spring Games in Florida on March 15. Rathbun pitched the final three innings and faced just 10 hitters.

James got her start as an athlete in first grade and worked her way through high school where basketball was her main focus. But she gradually shifted to softball.  "I had natural talent in softball; it was easy and fun," said James.

Her softball career started as a pitcher, not at catcher, a spot she has held in the lineup since the start of the 2005 season. "I was a pitcher until my dad stopped catching for me, so around fifth grade I started catching. I liked catching because I was still involved with every play," said James. She also had a lot of inspiration from the older girls on her team. "We had a group of really talented older girls at our school that helped push me to be better," said James. She played at Mankato Loyola High School.

James joined the Falcons last year and played in all 41 games. Coming in as a freshman and taking the leadership role behind the plate was intimidating. "I was very nervous in my first games, I didn't know how to be a leader and how to talk to people," said James.  In her first year she hit .207 and had two doubles and seven RBI. "One of my goals this year is to improve on my hitting. I'm pretty streaky and I'm working on being more consistent," said James.

The catcher is in a unique position being able to see all that is happening on the field. It's important for the catcher to be able to make adjustments to fielders, and at the same time, call the game for the pitcher. James has demonstrated that she has the talents and skills to handle all of the responsibilities.

During her freshman year, James established herself as the team motivator. "Ashley is also a "firecracker" on the team. Her cheers get the team fired up and her sense of humor keeps us laughing!"said Perkins.

So far this season, James has played in 10 games and is hitting .179. She has scored four runs and knocked in three. She has thrown out four of 12 would be base stealers. Her best game to date this year was against Macalester played at the Rebel Spring Games in Florida. She scored two runs and had three hits, including a triple, the first of her career.

James, who has batted in the No. 7 spot in the lineup for most of the year, is confident in her team this year. "We're a young team, but our players are knowledgeable. We have the potential to be in the top three in the WIAC."

One of the biggest surprises for James when she started playing for the Falcons was the level of athleticism. "I was surprised by the level of hitting. In high school you worried about the No. 3, 4, and 5 hitters.  In college you have to think about every hitter."

Peters is supported by both of her parents, Dave and Maureen; and two younger sisters, Krista and Hanna. "My best childhood memory would have to be growing up on the farm with my sister Krista," said Peters. "We would often go walking through the woods, play catch, and hit balls in the fields."

Peters, or Pete as her friends would call her, earned three softball letters as well as three all-conference awards over her high school career. She was also the co-captain of her team and won the team's Golden Glove Award. Peters was also named to the Senior All-Star Game, the Red Wing Republican Eagle first All-Area team, and the all-district squad.

Following high school, Peters made the decision to attend River Falls. She based her decision on both the academics River Falls would offer her along with the fact that she would be able to play softball.

"Coming off my shoulder injury was a lot of hard work. Not only was there the physical aspect of healing and strengthening it, but there was also the emotional aspect as well. I didn't know how my teammates would receive me after a year of not playing. They welcomed me back with open arms."

Falcon Coach Faye Perkins said of Peters, "She had shoulder surgery last spring and has made a 100 percent comeback. Amanda will play at first base and she could help us at second. Her hitting has come along great and we expect big things from her at the plate."

Peters will always remember the great moments the Falcon team has together both on and off the field. She will definitely remember the ride back in a van from a tournament in Duluth this last fall where the team played "Name That Tune," in what Peters calls, "karaoke style."

Taylor got a jump-start in her softball career. She started playing in kindergarten, a year before other girls were allowed to sign up. "My mom was the coach and my older sister played so I was able to start a year earlier." Taylor says her mother is her biggest role model.  "She never played softball, but she was always so strong and supported me."  Taylor grew up watching Ivan Rodriquez play for the Texas Rangers. "I would try to copy what he did; he was a great hitter," said Taylor.

In high school, Taylor was a two-sport athlete playing volleyball and softball. Her decision to come to UW-River Falls wasn't made until the middle of August of the year she graduated from high school. "I was so busy with school and sports that I just kept putting it off. I decided to come to River Falls because I heard they had a good journalism program, it was close to home, and I wanted to continue playing softball at the Div. III level," said Taylor.

"Margo is an exceptional "team player," said Falcon Coach Faye Perkins. "She works hard to not only improve her own performance but also to help improve the team's performance. As a catcher, Margo works exceptionally well with each pitcher - she knows their strengths and weaknesses and helps them in a very positive manner to work on becoming better. She reads the batters and exploits their weaknesses."

When Taylor's not catching she needs to be ready at a moments notice to come in and pinch hit. "That was one of the biggest things from this year to last year," says Taylor. "I am a lot more mentally mature this year. It's hard to go from having all my gear on warming up a pitcher, to suddenly going in the game to pinch-hit. I didn't know how to mentally prepare myself for that, now I know what I have to do to be in the right mind set."

Already this year she has shown her ability to enter a game and have an impact. In the team's 4-0 win over Carleton on March 1, she entered the contest in the sixth inning and promptly singled to left field to drive in the team's fourth run of the game.

Taylor has high expectations for her team as well. "Our chemistry is amazing, it's better than last year and we have more power and contact hitters. We're not quite there yet defensively, but we're all working together."

"As a freshman last year, Ashley stepped into the lead role on the pitching mound," said Falcon Coach Faye Perkins. "The experience from last year will make her that much better of a pitcher as a sophomore."

She is very excited about her team's chances in 2006. "We have a lot of potential to have a really good season and we are all pretty pumped up about it." With a lot of talent and good team chemistry, Bertrand feels the team can excel in the WIAC and in the conference's post-season tournament.

Bertrand is a strikeout pitcher, who prides herself on being able to keep batters off-balance. She feels her best pitch is her curveball, which really fools opponents. "A lot of batters lay off it because they think it's too outside and they end up getting rung up on it," Bertrand said.

Perkins says that Bertrand has many strengths as a pitcher. "Ashley's primary strengths as a pitcher are her speed, her rise ball, and her knuckle change, and she is a very composed; she doesn't get rattled on the mound."

She first began playing softball when she was 11. Her second year playing she was given the opportunity to pitch because her team only had one pitcher. She wasn't very good at first, but with lots of practice, she became quite the flamethrower.

Bertrand is the daughter of Wendy and Mike Bertrand and has two brothers, Brent and Shawn, and a sister-in-law, Amy. Much of her devoted practice time is spent with her father.  "He's been there for me through thick and thin. He's my catcher during the off-season and is always there when I need him, and I wouldn't be where I am today without him." She cherishes every moment that she gets to spend with her family and friends.

Apart from athletics, Bertrand is currently majoring in mathematics and has her minor in coaching. She was named to 2005 WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll and earned NFCA Scholar-Athlete honors. She finds juggling school and athletics difficult at times, but gets through it by being organized and prioritizing.

She plans on working in the accounting field and finance for a company like 3M or Medtronics. She would also like to pursue a coaching job to go along with her day job. "I want to be either a high school or college softball coach. Along with coaching a team, I want to spend some time working with young pitchers to help develop their mechanics and skills." For now though, she'll be focusing on her own very young, college softball career.

On the lighter side, Bertrand is a country music fanatic; she can listen to it anytime, anyplace and not get sick of it. She loves the movie Shrek and considers herself to be a, "big chick-flick kind of girl."

Her favorite athlete is Jenny Finch, a pitcher for the U.S. Olympic team. "She is really quick and has a lot of movement on her pitches, and is a really good hitter; basically everything I want to be."

Bertrand opened up her 2006 season just the way she'd like by defeating Carleton 3-1 on opening day. She started and went five innings, giving up one unearned run, while walking none and striking out nine. It's a good start, but she knows a lot of hard work lies ahead in order to achieve her high individual and team expectations.

"Breamber will be one of the team leaders this season. On the infield at second base, as a junior and the most experienced player, she will be the leader," said Falcon Coach Faye Perkins about the Prescott, Wis., native.

At the second base position, Syverson will have to deal with a lot of new faces besides the catch and pitcher, but she is optimistic.  "No one would know this is our first year together. We look like we've been playing together for years."

Syverson was playing softball as long as she can remember, starting out at age five in t-ball, continually working on improving her game.  "I never played second or hit from the left side until my freshman year here at UW-River Falls," said Syverson.  She played shortstop all four years of high school only occasionally venturing to the outfield.

When Syverson first thought of playing softball in college she thought it would be a good way to help her adjust to college life.  "It gives me something to look forward to," said Syverson who enters the 2006 season with a .275 career batting average.

In Syverson's first year with the Falcons she say plenty playing time appearing in 38 games and finished tied for second on the team with a .321 batting average. She had four RBIs and stole 11 stolen bases. She also led the team with 16 sacrifices. Syverson was the team's designated hitter for most of the season and was named to team's Most Improved Player in 2004. Syverson also saw some time at shortstop, but second base is still where she calls home.

"Bre is a straight-forward type of player. She lets her teammates know exactly what she thinks and is very straight forward and honest. Her teammates and coaches appreciate her honesty and always look to Bre to tell is like it is," said Perkins.

Syverson has optimistic and aggressive goals for this season, both for herself and for her team.  "I hope to win the conference tournament and finish as one of the top three teams in conference play.  I'm hoping this year to finish with a batting average above .320 and steal a lot of bases while playing an important role on the team.  As always, it'll be a fun season."

Brennan was pleased with the overall results from the 2004-05 season. "I was pleasantly surprised by the dedication and commitment of the athletes in our program. We finished with an All-American (Jill Crandall) and several school records. We also hosted our first ever alumni meet, high school coaches' clinic and track and cross country camps. We will continue to get better every year and I look forward to another season with our returning athletes and new recruits."

Brennan worked as an assistant track & field coach at Texas A&M prior to coming to River Falls. She coached men and women in the heptathlon, decathlon and pole vault. She had several NCAA qualifiers and coached the Big XII Conference women's pole vault champion in 2002. She also served as the camp director and the high school coaches' clinic director.

Prior to coaching at Texas A&M, she coached at the University of Iowa and at Louisiana State University as a graduate assistant. At Iowa she was responsible for the women jumpers, throwers and milti-event athletes. She also coached a women's 400-meter hurdler All-American. She also was the team's strength and conditioning coordinator. At LSU she worked in the athletic department compliance and marketing departments and with the senior women's administrator. She also assisted with ticket office and event management operations.

Athletic Hall of Fame in 2005. Syverson also competed with a German running club when he was a soldier stationed in Germany in the late 1980's. He also lived in Portland, Ore., and had the opportunity to run with and meet several national caliber master's level runners.

Many people are naturally gifted in some sort of area. Some people are blessed with a naturally good singing voice or have a knack for writing, while others may be naturally talented in sciences or mathematics.

"He's a very good all-around athlete," Falcon track & field Coach Martha Brennan said about the junior. "He's a jumper with good speed.  If you got good speed and can jump, you can do a lot in track."

His great speed and his awesome leaping ability are a couple of reasons why Christy's favorite event is the long jump. Not only is the long jump his favorite event, it is also an event that Christy set an indoor record in this season with a leap of 22-6 1/2.

That, however, is far from his only event. Christy shows how versatile he really is athletically by participating in multi-event competitions. This indoor season, he set a heptathlon record by scoring 4,850 points.

Christy, not only helps on the track, he also helps the team off the track. This year's track & field team is very young. Christy is one upperclassman who helps his young teammates make the transition from high school to college track & field.

Christy's experience in track is what makes him a good influence on his young teammates.  Christy has been running track since eighth grade. In his younger days, he played baseball, but because of vision problems, he was forced to quit. That was when he made the switch to track & field.

It turns out that it was a pretty good move for Christy to switch to track. In high school in Tomah, Wis., Christy went to state in the long and triple jumps in both his junior and senior years.  In the conference meet, he won both the triple and long jump, placed second in the high jump, and took third in the 300 hurdles in both years, scoring 34 team points.

So far, Christy has been able to bring his success from high school to the next level.  During this year's indoor season, he has set two indoor records in the heptathlon and the long jump.  He also has completed one of his goals for the outdoor season. Christy provisionally qualified for the NCAA Div. III Nationals in the decathlon at the Falcon Invitational held April 8-9.

Brennan also contributes Christy's success to his better health. "He did great," Brennan said about this year's indoor season, "Clint was healthy and that's the biggest thing. The big difference between this season and last was that he nursed a bad back throughout the outdoor season."

As for his goals for the rest of the season, Christy has already completed one of them by provisionally qualifying for the decathlon. He would like to improve his overall speed, hurdling and his javelin throwing. Christy also would like to try to break the school record in the decathlon.  As a team, he would like to see both the men's and women's teams finish in the top five at the WIAC meet in May.

Christy's life isn't engulfed by track & field. Christy also enjoys playing recreational sports such as croquet or bocce ball. He also likes to spend time with his girlfriend, Brittany Smith, who also runs track.

Christy is also a movie buff.  His favorite genre happens to be horror movies. "I'm up for a new horror movie any day," Christy said, "I never get scared, but I love watching my girlfriend jump and scream."

Christy also is in the Army Reserves. He is now in his fourth year of six. Christy joined to get money to pay for college, but says that his experience has been more than just a way to pay for tuition.

The Hills, Minn., native is finishing his masters of education degree in sport management at the University of Minnesota. He completed his bachelor of science degree at UW-River Falls in the spring of 1994 with a major in physical education and a minor in athletic coaching.

The Falcons will next compete in the Eau Claire Invitational on Saturday and Sunday. Action starts at 9 a.m. both days. Saturday's play will be at the Mill Run Golf Course and on Sunday the teams will play at the Wild Ridge Golf Course.

"I loved volleyball so much," Coughlin said. "It was an extremely hard decision, and to this day I wonder where I would be if I had chosen volleyball." Coughlin did not want to chose between the two sports, but found it necessary because of the stress level. Her first year, for example, was spent going to class all day, golf practice from 1-3 p.m., and then directly to volleyball practice until 6 p.m. After practice, she had to eat, do homework, and find some time to have a little fun.

Why did she choose golf? The answer is simple. She had more playing time in golf and the team was a lot closer since there were only six players. Coughlin did not just quite volleyball, however. She practiced and traveled with the team as much as she could. She loved to be around the sport and to help support the players. "Being able to say that I play college golf is a huge accomplishment, because not a lot of people can say they've played college golf."

In the spring semester of her junior year, Coughlin was on the Dean's List.  However, that is not the only award she has won in her lifetime. She has been on the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll for golf and volleyball, and she is the captain of the golf team this year.

Coughlin said, "I want to teach them [the younger players on the team] what Falcon athletics is all about, therefore I lead by example. I want them to carry on the same Falcon tradition, having good sportsmanship, perseverance, dedication, and commitment to a sport, which was taught to me."

Last year the Falcons finished third in the conference. "Being matched up against Eau Claire and Oshkosh for first place was an accomplishment because you know that your program had a successful year."

Motivation came to Coughlin mostly from her grandfather and brother. "They have pushed me to be the best that I can be and they always make sure I have the proper equipment. Not to forget, my parents and family are among my biggest supporters."

Coughlin was on the first Falcon golf team, and is the last one to be graduating from that team.  Berkhof said that since her first year on the team "she has improved her course management skills.  She thinks through what she needs to do a lot better and this has helped her a great deal"

Coughlin is unsure of her future. Her ultimate goal in life is to become an athletic administrator.  She hasn't decided yet if she is going to get a job teaching at an elementary school right after she graduates, or if she will pursue a master's degree.  If she decided to get her master's right away she is thinking about attending the University of St. Thomas or the University of Minnesota.

As to where Coughlin will end up living she doesn't know. "I love Two Harbors and Duluth, but right now if I were to predict where I will live in five years it would probably be somewhere in Wisconsin."

"Kara has been in the lineup for four straight years and has had a very good career at UWRF.  Not only will her score be missed, but also she's been great to have around and her very caring and sincere personality will be missed" Berkhof said.

Kelli Dahle played her first season of golf this year at UW-River Falls and although the golf season is over, practices are not over for her because she will also be playing for the Falcon hockey team this winter.

One of Dahle's teammates, Kara Coughlin, also juggled two sports her first year at UW-River Falls. Coughlin played golf and volleyball, which compete during the same season. "Kara has given me a lot of encouragement this year," said Dahle.

However, that's not what her grandpa wanted for her when she was growing up. "My grandpa was a big golfer and wanted be to quit hockey so that I could play golf." Her grandpa was not the only one who got her into the world of golf. Her neighbor took her to the driving range when she was very young, only five-years-old.

As a team, Dahle felt that the Falcons did well this season. However, she was not very satisfied with her individual scores. Her goal for next year's season is to "shoot consistently in the low 80s or 70s." She feels that driving and long irons are the best part of her game.

Dahle has many role models, but feels as if her high school coach, Jeff Nelson, is the most influential. "He understood the game so well and knows all the different rules. He knew every different shot and offered helpful ways to make my game top-notch."

Recently, there has been a lot of information about Michelle Wie in the news. She is a sixteen-year-old from Honolulu, Hawaii, who announced that she was going pro. Dahle said that she is a "phenomenal golfer. I respect her a lot for that."

Dahle. who is from Bemidji, Minn., hopes to continue playing golf throughout her life. "Golf is a sport that you can always play. I hope that I can continue it in the future and just have fun playing."

One of the most exciting moments in Dahle's golfing career was when she was a sophomore and junior in high school when her team went to state. In 2004, her junior year, everybody on her team thought that they had lost the tournament. Everybody on the team was crying, but she found out that they had actually won. "I counted up the scores again and found out that we won by two shots. I ran back to my team and told them and we were all happy."

Dahle is majoring in biology. Eventually, however, she wants to go to school for physical therapy. She might transfer to the University of North Dakota for that program, but is still unsure of what she will do. Her ultimate goal is to either work in pediatrics, sports medicine, or physical therapy.

Dahle was nominated as Falcon Golfer of the Week two weeks in a row this year. Her lowest round was 83 and her best tournament was 167, both came at the WIAC Championships held Oct. 1-2 at the Nemadji Golf Course in Superior. She was the team's top individual finisher and tied for 11th place oveall. The Falcons placed fifth of seven teams at the meet.

Sarah Carlson enters her final season for the Falcons in 2005. She has demonstrated uncanny offensive skills and will be one of the Falcon all-time leaders in goals, assists and points when her career ends. Carlson is one of the team’s captains this year. She enters the 2005 season with 28 goals and 19 assists in 39 career games. She is fourth all-time in goals and third all-time in assists. She always draws the opponents’ top defensive players in an effort to slow her down. She played her freshman season at UW-La Crosse.

Gina Hawkins returns for her senior season with the Falcons in 2005. She is one of the team’s captains this year. Hawkins will play defender. In 54 career games she has scored three goals and six assists. She has proved to be one of the top defenders in the WIAC.

Julie Shuldheisz returns for her fourth and final season for the Falcons and will play the midfield. She has been a steady performer throughout her career and will be looked upon to give the Falcons leadership throughout the season. She enters her final season with two goals and four assists for eight points.

Jessie Olsen returns for her fourth year with the Falcons and will play defender. She received a medical red-shirt in 2004 and has two years of eligibility remaining. She is one of the team’s captains this year.

High School, Personal: At Elk River High School she won the team’s Coaches Award and earned honorable mention to the all-conference team. Olsen was on the A Honor Roll and earned academic letters. Her hobbies include spending time with family and friends and being outdoors. Her role models include her parents and grandparents and people who are willing to work hard even when others don’t believe in them. Her favorite soccer moments are winning the 2003 WIAC Championship and road trips. She was named to the UW-RF Dean’s List after the spring 2004 semester. She is the daughter of Julie and Steve. Olsen is majoring in health & human performance.

Kim Saufl is in her first season with the Falcons and will play forward. She can also help the team by playing midfield. She played the last two seasons at Iowa Central Community College and attended UW-Green Bay last spring semester. She starts her junior season with the Falcons this fall.

High School, Personal: Dudley earned a Raider award at Park High School. Her hobbies include reading, playing cards, doing crossword puzzles and hanging out with friends. Her role models include her sister, Sonja, a former Falcon soccer player, and Briana Scurry. Her favorite soccer moment was getting her first collegiate shutout. Her high school coach was Greg Juba. She is the daughter of Deb and Caroll. Dudley is majoring in history secondary education.

High School, Personal: She was voted Champlin Park’s Most Dedicated player in 2003. She is the daughter of Linda and Jeff. Her role model is her sister, Kristin. Her hobbies include being with friends and family, playing soccer, rollerblading, going to the cabin and enjoying the outdoors. Her high school coach was Chris Osbourne. Pengra is majoring in marketing communications.

Maranda Simonet joins the Falcons for her first season of competition in 2005. She will play midfield but has the talent to also play forward. She attended the Minneapolis Community and Technical College last year.

Hannah Tvedt had a great first year for the Falcons in goal last year. She is a talented keeper who has shown the ability to make the big save whenever it’s needed. She uses her speed and quickness to cover the net.

High School, Personal: Tvedt earned four soccer letters at Byron High School. She was named to the all-conference team and was the team captain in 2001 and 2002. An outstanding all-around athlete, she earned three basketball and four softball letters. She was the captain of both teams and earned all-conference softball honors twice. Tvedt earned two academic letters and was a member of the Student Council for four years. She was a member of the National Honor Society. Her high school coach was Marc Stangler. Her hobbies include spending time with family and friends, being outdoors and being active. Her role models include her sister, Emily, her parents, her Aunt Marilyn and Teresa Weatherspoon. Her favorite soccer moments are long road trips and over night trips. She was named to the UW-RF Dean’s List after the 2005 spring semester. She is the daughter of Pam and Chuck. Tvedt is majoring in agriculture studies.

High School, Personal: She was named to the all-conference and all-tournament teams in 2004. She was the team’s captain and was a Will to Win Athlete award winner. In 2003 she was named her team’s Most Improved and earned honorable mention to the all-conference squad. She was also a captain of the track & field team. She is the daughter of Debra and Robert and they are her role models. Her favorite soccer moments were when Mounds View defeated Totino-Grace (5-0), for the first time in 11 seasons, and when her team beat White Bear Lake in the section finals. Her sister, Amy, is also a member of the Falcon soccer team. Her hobbies include fishing, camping, playing sports and being outdoors. Her high school coach was Sharon Swallen. Piersak is majoring in biology.

The following games are listed with the most recently played games first.  Only games that have been completed are shown.  The line score for each game is shown, followed by a list of reports that are available on-line.

After a scoreless first half, UW-EC scored twice in the second half to get the win and advance to the finals which will be played Saturday at 1 p.m. Eau Claire will play the winner of the Stout-Oshkosh match.

Falcon goalie Hannah Tvedt made a season high 13 saves in the match. She stopped six shots in the first half and seven in the second. Eau Claire goalies Liz Weirick and Allie Rivard each played a half and made one save each. Amy Jensen and Heather Morgan each had one shot on goal for the Falcons. Jensen had three total shots.

Amy Piersak scored from 30 yards out on a rebound from a corner kick with 1:27 to play in the second overtime to give the Falcons the victory, their second victory in a row over Stevens Point, after losing to the Pointers in all 15 meetings prior to this season.

Stevens Point dominated regulation with 16 shots, while limiting the Falcons to four. Goalkeeper Hannah Tvedt finished regulation with four saves. Conference points leader Sarah Carlson left the game in the first half with an injury but was able to return for the Falcons.

On Friday morning the Falcons travel to Eau Claire to face off against the conference regular season champion Blugolds. The Falcons were defeated by Eau Claire 1-0 on Oct. 4. The Falcons have reached the semifinals of the conference tournament for the fourth year in a row. The kickoff is set for 11 a.m. and will be followed by a matchup between UW-Oshkosh and UW-Stout at 2 p.m. also in Eau Claire.

The Falcons took the lead early, when Sperstad scored an unassisted goal at 5:29. The score remained tied throughout the first half, despite the Falcons dominance in shots. The Falcons finished the first half with 16 shots, with nine being on goal. The Cougars finished with one first half shot.

The Falcons took the lead early at 29:31 in the first half, when Sarah Carlson picked up her tenth assist of the season after getting passed her defender in the corner and crossing the ball to Betsy Straub, who headed it in for her second goal of the season.

The Falcons finished with 20 shots and 16 were on goal, while limiting Platteville to eight shots. Kelly Piersak led the Falcons with four shots on goal. The win was the first ever for Platteville against the Falcons.

The Falcons finished with 18 shots and 13 were on goal. Kim Saufl led the Falcons wtih three shots on goal. Falcon goalie Hannah Tvedt made nine saves including two in each of the overtime periods. SB goalie Amanda Broadbent made 13 saves - she had nine saves in the first half, two in the first overtime and one in the second overtime.

The game was very balanced with both teams having limited opportunities throughout. The Falcons had four first half shots, while limiting Eau Claire to two. In the second half the Falcons and the Blugolds each had three shots.

Sarah Carlson scored the winning goal at 84:19 from about 40' away on the right hand side of the box. She placed the ball just over the outstretched arm of Pointers goalie Amanda Nechuta and into the upper left corner of the goal. The goals are Carlson's 8th and 9th goals of the season. The Falcons were able to hold off Stevens Point for the last five minutes to secure victory.

At 33:16 in the first half Carlson scored the first goal of the game to give the Falcons an early 1-0 lead. Carlson headed the ball in after Betsy Straub sent in a corner that was originally headed by Kim Saufl. Straub and Saufl were credited with assists.

The Falcons and the Pointers each ended up with 14 shots on the game. The Falcons faired better in the second half, finishing with 11 shots while holding Stevens Point to seven second half shots. Carlson's goal was her second game winner of the season.

Goalkeeper Hannah Tvedt finished the game with four saves and collected her 9th win of the season. It was Nechuta's first collegiate start at goalkeeper. Nechuta was named 1st Team All-American in Division III for basketball last season.

The Falcons are now 3-1-0 in conference and are one point behind Oshkosh for the conference lead. The Falcons travel to Eau Claire on Tuesday to face off against the Blugolds. Kickoff is scheduled for 4 p.m.

Amy Jensen scored four goals and assisted on another, Sarah Carlson scored two goals and assisted on three others and Kelly Piersak scored a goal and also had three assists leading the Falcons past Superior.

Miranda Simonet scored her first career goal at 105:00 in double overtime to lift the Falcons over St. Thomas. Simonet put in a rebound off of a shot from Sarah Carlson in the upper left corner of the net. The Falcons improved their season record to 7-1-0.

The Falcons were outshot by St. Thomas in regulation time, taking 11 shots while allowing 16. In the two overtime sessions the Falcons outshot the Tommies eight to one. The Falcons had a chance to win in the first overtime, when Kim Saufl's shot was deflected off the cross bar by the Tommies goalkeeper. Amy Jensen headed the deflection off the post and the ball was cleared.

Freshman Diana Hermes scored a goal and assisted on another to help lead the Falcons passed the Norse of Luther College. Hermes scored the first goal of the game at 44:05 in the first half off a rebound of her own shot to give the Falcons a 1-0 lead at the half. Only minutes into the second half Midfielder Kim Saufl one-touched a corner kick from Julie Shuldheisz into the corner to give the Falcons a 2-0 lead. The Falcons scored again at 67:03 when Hermes found Sarah Carlson at the top of the box, Carlson used a couple touches to get passed a defender and nailed it right by the goalie to give the Falcons a 3-0 lead. At 83:46 Amy Jensen shot in a rebound from 35 feet to give the Falcons the 4-0 victory.

Julie Sperstad scored her first goal of the season at the most opportune time, giving the Falcons their first conference win. Sperstad placed a shot just past the outstreched arms of Whitewater keeper Aimee Kitson and in to the left corner of the goal at 88:33 in the second half to give the Falcons the win. The goal was assisted by Sarah Carlson.

In the second half the Falcons came out energized and focusued. The falcons dominated posession and finished with 18 second half shots while limiting Whitewater to three. Amy Jensen scored the first goal of the game at 69:56 with assists from Carlson and fresman Kelly Piersak. The Warhawks came back at 79:20 and took advantage of one of very few second half opportunities to tie the game 1-1, on a goal from sophomore Maggie Mitchell.

The Falcons started with a flourish, scoring two goals in the first six minutes of play. Junior Kim Saufl tapped in the first goal on a free kick cross from junior Ashley Peterson at 1:35 in the first half. Only four minutes later Sarah Carlson scored her fourth goal of the season heading in a corner kick from Peterson to give the Falcons an early 2-0 lead. The assists were Petersons first two points of the season. The Falcons continued to control posession for the early part of the first half, but gained a false sense of security and began to lose energy as the half wore on. At 37:39 Oshkosh forward Melodie Romanowich tipped in a cross past Falcon keeper Hannah Tvedt to bring the score to 2-1. The Falcons finished the first half with 11 shots and Oshkosh had ten.

In the second half the Falcons had chances, but Oshkosh remained in control, despite the early deficit. The Titans tied the game at 64:12 when junior Amy U'Ren scored on a cross from Amanda Matzke. Oshkosh finished their comeback 11 minutes later when senior Stacy Stroud headed in a cross from Katy Werginz, giving the Titans a 3-2 lead. The regained energy in the last 15 minutes but were unable to tie the game.

The Falcons soccer team defeated St. Scholastica 5-0 Sunday afternoon in an impressive fashion. Sarah Carlson scored at 14:01 in the first half on a cross from midfielder Amy Jensen and than once again at 19:32 on a rebound off of a shot from Julie Sperstad that had hit the cross bar. The two goals were Carlson's second and third of the season. The Falcons entered the second half with a 2-0 lead.

Only moments into the second half Jensen scored on a free kick to give the Falcons a 3-0 lead, it was her second goal of the season. At 72:10 freshman Kelly Piersak scored her third goal of the season off a corner kick that was assisted by Calson. As the second half wound down the Falcons sent in their bench without losing any success. At 83:11 freshman Betsy Straub scored her first career goal on an assist from Jen Pengra, giving the Falcons their final goal of the game. The Falcons finished with 29 shots on goal and limited St. Scholastica to only eight. Goalkeeper Hannah Tvedt had two saves and finished with her third shutout of the season.

The second half was balanced as well, but River Falls was able to put on a bit more pressure than they had in the first. The Falcons finished with ten shots, including five on goal, while the Oles had only six shots, putting one on goal. At 64:35 in the second half Freshman Kelly Piersak scored on assists from Sarah Carlson and Gina Hawkins giving the Falcons the 1-0 lead and ultimately the win. It was Piersak's second goal of the season. The assist was Carlson's third of the season, leading the team. It was Hawkins first assist of the year. Shortly after the goal, St. Olaf put on a short fury of shots including two that hit the cross bar and came out. The Falcons were than able to hold on for the last twenty minutes to secure the victory.

Four Falcons scored goals in the contest that was played in rain during the second half. Amy Piersak opened the scoring with her first goal of the season at 8:57. She scored from about 30 yards out. Amy Jensen gave the Falcons a 2-0 lead at 18:39 when she scored from 30 feet out on a shot with her left foot. It was her first goal of the season. Sarah Carlson scored the third RF goal at 20:16. She scored from 20 feet away from the left side. She received pass from Kelly Piersak who picked up the assist on the play. It was Carleson's first goal of the year. Kim Saufl scored the fourth goal of the game, and her second of the year, at 34:43. She scored from 25 feet out and was assisted by Carlson.

Hannah Tvedt started in goal and made two saves to get the win. Andrea Dudley played the last 20 minutes and made one save to help preserve the shutout. The Falcons had 17 shots in the game. Bethel finished with 10 shots.

Offense: Diana Hermes (Fr., Prior Lake, Minn.) came on strong this week at the forward position. She scored a goal and assisted on another in the Falcons 4-0 victory over Luther College on Wednesday afternoon. Hermes scored the first goal of the game off of a rebound of her own shot and later assisted on a goal by Sarah Carlson. "She's coming out and making an impact," Falcon Coach Sean McKuras said.

Check-in will take place from 3-5 p.m. at Hathorne Hall. All players will move into the Hathorne Hall during this time period. A room and roommate will be assigned upon arrival. You will also receive an itinerary upon check-in with final details on the pre-season schedule.

A mandatory athletic meeting has been scheduled for 5:30 p.m. and will take place in Karges 124. Players will stay in the residence hall until Aug. 29th. At that point players with housing contracts will move into their regular residence hall from 7-9 p.m. While staying at Hathorne Hall, lunch and dinner will be provided by the University. However, players will be responsible for their own breakfast. For your convenience, a refrigerator is provided in each room.

On Aug. 29th players will move into their permanent housing for the 2005 academic year either on or off campus. A fee of $90 is due at check-in. Checks should be made out to UW-RF to cover lodging and meals. During pre-season there will be team-building events during the evening.

Thirteen returning letter winners will meet Coach Sean McKuras for the first practice on Aug. 21. The Falcons have a solid balance of players back in goal, on defense, in the midfield and up front. "We are very excited about the coming season," said McKuras. We are returning some veteran players. In addition, we are bringing in some talented freshmen and a transfer who will strengthen the team. Our strength is the team aspect - meaning no one gets left behind."

Not a bad strategy on their part when you look at her stats. Last season Carlson scored four goals and six assists in a 14-0 win. Those achievements make Carlson No. 1 in the country for NCAA Div. III for most goals scored in a single game, and most assists in a game.

On the field Carlson's skills are sure to impress anyone. She's impressed her teammates, which was evident when the team won the WIAC title in 2003 and they awarded her the team's Most Valuable Offensive Player of the Year award. It was Carlson's first year wearing a Falcon jersey. Again, as a junior in 2004, she was the team's Most Valuable Offensive player. Three times each season she was their offensive Player of the Week. They voted her as a co-captain for her final season.

People from out of state are even noticing her. A Twin Cities newspaper featured Carlson with a photo as a player to watch out for. At a University when the biggest and most prominent athletic news is often the NFL's Kansas City Chiefs, this is something for her and the University to be proud of.

Typically college students are notorious for doing anything they can to sleep and get out of going class, so soccer would be a good excuse not to go to class. Carlson is not one of those typical college students. Being a student-athlete requires free time to be spent very wisely; she works to see the positive aspect.

"She's driven," McKuras said. "[Carlson is] one of the first at practice and one of the last to leave." She simply knows what it is she needs to get done when it comes to work and school and does it. She sees no other option, he said.

She does admit that sometimes it is hard to miss social events, but it is easier now in college than it was in high school. Also, at one point it was hard to make the decision to give up other sports to focus on soccer. However, she doesn't regret ever choosing soccer.

Through being involved in soccer she has learned more than just athletic skills. Carlson has learned things that she can apply to her future professional life working with young children using her communicative disorders major.

Being co-captain has also given her leadership skills. Carlson is responsible to help organize activities and, more importantly she adds, keep spirits up and get everyone going before games and practices.

McKuras said he can see that she is the type of player that her teammates want to emulate, and agrees with Olsen that she is a role model. Yet at the same time she's "one of the most humble athletes" he has coached.

Her teammates have the same expectations of her. Hawkins said that Carlson's leadership method of example, when she does say something to a teammate, they know that she wouldn't suggest it if she couldn't do the same thing.

Hawkins said that Carlson somehow manages to manipulate her small 5-foot, 3-inch body, and do what she wants the ball to do. She said she wasn't a flashy or forceful player, but can use light touches to tap the ball just around the goalie.

Hawkins described Carlson as consistent, and that she knows the team will miss that next year. McKuras agrees. "She's the complete package when it comes to a player," he said. "You can't replace it, fill it in, maybe, but not replace."

She wants to travel to Europe before getting a full time job. Either that or go on to graduate school and get her Masters degree to later teach in an elementary school. She said she's not exactly sure what's going to be next academically.

As a senior for the Falcons women's soccer team Gina Hawkins has been through a lot on the field. She has been on a conference championship team, started every game for two consecutive seasons and been a captain in this, her senior year.

She recalls most of the good times in her youth being on the family farm and showing cattle at the state fair with her family. When she was younger and her parents wanted Hawkins and her siblings to go outside and get some fresh air, they were told to spend time with each other. She used her time outside a little differently than most kids would, "We used to have manure fights. We'd just chuck it at each other!" she said.

Hawkins loves that soccer is a team sport. "It's awesome to work with a bunch of people and have a common goal," she said. She says she will miss "being a part of a team, with that many people working together on something."

At the end of this school year Hawkins will graduate from UW-River Falls, but she has learned quite a bit outside of the classroom and off the soccer field that she will take with her forever. "I've learned how to use my gifts to the best of my ability," she said.

"From the look of our record one would be compelled to say that we had a bad season, however if you look deeply into the teams we played and competed against, I would say we didn't lose to anyone that we shouldn't have," said Falcon Coach Patti Ford. The Falcons played 12 regionally ranked and 10 nationally ranked teams in 2005. Five of those nationally ranked teams were from the WIAC. Four WIAC teams received berths into the NCAA Div. III national tournament.

The Falcons started their season with a very back and forth record. In both the Elmhurst and Illinois Wesleyan tournaments they left with records of 2-2 so it was difficult to say what this Falcon team would do. "Our schedule was tough, we played many talented teams and competed well," said Ford.

The Falcons had a hard time on the road this season in WIAC play, finishing undefeated at home, but losing all of their road matches. They started their conference season with two losses, the first at UW-Platteville in three games then at UW-La Crosse after a long fought battle in five games. They re-grouped in time to take on UW-Stout for their first home conference match, where they marked their first WIAC win in three games. They suffered two more road losses when they fell to UW-Superior in five games, and to UW-Whitewater in four. Their second win came from their second home match against UW-Stevens Point defeating them in three games for Parents and Seniors Day. Their final conference loss came at UW-Eau Claire where they fell in three games.

Ford is optimistic about her team's future. "This team will be prepared for what lies ahead of them for the 2006 season. The lessons learned from this season will not have an ending until they begin to prepare for the next season. We have all the tools to be a top team in the always tough WIAC."  The Falcons return every starter from this year's team and will have eight seniors on the roster.

Barbie Soine returns for her second and senior season with the Falcons. She can play both the setter and libero positions. "Barbie will position herself to help as a defensive specialist. She is a very good athlete with great depth for the game. She will help the team get out of tough situations as a passing and defensive specialist," Coach Patti Ford said.

Andrea Geehan will play an important role with the Falcons again in 2005 at the middle hitter position. "Andrea is an essential ingredient in the line up. She will be one of the team's biggest offensive threats and her physical presence will be a plus," Coach Patti Ford said.

North Branch High SchoolTressa Gustafson is in her third year with the Falcons and plays outside hitter. "As one of the top reserves in 2004, Tressa's role will increase as she has all the offensive and defensive skills to become one of the top outside hitters for the Falcons. She is a solid ball-control player who will do a majority of the passing this season," Coach Patti Ford said.

Kat Krtnick is a talented player whose versatility and skills make her one of the top players in the WIAC. She will play both the setter and outside hitter spots for the Falcons. "Kat's talents and versatility make her one of the top players in the WIAC. She loves the game and that's one of the reasons she is so successful. All around the court she doesn't have a weakness and is only getting better," Coach Patti Ford said.

Lindsey Mace returns for the 2005 season as the team's starter at the libero position. "Lindsey will be an impact back row player for the Falcons. As the season rolls on, she will not miss a beat. The experience she gained in the 2004 season will keep the Falcons on path to compete at a high level in 2005," Coach Patti Ford said.

Callie Bjelland-Olson is a junior academically, but is in her first year with the Falcon volleyball program. She plays setter. She played two seasons at NCAA Div. II Washburn University. "Calllie is a quality setter with great instincts for the game and has played against some of the best when it comes to her experience at Div. II. She will add immediate depth to the Falcons at the setter spot. Her talents allow the Falcons to change the offensive system in any match," Coach Patti Ford said.

Kate Thompson returns for her third season with the Falcons and will once again play a key role for the team with her play as an outside hitter. She has been one of the team's top players and has shown the talents to be one of the best outside hitters in the WIAC. "Kate is an explosive jumper with a tremendous desire to succeed. A fierce competitor, she has come a long way and there is no doubt that she is one of the top outside hitters in the WIAC. She will once again play a key role for us in 2005," Coach Patti Ford said.

Molly Thompson is a two year letter winner and returns for her third year with the Falcons. She plays the right side hitting spot. "With Molly in the line up the Falcons will have a very balanced attack. She is a fundamentally sound player with the ability to play several roles. She is the type of player who has the skill and ability to dominate the offense as an outside or right side hitter," said Coach Patti Ford.

Krista Vandenberg is in her third year with the Falcons and plays the middle hitter spot. "Krista  has come a long way throughout her career.  She will be relied upon to add depth to the middle hitting position.  She has a great physical stature and has worked hard in the off-season to develop strength and quickness. As she progresses so will the strength of the Falcon middle hitters. The Falcons look for her to come in off the bench and give the opponents another look," said Coach Patti Ford.

High School & Personal: Vandenberg earned three letters in volleyball at Kimberly High School. Her hobbies include traveling and spending time with family and friends. Her high school coach was Jeff VanLannen. She is the daughter of LuAnn and Gary. Vandenberg is majoring in marketing communications with a coaching minor.

Vanessa Zamzow is in her third year with the Falcons and plays the libero position. She is one of the team's captains. "Vanessa is the essence of "team player." She has been a member of the Falcon volleyball team for the past three seasons and though her court time has been minimal, she has made an impact for all around her.  She enters the gym with a great disposition and desire and it will pay enormous dividends for all who encounter her.  Her leadership skills are beyond top-notch. Everything we teach about athletics Vanessa embodies.  Look for her to expand her contributions to one on the court as the season progresses," said Coach Patti Ford.

Krista Cordes joins the Falcons for her first year of play and will play he right side hitter position. "Krista  joins the Falcons for her first year of play. She is a quality athlete and it showed from the beginning of pre-season practice.  After being away from competitive volleyball for two years Krista has made a tremendous comeback to the sport.  The early indication is that Krista is in a position to compete with the Falcons at the highest level.  She is an excellent jumper with tremendous desire to succeed," said Coach Patti Ford.

Susie Ingalls returns for her second year with the Falcons and plays the middle hitting position. "Susie is another good athlete with a good work ethic and when you put those together she's going to develop into a key player for the Falcons. Susie has come a long way throughout her first season; she came into the Falcon volleyball program and picked up on the skills needed to become a dominant Falcon middle.  The sophomore will be thrust into the Falcon line-up and will add much needed physical presence at the net," Coach Patti Ford said.

Diana Rogers is in her second year with the Falcons and plays the right side hitting position. "Diana has come a long way throughout her tenure at UW-RF. She is a solid athlete who has worked extremely hard during the off-season. She is fundamentally sound and is capable of playing several roles for the Falcons. She is constantly working to improve the finer areas of the passing and defensive game. Her work ethic brings the level of competition up and makes the players around her play harder and better.  Look for Diana to help the Falcons out during tough defensive situations," Coach Patti Ford said.

Krista Russell is in her second year with the Falcon volleyball program and plays the right side hitting spot. "Krista  will be called upon to add depth to the right side hitting position.  She has great instincts for the game.  She is a physically strong player and will help the Falcons as she gains more experience and confidence in her game," Coach Patti Ford said.

Courtney Schroeder is in her second season with the Falcons. She plays the outside hitter position. "Courtney is a hard-working athlete who has transformed into a reliable outside hitter. She has come a long way since her first year and there is no doubt that she can give the Falcons valuable minutes at either the outside hitter or defensive positions," said Falcon Coach Patti Ford.

High School & Personal: Schroeder was named to the all-conference team in 2002 and 2003 while playing at Byron High School. She also earned honorable mention to the all-conference team in 2001. Schroeder also competed in track & field and was named to the all-conference team for five straight seasons. She earned All-State honors in 2003. She also was an academic award winner for four years. Her hobbies include playing volleyball and spending time with family and friends. Her high school coach was Jane Krier. She is the daughter of Cindy and Gene. Schroeder is majoring in elementary education with health and coaching minors.

Kacey Barrett is in her first year with the Falcons and plays the middle hitter spot. "Kacey will add depth and talent at the middle hitter spot. She will be a big surprise to a lot of people. The Falcons look to see her come in and see some time in the front row as she learns the fast transition to the collegiate game," said Falcon Coach Patti Ford.

High School & Personal: Barrett was named to the all-conference team in 2004 and earned honorable mention honors in 2003 at Fridley High School. She also participated in basketball and track & field. She earned all-conference honorable mention recognition and was the team's Most Valuable Senior award in basketball. She was named to the all-conference track & field team for three straight seasons. Barrett was the vice president of the German Club. Her hobbies include drawing and painting, watching movies and hanging out with friends. Her high school coach was Ron Kuntz. She is the daughter of Laurie and Terry. Barrett is majoring in German and art.

Nina Cooper joins the Falcons for her first year of collegiate volleyball and plays outside hitter. "Nina has great instincts for the game.  She is a very good all-around athlete.  She will continue to get better every time she enters the gym.  Look for Nina to develop into a solid outside hitter for the Falcons," Coach Patti Ford said.

High School & Personal: Hample was named Mahtomedi's Best Defensive Player in 2002 and earned all-conference honorable mention honors in 2003. The talented athlete also played basketball and softball. She was the school's Outstanding Senior Athlete in basketball and earned all-conference honorable mention honors. She won the team's Gold Glove Award twice. She was also the cross country team's Hardest Worker in 2004. Hample won the Legion Honor Award for Excellence in Athletics in after her senior season. She was an Academic Honor Student for three years and earned Academic High Honors in 2005. Her hobbies include listening to music, reading and working with children. Her high school coach was Jill Holmstrom. She is the daughter of Patricia and Dirk. Hample is majoring in elementary education with a health education minor.

Abiliene Koch is in her first year with the Falcon volleyball program and plays outside hitter. "Abiliene is an outstanding athlete.  She is a great addition to the Falcon volleyball team.  She is a hard-working competitor who will develop into a reliable outside hitter for the Falcons," Coach Patti Ford said.

Kerissa Morrin starts her first year of collegiate volleyball with the Falcons and plays the outside hitting spot. "Kerissa has all the skills mentally and physically to contribute to the Falcon line-up.  The coach's daughter has been around the game of volleyball her entire life.  Kerissa knows how to be successful.  She has great savvy for the game and amazing ball control which will help her gain court time as a first year player," Coach Patti Ford said.

Shelby Sand is in her first season with the Falcon volleyball program and plays middle hitter. "Shelby  will play an immediate role for the Falcons either in the middle or right-side.  She will add some much needed depth and experience to the Falcon line-up.  She could position herself to become one of the starting middles.  Shelby has play with some of the best when it comes to her club experience with Minnesota One," Coach Patti Ford said.

High School & Personal: Sand helped lead Andover High School to a fourth place finish in the Minnesota State Tournament in 2004. She was voted the team's Most Committed and Big Kill awards winners. She earned all-conference honorable mention twice. Sand was a member of the National Honor Society for two years and earned two academic letters. Her hobbies include music, painting and drawing. Her high school coach was Connie Huberty. She is the daughter of Rhondda and Greg. Sand is majoring in art.

In their first match against St. Thomas, the Falcons made 16 kills and five errors. Libero player Lindsey Mace served the final nine straight points to win it 30-21. The second game was a close battle and despite the Falcons making 19 kills and only three errors St. Thomas pulled out a 28-30 victory. The Falcons went on an eight point streak early in the third game and went for another straight six towards the end winning that game 30-24. They had 16 kills and eight errors. The fourth game was another tough battle, but the Falcons played consistent winning that game 30-22. They had 15 kills and four errors. Andrea Geehan and Kate Thompson tied as the kill leaders with 22, and Kat Krtnick had an amazing 56 assists and she led in digs with 18.

The Trick or Treat Tournament ends the Falcons regular season games. They will play their first game of the WIAC Tournaments on Tuesday at 7 p.m. where they will play against number one ranked UW-Whitewater on their home court.

Against Bethel, the first game was tough with each team going point for point. They made 14 kills and five errors. In the second game, Bethel got out to an early lead with an eight point streak, which the Falcons never recovered from. They had 12 kills and nine errors. The third game saw a spark from the Falcons as they battled to an early 10-4 lead, but a ten point streak from Bethel put them both neck and neck. Vanessa Zamzow put the Falcons ahead 20-19 with an ace serve, but Bethel came back and won 30-28. The Falcons made 16 kills and had three errors. Kate Thompson led in kills with 13 and Kat Krtnick led in assists with 28. Lindsey Mace led in digs.

In their second match against Northwestern, the Falcons came out strong making 17 kills and five errors in the first game. In the second they made 15 kills and had four errors, and in the third they made 17 kills and only three errors. Kate Thompson led in blocks again with 17, and Kat Krtnick was the assist leader with 35 and the dig leader with 12.

The Falcons played consistent throughout the match making 12 kills in the first game, 13 in the second, and 11 in the third. Unfortunately they were also consistent in their errors making 9 in the first and third game and 7 in the second.

The first game was a real battle as both teams competed hard for every point, but a six point streak from the Falcons gave them the final push they needed in the end to win 30-26. The falcons make 11 kills and had seven errors with a .089 hitting percentage. The second game was all Falcons when they made a ten point ralley in the middle of the game leaving the Pointers little chance of coming back. They made six kills and six errors that game. The third was another big game for the Falcons as they made another ten point ralley in the middle to quickly defeat the Pointers 30-17. They made 10 kills, four errors and had a .158 hitting percentage.

In the first game, the Falcons had 15 kills, but made seven errors, and had a .151 hitting average. The second game was not better with 12 kills and for a .083 hitting percentage. The best effort came in the final game when the Falcons had 15 kills and a .208 hitting percentage.

Leading the Falcons in kills was middle hitter Andrea Geehan with 14. Kat Krtnick had the highest hitting percentage with .444, she also led in assists with 29 and in digs with 17. Kate Thompson had three serving aces.

The Falcons play at the Eau Claire Siegenthaler Memorial Tourney on Friday. Their first match is against Millikin at 6 p.m. and their second is against Stevens Point and that begins at 8 p.m. On Saturday they play Stout at 1p.m. and Eau Claire at 3 p.m.

Kate Thompson led in kills with eight and her twin sister Molly was right behind her with seven. Kat Krtnick had a total of 22 assists and Lindey Mace made the most digs with 16. Molly Thompson was a close second wth 15 digs.

Outside hitter Kate Thompson was named to the all-tournament team. She led the Falcons with 59 kills. She finished the tourney with a .199 hitting percentage. She also led the team with 10 service aces and she had 35 digs.

Outside hitter Kate Thompson (Jr., Forest Lake, Minn.) was one of the team's top players in three matches last week. "Kate did a great job in the front row and also helped us with her defensive skills," said Falcon Coach Patti Ford. In the team's first match at UW-Superior, Thompson led the Falcons with 20 kills and led the Falcons with a .333 hitting percentage. She also had the most serving aces with four, led the Falcons with two solo and one block assist and was second in digs with 14. In the team's home match against UW-Stevens Point she led her team in kills again with 17 and had the team's highest hitting percentage with .533.  She was also second in digs with 11. In eight games she averaged 4.62 kills per game and had a .420 hitting percentage.

Middle hitter Andrea Geehan (Jr., St. Paul, Minn. Como Park HS) played another amazing week of volleyball making this her second time being named the Player of the Week. She led the Falcons in kills against UW-Oshkosh with 14 and had a hitting percentage of .270.  She also had three digs and two block assists. Against UW-Whitewater, she led again in kills with 19 and had the highest hitting percentage with .405.  She also helped her team with one assist, five digs, and four block assists. Falcon Coach Patti Ford said, "Andrea is really developing into a great player. She helps her team by making the opponent think about where she's going to put the ball and takes a lot of pressure off her teammates."

Setter/outside hitter Kat Krtnick (Jr., Fridley, Minn.) played a tough weekend of volleyball.  Against UW-Platteville she led her team in assist with 22 and really showed her flexibility as a player when she switched from setter to hitter against La Crosse.  "She made great attempts in the hitter role and really worked hard," said Falcon Coach Patti Ford. In the match against La Crosse she had 36 assists and 10 kills. In the two matches she played eight games and had 10 kills. She finished with 58 assists, six aces, 31 digs and one block assist.

The following matches are listed with the most recently played matches first.  Only matches that have been completed are shown.  The line score for each match is shown, followed by a list of reports that are available on-line.

"We did lose three seniors who had significant playing time," said Falcon Coach Patti Ford about the loss of outside hitters Nina Petersen and Logan Kiesch and middle hitter Gina Anderson. "That will certainly change our look. But with our returning players we are in good shape to be successful. The returning players' experience will pay off this year. We will rely heavily on our returnees to fill any voids and work our newcomers in as the season onfolds."

She started playing volleyball when she was in fifth grade. "I started playing through school and thought it would be fun and a great way to meet people. I love it for the competitiveness and being with friends," says Soine.

This is her second year with the UW-RF volleyball team. She started her college volleyball career at Southwest State which is a NCAA Div. II institution. "It was a lot more intense," according to Soine.  For her second year, she played at Ridgewater Community College. "Playing with the Falcons is in the middle and it's perfect for me."

Last year she played in 32 games and had nine kills, five assists, and 45 digs. She plays the setter or libero position. "Barb provides this team with a lot of energy.  She is a great team player and she provides a stable role model for many to follow," said Falcon Coach Patti Ford.

In the future she would like to coach volleyball. "Barb has all the personable skills to become a good coach. She is well versed in many sports - playing volleyball and running track at the collegiate level will certainly help her relate to athletes."  Soine is majoring in health and human performance and is returning next year to complete a second minor in business.

Along with being a volleyball player, Soine is also a member for the Falcon track & field team. During the outdoor season, she competes in the 100 and 200-meter dashes and does 100-meter hurdles, relays, long jump and triple jump. In the indoor season she competes in the 55, 200 and 400-meter dashes, the 55-meter hurdles, the triple jump and the long jump. "I do miss a little of the spring volleyball, but competing in both track and volleyball works out well," said Soine.

Soine says that she doesn't get stressed because competing is a huge stress reliever for her. Her advice to anyone thinking of taking on her kind of workload is to manage time, get lots of sleep, and prepare to meet a lot of people.

She was her junior high school team's running back in football and she loved it.  "I was a total tomboy and I loved to play football, but my Mom made me quit when I got hurt," said Zamzow. She had to decide between playing volleyball or swimming and she chose volleyball even though she had never played the game before in her life.

That decision has made all the difference in her high school career as she developed into a stand out player. She was named team captain and earned all-conference honorable mention in 2001 while playing at Park Center High School. She was also named to the Sun-Post All-Region team. During her high school years, she also competed in track & field and basketball. She earned all-conference honors three times in track & field. She was the captain of the basketball team and was named the team's Outstanding Senior in 2002.

Zamzow's enthusiasm in high school stretched beyond athletics. She was also a member of the National Honor Society and earned a Triple 'A' Award for excellence in arts, athletics and academics. She also earned the Star Community Award.

That ambition has spread into her college years. Besides being a member of Student Athletic Advisory Committee and playing intramural basketball and softball she was named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll for the second straight year.

"The many lessons that athletics can teach such as hard work, team cohesion, commitment and working towards a common goal Vanessa lives every day whether it has been on the court, classroom orwith her community service activities," said Falcon Coach Patti Ford.

Zamzow has spent four years with the Falcons. During her freshman year, she red-shirted, giving her junior eligibility this year though she will graduate this spring with a major in elementary education and a minor in math. "I would like to teach middle school math," said Zamzow and Ford thinks she'll be good at it. "She is going to do great things as she enters her professional career as an elementary teacher."

Her busy schedule and commitment to excellence have left little her little free time, but you won't find her complaining. "Meeting people and playing volleyball is great. I just take things on a day to day basis and try and keep my priorities in order."

The Falcon volleyball team has three juniors that make up the key group of returning players for this season. All three won post-season honors last year earning honorable mention to the 2004 All-WIAC team.

Thompson will be working the outside hitting spot to improve on the 307 kills she had last season. With an average of 3.34 a game she looks to mark up the scoreboard as much as possible this year. She had 36 aces, the fourth highest on the team, and 244 digs with 13 assists. She finished with five solo and 22 total blocks.

With the Falcons predicted to finish third this season in the WIAC the pressure is definitely on. With a rugged WIAC schedule to come the Falcons will be looking to these three players to help them achieve all of the team's goals.

Middle hitter Kiah Sagami and outside hitters Molly Thompson and Tressa Gustafson also return and hope to fill in for the loss of three seniors who covered a lot of playing time last year. In addition, Krista Vandenberg, Vanessa Zamzow and transfer Callie Olson look to add depth to the Falcon lineup.

Mace returns to the Falcon line up as the team’s top libero. She played in 133 games last year and led the team with 523 digs. She sees the large return of players as a key to winning. She sees her role on the team as picking everybody up and keeping the energy level high. “One huge strength is that most of us have played together for a while now and we should know how we think and play. My personal goal would have to be to pass every ball perfect and not let a ball hit the floor.” said Mace.

Another middle, Vandenberg, played a minimal role in games during the 2004 season, but was named the team’s Most Improved Player. The Falcons will look for her to continue to improve and compete for more extensive playing time as the season progresses.

Out of the seven freshmen, one player in particular is standing out. Middle hitter Shelby Sand will be looked to help fill in that position along with Andrea Geehan. “Sand can become an impact player for the Flacons. She has a quality background from helping her Andover team get to state in 2003 and playing for one of the top clubs in Minnesota,” said Ford.

A trio of freshmen outside hitters, Abiliene Koch, Kerissa Morrin and Nina Cooper, will add depth of the passing and defensive end of the game. All are good competitors with solid high school credentials. Morrin helped her high school team to the WIAA State Championship in 2001 and a runner up finish in 2003.

Newcomer, Krista Cordes joins the Falcons after a brief sabbatical from volleyball, but she is not unfamiliar with the WIAC and it’s competition. She is a hard working athlete who is also competes on the Falcon basketball team.

Callie Olson joins the team and adds immediate depth to the setters. She is a transfer from NCAA Div. II Washburn University. Her experience at the Div. II level will benefit the Falcons. She has been trained and played against some of the top Div. II teams.

O’Grady is a firm believer in education and helps all UW-RF students in pursuit of collegiate degrees. In his career as head coach, 166 of 167 Falcon football players, who have completed four seasons of eligibility, have earned undergraduate degrees. Several have gone on to highly successful careers in education, coaching, business.

O’Grady is well known as a speaker and clinician throughout the midwest. He has spoken at the Wisconsin Football Coaches Association spring clinic several times and has addressed participants at the Indiana Wishbone Coaches Association clinic. He has been invited to give clinics in Wisconsin, Illinois, Pennsylvania, Indiana and Minnesota. For the past 15 years he has worked with former Falcon football player and teammate, Darryl Herrick, at a football clinic in Gilman, Wis. The clinic was established by Herrick, who is the superintendent of the Cedarburg school district, in memory of a nephew who was killed in a hunting accident.

Kevin Bullis is entering his 10th year with the Falcons as the club's defensive coordinator. He has helped the Falcons become one of the top defensive teams in the WIAC. His main responsibility is with the defensive linemen.

Anderson was named to the first offensive team and Retzlaff to the first defensive unit. Cassellius was named to the second defensive team, Cook earned honorable mention to the offensive team and Jordan earned honorable mention to the defensive unit.

Cassellius, a 6-5, 225 pound defensive end, was one of the team's top pass rushers. He started and played in nine games and finished the year with 17 solo and 30 total tackles. He tied for the team lead in sacks with 3.5 and tied for the team lead in tackles for loss with six. He was second for the Falcons in passes broken up (3) and he led the Falcons in quarterback hurries (9). Cassellius twice had six tackles in a game - against Pacific Lutheran (4-2) and Platteville (3-3). He had three quarterback hurries against Platteville. He was named the team's Defensive Player of the Week for his game against Bemidji.

Personal: At DeSoto High School he was named to the all-conference team as an offensive and defensive tackle as a senior. Also named to the All-Region team as an offensive tackle. He was a team captain as a senior. He is the son of Curtis. His high school coach was Milt Hendrickson. He is majoring in culinary management.

Personal: Acosta played at Waconia High School before attending UWRF. He was a two-year starter on defense and was named to the all-conference team. He was voted his team’s Defensive MVP. An all-around athlete, he was the captain of the basketball and baseball teams. He is the son of Mary and Mike. His high school coach was Pat Foley. He is majoring in marketing communications and worked as a marketing intern for the Kansas City Chiefs Summer Training Camp in 2004. He worked the 2005 camp as an assistant in the Chiefs equipment department as a ball boy.

Personal: At Green Bay East high School he was named to the all-conference team as a kicker and earned honorable mention as a cornerback. He is the son of Gloria and Lloyd. His high school coach was John Kolstad. He is majoring in conservation.

Personal: At Stillwater High School, he earned two letters in football. He graduated with academic honors. He is the son of Anne and Dan. His high school coach was Scott Hoffman. He is majoring in business management.

Personal: Cassellius was a three-sport athlete at Glenwood City High School. He was named to the all-conference football team as a defensive end and tight end as a senior. He also earned All-Region and All-Sate honorable mention honors as a defensive end. In track & field he won the 2001 conference discus championship and placed second in the shot. He competed in the WIAA state meet in both events. He placed second in the shot at the conference meet in 2000. Also played with the basketball team that won WIAA State Championship. He was a member of the Future Business Leaders of America for four years and a member of the Student Council for two years. He is the son of Joan and John. His high school coach was Phil Ottney. He is majoring in health & human performance.

Personal: Hofdahl played at Owatonna High School and was named his team’s Lineman of the Year in 2003. He earned all-conference honors as an offensive lineman. He was also the captain of the school’s swimming team. The swim team was the 2002 academic state champion. He is the son of Kim Zago and Dennis. His high school coach was Jeff Williams. He is majoring in physics.

Personal: At River Falls High School he was a football team captain as a senior. He earned All-State recognition with the strong Wildcat wrestling program. He is the son of Sue and Roger. His high school coach was Bill Forester. He is majoring in health & human performance.

Personal: At Barron High school he was the captain of both the football and hockey teams. He was named to the second all-conference team as a senior after earning honorable mention as a junior. He won the Coaches Choice award in hockey and also played baseball. He was the FFA president, the senior class vice president, a member of the Student Senate and a member of the senior band and choir organizations. He has been named to the UW-RF Dean’s List and earned a CAFES scholarship. He is the son of Lynn and Keith. His high school coach was Ken Mueller. He is majoring in biology.

Personal: At Maple-Northwestern High School he was named to the first all-conference team as a punter and won the team’s Coaches Award. He also earned all-conference honors three times in baseball. He was the school’s commencement speaker and a senior class officer. He graduated third of 115 students academically. He has been named to the UWRF Dean’s List in every semester. He is the son of Carole and Gerald. His high school coach was Ray Kosey. He is majoring in English education.

Personal: Also a member of the Falcon track & field team – he has competed at the WIAC Meet in the 100-meter dash and as a member of the 4x100 and 4x200 relay teams. At Alma Center Lincoln High School he was named to the all-conference team as a linebacker when he led the team in tackles. He was also a team captain. An all-around athlete, Nelson earned all-conference honors for four straight years in three events in track & field and also in baseball. In his senior season in baseball he led the team in steals and batting average. He was the track team’s captain in his junior and senior seasons. He holds the school record for most points in a season. Nelson was his school’s Athlete of the Year and was named to the academic all-conference team. He was a member of the student council, DARE, a business club officer and a representative to Badger Boys State. He is the son of Judy DeJong and Don Nelson. His high school coach was Craig McIntosh. He is majoring in health & human performance.

The Warhawks got on the board first in the scond quarter on another Jacobs touchdown run this time from 13-yards out to make the score 20-0. RF finally got on the bored late in the first half on an 11-yard Jeremy Wolff to Dave Affeldt pass. Affeldt ran in the two point conversion to make it a 20-8 game. The drive covered 80 yards in 15 plays.

In the third quarter, UWW started strong. Justin Beaver got in the act with a four-yard touchdown run. Derek Stanley caught the two point conversion pass to make it a 28-8 game. The drive covered 52 yards in three plays. Later in the third quarter RF got on the board again this time by Nathan Anderson who ran it in from two-yards out. Affeldt's two point conversion run was good to make the score 28-16 UWW. The drive covered 75 yards in 17 plays.

RF was led by Anderson's 98 yards rushing and one touchdown. Wolff chipped in with 66 yards running and one passing touchdown. Affeldt led the team with 31 yards receiving and one touchdown. UWW was led by Beaver who had 145 yards rushing and one touchdown. Jacobs passed for 179 yards and had one touchdown. He also had two rushing touchdowns.

RF scored the first points of the fourth quarter on a four-yard Nathan Anderson touchdown run to make the score 25-17. Extra point was missed. The Eagles put the game away on their very next possession scoring on another Schumann touchdown pass this time to Jason Wagner from four-yards out. Two-point conversion was good. The drive covered 59 yards in seven plays.

RF was led by Anderson's 95 yards on the ground and one touchdown. Wolff chipped in with 76 yards and one rushing touchdown. He also added 48 yards passing and one touchdown. UWL was led by Schumann who had 214 yards and three touchdowns. Kettenhofen had six catches for 55 yards and one touchdown to lead the Eagles.

The Falcons scored the first points of the second quarter on another Bodurski field goal this time from 47 yards out. His field goal was a new school record. The drive covered 58 yards in 14 plays. On UWP's next possession Tyson Droessler scored a two-yard touchdown to give the Pioneers a 7-6 lead. The drive covered 44 yards in seven plays.

After a 48-yard Matt Jordan kickoff return, the Falcons scored three plays later on a Nathan Anderson three-yard run. Jeremy Wolff added the two-point conversion to make the score 14-7 RF. The drive covered 31 yards in three plays. RF added another touchdown late in the second quarter on the legs of Wolff. He ran it in from three yards out to make the score 21-7 at half. The drive covered for 55 yards in seven plays.

RF scored the only points of the third quarter on another Wolff touchdown run. He ran it in from 16 yards out to make the score 28-7 heading into the fourth quarter. The drive covered 89 yards in 13 plays.

Stout took the opening kick off and drove to the Falcon 22 yard line before Andy Acosta intercepted a Stout pass to stop the drive. Later in the quarter Stout drove to the Falcon 16 before Matt Jordan recovered a fumble at the RF 12 to kill that drive.

The Blue Devils scored 21 unanswered points in the third quarter. Jesse Wendy scored on a 15-yard pass play from Tanner Kattre with 8:27 to play in the third quarter. On RF's next possession the Falcons threw an interception that led to another Stout score. Once again it was the Wendt-Kattre combination and the touchdown play covered 10-yards. The Falcons were stopped again after three plays and then Stout's Joe Seep returned the Falcon punt 69-yards for a score.

The Falcons finally got on the scoreboard with 7:41 to play in the game when Nathan Anderson went in from two-yards out. The drive covered 72 yards in 11 plays. The big play in the drive was a 28-yard run by Jeremy Wolff that gave the Falcons a first down at the UWS seven. Three plays later Anderson scored.

Shane Hanson led the Falcon defense with eight solo and 11 total tackles. Tony Dorner had one solo and 10 total stops. Ryan Agrimson had four solo and nine tackles while Nathan Renk had seven tackles including one sack.

UWSP got on the board halfway through the third quarter on another Heldmann field goal - this time from 24 yards out. The drive covered 74 yards and it took 11 plays. RF answered right back two plays later on Wolff's 69 yard run and it tied the score at 16. The drive covered 75 yards. The score after the third quarter was tied at 16.

The Blugolds took the opening possession and drove 80 yards in nine plays. Tony Hull capped off the drive with a five-yard touchdown catch from Jesse Krzyzanowski. After a Falcon punt, Eau Claire came right back on its next drive scoring again on a Krzyzanowski pass to Hull - this time from seven-yards out to make the score 14-0 after the first quarter.

RF was led by Nathan Anderson's 44 rushes for 232 yards on the ground - both were career highs. Wolff chipped in with 34 yards on the ground and one touchdown pass. Chris Anderson led the team with 34 yards receiving and one touchdown catch.

UWEC was led by Krzyanowski's 183 yards passing and two touchdown. He completed 15 straight passes to start the game. Gast led the team on the ground with 78 yards on 22 carries along with one touchdown. Hull had seven catches for 63 yards and two touchowns.

The Falcons faught back once again this time scoring with under two minutes left in the fourth quarter on Spasimir Bodurski's 21 yard field goal with 1:51 left in the game. It capped off a four play eight yard drive. The score after regulation was tied at 10.

RF was led by Nathan Anderson's 87 rushing yards on 22 carries. Wolff also pitched in with 72 yards on the ground and 84 passing to go along with his one touchdown pass. Chris Anderson led the team with three catches for 33 yards and one touchdown.

PLU got on the board later in the second quarter going 80 yards in eight plays which was capped off by Matt Steiner's three-yard touchdown run. RF scored the last points of the first half on Ryan Hansen's eight-yard touchdown catch from halfback Andy Kolstad. Kolstad took a pitch and on the halfback option hit Hansen in the end zone. The drive covered 64 yards in seven plays. RF led at the half, 24-7.

RF scored the first points of the fourth quarter taking the ball 75 yards in six plays capped off by Wolff's 53-yard touchdown run. The two point conversion failed. Wolff finished the day racking up 162 yards on the ground and 119 yards passing. Anderson also rushed for more than 100 yards racking up 115 yards on 30 carries along with one touchdown.

Sannes marched his team right back down the field on the very next possesion. BSU covered 68 yards in six plays. Sannes threw his last of four touchdown passes, this time Schreiber, covering 10 yards at 10:57. Schreiber scored the last points of the game scoring on an 18-yard run capping off an 11-play 87-yard drive to end the scoring. Schreiber ended the day with six catches for 121 yards and two touchdowns. Sannes passed for 287 yards and four touchdowns along with one interception.

CSP drove down the field after taking the kickoff and nearly scored. On a third-and-two play from the UWRF 42, halfback Brian Holmes broke free and looked like he was going to score. But Agrimson caught him from behind and forced a fumble that was recovered by Shane Hanson in the end zone.

The Falcons return some experienced players at key positions that gives O'Grady a reason for offensive optimism. Starters and back ups return at both quarterback and fullback. Dave Affeldt played in every game and Andy Kolstad played in six last year at quarterback. Affeldt was third on the team in rushing with 349 yards and he scored four times. He was 3-6 passing for 52 yards and one score. Kolstad, who missed four games with injuries, rushed for 114 yards and was 13-26 passing for 208 yards and two touchdowns. Jeremy Wolff, who started every game at halfback in 2004, could play some under center in 2005. He rushed for 177 yards as a halfback last year. He completed the only pass he threw for a 35-yard touchdown. Three veterans return at fullback led by 2004 starter Nathan Anderson. He was second on the team in rushing with 876 yards and he scored four times. John Ward played in eight games and finished with 170 yards. B.J. LeRoy, who did not play last year, returns for the 2005 season. "The quarterback spot is up for grabs," said O'Grady. "Only time will tell who the starter will be. We have some great depth at fullback - a spot where depth is needed. Anderson has gotten bigger and stronger. Ward played last year and LeRoy is back too." The graduation of halfback John Peterlik will leave a hole to fill. He led the Falcons in rushing last year (1,143 yards) and scored 11 touchdowns. He also returned punts and kickoffs. He was named to the All-WIAC team as an all-purpose back. O'Grady said that Wolff, Affeldt or Kolstad could also play halfback. Beau DeBruin, who rushed for 124 yards and one touchdown, and Zeke Secrist, could also see action at halfback. "The halfback spots are a little up in the air right now." Chris Anderson returns at wide receiver. He caught only one pass last year - for 29 yards - but he, "runs great routes, is quick and can catch the ball," according to O'Grady. Josh Nelson also played some at wide receiver and Josh Grover, who had the fastest 40 times in the spring, has been moved to wide receiver. Tackle Nathan Cook, tight end Andy Marx and guard Jordan Miller return as starters in the line. Dave Kapping and Nathan Tenut are other returnees who could help. "I'm excited about the line since we have some players who have legitimate size and experience," said O'Grady.

The Falcons made improvements in their play last year using a different defense. More improvement is the key for 2005. In 2004 the Falcons allowed only two touchdown passes covering more than 25 yards. In 2003, the Falcons allowed 10 touchdown passes covering more than 25 yards. The defense forced 19 turnovers in 2004 compared to 12 in 2003. Returning to the line is a key to the Falcon team in tackle Aaron Retzlaff, who was named to the first All-WIAC team in 2004. He had 36 tackles including five tackles for loss. Dan Buker returns at linebacker. He had 48 tackles including a team-high seven tackles for loss. He recovered one fumble. Both corners also return. Matt Jordan had 52 tackles, two interceptions and a team high five pass break ups. Shane Hanson had 17 tackles and he broke up three passes. O'Neal Hampton also returns in the secondary after finishing third in tackles last year with 55. Jeff Cassellius returns at an end spot after playing in 10 games in 2004. He had 26 tackles including five for loss. Gregg Neumann is another returning end who also played in 10 games and finished with 15 stops. Dylan Dabrowski will play at tackle. He played in 10 games in 2004 and had 10 tackles. Mike Larson, Ryan Agrimson and Tony Dorner will help the Falcons at linebacker. Larson played in eight games while Agrimson and Dorner played in nine. Agrimson had 31 tackles, Dorner nine and Larson three. Andy Acosta and Bruce Baillargeon will man the strong safety spot. Acosta played in seven games and made five tackles while Baillargeon played in 10 games and had 27 stops. Robby Nesvig will play at free safety along with Hampton. He played in nine games and had 14 tackles. "Coach (Kevin) Bullis is in his second year as defensive coordinator and has spent a lot of time with the coaches. They all feel more comfortable. As coaches gain experience you'll see overall improvement," said O'Grady.

Jovin Kroll and Spasimir Bodurski both return. Kroll handling all of the punting and Bodurski did all of the place kicking in 2004. Kroll punted 45 times and averaged 32.9 yards a try. He had eight downed inside the 20. Bodurski has a strong leg and finished 6-10 in field goals with his longest covering 41 yards. He was also good on 19-20 extra point kicks. "Both players need to be a little more consistent," said O'Grady. O'Grady will have to find a long snapper and punt and kick off return men.

Retzlaff has also been a two-year captain for the Falcons, and was last year's Defensive Player of the Year. Retzlaff has been a mainstay for the Falcon program the last four years, seeing action in almost every game.

After playing two very good Division II teams, Retzlaff feels that the team has made good strides that will help out when conference play begins. He also feels that the continuation of hard work during practice and in the weight room will only help the team improve.

Coming back for another year was not a big deal for Retzlaff because the guys on the football team have become like family to him. He loves being part of a team and he says there is no greater feeling than that. He also says that the coaches have made him a better football player as well as a better person.

He grew up in Shawano, Wis., where he played football since the fifth grade. In high school he went to Shawano High, where he was the team's captain and earned honorable mention all-conference. He also played baseball and was named to the second all-conference team.

Retzlaff's goals for this season are much like any other team member that wants to do well. With his leadership skills, the team has a good chance to have a good season. He also feels that this season they are due to make their mark on the WIAC.

He grew up in Glenwood City, Wis., where he played football for Glenwood City High School. He received many accolades at Glenwood City including all-conference first team as a defensive end and tight end as a senior. He also received All-Region and All-State honorable mention at defensive end as a senior.

Cassellius played on some good football teams during those years. In his freshman year they won the WIAA Division 5 state championship,. His brother was a member of the team also. In both his sophomore and senior seasons his team advanced to the state semifinals only to lose to Edgar both times.

In track & field he won the 2001 conference discus championship and placed second in the shot put. He competed in both events at state that year. He placed second in the shot put at the conference meet in 2000.

Nathan Cook is one of the Falcons most experienced offensive lineman and he and his line mates are having a solid year in breaking down defenses and allowing the UW-RF offense to at times dominate opponents.

To his teammates Cook has brought toughness to a much-improved team this season. After a dominating performance against Pacific Lutheran, the Falcon offensive line was named the Offensive Line of the Week by d3football.com. He helped the team rush for 506 yards and a total of 560 yards.

"The Oshkosh game was very satisfying because in past years our team would have self destroyed under the pressure of a close game," said Cook. He was named the team's Offensive Player of the Week after the win at Titan Stadium.

His high school football team he played on was a very successful unit that was coached by Lavern Pottinger. In his senior season, Cook was part of the only Rice Lake team that has won the Big Rivers Conference football championship.

After beating Oshkosh the Falcons feel that they are due to have a breakout season in the WIAC. Cook feels that if they don't get ahead of themselves, take one game at a time and improve every day in practice they have a chance to win the conference title.

"Every team has the chance to get beat in this conference. Our great off-season workouts and strong work ethic along with positive attitudes have put us on track for a very successful year," predicted Cook.

The Falcons hope with all the hard work that has been put in that they will contend for the conference championship this season. The team's confidence is very high right now and that is not good for opposing WIAC teams.

Before this season he had only recorded a total of nine catches for 111 yards and two touchdowns. This season already he has 11 catches for 155 yards and two touchdowns. He caught his touchdown passes against Eau Claire and Oshkosh.

Anderson has a few memorable moments that football has brought him. In high school his favorite moment was when he returned a punt return for a touchdown. His favorite moment in college was when he scored his first touchdown.

"Chris has been a team player for five years," said Falcon Coach John O'Grady. "Wide receivers at UWRF are known for their patience and blocking. He is a great route runner who has great hands. He will be successful in his post collegiate career."

After falling to UWSP (23-16 on Oct. 15) the Falcons still have confidence that they can move the ball both or the ground and in the air. Anderson is very confident in his abilities as well as the teams.

His teammates feel that he has brought toughness to the team that cannot be matched. After a dominating performance against Pacific Lutheran, the Falcon offensive line was named the Offensive Line of the Week by d3football.com. He helped the team rush for 506 yards and 560 yards of total offense.

His teammates feel that he has brought toughness and youth to the team that cannot be matched. After a dominating performance against Pacific Lutheran, the Falcon offensive line was named the Offensive Line of the Week by d3football.com. He helped the team rush for 506 yards and 560 yards of total offense.

"Dave has been a great team member and role model. He has played for us at a couple of offensive line positions. He has also been involved in other aspects of college life. He will be successful in life," Falcon Coach John O'Grady said.

His teammates feel that Kapping has brought toughness and veteran leadership to the team that cannot be matched. After a dominating performance against Pacific Lutheran, the Falcon offensive line was named the Offensive Line of the Week by d3football.com. He helped the team rush for 506 yards and 560 yards of total offense.

The Falcons finish the year off against UW-Whitewater this Saturday (Nov. 12). Whitewater is undefeated but the Falcons feel they can stay in the game with no turnovers and play smart ball-controll football.

"Aaron has been aa standout in this conference for two years. He has been our most consistent defensive lineman who has strength, power, and quickness along with great work ethic. He loves playing the game and will be very successful in his career."

"Nate has been a very good offensive lineman and is our most experienced player. He is our most athletic lineman and will perform both guard and tackle. He will also be very successful in the real world following his collegiate career."

"Nathan has been the classic UW-RF football player. He's worked hard, waited for his turn to compete and found a way to contribute. He's hung in there and not quit. He will be a success in his career."

"Chris has been a team player for five years! Wide receivers are known for their patience and blocking. He is a great route runner who has great hands. He will be successful in his post collegiate career."

Katie Lynn Anderson is in her first year with the Falcons. She played at Forest Lake High School where she was the team's captain for two seasons. Her most memorable tennis moment was in her senior season when the team set high goals and worked very hard as a team to do the best the girls team has done in almost six years. Another memorable moment was making varsity as a freshman. She prefers to play singles and her best stroke is her forehand. Her tennis goals are to make the team, improve her backhand, meet new people (friends), win matches, be successful, have great memories, and learn to help through life. Anderson also wants to contribute to the team as much as possible. Her favorite tennis player is Maria Sharapova. Her hobbies include reading, shopping, hanging out with friend at the lake and playing basketball. He favorite musical group is Taking Back Sunday. Her future goals are to be very successful, help others set goals and succeed, help out in a church and eventually have a family and live happily ever after. She is the daughter of Carroll and Julie and has two brothers. Anderson is majoring in education and psychology with a minor in coaching.

Becky Briese returns for her third season with the Falcons. She had an outstanding sophomore year for the Falcons finishing 10-6 in singles play. She played most of the year at the No. 5 spot. She also finished 9-8 in doubles play spending most of her playing time at the No. 2 position. At the WIAC Meet Briese placed fifth at No. 5 singles and fourth at No. 2 doubles. She was a part of the team's Doubles Team of the Week on Sept. 27. In 2003 she had a 10-1 record at No. 6 singles and was 4-2 at No. 5. She placed fifth in the WIAC meet at No. 6. At No. 3 doubles she had a 10-7 record. She placed sixth in the doubles flight at the WIAC meet. Her most memorable tennis experiences are high school van trips her junior and senior year and writing messages to the van behind us our freshman year at UW-RF. She lists her best stroke as her forehand. Her goals including graduating from River Falls within a reasonable amount of time and starting a career. Her favorite tennis player is Roger Federer. Her favorite musicians include Jack Johnson, Rod Stewart and Joe Adams. Briese was named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll in 2004. Her hobbies include kayaking, fishing, welding, making the rice crispy bars. Her future goals include getting a good job, getting married and starting a family. Briese also wants to stay involved with tennis either playing or coaching. She is the daughter of Bruce and Gail and she has two brothers. Briese is majoring in agricultural engineering.

Molly Keifenheim is in her first season with the Falcon tennis team. She competed at Buffalo High School. Her most memorable tennis experience is g oing to the Carlson Tennis Camps with her teammates. Her tennis goals are to b ring her game to a higher level. Keifenheim prefers to play doubles and lists her best stroke as her forehand. Her favorite tennis player is Patrick Rafter. Her hobbies include camping, playing disc golf, painting, sleeping and shopping at thrift stores. Her favorite musical group is the Beatles. Her future goals are not to grow up and become boring. She is the daughter of Dana and Charley and she has one sibling. Keifenheim is majoring in art education.

Kaylei Sorensen joins the Falcons for her first year of collegiate tennis. She had an excellent prep career at Stevens Point High School. Her most memorable tennis moments are having an undefeated 2004 season and playing in the WIAA State semifinals two years in a row.  She enjoys playing both singles and doubles and lists her best stroke as her forehand. Her favorite tennis player is Maria Sharapova. Her tennis goals are to improve her speed and agility. Sorensen's hobbies include water skiing, tubing, running, scrap booking and reading. Her favorite musician is Joss Stone. Her future goals include being rich and famous. She is the daughter of Don and Steve and has one sibling. Sorensen is majoring in communicative disorders.

Katie Anderson will be at the No. 5 singles spot and will be the third seed. She has a 6-7 record entering the tourney. Mindy Rudiger will be playing at No. 6 singles and is the other No. 2 seed for the Falcons. She has a 9-1 record.

The Falcon tennis team defeated Bethel on Monday afternoon, 6-2-1. There was one match considered to be a tie due to the poor lighting conditions at the end of the night. All of the matches played tonight were eight game pro-sets.

Knobloch worked up that craving during the off season by maintaining a 40 hour work week, training before work, coaching high school athletes after work, then going home to train before going to bed. She said she didn't have much of a life other than tennis or work.

Dedication is only one of her assets that has helped her work her way into the No. 1 singles spot for the Falcons, a post she's had for two years. Playing the No. 1 spot in tennis is announcing that person is the best player on the team, and will face the opposing team's best player.

Knobloch was not heavily recruited, but when she showed up at River Falls, the coaching staff was impressed. She took the team's No. 5 singles spot. The No. 3 and 4 spots were taken by seniors and No. 1 and 2 were held by juniors.

After that season was over Knobloch was featured in Tennis magazine as a collegiate player to watch. Featured in that magazine are tennis players from all divisions, and she was highlighted along with teammate Leah Baron. Knobloch saw it as another honor.

Each week that she was honored she won tough matches and showed improvement. When she was named the WIAC Player of the Week she defeated two opponents in straight sets. These were the same opponents who a year ago challenged Knobloch. She lost to the opponent from St. Scholastica last year in strait sets. Against the St. Mary's opponent Knobloch won last season, but it took her three sets to do it.

Aside from training her body all summer, Lueck said she had to work on developing what he described as her "B" game. She needed to have an alternative plan and execution ability to win. She had to know that the ball was going to come back and mentally and physically position herself to win the point. Smashing the ball as hard as possible may not beat each opponent.

During the pre-season members of the Falcons could be seen at the Mall of America together, biking and hanging out. Before home matches a recording of Knobloch leading the team singing the national anthem is played. The girls bond and spend quality time together.

If there were conflicts, Knobloch would be a good person to help mediate. She is the tennis delegate to the campus Student Athlete Advisory Committee. The committee works together to plan activities to help the community. Knobloch brings ideas the tennis team has to the meeting to help out the community.

Knobloch is an elementary education major and hopes to coach tennis as well. She is learning skills through tennis that she can apply in her future career. She said she's learning to focus, concentrate, and deal with hard situations.

Another thing that will help Knobloch teach is her ability to manage time. Without time management, she says, a student athlete will have a very hard time. She also said it teaches her not to procrastinate, and use free time for things that are most important.

When she finishes a match, she does something that many athletes have a hard time doing. She leaves it all out on the court. Knobloch can devout all of her time and energy to one thing, and then move on to the next. To her it doesn't matter if she wins or loses, she'll take the lesson learned and apply it later, but she won't dwell on the outcome.

A senior this year, Baron has kept her self very busy as a two sport athlete with her season going from early August to March. Baron plays tennis and hockey. There is even a time period where the seasons overlap.

Baron said it is sometimes very difficult to do both tennis and hockey, stay on top of academics and have a social life. "I don't see it that way though," Baron said. "'Cause it's the life that I chose."

Tennis and hockey are not the only ways that Baron is involved on campus. A small group of women teach figure skating and she has helped to organize an annual skating show held in December. She said each year "the show gets better." Baron teaches people how to skate as a full time job in Stillwater, Minn., a job she will have when she graduates next semester. She also worked at a speed and agility shop, Excelleration, also in her home state of Minnesota.

Being so involved in both sports and outside activities Baron has learned qualities that she can apply in other areas of her life. "Patience," she said. " I have to take a deep breath and say, 'you can do this.'"

She has had the same partner for three years, Megan Knobloch, also a senior. The two work well as a team and have developed signals and ways to communicate to be a better team. "We have to play as one but we're a doubles team," Baron said. "The most important thing is that you and your doubles partner need to be on the same page." Baron said that she thinks it helped that neither of the players had doubles experience before coming to River Falls. "We were both going through the same thing," she said. "We've come a long way." They finished their careers in fifth place in the WIAC Meet at No. 1.

She communicates with all the other players on the team. Baron is a co-captain this year along with Knobloch. Baron is a mediator for the team to the coaching staff and she also plans out the conditioning that the team will do.

A two sport captain organizing how much conditioning will be done could be a little overwhelming, but Baron said that wasn't the case. She said she wanted to show that she was serious about working hard, and lead by example.

She also talks to the coach. Lueck said if the front seat in the van is open when the team goes on road trips, Baron will take the open seat and talk with him along the way. He said the conversations are "adult to adult," they are about anything. "I like that," Lueck said. He said Baron is more than a player to him. "She will always be my friend," he said.

Baron said she shared the sentiment. "We will definitely still have that friendship when tennis is over," she said. In those conversations the two are comfortable talking about life situations, Lueck said Baron had had ups and downs that test her ability, but he understands. "Some issues are more important than tennis, more important than school," Lueck said.

Baron begins her days early with classes at 9 a.m. and then tennis and hockey practice finishing up around 7 p.m. Then her nights are spent hanging out or watching movies and doing homework before going to bed.

"I'm such a competitive person," she said. Competition roots in her family. Baron grew up in a house of five kids, she said her parents are "very supportive," they come to most of the home meets and games and the ones close to her hometown of Hermantown, Minn. The person she said she looks up to the most is her dad. He played Div. I hockey at the University of Minnesota-Duluth. She said her helped her to stay on the right track. "Everyone falls but he's always there helping me back up," she said.

She's learned perseverance in the face of animosity. Baron said her hockey coach has always been very against her playing two sports. He wants her there all of the time, and not spending time risking injury while playing tennis she said.

There was a time when Baron was injured and could not play. It was the week a tennis meet was scheduled against UW-Eau Claire, a team they were really aiming to beat this year.  With Baron out, that left the No. 2 spot vacant. The whole team had to be shifted and moved up a spot, playing competition they were not used to. "It killed the team," Lueck said. "It's like losing (Brett) Favre as quarterback. He said that the outcome of the match, which River Falls lost 7-2, shows how valuable Baron is to the team.

Her value was proven last season as well at the meet against UW-Oshkosh. The teams were tied and Baron and her opponent were the deciding match. Lueck said he could not have had a better player out there to decide the match. Baron pulled through and won the match in three sets, giving the team a 5-4 victory.

The same story was told to Tennis Magazine and they featured Baron as one of the collegiate athletes to watch this season. Baron said it was an honor because she was the only Div. III player featured.

Baron has finished the season right where Lueck said he hoped. She took third place for the second year in a row at No. 2 singles at the WIAC Meet. She doesn't have much time to think about it though; the first hockey game is less than a two weeks away.

Pudgie Siverling joins the staff as a volunteer assistant after two outstanding years competing for the Falcon women's team. Coach Bill Henderson is very happy to have her joining the staff and feels that she will be of great help through the season.

Danielle Mandich joins the Falcons for her freshman season in 2005-06. She attended Bloomington Jefferson High School and went to state in her final three years. She finished first in her section in the 50 freestyle as a senior. She is the daughter of Caroline and Dan Mandich. Her major is elementary education.

Ashley Swenty joins the Falcons for her freshman season in 2005-06. She competed in the state meet all four years at Tomahawk High School. She finished second at state her junior year and was a captain her junior and senior year. She is the daughter of Ann and Scott Swenty. Her major is dairy science.

Matt Banz is in his first year with the Falcons in 2005. He was named to the Minnesota All-State team while competing at Eagan High School. He was a sectional finalist four times and earned honorable mention to the all-conference team three times. His favorite events are the 50 and 100 freestyles and the 100 fly. He is the son of Rich and Julie Banz. He is majoring in chemistry.

Brandon Blaisdell returns to the Falcons in his sophomore season as the only diver on the squad this season. He scored on both boards at last year's WIAC meet and was a finalist on the three meter board. His major is pre-dental studies.

Erick Dornseif joins the Falcons for his firs year of collegiate swimming. He competed with the North Suburban Aquatic Club team and at Mounds View High School. His favorite evens are all relays, the 50 and 100 freestyle events and the 100 backstroke. He is the son of Jim and Teresa. Dornseif is majoring in art education.

Eli Eschenbauch returns to the Falcons for his senior season. He is one of the team's captains. His favorite events are the breaststroke, IM and fly. He is the son of Al and Pam Eschenbauch. Eschenbauch is majoring in elementary education.

David Johnson joins the Falcons for his first collegiate season in 2005. He won five state titles in the 2005 YMCA Championships. His favorite events are the freestyle sprints and the fly in the medley relay event. He is the son of Lloyd and Jane Johnson. Johnson is majoring in physics.

Dan Kessenich is back for his fourth and final season for the Falcons in 2005. He is one of the team's captains. He enjoys swimming all events and his swimming highlights are competing in the WIAC Championships. He is a member of the Falcon cross country team. He is the son of David and Marriann Kessenich. Kessenich is majoring in geography.

Mikhael Keyer is back with the Falcons for his second season. He competed with the Lake Placid High School team in Florida and the U.S. Paralympic swim team that traveled to Athens in September of 2004 for the Paralympic Games. His favorite event is the backstroke and the highlight of his swimming career is competing in the 2005 WIAC Meet. He is the son of Jane Keyser. Keyser is majoring in health & human performance.

Recruit's Weekend is an opportunity for those swimmers and divers who are interested in UW-RF swimming & diving to come to campus and meet the coach, captains, swimmers and divers and get a good look at the campus.

If you would like an invitation to Recruit's Weekend please contact Henderson by the e-mail link below. You may attend either scheduled weekend. Weekends have been designated for men or women to avoid conflict with the Wisconsin and Minnesota high school swimming and diving seasons.

The women's team should see between 12-16 new members and that group includes three Minnesota state finalists. The men's team is looking forward to having 7-10 new members which will take the team up to their biggest squad in almost 20 years. The new male swimmers include three state qualifiers.

Excitement has been building up over the past couple of weeks for the University of Wisconsin-River Falls swimming & diving team, and Ashley Crunstedt is probably one of the most excited.  She is graduating in May of 2006 with a degree in broadcast journalism and a minor in international studies.

Crunstedt plays a very big role on this year's team. "Ashley was voted team captain last season for this year's team," Falcon Coach Bill Henderson said.  She is there to lead and encourage both the new swimmers and the veterans.

Crunstedt has been swimming since she was very young. " My younger sister, Kelsey, and I would be in the water all day, everyday! We went to swimming lessons a few times, but pretty much self taught ourselves." When her family moved to Savage, Minn., she tried out for the Burnsville Swim Club. She skipped the "novice" level, where swimmers learned the different strokes, and went directly to the "bronze" team. This was a big deal for Crunstedt because she had not had any formal training at that point in her career.

Every swimmer has favorite events, but one event that most of them dread is the butterfly.  However, this event is Crunstedt's favorite, " because no one else wants to swim it. I feel like it's my event - you get a lot of respect in the swimming world for doing it. I know I'd never believe myself back in high school when I say this, but as of last season, I am a 200 yard butterflyer."  She also competes in the 200-yard backstroke, 500-yard freestyle, and the 100-yard butterfly.

Crunstedt does not plan on continuing competitive swimming after she graduates, but she would not trade her years in the pool for anything. "Swimming, more so than anything else, has shown me how to set goals, and what steps I need to take to achieve them. It has taught me to push myself day in and day out in all aspects of life. It's taught me time management in a big way."

Growing up Crunstedt not only swam, but also danced competitively for 11 years and played softball for seven.  Once she got to Burnsville High School, however, she had to decide which sport she wanted to continue with and play varsity. Her choice? Swimming. Today, she is active in other ways as well. " I ski every so often, and my roommate just taught me how to ice skate last year."

When asked about her plans for the future, Crunstedt said, "I'm one of those people who still don't know what they want to be when they grow up." She spent spring semester of 2005 traveling around Europe with the International Traveling Classroom, and would love to return there. If that doesn't work out, she plans on getting an internship at a local television station to see if behind the scenes broadcasting is still what she wants to do.

Crunstedt is looking forward to the rest of the season this year. "It's early in the season," she said, "so my times are a little off, but I know with the training I've been putting in that the end of the season conference meet is going to pay off! I'm really pumped for a good finish to my competitive swimming career!"

Two of Crunstedt's most memorable swimming moments came at UW-RF and in high school. "I know I had really great end of the season section meet when I was a junior in high school. I had a huge drop in my 100 back time and finished seventh in the section. Another big moment would have to be last year when I swam the 200 butterfly for the first time - and I finished! I thought it was awesome that I was able to finish since I doubted myself for so long, and I did it with a decent time."

Before college, Smaagard attending White Bear Lake High School and swam with the YMCA team. Smaagard says there was not a whole lot of competition or training at the YMCA, but this gave him the opportunity to practice and work on desired strokes.

Besides swimming, Smaagard is a pretty "goofy character. "I enjoy doing a lot of things, having a good time, and sprucing up people's lives." Sometimes Smaagard and his roommate, Jason Chorba, play loud "weird" music in between peoples classes. Smaagard and Chorba sing, dance and wave at people walking by. "People laugh at us when they are going or coming from classes. We hope it makes their day better," said Smaagard.

After Smaagard gets his rush of laughter, he also takes time to communicate with others. "I love talking with people and listening. I am very open with things."  Maybe it's the psychology aspect of him coming out?

"It was a season of highs and lows," said Falcon Coach Joe Cranston. "Beating Gustavus and Stevens Point was fun. Playing Middlebury in overtime in their rink was fun.  Playing our final game of the year against Lake Forest was also a good way to end the year, especially for the three seniors."

"It will be hard to replace their leadership and dedication more than their contributions in points. I can recruit some kids to come here and score goals, but it would be hard to recruit three people with better character than Leah, Louie and Lindsay," said Cranston.

"I have no idea what next year will bring. I think it might be somewhat of a rebuilding year. We return a pretty good defensive core and have some good forwards. I would expect to have at least 10 or 12 new faces at tryouts next year," said Cranston.

High School, Personal: She uses her superb skating skills to find open ice and pull away from opponents. In her senior year at Proctor-Hermantown High School, she finished with 44 points and was named to the All-Area team. She was named a Prep Newsmaker in the Duluth News-Tribune. She set a school record for assists and also played with the Minnesota Selects in 2001. She is the daughter of Mark and Laura and has one brother and three sisters. Baron is majoring in health & human performance.

Lindsay O'Keefe has played a bigger role in each of her previous seasons and has the skills and talents to make her senior season her best. She will be a key member of the team at the forward position.

High School, Personal: In 2003 she served as captain for the Lakeville High School team. She was named the team's best offensive player and made the all-conference team three times. Hurley also named All-State honorable mention her junior year and earned All-State Academic honors her senior year. The highlight of her high school career was scoring an overtime game winner in the sectional finals her junior year. She is the daughter of Ken and Tracie and has one brother and one sister. Hurley is majoring in biomedical science.

High School, Personal: She played high school hockey at Buffalo and made the all-conference team for three years. Wallace also played for the Minnesota Selects for seven years, yet she says the highlight of her career is winning the conference championship three consecutive years. She is the daughter of Richard and Nancy and has one brother and one sister. Wallace is majoring in business administration.

Ashley Anderson is in her first year with the Falcons after transferring from Concordia-Moorhead. At C-M last year she was second in scoring with five goals and 11 points. She scored two power-play goals and two game-winners. At South High School she was the team's captain and was named to the All-State team. She earned all-conference honors three times. She was also a captain, All-State and an all-conference soccer player. Anderson was a Miss Hockey candidate and competed in the Chicago Showcase Tournament. Anderson was a member of the school's Student Council. She was named the MIAC Player of the Week on Nov. 29. She lists her biggest high school hockey thrill as winning the State Championship. She is the daughter of Nikki and Jon and has two brothers. Anderson is majoring in criminal justice.

High School, Personal: During her senior year at Shattuck-St.Mary's Prep School, she had eight points with one goal and seven assists. She helped her team win the State AAA Tournament to advance to Nationals. She is the daughter of Dane and Donna and has one brother and one sister. Anderson is majoring in business.

High School, Personal: At Moorhead High School she earned the Hardest Worker award all four years of her high school career. She was named to the all-conference team twice. During her senior year she had 16 points with eight goals and eight assists. She participated in the Junior Fest and the Senior Classic. She is the daughter of Mike and Deb and she has one brother and one sister. Bruggeman is undecided on a major field of study.

High School, Personal: During her senior year at White Bear Lake High School, Mohwinkel was named to the all-conference team. She was also named to the All-State academic team. She also helped her team to a second place finish in the 2002 Minnesota State Tournament. She is the daughter of Neal and Barb and has two brothers. Mohwinkel is majoring in marketing communications.

High School, Personal: Snedeker attended Osseo High School where she was the team captain in 2003, earned all-conference honorable mention and the team Most Valuable Player award. She also played in the Junior Fest and played with the Minnesota Thoroughbreds U-19 team during her senior year. She is the daughter of Dale and Judy and has one brother. Snedeker is majoring in elementary education.

Jessie Dyslin is in her first year with the Falcons and will play defense. She helped South St. Paul High School win the Minnesota State Championship in 2005. She scored six goals and finished with 34 points from her blue line position. She was named to the All-State team in 2005. Dyslin earned honorable mention to the all-conference team in 2005 and was named to the first team in 2004. She competed in both the Junior and Senior Fest Tournaments and the Chicago Showcase Tournament. She earned all-conference honorable mention honors in soccer. She was a member of the Gold Honor Roll. She lists her biggest high school hockey thrill as winning the State Championship. She is the daughter of Mary Ann and Donnie and has one brother and one sister. Dyslin is majoring in animal science.

Sara Halseth joins the Falcons for her first collegiate season in 2005-06. She will play forward. At Moorhead High School she was named to the all-conference team for four straight years. Halseth was the team's Most Valuable Player twice. She competed in the Junior and Senior Fest Tournaments. She scored 24 goals and had 41 points in 2005. She lists her biggest high school hockey thrill as beating Bemidji in four overtimes in the section finals. She is the daughter of Lisa and Scott and has one brother and one sister. Halseth is undecided on a major field of study.

Amy Hasbargen is in her first year with the Falcons. She has the skills to play both forward and defense. At Lake of the Woods High School she was the team's Most Valuable Player in 2005 when she scored 11 goals and finished with 39 points. She was named to the all-conference team and competed in the Senior Classic and Chicago Showcase Tournaments. She also won the team's Most Dedicated, Hustle and Sparkplug awards. Hasbargen was named to the 2005 All-State team. She was captain of the hockey team for five seasons, the swimming team for two years and the softball team for one season. She was a member of the National Honor Society and an All-State Senior Class representative. She also earned the Triple A award, was named to the academic All-State team and earned a Gold Star. She is the daughter of Carrie and Keith and has two brothers. Hasbargen is majoring in sociology.

Leigh Landgraf joins the Falcons for her first collegiate season in 2005 and will play defense. She earned all-conference first team honors at Cottage Grove High School. She finished with six goals and 22 points in 2005. She also earned honorable mention to the team for five seasons. She was a team captain and competed in the Junior and Senior Fest and Chicago Showcase Tournaments.  Landgraf also earned all-conference honors in soccer. She lists her biggest high school hockey thrill as playing in the first game of her junior season when the stands were packed. She is the daughter of Shelley and Steve and has two brothers and one sister. Landgraf is majoring in pre-medicine.

The Falcons wasted no time putting the goal in the net, making three of their four goals in the first period. Jenna Scanlon was the first to score with an unassisted goal at the 1:15. Kelly Jensen scored next with a power play goal at at 3:38. She was assisted by Jennifer Wallace and Ashley Anderson. Lou Paulson scored her 11th goal of the year and the game winner to make it 3-0 on an assist by Lindsay O'Keefe. Lake Forest made their first goal on a power play late in the first period at 16:57. They started the second period out with a bang, scoring the only goal at 0:52. Leigh Landgraf scored the final and only goal of the third period on an assist from Lindsay O'Keefe with 5:22 remaining to seal the victory for the Falcons.

Three goalies shared equal playing time with Mandi Mohwinkel taking her first win of the season. Katie Kantrud and Amber Lindner played the second and third period. They combined for at total of 31 saves as UW-River Falls finished their season 14-11-2 overall.

UWRF is led in scoring by senior forward Lindsay O'Keefe who has eight goals and 19 points. Her 11 assists leads the team. She has scored two power-play goals and one game-winner. Junior defender Jennifer Wallace is second in scoring with eight goals and 17 points. She has scored three power-play goals and two game-winners. Sophomore forward Jenna Scanlon leads the team with 12 goals and she has 15 points. She has scored two power-play goals and two game-winners.

The Falcons were the only team to score in the first period with a goal from Leah Baron at 14:43.  She was assisted by Lindsay O'Keefe and Kelly Jensen.  Neither team scored in the second period, but both teams displayed tough defense when, at different times, they played with two players in the penalty box at the same time.  The Falcons scored first in the third period with a goal at 7:25.  Jenna Scanlon scored an unassisted goal, 4 on 4.  Lake Forest answered right back with a goal at 9:32 to bring the game within one then had another goal at 11:26 that sent the game into overtime. Neither team could score in overtime ending the game 2-2.

The Falcon defense came out in full force during three occasions when the Falcons had two players in the penalty box. "Our special team played really well. Paulson did a great job blocking shots while the other team had the power play. The entire team played well and with a sense of urgency," said Falcon Coach Joe Cranston.

Finlandia took control in the second period and tied it up 4-4.  The Lions scored first at 3:51, but Paulson came right back with a goal at 5:10 with assists from Kristen Juven and Jenna Scanlon.  Finlandia didn't wait long to score another goal and scored just 15 seconds after the Paulson goal.  They scored one more time at 6:21 to tie them up 4-4. "We made a few defensive mistakes in the second period and had some difficulty getting the puck in the net, but we came back and played tough," said Falcons Coach Joe Cranston.

With the third period being the deciding period for the game, both teams came out strong, but it was the Falcons who took a commanding lead scoring two consecutive goals.  The first was scored by Wallace with assists from Leigh Landgraph and Halseth at 9:12.  The next goal came from Kelly Jensen with assists from O'Keefe and Baron at 10:00. The final minute of the game saw the Falcons with two players in the penalty box, but the Falcons were able to hold off the Lions and win 6-4.

The Yellowjackets came out intense and scored their first goal 2:50 into the first period. The two teams battled out the rest of the first and all of the second period with neither team scoring. In the third period Superior made their second goal at 4:22, but the Falcons fought back with Lindsay O'Keefe scoring their first goal on a power play at 12:32. She was assisted by Leigh Landgraph. In the final seven minutes the Falcons really played hard to try to push the game into overtime, but it wasn't enough and the Yellow Jackets won 2-1.

River Falls got behind early when the Pointers' Kim Lunneborg scored a goal only :53 into the contest. Stevens Point extended their lead to two when Tracy Truckey got the puck in the net with under :30 remaining in the first.

The second period was once again dominated shot wise by the Panthers. The Panthers were able to get off 13 shots compared to the Falcons three. Although only taking three shots on net, River Falls was able to capitalize on two of those shots to take the 2-0 lead. Falcon goals were scored by Lou Paulson 9:36 in and then Renae Bergh knocked in her first goal of the season with 1:10 remaining in the period. The Falcons took the momentum and hoped to carry it with them through the third.

The third period is where Middlebury made a move. The Panthers finally scored a goal 5:13 into the period thanks to Gloria Velez. Middlebury tied the game just over a minute later with a score from Randi Dumont. With the game knotted at two, both teams played solid defense and skated to the end of regulation with a tie.

Middlebury had a power play opportunity carry over into the overtime and they took advantage. Abby Kurtz-Phelan banged home the game winning power play goal just 36 seconds into the overtime to cement the win for the Panthers. River Falls played a tough game and came up just a little bit short in the end.

The third brought on more effort from the Falcons as they played intense defense the whole way through. The Falcons uped their lead to two with a strike from Leigh Landaraf. River Falls dominated the whole game and easily took the win.

River Falls scored the games first goal thanks to Jenna Scanlon score just 25 secons into the game. Other than the Falcon goal, the remainder of the first was rather quiet as it ended with the Falcons leading, 1-0. River Falls took 11 shots on goal compared to St. Mary's six.

The second was all St. Mary's as they were able to take the lead with two goals of their own. Jessica Ribish scored the first Cardinals goal at the halfway point of the period. Ribish's goal was a power play goal assisted by Mellissa Mondo. Mondo later scored a goal of her own to put St. Mary's in the lead. The second ended with the Cardinals in front, 2-1.

The Falcons battled back in the third and showed how much strength they have on the offensive end. Lou Paulson knotted the game up with her power play goal 5:08 in. Leah Baron added her game winning goal 32 seconds later. The Falcons looked to play stellar defense and prevent the Cardinals from making a push. The Falcons were successful and even added two late goals to put the game away. River Falls goals were scored by Kelly Jenson (11:50) and Kristen Juven (19:25).

The Falcons left the Lions no chance in this game as they scored the first five consecutive goals.  Sara Halseth was the first to score for the Falcons at 8:20 of the first period with an assist from Jessie Dyslin.  It was Halseth's third goal of the season.  Kristen Juven made her second goal of the season at 9:41 with an assist from Amy Bruggeman of the second period.  Lindsay O'Keefe made her third goal of the season at 11:05 with an assist from Leah Baron.  Kristen Juven started the scoring of the third period with a power play goal at 3:05 and an assist from Jenny Wallace.  It was Juven third goal of the season.  Finally, Kelly Jensen went unassisted at 13:12 making her fifth goal of the season.  Finlandia scored their goal in the final seconds of the third period at 19:22 on a power play of the third period.

Kelly Jensen started off the scoring with a goal at 9:51 of the first period with assists from Lindsay O'Keefe and Leah Baron. The Lions answered back with a power play goal at 10:30 to tie the game up going into the second period. The Falcons dominated the second period with Kelly Hurley wasting no time scoring at 3:03 with assists from Sara Halseth and Leigh Landgraf, then Landgraf made her first goal of the season on a power play with an assist from Amy Bruggeman at 9:18. In the third period that Lions brought it within one when they scored on a power play at 18:57 then sent the game into overtime just under the buzzer at 19:19. The Lions then made the game winning goal with only 27 seconds left in overtime.

Mandi Mohwinkel played goal a total of 64:33 before leaving an empty net. She made eight saves in the first period, five in the second, seven in the third, and one in overtimes. Her record is now 0-1-1.

The Falcons came out in their second game against the Pointers with a lot more intensity and allowed them to only get two shots on goal to their 14, in the first period. First to score was Jennifer Wallace on a power play at 15:06 of the first period with an assist from Sara Halseth. The Pointers answered back with a goal at 17:34. Kelli Dahle made the game winning goal at 11:03 of the second period with another assist from Halseth. The Falcons out shot the Pointers 12-5 in the second period, but the Pointers came back strong in the third making 10 shots and holding the Falcons to two. The Falcons went 1/7 on power plays and the Pointers were 0/6. "We played great, this was an important win for us because it keeps us on top in the conference," said Falcon Coach Joe Cranston.

Amber Lindner played the first two periods in goal making 13 saves out of 15 shots. Kim Grafstrom played the remaining 19:10 before leaving an empty net. She made two saves out of three shots. Lindner takes the loss making her record 4-2-0.

The first period saw no scoring action from either side, but a tough Falcon offense worked hard outshooting SCC 17-4 in the first period. "We had just as many chances in every period, we just wore them down," said Falcon Coach Joe Cranston. SCC started the scoring just 20 seconds into the second period on a power play goal. That was their first and last time on the score board as the Falcon dominated the rest of the game. Lou Paulson was the first to score at 8:19 with assists from Kelli Dahle and Kristen Juven after that the goals came pretty steadily. The next goal came at 16:14 from Kelly Jensen who was assisted by Leah Baron and shortly after Lindsay O'keefe got in on the scoring action with an unassisted goal at 17:32. The Falcons really let loose in the third period scoring five goals and shutting down SCC. Amy Hasbargen made the first goal of the third period at 4:55 with assists from Paulson and Juven. Jenna Scanlon made the next two goals, the first at 8:51 with an assist from Jensen and the next was at 9:33 with an assist from Juven. Baron made the seventh goal for the Falcons at 15:52 with assists from O'Keefe and Juven and the final goal came from Jensen with an assist from O'Keefe at 17:06.

Two freshman goalies had their first showing in goal. Taking playing the first half of the game was Katie Kantrud who made five saves out of six shots. She came out at 11:20 of the second period and Kim Grafstrom came in to make five saves out of five shots. Grafstrom is now 1-0. "It's good to get them in there and see some time on the ice, even though they didn't see many shots," said Cranston.

Amber Lindner took her first loss of the season and is now 2-1-0.  She made ten saves in the first period, nine in the second and six in the third.  She was pulled late in the third period leaving an empty net with 2:30 left in the third period.

The Falcons played a slow first and second period with few shots from either team. "We were still coming off our win against Gustavus and weren't focused right away. In the third period we picked up and played a lot better," said Falcon Coach Joe Cranston. The Falcons made five shots in the first period and Augsburg had two. In the second period, Falcons stayed consistent with five shots and Augsburg improving slightly with five. The game got interesting in the third when freshman Sara Halseth scored the first goal of the game at 3:55. She was assisted by Jenny Wallace. It looked like the Falcons were going to take home a 1-0 victory, but Augsburg slammed in a long range shot at 16:46. With the game looking to go into overtime, Jenna Scanlon brought in the game winning goal with just 17 seconds left in regulation. She was assisted by Kacie Anderson and Halseth. Shooting really improved in the third period for the Falcons. They outshot Augsburg 15-5. The Falcon defense held strong through four power play attempts by Augsburg. The Falcons were 0-2 in power play attempts.

The Falcons played an unbelievable season opener against Gustavus Adolphus. On paper there is no way the Falcons should have won. They were out-shot by the Gusties 46-11, but the combination of a strong defense, unbelievable goal tending, and well placed shots led the Falcons to defeat the second ranked team in the U.S. College Hockey Division III poll, 3-1.

Both teams scored in the first period, Gustavus was the first to put one in the net at 5:52 on a power play. Kelly Hurley had the first Falcon goal at 13:43 from back near the center line. She was assisted by Kristen Juven and Jennifer Wallace. Shooting for the Falcons proved that quality of quantity counts making only three shots on goal while the Gusties had 17. Neither team scored in the second period, but the Falcons were again outshot 18-2. The Falcons wasted little time scoring in the third period. Sara Halseth made the play by stealing from the defensemen and taking it right down for a score at 1:01. The second goal came from an empty net at 19:20 from Kelly Jensen. The Falcons were out shot in the third period 11-6.

The Falcon sufered from several penalties, but their tough kept them in the game. "We played hard and never gave up. We kept them to the perimeter and clogged the middle," said Cranston. The Gusties were 1-6 in power play attempts and the Falcons were 0-2.

"Lindner looks the best ever and is moving better, and her attitude is great," said Falcon Coach Joe Cranston.  Lindner had a lot of experience last year and looks to fill the position well with 24 games under he belt and a record of 15-4.

Mandi Mohwinkel is the only other goalie to have some experience on the ice. She played in one game last year against St. Mary's and made eight saves. Freshmen Kim Grafstrom and Katie Kantrud also look to help at the goalie spot.

The Falcons look to be strong at defense with returning junior Jenny Wallace. She was named to the AHCA West All-American team year. She helped out on offense too, scoring seven goals and led her team in assists with 13.  She finished eighth in the NCAA Div. III in power-play goals with six. Another junior, Emily Nierenhausen, will be looked at to contribute in points as well as defense. She had four goals and five assists for nine points. Sophomore Renae Bergh, also re-joins the team at defense. Last year she contributed three goals and one assist.  Sophomore Kacie Anderson is another returning defensemen. Last year she had three assists. Freshmen Kelli Dahle, Leigh Landgraf, and Jessie Dyslin are also ready to come into the defensive position.

Cranston is happy with the depth at forward this year. "We have three balanced lines and the fourth line is very capable. We have more depth in every position then we have ever had." The Falcons averaged only 2.81 goals a game last year, but with 13 of the top 16 scorers back, that average looks to improve.

The NCHA has always been notably tough, but Cranston is looking at three teams in particular. "We are getting ready for a stronger conference this year, particularly Stevens Point, Superior, and Eau Claire. Every year it gets better."

River Falls received two first place votes and were chosen second in the NCHA preseason Coaches Poll. Stevens Point was chosen first with four votes.  Superior was chosen third and Eau Claire came in fourth while Finlandia and Lake Forest tied for fifth.

Forward Kelly Jensen (So., Eden Prairie, Minn. Eden Prairie HS) had a solid game and helped the Falcons to an 8-1 win over St. Catherine last week. “She is working hard and has been all year. She has a great attitude and has been playing well every game,” said Falcon Coach Joe Cranston. Jensen contributed two goals and two assists in the win at Hunt Arena. Her first goal of the game, and second of the season, came in the second period at 16:41. That proved to be the game-winning goal. Her next goal came at 17:06 of the third period. She recorded her second assist of the season at 4:55 of the third period and her next assist came at 15:52 of the final period. She now has three goals and six points this year.

"I think we will be a much-improved team, returning 16 players," Falcon Coach Joe Cranston said. "Last year we were pretty young, and those players returning should be able to step it up and contribute right away.  This team has the most depth of any team we have ever had."

The Falcons are raising money to host a six team tournament this season, and are planning a trip out East next season. The team is taking $150 donations from people and businesses to sponsor us, and in return they receive a beautiful Sponsor Plaque. If you would like to donate please contact Joe Cranston at 715-425-2835.

Last year she really proved herself as one of the top collegiate players by making her second appearance on the first All-NCHA team. She finished eighth in the NCAA Div. III in short-handed goals and led the Falcons in goals with 13 and was second in points with 19.

Her plans for her senior year are simple. "I want to work hard and win."  She sees this season as having a lot of potential and her team goals are high. "We're shooting to win the regular season and conference playoff championships - we're aiming to go as high as we can."

She has been her team's captain for the last three years and says her job is easier this year. "It's not so much telling people what to do anymore. It's a more in depth role because a lot of them are returning players."

Falcon Coach Joe Cranston sees the potential in Paulson. "She sets her own expectations. She leads by example. I just hope she can stay healthy, if that happens, she will have a great year." Paulson had a pulled muscle after the team's first game against Gustavus Adolphus and had to sit out against Augsburg. But Duluth, Minn., native came back to play in the next weekend against St. Thomas and Bethel. Cranston named her the Falcon Player of the Week for her "hard work" during those games.

"I don't have any goals or expectations for her; she's a great person and a good hockey player, and good things come to people like that. I hope we can have a great season, that would be deserving of our three seniors," said Cranston.

Paulson is one of the team leaders again this season. She leads the team with six points and has scored three goals. Already this year she has twice been named the team's Player of the Week, including after the Falcons opened NCHA play last weekend with a sweep at Eau Claire.

What Paulson will miss the most are, "the friends I have made and going out everyday and competing with teammates and other teams."  She doesn't plan to go on playing competitively but hopes to keep playing for fun and might go into coaching,  "to see it from a different perspective."

Paulson looks back on her seasons with the Falcons and playing for Cranston as a great experience. "It has been the best sports experience of my life. Cranston has taught me so much about the game and just life in general. It is always fun because he is a friend just as much as he is my coach."

Senior Leah Baron's grace on the ice rink can be contributed to her years growing up figure skating, and continued practice teaching figure skating, but that isn't the only thing that led up to her successful career as a forward on the Falcon hockey team.

From when her tennis practice begins in August till when the hockey season wraps up sometime in March she is running on all cylinders. On top of her sports she also puts together a winter show in December for the young figure skaters she helps teach. But don't think that she's slowing down anytime soon. "My Dad asked me to join his inline skating marathon team. I didn't do it before because it was tough to train and be in sports, but this summer I plan to join to start training with them. I don't think I'll ever not have sports in my life."

Baron has had an amazing career playing for the Falcons. Starting in her freshman year she started had an immediate impact when she scored five goals and had 10 assists. She improved into her sophomore year nine goals and 16 points. She was also named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll. Last year was her best year with eight goals and 17 points and was again named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll.

This year she is starting out another strong season when she scored her first goal Nov.19 against Eau Claire and helping her team defeat the Blugolds 5-3. She scored her next goal in the team's 8-1 win against St. Catherine. She also had her first assist that game. Her next assist came Dec. 10 at Finlandia. The next game she picked up another assist.  "Leah is the best skater on our team, and that gives her the ability to be create offense. She is also a very good defensive player," said Cranston.

Baron will miss playing for the Falcons and one memory that will certainly stay with her was during her freshman year when she was first doing conditioning for the Falcons. "In high school we never really had to condition that hard, and I remember catching my breath after the first day of conditioning and thinking to myself what have I gotten myself into."

But Baron worked through it proved no task is too difficult. "She is usually one of the first players in on the forecheck, and she works hard coming back too. Every day I look forward to seeing her at the rink; she is an awesome kid!" said Cranston.

"I wanted to play with the best," said junior Forward Molly Buehner when asked why she decided to join the Falcon women's hockey team.  "Every year this team gets better and better.  It is nice to be a part of it."

She begins her third year and so far is proving to be an asset to her team.  "Molly is a hard worker. I can always count on her to give 100 percent in practice or in a game," said Falcon Coach Joe Cranston.

It's hard to tell where Buehner's tough work ethic came from. Whether from a supportive family, a determined high school coach, or having to prove herself playing on a boys high school team. Either way her tough attitude is proving to be a benefit for the Falcons.

Buehner's first taste of hockey came in the fifth grade when her family would take her to the USHL's Waterloo Blackhawk games.  "They were always fun to watch," said Buehner.  Both her brother and sister played and her Mom took over as coach of the women's team that was just beginning. "My parents were very supportive, they took us to those 5:30 a.m., practices, were willing to take us to play pond hockey, and were there with us through the good times and the bad."

Buehner's parents were worried about one aspect of her hockey career. "The only reservation my parents have ever had was allowing me to play on the boys high school team. Being from Iowa, there aren't many opportunities to play competitive hockey. I had to take the chance and never looked back."

Buehner proved she could play tough and handle herself playing on the boy's team and eventually earned herself respect from her high school coach.  "He always pushed me to get better, always believed in me, and cared bout me being the hockey player I wanted to be.  He continues to have that role in my life."

Buehner held on to that tough work ethic she learned in high school and used it in her college career. In her first year with the Falcons, she earned herself playing time in every game in the forward position. She also worked hard off the ice and earned a spot on the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll.

Her sophomore year showed the same enthusiasm as she scored her first collegiate goal and had one assist. She continued to make outstanding grades and was named to the NCHA All-Academic team and again to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll. It was during this year that Buehner marks her favorite memory playing for the Falcons during the conference tournaments. "We had nine forwards and four defenders going into the tourney. In the first round, we went into overtime, almost playing 80 minutes with a small roster. I was able to get a goal and an assist, but the feeling of giving all I had and being successful is the priceless feeling I won't forget. We ended up winning that game and all of that hard work throughout the season paid off."

This year Buehner is continuing to work hard at the forward position even if she's not always on the ice at game time. "She is a role player, and doesn't always get as much ice time as some of the other players, and she still manages to stay positive," said Cranston.

Buehner thinks the season so far is going how she planned. "I knew we would have a good team and we do. Losing a few certain games was kind of surprising, but I have such confidence that we can take the talent that we have and do some damage in the conference tournament and maybe even more."

Buehner knows what it takes to be the best and what it means to play for the best. Her formula for success is quite simple.  "My personal goal for the season is to continue to give the team everything I have in practice, the locker room, games, etc., never taking a day off mentally or physically."

Junior Jennifer Wallace is in her third year with the Falcons and her experience at defense, and her flexibility to play forward when needed, has made her able to help her team during almost any situation that arises.

"I'm a huge head case.  I have rituals I do before games, as soon as I get there I do stick handling with a ball, tape my stick while looking at the ice and thinking about the game and what we practiced, then after we run and stretch I think about the game some more while looking on the ice. I also make sure I'm always in a certain place in line," said Wallace.

Her pre-game habits seem to be paying off this year, as so far she has contributed three goals and seven assists.  One of her goals came in the 2-1 win over UW-Stevens Point.  She was the first to score in that game at 15:06 of the first period.  Her other two goals came in the Falcons home game against Finlandia, which they won 6-4.  She scored her first goal in the first period at 13:35 and the other one at 19:12 of the third period. "I think Wally is playing pretty well for us this year.  She sees the ice well, and makes good decisions," said Cranston.

After an explosive year like that, Wallace said the pressure to live up to that has increased.  "It's a little harder to live up to expectations, my role has changed so my numbers aren't as big this year.  I've also changed my position to forward so I'm still learning," said Wallace.

When Wallace decided to play for the Falcons she knew she didn't want to play for a losing team. "I decided to come to River Falls because the teams were doing well and I didn't want to play DI. It was also closer to home so my folks could come to games. The coaches here are also like my ones from high school and I liked that," said Wallace.

According to Wallace, her favorite memory came when her team played with heart. "My favorite memory so far is from last year when we played against Superior in the league playoffs. We only had two or three lines, but we kept trying. We were so dead and it was our last game of the season. Everyone put their heart into it. We left everything out on the ice that game and it was a great way to finish the season." The Falcons topped UWS, 5-4, in overtime.

Junior goalie Amber Lindner started playing goalie when she was in the 7th grade.  "There was no girl goalie that played full time, so I tried it and I was good," said Lindner. And she's only gotten better.

From the beginning of Lindner's career with the Falcons she started putting up big numbers. She played in 11 games her freshman year and had an impressive 9-1 record. She had a 1.26 goals against average and a .939 saves percentage. She finished in the top 10 in the NCAA final statistics, finishing fourth in winning percentage, sixth in goals against average and seventh in saves percentage.  Lindner was also named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll.

After an impressive first year, Lindner didn't coast, but worked hard to get better. She appeared in 10 games and had her first shutout last year. She had a 2.08 goals against average and a .911 saves percentage. She was named to the NCHA All-Academic team and to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll. Her contribution helped round out a tough final line of defense as she shared ice time with goalie Marlene Yaeger, who holds several records for the Falcons. Lindner holds a few records of her own.  In 2004 Lindner finished with a 1.26 goals against average which is the best ever in a single season by a Falcon.

"Amber is a hard worker on the ice, and she has worked very hard off the ice both during the season and during the off-season to get to the level that she is at right now," said Cranston. So far this year Lindner has started and played in every game and has a record of 11-6 with a 2.05 goals against average and a .922 saves percentage. She is 12th in saves percentage and 13th in goals against average in the NCAA Div. III.

When the other team scores, Lindner takes it especially hard. "There's a lot more pressure because there is only one of me. I take it more personal when the other team scores. I think, we might now not win."

That mentality has pushed Lindner, a Moorhead, Minn., native, to constantly be improving her game. "Amber really enjoys the game, and is a true competitor. She came into this season as the dominant goalie, but she's constantly working on improving her performance," said Cranston.

Lindner is majoring in communicative disorders and is a member of the National Student Speech Language Hearing Association and plans to go to grad school after graduating from UWRF. She also hopes to coach hockey. "I'd like to coach at the high school level because at that age they're good and you can still mold them."

He will be the first to admit that his lengthy tenure surprises him as much as anybody. "I originally came here thinking I would stay a maximum of five years and move on, but the University and the community have been so good to me that it has just turned into 20 years.

"This is a very special place. I am allowed to teach and coach. I am allowed to live a life doing what I love to do. The University administration has its priorities in order. I have really come to respect basketball at the Div. III level. To have the opportunity to coach basketball at the highest of levels in the WIAC and UW-River Falls is a privilege."

"I know we have struggled at times. I make no excuses. We are what we are. We play in Karges Center, a sub-par facility. We lack the historical perspective of some of our competitors. I have enjoyed taking the kids that want to come to River Falls to get a good education, and play basketball, and make us competitive. We have been consistently good, and I am very proud of that."

Bowen graduated from Indiana University with an undergraduate degree in physical education in 1966. He served the Hoosiers as a student-manager under two time National Champion Coach Branch McCracken. Like his father, son Matthew was a basketball manager at Indiana University under Coach Bob Knight. Basketball runs deep in the Bowen family. Grandfather Vernie Bowen was an Indiana High School coach for 40 years. Nephew Christopher is currently the basketball manager at the United States Military Academy under Coach Jim Crews.  Nephew Andrew Bowen is currently the basketball  manager at Bethel College in Mishawaka, Indiana.

Rick and his wife Sandy met as students while at Indiana University. They have been married for 39 years and have two sons. Sandy is retired after teaching cell biology and botany at River Falls High School. Matthew is assistant basketball coach at Valparaiso University and married to Birmingham, Ala., native Ashli. They have a daughter, McKenzi, 3, and reside in Valparaiso, Ind.

Basketball runs deep in the Bowen family. Like his father, son Matthew was a basketball manager at Indiana University under Coach Bob Knight. Grandfather Vernie Bowen was an Indiana High School coach for 40 years. Nephew Christopher is currently the basketball manager at the United States Military Academy under Coach Jim Crews. Nephew Andrew is currently the basketball manager at Bethel College in Mishawaka, Ind.

Along with his on the floor coaching duties and administrative tasks, he directs the Falcon recruiting efforts, coordinates scouting and film exchange, and is director of the Falcon summer basketball camps and annual high school varsity team camp / tournament - the Great Falcon Shootout.

Kurran Sagan is in his second season with the Falcon coaching staff after spending two years as a student manager for the basketball program from 2002-04.  Last season, he completed an internship with the Athletic Department at UW-RF in game administration. He is currently employed as the Recreational Leadership Coordinator at UW River Falls.  He graduated in the spring of 2005 with a degree in health and human performance.

Hans Hoeg returns for his junior season after leading the Falcons in minutes, scoring and rebounding in his sophomore season. A mainstay for the Falcons the past two seasons, Hoeg will be counted on for his abilities on both ends of the court.

High School/Personal: Hoeg had an outstanding high school career at Litchfield winning two Class 2A championships and being named to the All-State tournament team both years. He was chosen to the All-Area team twice and was named all-conference three times. He averaged 14 points, four rebounds and three assists for the Dragons. Hoeg is majoring in business. He is the son of Tom and Beth and has one sister.

Erik Kossoris returns for his junior season with the Falcons. An important contributor for the Falcons the past two seasons, Kossoris will use his shooting skills and his ability to get to the basket to be a main player in the Falcon backcourt in 2005-06.

High School/Personal: Kossoris played at Waukesha South High School and earned three letters. He averaged 15 points, four rebounds and two assists a game as a senior, and was named to the second all-conference squad. Kossoris is majoring in elementary education and is the son of Carole and Tom, who are both in education. He has one sister.

High School/Personal: James attended Horizon High School where he was a two-year letter winner. He averaged 10 points, five rebounds, two assists and two blocks a game. James was named to the all-conference team and received honorable mention to the all-defensive squad. He is the son of Deborah and Bernell and has one brother and one sister. He is majoring in psychology.

High School/Personal: Maas was a four-year letter winner and starter at Northwood High School.  He averaged 18 points, eight rebounds, five assists and three steals a game. The Evergreens finished 21-4 in his senior season.  He is the son of Theresea and Rick Maas and has one brother and one sister.  Maas is majoring in math and health & human performance.

High School/Personal: Hall had a great career at Glenwood City High School helping the Hilltoppers to the 2001 Wisconsin State Championship and a 26-1 record his junior season. As a senior he averaged 16 points, seven boards and four assists. Hall was part of two conference championship teams and was named to the all-conference team after his senior season. Hall is majoring in math education. He is the son of Neil and Terry and has one sister and one brother, Scott, who is a manager for the Falcons. He is an active member of the UWRF Student-Athlete Advisory Committee.

Scott Kelly is back for his sophomore season after being a major contributor for the Falcons in his freshman season. A very versatile player, Kelly will be counted on to continue his fine play both inside and on the perimeter for the Falcons.

Tim Pearson is back for his sophomore season after gaining valuable experience towards the end of the 2004-05 season. A tough rebounder with good shooting skills, Pearson will be counted on to play a more significant role in his second season as a Falcon.

Ryan Zylstra is ready to begin his second season at the center position for the Falcons. After seeing limited minutes as a freshman in 2004-05, Zylstra will look to use his size and touch around the basket to be a force inside the paint.

High School/Personal: At Annandale High School he earned two letters and was a two-year starter. He averaged 17 points, 10 rebounds and one assist for the Cardinals. Zylstra was named to the all-conference team and was named the team's Most Valuable Player. He helped lead the Cardinals to the sectional finals his junior and senior season. He is the son of Darlene and Dave and has one brother and three sisters. He is majoring in business.

Cory Rondeau returns to the Falcons for his sophomore season. A player with outstanding jumping ability, Rondeau will look to contribute as a rebounder and a screener at the forward position for the Falcons.

Joey Cowley returns to the Falcons for his sophomore season after missing most of his freshman season due to injury. A fine outside shooter, Cowley will look to contribute to the Falcon backcourt this season.

High School/Personal: Cowley enjoyed a wonderful career at Northwestern High School. He was named to the all-conference team twice and earned All-State honorable mention honors his senior season. He averaged 19 points, five rebounds and five assists a game in his senior season. Cowley was a WIAA Scholar-Athlete and played on the Division 3 North All-Star team. His team won the conference championship and advanced to the section finals his senior season. He was named to the Superior Daily-Telegram All-Area team. Cowley was a three-year starter and letter winner. He is the son of Judy and Dan. His father was his coach at Northwestern. Both of his parents are teachers. He is majoring in health & human performance.

High School/Personal: Glaeser played at Northwestern High School where he earned honorable mention to the All-State team. He was twice named to the all-conference team. He was a DECA officer and was on the academic Honor Roll. He is the son of Leanne and Jim. Glaeser is majoring in health & human performance.

"Hans is very deserving of making the All-WIAC team," said Falcon Coach Rick Bowen. "It is a tribute to Hans. He led us in almost all categories this season. He certainly is one of the top 10 players the the best conference in the nation."

The Falcons came out of the gates firing, knocking down 63 percent from field goal range as well as from beyond the arc in the first half. With 1:45 remaining in the first half Mark James knocked down a free throw to give the Falcons their largest lead, 34-23.

The second half proved to be a different story for the Falcons. Ryan Stangl came out of the locker room firing for the Blue Devils, scoring 15 second half points, helping Stout back into the contest. Stout took their first lead of the second half with 15:12 remaining when Stangle hit a three point basket from the corner to give the Blue Devils a 42-41 lead. Stout built their lead up to six points when Stangl hit another three-point basket with 11:35 to play. The Falcons remained resilient and follwed with and 8-0 run of their own, culminating in a three-point shot from James. The Blue Devils than pulled away again, bringing the lead up to seven points with 6:30 to play. The Falcons were able to bring the game within two, but were never able to get any closer and ended up losing the game 75-65, with the score not validating the tension of the game.

The winner of the River Falls - Stout game will play the winner of the Platteville-Stevens Point game on Thursday at the site of the highest seeded team. The WIAC playoff championship game will be Saturday, once again at the site of the highest remaining seeded team.

In the second half the Eagles slowly chipped away at the Falcons lead. With 8:21 to play Chris Ask hit a three-point basket to tie the game at 48-48. Ask then hit two consecutive jumpers and Eagles guard Chris Fehrenbrach scored on a layup and a free throw to extend the Eagles lead to seven points with 4:30 remaining. The Falcons answered with a 9-2 run of their own to tie the game at 57 with 2:29 to play. After Eagles big man Joe Werner knocked down two free throws with 1:21 to play and the Eagles turned the ball over from a shot clock violation, Hans Hoeg hit an off-balanced jumper in the lane to tie the game at 61-61. Ask missed a short jumper as time expired sending the game into overtime.

In the first overtime neither team was able to build a lead larger than two points. Mark James hit a jumper from the wing with 47 seconds remaining to tie the game and then blocked Fehrenbrach's attempt for the game-winner as time expired.

In the final overtime La Crosse was unconscious from the floor, they finished the second overtime knocking down all six of their attempts from the field. Ask banked in a leaner with 14 seconds remaining in the game to beat the shot clock and to seal the victory for the Eagles.

Hans Hoeg hit the game-winner on an off-balanced jump shot from the free throw line with 18 seconds remaining in the game. The Blugolds had one last shot, but Eau Claire guard Jared Bardon's shot attempt fell short with six seconds to play. Alex Maas knocked down one of two free throws with 0.1 on the clock to give the Falcons a 59-57 win.

The Falcons were led by Ryan Zylstra, who scored a career-high 27 points, blocked a career-high five shots and tied his career high with nine rebounds. Hoeg was the only other Falcon in double figures, scoring 21 points. Ryan Thompson led the Falcons with four assists.

The Falcons didn't have the lead in the second half until there was ten minutes remaining. Hoeg hit a three point shot to break a 45-45 tie. Soon after Hoeg's three the Blugolds regained the lead and led until 2:26 in the game when Zylstra hit a short jumper. Bardon scored soon after on an alley-oop lay-up before Hoeg hit the game winner with 18 seconds to play.

UW-River Falls was led by freshman guard Erik Olson's 14 points. He shot 5-9 from the field, including 4-6 from beyond the arc. Olson knocked down buzzer-beating three point baskets to end the first half and at the end of regulation. Olson was the only Falcon player to score in double digits for the Falcons. Ryan Zylstra scored nine for the Falcons. The Blue Devils held Hans Hoeg, the Falcons leading scorer, to seven points. Mark James led the Falcons with six rebounds.

The Falcon fell behind by 21 points after the first 8:30 minutes of play in the second half. UW-RF was able to chip away at the lead for the remainder of the game, but never came closer than ten points. The Blue Devils pulled away down the stretch and won the game 63-49.

Hans Hoeg knocked down two clutch free throws tie the game at 56-56 with :06 remaining. After a time out Tim Pearson stole the Titans' inbounds pass and found Ryan Thompson streaking down the side of the court, Thompson thrusted up a shot from a few feet beyond the three-point line with :03 to play, the shot was rebounded by James who laid in the game-winner as time expired to give the Falcons the shocking upset.

In the second half the Titans fought back. With 6:35 remaining in the game Titans senior guard Andy Jahnke hit a three to give the Titans their first lead of the game at 52-50. Oshkosh built their lead to 56-50 with 3:36 to play, they never scored again. Zylstra scored on a lay-up on an assist from Thompson to bring the Falcons within four. On the next possession Thompson banked in short jumper to bring the Falcons within two with only 2:35 remaining in the game. James was substituded into the game and played tight defense on Jahnke over the next few minutes and scored his only bucket of the game to bring victory to River Falls.

The Falcons finished with three players in double figures. Ryan Zylstra led the Falcons with 18 points and grabbed seven rebounds. Hans Hoeg scored 14 points on 4-9 shooting and Ryan Thompson scored 10 points, while dishing out a game-high eight assists and grabbing five rebounds. Mark James led both teams with ten rebounds.

The Falcons scored first in the second half bringing them within six, but the Pointers followed with a 7-0 run of their own to bring the lead back up to thirteen. The closest River Falls came after that was within seven when Eric Kossoris scored to bring the Falcons within seven. Stevens Point answered with two quick threes and the Falcons never recovered.

In the second half the Falcons slowly crawled back into the game, eventually gaining the lead on a lay-up from Ryan Zylstra with 5:53 remaining. Hoeg hit another lay-up and Zylstra hit a short jumper to give the Falcons a 55-49 lead with 3:36 remaining, the Falcons didnt score again. Werner scored seven of his nine points in the final three minutes helping the Eagles pull away with a victory.

The Falcons were once again led by Hoeg, he scored 19 points and grabbed six rebounds. He shot 8-13 from the field and 3-4 from three-point range. Zylstra scored 14 points and grabbed six rebounds for the Falcons as well. The Falcons were sparked by 10 points off the bench from freshman Erik Olson, he also picked up five rebounds. Ryan Thompson led both teams with eight assists.

Hans Hoeg was the top performer for the Falcons, knocking down 6-11 shots from the field, including 5-8 from three-point territory and 9-10 from the free throw line. He finished the game with 26 points. Ryan Zylstra scored 14 points and led the Falcons with nine rebounds. Eric Kossoris proved to be a spark off the bench, scoring 13 points, including 3-6 from beyond the arc. Ryan Thompson played all 40 minutes and led the Falcons with five assists, he also picked up nine points and grabbed three rebounds.

The Falcons were led in scoring by Zylstra who scored 22 points. He was 7-13 from the field and 8-10 from the line. He also led the Falcons with nine rebounds and he had two blocks. The 22 points and nine rebounds are career highs for Zylstra. He is averaging seven points and 3.1 rebounds a game. Hoeg also was in double figure for the Falcons with 14 points and he had five rebounds and three assists. Ryan Thompson led the Falcons with six assists. UWW had four players score in double figures led by Jeremy Manchester who scored 22. He was 8-16 from the field, including 6-8 from three-point range. Andy Freund led the Warhawks with seven rebounds.

The Falcons and Tommies struggled on offense to open the second half. With 14:20 remaining in the game Zylstra hit a short jumper to give the Falcons a 38-36 lead. The Falcons held a short lead for most of the second half, building their largest lead of four with 11:27 to play on two made free-throws from Hoeg. The Tommies held an early lead in the half at 36-34, but didnt gain the lead again until 36 seconds in the game when Bryan Schnettler hit a contested three to give the Tommies a 55-53 lead that they would never relinquish.

The Falcons trailed by as many as 18 points in the second half but were able to make a valiant comeback and take the lead with 5:40 remaining. The Falcons and Storm traded baskets down the stretch, but Simpson scored the last bucket, with :09 remaining in the game. Alex Maas missed a last second three point basket from the corner as time expired that would have won the game for the Falcons.

Ryan Thompson led the Falcons with 18 points. He scored 13 points in the second half and knocked down three baskets from beyond the arc during the Falcons second half comeback. Thompson finished the game 7-11 from the field, and 4-8 from three-point range. He also led the Falcons with five assists and grabbed four rebounds. Hans Hoeg scored 16 points for the Falcons and grabbed a team-high five rebounds, he also shot 7-11 from the field.

The Falcons finished the game with four players scoring in double-figures. Pearson and Hoeg led the team, and Scott Kelly and Ryan Thompson added 11 and 10 each. Eric Kossoris led the Falcons with four assists.

In the second half the Falcons made a valiant comeback, but were only to bring it within six points with 2:19 to play on a jumper from Scott Kelly. The Scots responded over the next minute and a half with a basket and a free throw to put the game out of reach.

The Falcons fell behind 6-0 in the first four minutes and were unable to come back from the early deficit. The Falcons never led in the game and after trailing 12-5 with 13 minutes remaining in the first half, coming closest with 17:42 to play in the game when Scott Kelly scored to bring the Falcons within six at 33-27. The Pioneers then went on a 22-2 run over the next ten minutes of play to bring the game out of reach.

Hans Hoeg led the Falcons with 21 points, while picking up six rebounds. Cory Rondeau played well in his first collegiate start, scoring 10 points on 5-6 shooting. Rondeau and Mark James led the Falcons with seven rebounds each.

Hans Hoeg led the Falcons once again, with 14 points and eight rebounds. Mark James added nine points and Scott Kelly and Eric Kossoris chipped in eight a piece. Ryan Thompson led the Falcons with five assists.

The Falcons were led by juniors Eric Kossoris and Hans Hoeg. Kossoris scored 20 points on 7-14 shooting from the floor and led the Falcons with six rebounds. He also contributed two assists, two steals and no turnovers. Hoeg finished with 18 points, hitting 6-16 from the floor. He also finished with four rebounds, three assists and led both teams with four steals.

The Falcons had a terrific trip to Hawaii over the Thanksgiving weekend - the only negative was the outcome of the games. "The trip was everything we wanted - except for the outcome of the games," said Falcon Coach Rick Bowen.

The Falcons were once again led by Hans Hoeg, he scored 17 points and grabbed six rebounds. Eric Kossoris scored 12 points as well, for the Falcons. Ryan Thompson came off the bench to play 30 minutes and score six points, he led the Falcons with five assists.

Concordia-St. Paul opened the second half with an 8-2 run and took an early second half advantage, with a 37-32 lead. The Falcons fought back and tied the game at 46-46 when Mark James knocked down a three from the wing with 8:25 remaining on a pass from Ryan Zylstra. The game remained tight for the remainder. Kenneth Pointer hit a clutch three-point basket with 1:28 remaining in the game from the top of the key to give the Golden Bears a 56-50 lead. Hans Hoeg hit two consecutive short jumpers to bring the Falcons within two with only 28 seconds to play. Ty Thomas hit one of two free throws for Concordia-St. Paul with 20 seconds remaining to extend the Golden Bears lead to three. On the Falcon's final posession Hoeg missed a three-point basket from the wing and Eric Kossoris missed a last second desperation three off the rebound to give the Golden Bears the victory.

Hoeg led the Falcons in scoring with 16 points, he also picked up seven rebounds and two assists. Zylstra was the only other Falcon in double figures, he scored 14 points and pulled down five rebounds. Kossoris led the Falcons with four assists. James also grabbed seven rebounds on the game.

The Falcons finished 8th in the WIAC last season and have been predicted to finish in the same position this season by the sports information directors of the WIAC, but Coach Rick Bowen thinks the team is better than their predicted finish.

The Falcons bring back many notable players as well. Juniors Eric Kossoris and Hans Hoeg lead an experienced backcourt. Both played respectable minutes as freshmen, in the Falcons WIAC Championship season only a couple years ago.

Kossoris enters his junior season after averaging 9.1 points per game for the Falcons last season. He finished with a .829 free throw percentage and led the guards with a .439 field goal percentage. He is expected to lead the Falcons as the starting point guard this season.

The Falcons experienced backcourt will bring leadership to the team this year, but in order for the Falcons to finish somewhere between fifth and seventh in the conference they'll need strong seasons from the post players as well.

Forward Scott Kelly enters his second season as a Falcon after contributing quite a bit in his freshman season. Kelly started 10 games and averaged 4 points per game. He led Falcon freshman in minutes per game, points per game and rebounds per game. At 6-5 Kelly spreads out the floor for the Falcons with his ability to play inside and knock down the three point shot.

The Falcons also need to have a strong season from sophomore Ryan Zylstra. Zylstra played in 14 games as a freshman, starting four. He averaged three points per game and 1.4 rebounds. He will begin the season as the starting center for the Falcons.

In addition to an experienced starting line-up the Falcons maintain a good amount of depth. In addition to Olson - Tim Pearson, Ryan Thompson, Nick Hall and Cory Rondeau should all play some minutes off the bench.

Thompson averaged 18.8 minutes per game last season and started 11 games for the Falcons. He averaged 2.1 points and led the team with 51 assists. Pearson came off the bench last season and played some big minutes. He averaged 1.8 points per game in 5.3 minutes. On Feb. 12, 2005 he hit a three point shot in the Falcons upset victory of Platteville. Rondeau is expected to be the back-up post man after playing very limited minutes in his freshman season. Bowen commented on Rondeau's improvement from last season. "Here's a guy we almost cut, who is now going to be our back up post player," Bowen said. Hall will also contribute. In his sophomore season he started 11 games and averaged 1.9 points per game. He finished the season with an assist-turnover ratio just over two, with 39 assists and 19 turnovers.

The Falcons enter the 2005-06 season with a lot of optimism and with a very hard working group of players. "We've had the best first month of practice I've ever had in my career," Bowen said. "I love the work ethic of this group of kids."

It is possible to derive comparisons between the Badgers and the Falcons; they both play in tough conferences, they both play in Wisconsin and they both play basketball, beyond that, the comparisons are minimal.

Prior to the game the Falcons enjoyed a pre-game meal at a restaurant in their hotel and had some down time to rest and relax before the game against the Badgers. Falcon players Ryan Thompson and Tim Pearson discussed the game in their hotel room before the game. "I can't believe we're playing the Badgers," Thompson said. "I thought this day would never come."

He continued about what the team can take out of playing a Div. I team like the Badgers. "I see no downside whatsoever," Bowen said. He went on to say that it is important to play difficult games against teams such as the Badgers and Con.-St. Paul, a Div. II team that the Falcons will host on Nov. 18.

The Falcons were able to score in transition after Falcon guard Ryan Thompson stole the ball from Kammron Taylor. Thompson dropped it off to Scott Kelly who threw and outlet pass to Eric Kossoris. Kossoris dished it off to Erik Olson for the basket.

The Falcons played tough transition defense in the first half; Mark James deflected a pass off of Badgers forward Alando Tucker with about nine minutes to play in the half to force the Badgers first turnover. Moments later the Badgers score their first transition basket on a lay-up from Tucker.

As the half wound down the Falcons began to come back. Hoeg and Olson each hit three point baskets and Zylstra knocked down a couple free throws and with 1.8 seconds remaining in the half to give the Falcons an 8-3 run. The teams entered the half with the score 41-17.

Badgers head coach Bo Ryan praised the Falcons in a press conference after the game. "They played hard and got after it, they were very aggressive," Ryan said. "If we're going to play exhibition games, lets play these kind of games."

Hoeg led the Falcons in scoring with nine points, shooting 3-8 from the field. Zylstra started at center for the Falcons and finished the game with eight points and a game-high 12 rebounds, while playing 29 minutes.

Transferring from junior college to a four-year school can be difficult for some. For senior forward Alex Mass, his first year at UW-River Falls was no exception. Maas transferred from Mesabi Community College in his junior year. Before that, he spent his freshman year playing for Augsburg College in the Twin Cities. He says that last year was a difficult one, but gradually he adjusted, and he believes this year is going extremely well and he's ready to contribute a lot to the Falcons in 2005-06.

"I think when I first got here I struggled for a while," Maas said about his first year at River Falls. "Then in the second semester of last year, it got better. Now I think that this year is going really well."

Mass attended Mesabi Community College in northern Minnesota for two years. In his last season there, he was a starter and helped the team win the Minnesota State Junior College Championship. Prior to that, he played for Augsburg College. River Falls is his third school in four years. He says that transferring so much makes him have to get used to some new things.

Maas had different reasons for transferring to River Falls. He wanted to play in the WIAC and he also wanted a school with his major, horticulture. River Falls just happened to be the school with both. "I kind of wanted to play in the WIAC," Maas said, "River Falls was a school with my major, so I decided to come here."

Maas was born with a basketball in his hands. He grew up in Minong, Wis., and started playing basketball when he was three. His father, Rick, has been a basketball coach for 29 years so Maas was always around basketball. He would go to his father's practices and shoot around. His father was also a big influence on him and his basketball career. He happened to be Maas' coach from seventh grade up to his senior year of high school.

With his father standing on the sidelines, Maas was able to have an outstanding high school career at Northwood High School. Through his career, he averaged 18 points a game. He scored 1,000 points during his high school career. He earned all-conference honorable mention his freshman year. In his junior and senior year he was able to make the all-conference team. He was a four-year letter winner at Northwood and a four-year starter. In his senior year, he helped Northwood to a 21-4 record.

Like most student athletes, Maas has other interests besides playing basketball. He enjoys hanging out with friends and lifting weights. He also likes the outdoors. He enjoys hunting and fishing. Maas is a rifle hunter and usually hunts deer, even though he hasn't been too successful. He says that the biggest deer he's gotten was a four pointer.       Being a junior college transfer on a sports team is never easy. Maas' first year at River Falls was no exception. Last season, Maas played in 20 games and started one. He was basically a role player for the team. This season, however, both he and Falcon head Coach Rick Bowen believe that Maas can get into the playing rotation and expand on his role.

Maas has some ideas on what he needs to do to get more playing time. "I need to be more productive in scoring," he said. "I want to be a guy that coach can trust to put in and handle the ball, and play solid defense."

"I think Alex needs to be consistent," Bowen added. "He demonstrates the ability to shoot occasionally. Sometimes he shows real flashes, but he's just inconsistent. I have every hope that Alex will work his way into the playing rotation."

An adjustment he'll have to make for his final season is getting back into the game-playing mindset. He said playing in open gym doesn't compare to the mental and physical preparation of an intercollegiate game.

Bowen said James will also bring a veteran's experience to the young team. As one of two seniors on the team, James said he is confident in leading the team. He said he thinks the team realizes that he wants what's best for the team, and when he does something, they see that in him.

"The climate was a big issue the first year," Bowen said. Not going to classes led him to academic ineligibility for the first time in his life. He said that was the toughest concept for him to deal with.

As a psychology major, James understood he would have to condition himself to adjust to the cold. So he wears as little clothes as possible when it starts to cool down, to get his body used to being chilled. By the time it gets to be really cold and there's snow on the ground, he doesn't have to suddenly adjust, and he said that makes it easier.

He said he made a system where he makes himself spend two hours a day for four days a week in the library studying. Even if he doesn't have a test or assignment, he will look over his notes and familiarize himself with the material as much as possible.

That maturity and commitment he has made will help him with his future aspirations.  Next on James' to-do list is to get into a law school and become a lawyer. He said he is looking into Emory Law School in Georgia or Arizona State. He said he thinks his undergraduate degree in psychology will help him with law because he will understand the human mind and that would help.

Basketball has also given him knowledge he can apply later in his life. James said the social aspect of athletics is the biggest bonus because he has developed communication skills with people that he otherwise would not have. His competitive nature has also been enhanced through basketball and he thinks it will make him a better employee.

He said his grade-school friend, Channing Frye, who played basketball for the University of Arizona and is now a New York Knick in the NBA, and he jokes around with him saying he's got an advantage because he has a conference championship ring, and Frye doesn't.

The Falcons flew out to Hawaii to play in the Concordia-Irvine Classic in Maui. James said he was excited about the trip for many reasons. He said just going to Hawaii was exciting, and playing basketball there was fun, and his family was there as well.

Leaving his family and familiar area was hard to do, James said. But he said he thinks it has made him stronger. James being here has made the team stronger. "He's very verbal and enthusiastic," Bowen said of James. "If everyone feeds off of him, it will make a big difference."

His second season is River Falls brought Kossoris his first minutes of playing time. In 21 appearances Kossoris averaged 10 minutes a game and played a huge roll defensively. His defensive talents helped the Falcons win the 2004 WIAC title.

"We've have a pretty rough first half of the season but I think that we are starting to come together. The second half of the season is all conference games so we'll take it from there, hopefully get some wins, and get a nice seed in the playoffs."

Hoeg was able to shine in high school. He attended Litchfield, Minn., High School and won two state championships in his junior and senior seasons.  Hoeg averaged 14 points, four rebounds, and three assists throughout his career.

This season, Hoeg is first on the team in average points with 16.9, first on the team in average rebounds with 4.9, and second on the team in average assists with 1.8. Looking at the numbers, the Falcons have gained a great dependence on the play of Hoeg.

Besides sharing a common fervor for the sport of basketball, what does the Falcons 6-10 center Ryan Zylstra have in common with NBA legends Magic Johnson and Michael Jordan? Not only are all renowned for their exceptional athletic talents, but all three men have a stern commitment to another lifelong passion - entrepreneurship.

After graduating from UW-RF with a business-broad area major in 2008, Zylstra plans to pursue his ultimate career objective involving the launch of his own web-development business. Steadfast and determined to be his own boss, he attributes his industriousness, both in e-commerce as well as on the basketball court, to the adamant "work ethic" that he's learned from his parents.

Though highly-driven, Zylstra (or "Z" as his teammates call him) has a very "easygoing" personality, but is quickly learning how important it is to be aggressive down low in the post. After years of scouting NBA icon Shaquille O'Neal, Zylstra hopes to emulate Shaq's persona out on the court: "He can throw people around and that's what I want to do."

Zylstra, the leading BIG man for the Falcons, hopes to capitalize on his "posting up and rebounding skills" as the rest of the season unfolds and is working to incorporate a new "dribble drive" move into his game to ensure that the defense is always on its toes. He has already been named the Falcon Player of the Week once this year with his career high performance of 22 points and nine rebounds against UW-Whitewater.

This Annandale, Minn., native is no stranger to accolades, though. In high school "Z" was named to the all-conference team and honored as team MVP. In addition, he lead his team to two consecutive section semifinal appearances, where his high school team lost to Falcon teammate (and now roommate) Hans Hoeg's Litchfield team both times.

Now as a first-year starter for the Falcons, Zylstra is quickly getting acclimated to the intensity of the WIAC and the game situations inherent within such a powerful conference. "I used to get nervous, but now it's just a matter of performing my best."

To Falcon Coach Rick Bowen it is extremely evident that Zylstra has made tremendous strides in his game this season. "Since the start of the season until the last two or three ball games, the improvement of Ryan Zylstra has been some place between very good and extraordinary," he said.  "The biggest improvement I see in Ryan is that he's getting confidence in himself and in his game."

And with the chemistry gradually igniting for the Falcon core, Zylstra's performance can only bolster the high hopes of the team for the post-season tournament. Zylstra, confident in the progression of his team says, "We are starting to play really well right now. We will be pretty tough once the conference tourney comes around; no one will want to play us."

Thus far in his collegiate basketball career, "Z's" fondest memory has been his red-shirt freshman season when the Falcons were crowned WIAC Champions, but with two-and-a-half seasons of eligibility remaining, Zylstra still has two goals to accomplish before he retires competitively from the game: to win the WIAC post-season tournament and to have an opportunity to play in the NCAA Tournament. Both ambitions, Zylstra believes, are very attainable.

Basketball may be his sport of choice today, but in elementary school "Z" could be found shooting goals on the soccer field. Once fifth grade basketball season came, he decided to trade in his soccer cleats for a pair of Nike high-tops. The size seemed to fit just right back then, and though he might have outgrown a few pairs over the years, thankfully, those Nikes still fit.

A self-claimed "country boy" at heart, Zylstra spends his summers working at his Dad's insurance office and tending to the lawn and "grunt work" of his old farm home. Though spare time comes seldom for "Z", he spends most of it reading books and working out. His favorite book is The Da Vinci Code by Dan Brown.

Whether it's managing his future web-development business or battling in the post for the Falcons, Zylstra continually reminds himself to, "Never give up. You never completely know the outcome until the final buzzer." Even then, there should always be a perpetual drive to improve and get better everyday.

"I would still love to be a coach at some time," Hall said about possibly coaching in the future, "it's always been a passion and a dream of mine. I'd take it on as a challenge and try to do the best I could."

Hall's coach at UW-River Falls, Rick Bowen, says that having Hall around is like having an extra assistant coach. He says that Hall's biggest asset is his knowledge of the game and what he brings to practice.

"No one understands the game like Nick," Bowen said about the senior guard. "Nick's one of those guys that's a coach waiting to happen. No one understands what I want done on the court better than Nick."

Hall's father has been a coach in Hall's hometown of Glenwood City, Wis. He took Hall to his practices while his mother worked. Even though Hall's father didn't coach him directly, he has always helped develop his game.

"It's very possible for us to get on a little streak," Hall said. "We weren't expecting to be conference champs for the regular season. If we could be playing the best basketball that we can at the end of the year, we could possibly go out and win the conference tournament and get into the NCAA Tournament."

"Nick is caught in kind of a tough place," Bowen said. "I really wish he was playing more. He's one of those types of players that only coaches understand and appreciate. Every team has got to have a Nick Hall on it. He really dedicates himself to the game."

Hitting this brick wall has put a huge dent in Kelly's playing time. In the opening game of the season against Concordia-St. Paul, Kelly played 25 minutes. In the second game of the year against St. John's, he played 33 minuets. But as of late, his playing time has been decreasing.

"He's having trouble standing on the beach and throwing the ball in the ocean," Bowen said about Kelly's shooting as of late. "It's all confidence. I can't see anything in his shot mechanically that I can change."

Starting as a freshman is never an easy thing in college basketball. Kelly experience was no exception. He says that he was nervous in the beginning of the year but adjusted quickly. This year, he has adjusted to the speed and talent of college game.

He believes that the team is a lot better and closer this season than last. "It seems like everyone on our team gets along well," Kelly said. "We came close and competed in every single game, we just haven't won. We have more leaders this year."

Kelly is majoring in business administration with a coaching minor. When he gets done with his schooling, Kelly would like to go back to Hastings and work for his father's business. He also hopes to coach high school basketball.

In his spare time when Kelly is back home, he enjoys anything that involves the outdoors. He enjoys fishing and boating. He claims that the biggest fish he's ever caught was a 28-inch walleye last summer.

Hovet received her Psychology undergraduate degree and Coaching minor from UW-Stout. She completed here Master's Degree in Kinesiology with an emphasis in Sport Psychology and Sociology at the University of Minnesota. She currently teaches at UWRF in the health & human performance department along with her coaching duties.

Kathy Holbrook is in her fourth year as an assistant coach with the Falcon women's basketball program. Falcon Coach Cindy Hovet says, "Kathy has been excellent for our coaching staff and program. She'll continue working with our post players, help with recruiting, and assist in scouting and planning for our opponents. She is enthusiastic to be part of our program and does a fantastic job working with our student-athletes. Kathy truly believes in the Division III philosophy and is committed to our players having a great experience. She is professional, positive and driven to help us become a better team. Kathy has learned our system and gets better at teaching it every year. She's tremendous to work with. We're lucky to have her on our staff."

Mara Reif-Wenner  is in her fifth year as an assistant coach with the UWRF women's basketball team. Falcon Coach Cindy Hovet says "Mara is always one step ahead of me around the office and gym. She keeps things organized and is the detail-oriented assistant that every coach wants on staff. She takes care of game management and most of our travel arrangements. Mara works with our perimeter players in practice and assists with recruiting and scouting to prepare for our opponents. She has been around UWRF basketball for a long time and is incredibly motivated to see Falcon basketball at the top of the WIAC. Mara understands what UWRF basketball is all about and contributes to that mission every opportunity she gets. She makes my job a lot easier." Reif-Wenner was a four-year letter winner for the Falcons, ending her playing career with the 2000-01 season. She was the captain of the team that finished 18-8 overall, which is the most by a Falcon team since the 1988-89 season. She was named to the All-WIAC first team and was also chosen for the WIAC All-Defensive unit. She averaged 10.6 points, 6.1 rebounds and 3.7 assists per game. Reif-Wenner led the WIAC in assist-to-turnover ratio with 2.06.

Reif-Wenner is currently employed at the 3M Company in St. Paul, Minnesota. She is also attending graduate school at the University of Minnesota pursuing a career in the exercise physiology area. She earned her undergraduate degree in Chemistry in 2001 at UW-River Falls. This spring she will be teaching exercise physiology in the UWRF health & human performance department.

Miranda Biteler returns as a team captain for her senior season with the Falcons in 2005-06. Biteler’s leadership and work ethic are definite strengths. Coach Hovet says, “Miranda’s maturity and drive are tremendous for our team. She works very hard at her game and takes pride in being a contributor on both the offensive and defensive ends of the floor.” This season the Falcon’s will look to Biteler to be one of the team’s defensive stoppers on the perimeter. Along with her defensive assignments, the Falcon’s will be expecting her to let loose on the offensive end of the floor this year. Her versatility with 3-point shooting, going to the hoop off the dribble and pulling up anywhere in-between should be tough to defend. She had a break out season in 2004-05 playing in all 25 games and starting in 21. Miranda averaged 26 minutes per game and was a consistent 39% field goal shooter. She averaged 6.6 points, 2.2 rebounds and was second in assists (62). She led the team in free throw percentage (30-36, .833). Biteler joined the Falcons after being a two-year starter at Chaska High School in Minnesota. She earned honorable mention to the All-Conference team averaging 9.4 points, 2.7 rebounds, and 4.6 assists a game in 2002. She was captain of the team and won her school’s Triple A (Arts, Academics, & Athletics) Award. She is the daughter of LeRoy and Wanda Biteler. Miranda is majoring in Health & Human Performance with minors in Business and Coaching.

Chisato Nakaike returns to the Falcons for her fourth and final season in 2005-06. She has developed into a complete offensive player for the Falcons and is a scoring threat from anywhere on the court. Besides developing her offensive abilities, her defensive intensity continues to be a strength. Coach Hovet says, “Chisato has been steadily improving the past couple years. Her tenacity on defense has been consistent and her commitment to taking care of the ball and rebounding is really going to help her turn the corner this year and help our team. She’s always been a good shooter and defender, but I expect the other dimensions of her game to be much improved this season.” She played in 15 games in 2004-05 averaging four minutes a game. Chisato was sidelined a majority of the 2003-04 season with a knee injury. Nakaike had an extremely successful basketball career in Japan at Shogyo High School. She was Best 16 player in Fukui Interschool championships and was a Best 5 at the National Athletic Meet. She is the daughter of Yukio and Satomi. Chisato is a Marketing Communications major with an International Studies minor.

Krista Cordes is a talented guard who returns for her third season with the Falcons in 2005-06. Cordes is expected to get a significant amount of playing time this year at the wing position. Her improved strength and aggressiveness on the defensive end of the floor and on the boards has really added to her game. Coach Hovet says, “Krista can put quick points on the board. She has such a great attitude and competitive spirit; I’m excited to see her on the court more this season. She has become a well-rounded player with her improvements in defense and rebounding, she’ll be a tremendous asset to our team this year.” She played in 22 games in 2004-05 and averaged 2.8 points and one rebound a game. She had a career high in points with 13 vs. Stevens Point. She played in eight games in 2003-04 and improved her game in all phases. Krista joined the Falcons in 2003 from Farmington High School in Minnesota. She was a two-time All-Conference selection and three-year starter for the Tigers. She averaged 16 points, five rebounds and one assist per game her senior season. Cordes was voted her team’s Most Valuable Player in 2003 and finished with over 1,000 career points. She was a member of the Falcon volleyball team this past fall. She is the daughter of Teri and Jack Cordes. Krista is majoring in Business with a minor in Spanish.

Megan Lindman returns for her junior season with the Falcons in 2005-06. Lindman is a talented all-around athlete with an intensely competitive attitude. Her toughness helps her gain position inside to score or grab the boards. She has led the Falcons in blocked shots each of the past two seasons and has 62 in her career. Megan is expected to break into the starting line-up this season and be a key player in all aspects of the game. Coach Hovet says, “Megan is a tremendous athlete and has gotten much stronger and more aggressive going to the hoop. She can balance her physical presence with finesse and quickness, which is a great combination inside. I’m expecting Megan to emerge as one of the toughest post players in the league this year.” She had a tremendous season with the Falcons in 2004-05 averaging 8.9 points and 5.5 rebounds a game, which is in the top three in both categories. She played in every contest and started four times averaging 22 minutes of playing time. She scored double digits in 11 games with a career high 20 points against Stout. She had a double-double against Whitewater when she scored 12 points and grabbed 10 rebounds. Lindman led the Falcon’s in rebounding in six games. In 2003-04, Lindman played in all 26 games and started twice. She averaged 8.1 points and 4.4 rebounds. Lindman joined the Falcons from Rochester Mayo High School where she averaged 13.3 points, 9.5 rebounds, 2.1 blocks and 3.6 assists a game. She was selected to the All-Conference team for three seasons and was her team’s captain in 2003. Her team won conference titles in 2001 and 2003 and participated in the Minnesota State Tournament in 2000. Lindman was a four-year starter for the Spartans. She is the daughter of Debbie and Randy. Megan is majoring in Broad Area English.

Melanie Preiner was one of the team’s most durable and consistent players last year and returns for her third year in 2005-06. She played and started every game for the Falcons, one of only two players to accomplish that feat. She averaged a career best seven points and led the team in assists (73). She wasn’t afraid to go inside either and finished averaging 3.4 rebounds a game. Preiner was the team’s top three-point shooter (33-95, .347). For the past two seasons she has been one of the team’s most consistent players at both ends of the floor. She led the team in steals in 2004 and finished second in 2005. She has found more scoring opportunities and has steadily improved her defensive skills. She could become one of the University’s all-time leaders in both assists and steals in her four years. Coach Hovet says, “Melanie has been a rock on our team. She has been a great point guard for us and she is equally capable of playing the wing. Her toughness and competitiveness are consistent. She brings all the intangibles a team could ask for. She hasn’t necessarily stood out the last couple years but she’s absolutely been a key to our success.” Preiner had an immediate impact with the Falcons as a first-year player in 2003-04. She played in every game and started the last 22 contests. Preiner averaged 4.2 points and 3.7 rebounds while playing just over 21 minutes per game. She joined the Falcons from Stillwater High School where she was a two-year starter and earned three letters. She averaged 6.6 points, 2.5 rebounds and 5.5 assists for the Ponies. Preiner was selected to the All-Conference team, and won her team’s Coaches Choice and Hustle Awards. She is the daughter of Julie and Tom. Melanie is majoring in Marketing Communications.

Traci Reimann has played a lead role for the Falcons in each of her first two seasons and returns in 2005-06 to build on her previous successes. She played and started every game in 2004-05, one of only two Falcons to accomplish that feat. The talented post player scored a career high 28 points against Platteville. She scored in double digits in 11 contests and had three double-doubles. In one five game stretch in midseason she scored 81 points and grabbed 50 rebounds. Reimann earned honorable mention to the All-WAIC team and was twice named the team’s Player of the Week. She was second on the team in both scoring and rebounding. As a first-year player in 2003-04, she started every game and finished the season as the team’s top rebounder averaging 8.2 per game. That effort on the boards ranked fourth in the WIAC. She averaged 9.1 points, and earned over 28 minutes of playing time a game. She has shown steady improvement on the offensive end of the court. Her defensive skills have improved and she has the ability and tenacity to take over on the boards and dominate in the paint. She is a loyal team player who encourages her teammates at all times. Coach Hovet says, “Traci was a great player for us last year and has made huge improvements over the summer. I’m excited to see her jump into a leadership role this year and dominate both ends of the floor in the paint. She certainly has the ability and attitude to be one of the best.” Reimann joined the Falcons after a solid career at North Branch High School in Minnesota. She was a two-year starter for the Vikings and helped her team to three State Tournament appearances. Her 2001 team finished second in the finals. Reimann was her team’s Most Valuable Player and she was selected to the All-Conference team as a senior. She averaged 15 points, seven rebounds, and three assists per game. The Vikings won four conference titles. Traci is the daughter of Kathy and Dan Reimann. She is majoring in Health & Human Performance Option II with a minor in Coaching.

Kim Sorenson is back for her second season with the Falcons in 2005-06. Kim missed the majority of last year with a season ending injury after competing in only a handful of games. She played the point position in eight contests and averaged 12 minutes a game. Although she couldn't compete most of the year, Sorenson was able to pick up many valuable college basketball lessons and is expected to be an improved player this winter. Her quickness and tenacious attitude on defense will prove to be very frustrating for opposing players. Coach Hovet says, "Kim's a worker, she always plays hard. I couldn't ask for a kid that's more willing to lay herself on the line for her team. She's not very big but she has the heart of a lion and never gives up, she makes things happen on the court. There's no doubt she's a good player. One of her greatest gifts is her ability to elevate the intensity of her teammates."  She came to the Falcons from Blaine High School in Minnesota. At Blaine she earned four letters and was a two-year starter. She averaged 10 points, four rebounds, five assists and five steals a game. Sorenson was her team's captain as a senior and was named to the All-Conference team. She earned All-Conference honorable mention after her junior season. In her freshman and sophomore seasons she was voted her team's Most Valuable Player. She earned the school's Academic Silver Award. She is the daughter of Ron and Deb. Kim is majoring in Health & Human performance with a minor in Coaching.

Jana Benitz joins the Falcons for her first season in 2005-06 and is expected to get minutes at the wing. She transferred to UW-RF from UW-Stout. Jana loves basketball and is driven to compete. She’s anxious to get out on the court and help our team. She’s positive and works hard every day. Jana moves well without the ball and isn’t afraid to get inside and get physical posting up and rebounding. Benitz played at Plum City High School where she was named to the first all-conference team for three straight seasons. She was a three-year starter and was twice the team’s captain. She was named to the Eau Claire Leader-Telegram All-Area team three times and also to the Republican Eagle All-Area squad. A talented all-around athlete, she earned four letters in basketball, competed in volleyball for four seasons and track & field for three years. Benitz averaged 12 points, six rebounds, 2.5 assists and two steals a game.

Caitlin Hunstock joins the Falcons for her first season with the team in 2005-06 and she plays the post position. She competed at West Chester University in Pennsylvania in 2004-05 where she played in 20 games and scored six points and grabbed six rebounds. Caitlin can play inside or outside and is learning our system pretty quickly. She has soft hands in the post and a nice shot on the perimeter, which gives us an opportunity to utilize her versatility at multiple positions. I’m expecting Caitlin to help us early and contribute through out the season. Hunstock played at Minneapolis South High School where she was he team’s Most Valuable Player in 2004. She was named to the all-conference team three times and was her team’s captain twice. She earned four letters and was a three-year starter. She is the daughter of Cheryl and William and her twin sister, Meghan, is also a member of the 2005-06 Falcon team. Caitlin is majoring in Sociology with minors in Criminal Justice and Spanish.

Meghan Hunstock is in her first year with the Falcons in 2005-06 but joins the team with a year’s collegiate experience. She played at North Park University in 2004-05 where she averaged 4.8 points and 2.9 rebounds a game. She played in all 24 games, and started three, for the Vikings. She shot .447 from the field. She plays the post position. Meghan is improving every day so I’m expecting her see more court time as the season progresses. She can play in the paint or on the perimeter and will be learning multiple positions within our system. She’s working at the details of the game and making huge strides in becoming a strong well-rounded player. Hunstock played at Minneapolis South High School where she was a three-year starter. She was named to the all-conference team three times. An outstanding student, she was a member of the National Honor Society. She is the daughter of Cheryl and William and her twin sister, Caitlin, is also a member of the 2005-06 Falcon team. Meghan is majoring in Sociology.

Jodi Kauth joins the Falcons for her first year of collegiate basketball in 2005-06. Jodi has a great attitude and is very committed to learning to play basketball at the college level. Her improvements are evident every day in practice. She’s a good athlete and will be a contributor to our team as she continues to learn and develop. Jodi is incredibly driven to learn and compete at this level, there’s no question she’s going to be successful. Kauth, who plays the post position, played at Granton High School where she averaged 13 points and 13 rebounds in 2005. She was named to the second all-conference team and finished second in the conference in rebounds. She shot .470 from the field and had 35 steals. She was very active in her high school where she was in the FFA, was the class president, was in the band and was involved in forensics. She is the daughter of Laura and Steve. Jodi is majoring in Agricultural Business with a minor in Dairy Science.

Justine Speckel joins the Falcons in her first year of collegiate basketball and plays the guard position. Justine is a great team player and is willing to work at the game. Her attitude and toughness are strengths that will help her continue to develop and improve on the court. She is learning and improving very quickly and is definitely an asset to our team. She’s been playing multiple positions and is willing to do anything she can to contribute. Speckel earned three letters and was a two-year starter at Buffalo High School. She averaged 10 points, seven rebounds and 1.5 assists in 2004-05. She was the team’s Most Valuable Player in 2005 after being named to the all-conference team. She was the team’s captain. She led the squad in scoring last season and was the team’s leading rebounder in 2004 and 2005. She earned honorable mention to the all-conference team in 2004. Speckel also competed in volleyball and softball and was the team’s captain. She was a member of the National Honor Society. She is the daughter of Patty and Tim. Justine is undecided on a major field of study but plans on minoring in Spanish.

RF was led by Melanie Preiner's 16 points and three steals. Krista Cordes had a double double scoring 11 points and grabbing a team high 10 rebounds. Miranda Biteler dished out a team high five assists and added three steals.

RF was led by Megan Lindman who had eight points, five rebounds and three steals. Krista Cordes also pitched in with five rebounds. Chisato Nakaike led the team with three assists. The Falcons turned the ball over 27 times compared to Eau Claire's 16.

Biteler finished 5-7 from the field, including a perfect 3-3 from behind the arc and 2-2 at the line. She also had five rebounds, one assist to two blocks. Krista Cordes and Megan Lindman each scored 10 points. Lindman led the Falcons with seven rebounds and five blocks. Cordes finished with six rebounds, three assists and two blocks. Melanie Preiner scored nine points, had five rebounds and she led the Falcons with four steals. The Falcons played without leading scorer (14.2) and rebounder (10.5), Traci Reimann, and Jana Benitz, who is sixth on the team in scoring (4.9). Both were injured and did not suit up for the game.

River Falls was led by Miranda Biteler who scored 15 points. She was three of six from beyond the arc. Melanie Preiner also made three three-pointers on eight attempts. She scored nine points and had three steals. Traci Reimann added 13 points and a team high 13 rebounds for the Falcons.

Stout was led by Duoss who for the season is averaging 19 points and 10 rebounds per game. She finished the game with 18 points and seven rebounds. Geissler was the only other Blue Devil in double figures scoring 11 points and dishing out three assists. She was three for four from beyond the arc.

River Falls was led by Traci Reimann who had 15 points and a dominating 17 rebounds. Melanie Preiner added 13 points and three steals and Jana Benitz came off the bench to score nine points. Kim Sorenson added six assists to lead the Falcons.

River Falls did not recieve the usual scoring output they expect from their players. Traci Reimann scored only six points to go along with nine boards. With Reimann kept under wraps, the Falcons had to look elsewhere. River Falls was led by Megan Lindman's 16 points followed by Melanie Preiner's 12. Minus Lindman and Preiner, no Falcons scored above six points.

The second half involved slightly more scoring for the Falcons but they could not keep the SP lead in single digits. The game was slow and every trip down the floor was a possession battle. Because of the pace, the Falcons were not able to gather themselves and make a quick run. The game concluded with the Pointers taking the nine point victory.

The Falcons did not recieve much help in the scoring department other than Traci Reimann's 27 points, one point short of her career high. After Reimann the next leading scorer for River Falls was Melanie Preiner with 10.

The second half started off decent for River Falls as they were able to cut the Stout lead down to single digits two minutes in, 45-36. The Falcon run would end there as Stout steamed ahead for the win. Reimann not only led the team in scoring, she also pulled down eight boards to take that category as well.

The story of the game was simply River Falls not getting much from anyone besides Reimann. Krista Cordes only had three points coming off of her 24 point preformance against UW-Whitewater and Megan Lindman added eight. If the Falcons are looking to be successful in the WIAC they are going to need to find more ways to get more output from their role players, or at least get a little more consistant.

The story of the night for the Falcons was Krista Cordes. Cordes dropped a career high 24 points which included five field goals from long range. Cordes also added seven rebounds to help River Falls to their third conference win. Melanie Preiner also made a strong effort and scored 13 points while pulling down five boards.

The first half was an up and down battle and neither team built a concrete lead. UW-Whitewater took the lead early, 8-5, when Lindsay Gerber put home a layup. The three point lead would be the Warhawks biggest lead of the game. Both teams went scoreless for the next four minutes until Miranda Biteler hit a long range three pointer that put the Flacons in the lead, 10-8. Cordes made her first three of the game when she knocked one down with 6:12 remaining in the half. Two minutes later Cordes dropped another tray which gave River Falls the 23-19 lead. The Falcons would go into the half looking at a 26-23 lead over the Warhawks.

The second half was blemished with fouls upon fouls. The pace of the game was slowed down and the game turned into an almost two hour contest. Free throws decided the game where the Falcons made 24 compared to Whitewater's 18. Cordes continued her solid effort with her third three of the game with 9:14 remaining to tie the game at 43. The Warhawks added a layup and a free throw of their own to take a three point lead. The Falcons battled back and Cordes hit her fourth three of the game with 6:16 reminaing to put the Falcons up for good, 53-49. The game concluded with River Falls taking 16 free throw attempts and making 13 of them. The Falcons extended their lead to eight points and ended the night with th victory.

Traci Reimann and Melanie Preiner kept River Falls in the game throughout and did not let up the intensity. Reimann finished the game with a team high 15 points while Preiner dropped in 10. Preiner also tallied a double-double with her team leading 14 rebounds.

The Falcons showed dominance over the Saints early in the first half. River Falls jumped out to a quick 7-2 lead two minutes in. St. Scholastica battled back and took the lead five minutes later. The Saints then put their foot on the gas and never trailed for the rest of the game. Going into the half, the Falcons trailed the Saints 33-29.

After the break, River Falls came out with a new attitude but still was not able to overcome their defecit. St. Scholastica's Sarah Klocke and Jen Kne provided most the scoring for the Saints and put the Falcons away for good. Klock scored a game high 26 points, 15 of which came from the stripe where the Saints shot 80% for the game. Kne added 19 to go along with her 11 boards. St. Scholastica slowy increased their lead throughout the second half and ran away with the victory.

River Falls had a tough time finding the net as they shot just over 29 percent from the field for the game. The Falcons were also dominated in free throws where they only made nine attempts compared to the Saints 25.

RF was led by Traci Reimann who had a team high 16 points. She also added six rebounds. Melanie Preiner had 14 points, a team high eight rebounds, and four assists. Krista Cordes and Megan Lindman each chipped in with nine points each.

RF was led by Traci Reimann who had a team high 23 points and 12 rebounds. Also in double figures were Jana Benitz who had 13 points and Melanie Preiner who had 10 points. Miranda Biteler chipped in with five assists and Megan Lindman had seven rebounds.

In the second half, RF played much better getting the game to within a point after a Krista Cordes made jumper to make the score 53-52 with 8:26 left in the game, but that's the closest the Falcons got. Platteville went on a run and closed the game with a few clutch free throws to secure the win 63-61 over the Falcons.

RF was led by Melanie Preiner who had a team high 18 points and four assists in 35 minutes of action. Miranda Biteler and Megan Lindman also chipped with 13 points each. Biteler also added six assists and four rebounds. Traci Reimann had a team high nine rebounds.

RF was led by Melanie Preiner who had a team high 15 points, five assists, and five rebounds. Krista Cordes and Traci Reimann also chipped in with 13 points each. Reimann also had a team high six rebounds. Miranda Biteler added 11 points and three assists.

RF was led by Melanie Preiner who had a team high 20 points, four steals, and three assists in 38 minutes of action. Miranda Biteler chipped in with 13 points and three assists. Megan Lindman added 14 points and five rebounds. Jana Benitz came off the bench to score 11 points and Traci Reimann had a team high seven rebounds.

RF was led by Miranda Biteler's 16 points and six assists. Traci Reimann chipped in with 15 points and a team leading 11 rebounds. Melanie Preiner added 13 points, six rebounds, and five assists before fouling out. Krista Cordes added eight points.

In overtime, UST freshman point guard Chelsea Wirtz took over with a clutch three-pointer and two free throws in the last two minutes. Cordes missed a potential game winning three-pointer after it hit the front of the rim as time ran out. UST won the game 66-64.

The score remained close in the first half. The Falcons led by as many as four points numerous times, but were never able to extend the lead. The V-Hawks largest lead was three, with 12:29 remaining in the first half. The Falcons entered the half with a 26-22 lead.

In the second half the Falcons retained their first half advantage and were able to keep the lead throughout most of the second half. The V-Hawks tied the game with 9:13 remaining, but the shortly thereafter the Falcons pulled away on a jumper by Traci Reimann and a three point basket by Melanie Preiner to give the Falcons a 58-53 lead that they would never relinquish.

The Falcons were led by Traci Reimann. She scored 25 points and pulled down 13 rebounds, adding to her averages of 16.8 and 12.3 rebounds per game. Biteler played a strong second half, scoring all 12 of her points in the second stanza. She also picked up three assists and three steals. Melanie Preiner added another 16 points for the Falcons and was able to knock down clutch free throws down the stretch to secure the victory.

The Falcons were led by Miranda Biteler who had a team high 10 points and four assists. Traci Reimann added eight points and a team high eight rebounds. Jana Benitz came off the bench to chip in with eight points and three assists.

The Falcons were led by Traci Reimann who had a team high 17 points and 12 total rebounds. Melanie Preiner added 10 points and seven rebounds. Megan Lindman also had 10 points and she pitched in with five rebounds. Miranda Biteler led the team with five assists.

In the second half, the Falcons scored a very promising 57 points and shot 56.4 percent from the field. They made 22 shots and four three-pointers. For the game the Falcons shot 45.9 percent from the field and 27 percent from the three-point line.

The Falcons hope to have more balanced scoring this season with a lot of depth at the post-position. Their strength this season will be getting the ball into the post players and hopefully getting them scoring looks. On defense, they will try to mix things up to get more turnovers and easier baskets.

"Miranda is a good leader who will be looked on to bring leadership. Reimann and Lindman are two very good post players that have improved with every practice and will looked upon to score some big baskets," Hovet said.

The Falcons also got a few new faces that will step in and play some key minutes this season. Post players Meghan and Caitlin Hunstock and Jodi Kauth will be look at to help inside. Jana Benitz looks to get some minutes on the perimeter this season.

"Jodi has a great attitude and she is improving everyday. Jana is a very good player that will get some key minutes. The Hunstock sisters, who transferred here, will both get some big minutes in the post," Hovet said.

Stout looks to be the pre-season favorite in the WIAC, but the Falcons hope to have a good chance to compete for the title this season also. Oshkosh, Eau Claire, and Stevens Point also should be in the upper half of the conference in 2006.

Hovet believes that the league is very strong this year. She feels that every team has a shot to win it. Top to bottom, she feels that the WIAC is one of the best in Div. III. "There is a lot of parity in the league this season. It's very even and no game will be easy."

The Falcons open the season at the Kalamazoo Tournament on Friday and play Finlandia in their first game. Action starts at 6 p.m. The team's home opener is set for Nov. 26 against Viterbo with action starting at 3 p.m. at the Karges Center.

There is a lot expected of her this season including leading the team on offense and to also hit some clutch three pointers. On defense, she is expected to stop the other team's best perimeter player.

She grew up in Chanhassen, Minn., and played basketball at Chaska High School. In her senior season she earned honorable mention to the all-conference team while averaging 9.4 points, 2.7 rebounds, and 4.6 assists per game.

"Basketball here and in Japan is a lot different. It was very hard for me in the beginning because I could not  understand anyone and when I would get yelled at I wasn't really sure what I did wrong because I didn't know what they were saying," Nakaike said.

"I will miss playing basketball here at RF. Right now I'm just loving every minute of it and I'm working hard everyday in practice. I would also like to thank everyone here for their support and being so nice to me," Nakaike said.

Cordes, a Farmington, Minn., native came to UW-RF after she was encouraged by Falcon Coach Cindy Hovet to study elementary education here while playing basketball. She said she also liked the small town atmosphere that River Falls has.

Starting off her freshman year on the basketball team, Cordes learned she had to have good time management skills and organize her life. She discovered early that elementary education was not for her and switched her major to business. In order to do well in her courses, excel in basketball and have a social life, she had to manage her time well.

She had to step that up even more when she made the decision this fall to try out for the Falcon volleyball team. She said she missed playing the past two years, and was excited to get back into the sport.

Cordes said she likes living with them because it makes it easier to feed off of each other's experiences. If one of them is battling school and sports, the others can be empathetic and help them get though it.

She said she now sees herself as a leader on the team. She is one of the veterans and she said she is more vocal this year. "Hopefully that helps to get everyone going, to be the spark" she said. "I want to energize everyone."

Her skills have also grown she said. "My defensive skills have gotten a lot better," she said. She said she has also become a quicker and stronger player, and all around improved.  "My ability to score and to shoot," she said are her big contributions to the team on the court.

Off the court Cordes said she tries to lead by example through her dedication to school work and attitude. She said she works hard to make the team get along by making sure no one is left out of team activities.

"Krista paid her dues with very limited game time her first two seasons. But she kept working and now it's paying off for Krista and the team. She has become an emotional boost for our team. She is one of our most versatile players with the ability to step in at any of three positions depending on who's on the floor. She's positive and an excellent teammate," said Hovet.

Reimann later attended North Branch High School where she started for two years and aided the Vikings run towards three appearances in the state tournament. She was selected to the all-conference team her senior season. For the Vikings, Reimann averaged 15 points, seven rebounds and three assists a game.

Following Reimann's great run in high school, she was recruited by River Falls Coach Cindy Hovet. Reimann knew she wanted to play basketball at the collegiate level but was not sure on an area of study. River Falls made the most sense based on its basketball program and the majors offered.

In her spare time Reimann enjoys spending time with friends and family along with participating in outdoor activities. "I like to bike, fish, and just basically any outdoor activity that you can think of."

After being asked what she planned to do over the long winter break, Reimann responded with, "Basketball, we pretty much have practice in the morning everyday and then eat lunch as a team. Lunch is then followed by another practice to finish out the day."

When asked what she remembers most from her younger days of basketball, Lindman said, "I was able to dress for the high school varsity when I was in eighth grade and the team was extremely good at the time."

Lindman's favorite Falcon moment was when the team knocked off Eau Claire last season on a last second shot. River Falls won the game 49-47.  Lindman dropped in eight points and six rebounds in that game.

Sorenson went to Blaine High School and played varsity ball right away. She lettered in each of her four years and made the All-Conference team in her senior season. Throughout her career Sorenson averaged 10 points, four rebounds, five assists and five steals per game.

In her freshman season, Sorenson was only able to see playing time in eight games due to injuries to her shoulder and knee. In those eight contests, Sorenson averaged 12 minutes and played tenacious defense.

Sorenson's sophomore season has been solid as she has played in every outing. Once again she is playing strong defense and keeping the Falcons in games. She is averaging just under 20 minutes of playing time each game and is making the most of it. She has scored 26 points and grabbed 33 rebounds. She also has 23 assists, 21 steals and three blocks.

In her spare time Sorenson enjoys hanging out with her friends and listening to a variety of music. "I will always remember our first summer league game when I got to finally play with all the girls who are now friends."

When asked of the transition from high school to college Benitz replied, "It was different coming from a division four high school where I started and played most of every game and then coming to college where play is minimized."

In this, her first season with the Falcons, Benitz has shot .418 from the field and averages 5.4 points per game. Benitz's game is improving every contest and she looks to be a big part in the future plans of the Falcons.

After high school, Hunstock went on to play college ball at Div. II West Chester University in Pennsylvania. Hunstock made 20 appearances and totaled six points and six rebounds. Following her year in Pennsylvania, Hunstock decided to transfer to UW-River Falls.

As a Falcon so far this season, Hunstock has played in 14 games where she's totaled 19 rebounds and 20 points. Hunstock is shaping up to be a player that will greatly benefit the Falcons in the future.

When asked of team and individual goals, Hunstock replied, "Hopefully get one of the top three positions in the conference standings and individually I want to step up my play and improve myself defensively."

Once playing, a competitive streak grew between her and her twin sister, Caitlin, who also suits up for the Falcons. The competition between the two was a classic sibling rivalry and there was always the competition as to who was the better player.

Whether she's performing graceful pirouettes in dance, showing her explosiveness and dexterity out on the volleyball court or engaging in the intensity and vigor of a basketball game, for Falcon freshman basketball player Justine Speckel, the "choreography" is all the same - optimism and hard work always yield success.

Speckel's incessant positive attitude and willingness to push herself to the next level have been evident throughout each and every endeavor that she has chosen to pursue. Preceding college, Speckel was an all-round athlete at Buffalo, Minn., High School where she participated in volleyball, basketball and softball. As well, she was a writer for the yearbook, a member of National Honor Society and a part of the "Student Stepping Up" program.

Dance was not the only activity that interested Speckel at a young age; she started her basketball career in third grade on her local community education team and continued to play into middle school and high school. In 5 th -8 th grade she even had the wonderful opportunity to be coached by her Dad, and then concluded her high school career as team Most Valuable Player and an all-conference selection.

Speckel's senior season was not only full of accolades, but is also her most prized memory from all of her basketball experiences. Not only was she fortunate to have a chance to play with seven senior teammates and best friends during her final year at Buffalo High School, but she also rallied her team to a much-improved record.

Now as a first-year Falcon basketball player, Speckel hopes to "keep improving everyday and to continue learning the offenses," so that she will eventually be able to help her team compete from out on the floor.

Always a pillar of encouragement for her teammates and a persistent presence on the court, Speckel has faced a new challenge as new Falcon - adjusting from playing the post position to playing wing. Though it's been a difficult transition, she deems the change "as a blessing in disguise. It's helped me get better at dribbling and shooting," Speckel said.

Adversity may be a common denominator among most college freshmen, but Speckel overcomes this obstacle by applying a demanding work ethic and enthusiasm to each facet of life. Whether academics, basketball, volleyball or dance, she prides herself on her "hustle" and her eagerness to "always get after it."

She's an ideal fit for the Falcon program because of her unwavering team spirit and ability to adapt to change. The "team" has always come first for Speckel, and this year is no different. She has high expectations for her team during the remainder of this season. "I think we have the personnel and drive to win the conference; we just have to continue to go out and battle every night."

To mentally prepare herself for the competitiveness of the WIAC contests, Speckel motivates herself by listening to music and always saying a prayer that no one on the team will get hurt. As a first-year, she knows that she will need to focus on the game to ensure that she is fully prepared to go in if called upon.

Basketball may have been her job since Sept. 15, but Speckle is attending college at UW-RF to uncover her true career calling. She may be "really, really, really undecided on a major" but is enjoying the opportunity to take a wide array of classes. Many fields have interested her so far during her first semester, and Speckle can foresee herself pursuing many different occupations in the future.

Speckel is also considering getting involved in other activities on campus. After years of playing volleyball for her high school team and a Junior Olympic club, her retirement from volleyball may be short-lived: "I really miss playing and am thinking about trying out for the team next year."

Dance rehearsals may be a past venture for Speckel, but for someone with such a positive attitude and eagerness to work hard, it will definitely not be long for Speckel to get into the "rhythm" of Falcon basketball.

Genuine enthusiasm is a laudable trait. In fact, according to legendary UCLA Coach John Wooden, enthusiasm is one of the two cornerstones to success. Wooden believes that it stems "from your heart being in your work" and that this desired "enthusiasm" will eventually become contagious to those one works with. Though only a freshman, Falcon basketball player Jodi Kauth is a true testament to his teachings.

A Granton, Wis., native, Kauth prides herself on having good morals, a compelling work ethic and an ebullient attitude. This is evident in her individual goals for the rest of the basketball season: "I want to contribute everything I can to my team to help them improve." Whether that means being feisty under the basket grabbing rebounds or being a source of comic relief for her teammates, Kauth gets the job done.

Falcon Coach Cindy Hovet also realizes the impact of Kauth's team spirit: "Jodi always keeps people smiling and laughing." This is a role that common first-year players rarely endure--but Kauth has proven she's no ordinary person.

Kauth involves herself in many different extra-curricular activities. Currently, besides being a member of the women's basketball team, she works at UW-RF Lab Farm, volunteers at both the humane society and the local hospice care subsidiary, "Treasures From the Heart."

In high school Kauth was president of a FFA chapter that won national awards, participated on the forensics team, varsity club and band, as well as ran cross country and represented her student body as class secretary. Academics were also an immutable part of her life as she was on the scholastic honor roll.

Though it's been a challenge to join on-campus organizations during her first semester of college, her propensity to partake in activities will not be suppressed for long. Kauth feels that "the more you're involved in, the better person you are because you interact with so many different types of people. You learn to adjust to any situation; you can be a leader, a team player or a follower at any time."

These past experiences have helped her transition into the collegiate game of basketball. Kauth explains the obstacles she has faced as a first-year player. "I came from a shaky basketball foundation, so when I first started I felt like I was learning the fundamentals when everyone else was accelerating."

But now with the season in its stretch drive, Hovet has seen immense improvement in Kauth's game. "Jodi can be a good player for us. She rebounds well and she's getting better and better as she gets stronger."

This 6-foot post has given empirical assets to her team this season - always observing and learning from the veterans. "As I turn into an upperclassman, I'd like to start filling the shoes of our current post players," says Kauth about her ultimate basketball ambitions.

In addition to Kauth's personal goals of "getting stronger with the ball" and emulating the proficient skills of the present posts, she hopes her team can prevail as one of the WIAC's toughest as the conference tournament draws near.

Kauth may fit Wooden's definition of "enthusiasm" in every endeavor she pursues, but she also possesses his other prized cornerstone for success: industriousness. She realizes that the absence of hard work can lead to failure.

Just as Wooden attributes his work ethic to laboring on his family's farm, so does Kauth. With an agricultural business-dairy science major she eventually wants to own a traditional dairy farm where she can see herself raising a family and instilling the same values she has received into her children.

Though she came to UW-RF from a small town and farm, she is firmly committed to eradicating the typical "farm girl" stereotype. "Most think that people from a small town are sheltered, but I've been all over the place and seen a lot."

Kauth has been to Washington D.C. twice, Mexico, Yellowstone, and even ventured on an 18-day road trip to San Francisco with her sister. "I may have graduated with a mere 30 people, but I have traveled around the country and experienced all different kinds of people and walks of life."

Other pastimes of Kauth's include: cooking, ice skating, ice fishing, hunting and doing anything outdoors. Although she hasn't had much time to engage in her favorite outdoor activities since basketball has started, she is optimistic "that the winter weather will cooperate for a couple more months."

Her basketball career may have officially begun in 8 th grade, but Kauth is just now commencing on her journey as a UW-RF Falcon. Her unparalleled "enthusiasm" and "industriousness" will not only help her evolve into a powerful WIAC post player, but ensure that she can achieve any aspiration and live out, not just John Wooden's, but her own definition of "success."

This is the third straight year that Meneghin has been named to the team. He is one of only seven players who have been named to the team for three straight years in 2006. This year he played in five games and had a perfect 5-0 record with a 2.20 goals against average and a .920 saves percentage. In his career he played in 45 games and had a 35-6-1 record. He had a 1.92 goals against average and a .928 saves percentage. He recorded six shutouts. Meneghin is majoring in accounting.

Salmela was one of the team's top defensemen. He played in all 27 games and led all Falcon defensemen in scoring. He had three goals and 16 points. His 13 assists tied him for third on the team. He scored one power-play goal and one game-winner. In his career he played in 79 games and had eight goals and 45 points. He had three power-play goals and two game-winners. Salmela is majoring in biology.

Personal: Meneghin has 30 career wins and six career shutouts with the Falcons. He will most likely have his name in the Falcon Honor Roll in games, wins, goals against average, saves percentage, minutes played, winning percentage, shutouts and saves by the end of his career. He played with the Victoria Salsa of the British Columbia Hockey League. After three years in the league, he started in the league's all-star game. While playing with the Barnaby Bulldogs he was named the team's Most Valuable Player. Meneghin had a .897 save percentage and a 3.6 goals against average in his final year with the Salsa. He went to high school at Holy Cross. He is the son of Emilio and Eva and has three brothers. Meneghin is majoring in accounting.

Mike Salmela is a familiar named to Falcon hockey fans and returns to the team for the 2005-06 season and will play defense. He competed for the team in 2002 and 2003. He then concentrated on his studies because he would like to eventually go to medical school.

Personal: Scanlon is a big goaltender who takes up a lot of the net and controls rebounds. He has great mobility and the ability to move the puck up the ice. In 2003 at Helena in the AWHL he finished with a 14-5 record with a 2.93 goals against average and a .909 save percentage. His sister, Jenna, is a sophomore forward with the Falcon women's team. He is the son of Charlie and Barb and has two brothers and one sister. Scanlon is majoring in business.

Personal: In 2003 Tiberio netted 19 goals and dished out 11 helpers to go along with his 142 penalty minutes while playing at Bismarck in the AWHL. The team won the AWHL's Borne Cup and advanced to the junior national tournament for the first time in the team's history. Tiberio lists his biggest junior hockey thrill as beating Billings in the playoffs to win the Borne Cup. He is the son of Joe and Barb and has one brother. Tiberio is majoring in business administration.

Derek Hansberry joins the Falcons for the 2005-06 season and will play forward. He played junior hockey at Wichita Falls of the NAHL. In 2005 he played 50 games and scored 16 goals and 33 points. He was the team's Unsung Hero Award winner in 2004 and was an alternate captain. In 2005 he was an alternate captain and earned honorable mention for the team's Player of the Week award. He lists his biggest junior hockey thrill as scoring two short-handed goals in the first round of the league playoffs against Texas. He is the son of Jeannette and Brian and has one brother and one sister. Hansberry is majoring in business administration.

Josh Meyers is in his first year of college hockey for the Falcons and will play defense. He played at Bozeman of the NAHL. In 2005 he played in 41 games and finished with two goals and nine points. He won the team's Best Defenseman award. At International Falls High School he was twice named to the all-conference team and twice won the defenseman Best Plus/Minus award. He earned a spot on the A Honor Roll. Meyers lists his biggest high school hockey thrill as playing in the Minnesota State Tournament. He is the son of Tina and Kelly and has one sister. Meyers is majoring in conservation.

Chris Nathe is in his first year with the Falcons and plays defense. He played junior hockey with the Tri-City Storm in the USHL. Last year he played in 58 games and scored nine goals and 37 total points. He played hockey at Elk River High School and helped the team win the Minnesota State Championship in his senior season in 2001. He is the son of Julie and Ron and has two sisters. Nathe is majoring in business administration.

Dustin Norman is in his first year with the Falcons and plays forward. He played junior hockey at Neepawa in the MJHL. He was twice named the team's Most Valuable Player. He was the leading scorer among first year players in the league with 43 goals and 87 points. He was named the team's Rookie of the Year. In 2005 he scored 36 goals and 73 total points in 55 games. Norman was twice named to the league's All-Star team. He is the son of Carla and Wayne and has one sister. Norman is undecided on a major field of study.

Chris Robinson joins the Falcons for his first year of collegiate hockey and plays defense. He played junior hockey at Lincoln in the USHL last year. In 2005 the stay at home defenseman played in 46 games and scored one goal and finished with two points. Before that he was a captain at Danville, a team also in the USHL. He is the son of Robin and Ron and has two brothers and two sisters. Robinson is undecided on a major field of study.

Robby Spalding is in his first year with the Falcons in 2005-06 and plays defense. At Roseville High School he earned honorable mention to the all-conference team for three seasons. He was named his team's Rookie of the Year and was an assistant captain in his senior year in 2005. He lists his biggest high school hockey thrill as beating the defending Minnesota  State Champions, Centennial, 3-2 in overtime in 2005. He is the son of Jennifer and Todd and has three brothers. Spalding is undecided on a major field of study.

The Falcons started out the scoring in the first with a goal from Tyler Kostiuk coming at 1:39. Stout battled back six minutes later with a power play score from Matt Mlynarczyk. Pat Borgestad knocked in a late first period goal at 17:48 to give the Falcons a 2-0 lead going into the break.

The second period was a defenive and goaltending battle most of the way. River Falls' Mike Salmela was called for checking from behind and also recieved a game misconduct halfway through. With one of their best defenders out for the game, the falcons needed to fill the void fast. With River Falls on the short end, Stout's Jake Erickson tied the game back up at two with a power play goal at 14:17. The game remained scoreless for the rest of the second and through the entire third as both teams battled into overtime.

River Falls was not able to get many shot attempts on Stout goalie Mike Stone in the overtime period. With the Falcons desperate for the win to keep their series hopes alive, goalie AJ Bucchino was pulled with 1:05 remaining to gain a one man advantage. Hopes were shattered shortly after as the Blue Devil's Andrew Stern put home the game winning goal on an open net at 4:13. River Falls' overall record drops to 17-7-3 on the season.

River Falls and Stout have a great history, especially this season. The teams met two times in the regular season and both came away with one victory. Derek Hansberry led the way with two goals in the River Falls 4-2 win in Menomonie. The Blue Devils got revenge the following day when they were able to edge the Falcons, 3-1.

With the two games coming at the end of the regular season, the Falcons and the Blue Devils will have faced each other four consecutive times following the first round of the playoffs. This might aid Stout's effort as they were able to gain some confidence in their season finale win.

The Falcons managed to play the Blue Devils five times last season, one of which being a minigame in the first round of the playoffs. This will mark the third time River Falls and Stout have matched up in the first round of the playoffs, the first happening in the 1997-1998 season. The Falcons are 3-1 against UWS in the first round of league playoffs.

The NCHA playoff format for the first round is a best two out of three games series. One five-minute sudden death overtime will be played on Friday and Saturday. If the series is tied after Saturday's game, a 20 minute minigame will be played immediately following. If the score is tied after 20 minutes, 20 minute sudden death overtime periods will be played until a winner is determined.

River Falls got off to a rough start from the start as UW-Stout was able to put the first score on the board late into the first. The Blue Devil goal came via Andrew Sterns and pushed the momentum in Stout's favor.

The second period did not go much better ad the Blue Devils were extended their lead to two early. Stout's Cory Mozak scored the Blue Devil goal at 1:32 of the period. The Falcons scored their only goal of the game almost 19 minutes later thanks to Derek Hansberry's shorthanded score. Hansberry's goal was assisted by TJ Dahl and got Hansberry to the 18 goal mark on the season.

With the score tied in the third period, Hansberry took a major penalty for checking from behind that put the Blue Devils on the power play for five minutes. The Falcons were able to stop Stout from scoring before UWS took a minor penalty at 18:42. The Falcons killed off 4:01 of the five minute penalty. With the team's skating at even strength, Tyler Kostiuk scored with just 40 seconds to play in regulation. The game-winning goal was Kostiuk's seventh of the season. Wade Harstad scored an empty net goal with 23 seconds to play - it was his seventh goal of the year.Both goals were unassisted.

The whole game was a defensive battle as both teams had trouble capitalizing on power play opportunities. AJ Bucchino was in goal for the Falcons and recorded his second shutout of both the season and his career. Bucchino stopped all 23 of the Jacket shot attempts. River Falls tallied six more shot attempts that UWS.

The win keeps the Falcons in second place in the NCHA standings with three games to play. The Falcons have 15 points and trail first place St. Norbert by three points and lead third place UW-Superior by three points.

Lake Forest battled back in the second and tied the game up halfway through thanks to Mike Kneeland's 13th goal of the season. The first and second period were nothing compared to what would come in the third.

The scoring started early in the third for the Falcons as Pat Borgestad put in his 11th goal of the season just a little under a minute in. Just under three minutes later Jared Sailer would put home the puck and extend the River Falls lead to two. Lake Forest would not go away as they tacked on two goals themselves to knot the game at three. LF goals were scored by Adam Tobias and Jordan Kniaziew. Luckily for the Falcons, they still had more gas in the tanks and they took the lead for good following a goal from Aaron Venasky with under two minutes remaining.

The hype building up to this week's game was immense as St. Norbert was the second ranked team in the nation and River Falls was the fourth. The hype died early as the Falcons were dominated in ever facet of the game.

The second did not go any better for the Falcons. St. Norbert tacked on two more goals to increase their lead to five. Both St. Norbert goals came via Sheldon Wing at 7:48 and 16:09. For the Falcons, TJ Dahl made some amazing moves with the puck looking to score but nothing would find the net.

River Falls was pretty much playing for pride the rest of the way as younger players were able to see a little more action. Falcon attempts to score were unsuccessful and St. Norbert tacked on two more goals. The first was dropped in by Hughes at 5:41 which was his second power play goal of the game. St. Norbert's seventh goal came on an off balance prayer from Ryan Petersen with :50 remaining in the game.

The second was a little more busy and the Falcons were able to score three more goals. RF scores came from two power play scores by Pat Borgestad, both under five minutes into the period, and a goal from Dustin Norman at 6:39. UWSP would also score a goal in the period via Nate Sorenson which would be there only goal of the game. The second and the game concluded with a three goal RF win.

The Falcons opened up the scoring early. Mike Salmela got the Falcons on the board first with his goal at the 6:03 mark. Chris Nathe later banged home his fourth goal of the season on the power play to give the Falcons the 2-0 lead. UWEC cut the Falcon lead to one with 5:30 remaining in the period with a goal from Ben Bosworth.

The Falcons did not coast through the second period. They continued their great play with an early goal from Jim Henkemeyer. Nathe scored his second goal of the game with a little under nine minutes to play before the break. The Falcons went into the locker room with a 4-1 advantage.

The third consisted of the Falcons protecting their lead and they also extended it with Derek Hansberry's score with less than 30 seconds to play. Hansberry's goal is his 14th of the season which leads the Falcons.

The Falcons scored single goals in each period. Tyler Kostick scored his fourth goal of the year at 16:16 of the first period to give the Falcons all the goals they would need. He was assisted by Jared Sailer and Jason Usher. Dustin Norman scored at 7:05 of the second period to give the Falcons a 2-0 lead. He was assisted by Nate Hansen and Jim Henkemeyer. It was Norman's fifth goal of the season. Derek Hansberry scored on empty-net goal with :24 to play in the game. It was Hansberry's team leading 13th goal of the year and he was assisted by Pat Borgestad.

Both teams were held scoreless until halfway in the first period when Derek Hansberry recorded his 12th goal of the season to put the Falcons on top. Hansberry's 12 goals on the year leads the team. Pat Borgestad later added an unassisted goal just under nine minutes after the first River Falls goal to put the Falcons on top 2-0. The first period would come to a close with River Falls holding onto the two goal lead.

St. Mary's was able to cut the River Falls lead in half thanks to Tim McNamara's goal 2:39 into the second period. McNamara's goal would be the only score of the period as the Falcons squeeked into the second intermission with a one goal lead. Going into the third, the Falcons were leading in shots 33-19.

The score remained locked at 2-1 for most of the final period until TJ Dahl finally gave the Falcons the comfortable two goal lead with eight seconds remaining on an open net. Dahl's goal is his eighth which ties him for second on the team in the category with Borgestad. Dahl leads the team in points wth 23.

Aaron Venasky, assisted by Lance Malark, opened up the scoring for the game with a goal three minutes in. Both teams had two power play opportunites in the period put could not capitalize. The first ended with the Falcons on top, 1-0.

The second period went rough for the Falcons as Bethel was able to put the puck in the net twice to take the lead. The first Bethel goal was scored by Ryan Adams :20 into the period. Neal Carlson added the second Bethel goal with his power play score 15 minutes later. River Falls' Pat Borgestad tied the game at two with a late second period goal. The second was all Bethel yet it was still anyones game.

The final period was a reverse from the second in which River Falls showed dominance. The dominance took place mainly on defense as the Falcons stoned Bethels nine shots on goal. River Falls took 13 shots of their own and were able to get one in the net thanks to TJ Dahls power play goal at the 7:30 mark. River Fals put a lock down on Bethel and took the win.

In the second, the Falcons were able get a game tying goal from Joe Tiberio at 18:28. Tiberio was assisted by Aaron Venasky and Derek Hansberry on the score. The second period consisted of a lot of great defending by both teams. River Falls was leading in shots at the end of the period, 25-16.

The third period started with a 2-2 tie but would not stay that way for long. The Falcons increased their offensive output and were able to put the puck in the net four more times. River Falls scoring was started by Wade Harstad 8:30 in. Harstad's goal proved to be the game winner. Hansberry's power play goal just under a minute later added an insurance goal for the victory. Nate Hanson scored a fifth Falcon goal at the 18:01 mark and Hansberry scored his second power play goal on the game with 17 seconds remaining in regulation.

The first period started out great for River Falls as they were able to jump out to a 2-0 lead. The Falcons first score was by Wade Harstad just over five minutes into the period. Harstad's fifth goal of the season was assisted by Derek Hansberry and TJ Dahl. Pat Borgestad added the second goal eight minutes later, assisted by Dahl. The Falcons recorded 15 more shots on goal than the Pipers in the period and dominated the puck.

Pat Borgestad recorded his second goal of the game early in the second period and increased the Falcon lead to three. Dahl and Hansberry assisted Borgestad on the goal. Hamline got their first goal of the game 11:53 in via Matt Zilles and cut the River Falls lead to two. The Piper's momentum was short lived as Dustin Norman put the Falcons back up by three 3:43 after Zilles' goal. TJ Dahl recorded his fourth assist of the game on Norman's goal while Hansberry knotched his third. The second period proved to be the end of the scoring for River Falls.

The first started physical which carried on for the rest of the game. River Falls was able to get in the scoring column first with Derek Hansberry's power play goal with four minutes remaining in the period. Chris Nathe added another goal for River Falls two minutes later which extended the Falcon lead to two. River Falls looked solid at the end of the first as they held a somewhat confortable lead.

St. Scholastica cut the Falcon lead in half 1:17 into the second with a goal from Trevor Geiger. The Saints were not ready to surrender a loss yet and kept the Falcons scoreless in the second period. St. Scholastica was leading the shot department through two, 21-19.

The Saints fought back in the third and were able to tie the game up with less than five minutes remaining. Shortly after the goal, St. Scholastica's Gordon Burnett was charged with a five minute major penalty which put the Falcons in the power play for the remainder of regulation. River Falls' Dustin Norman was able to squeek by a power play goal with 31 seconds remaining to give the Falcons the lead for good.

More excitement, at least for UW-Superior, was created early in the second when the Yellow Jackets' Colin Guiguet knocked in a goal 2:23 into the period. The Falcons responded eight minutes later with a goal from Derek Hansberry to knot the game at one. Hansberry's seventh goal of the season was assisted by TJ Dahl and Mike Salmela. The second came to an end with the both teams locked at 1.

The third period began and ended with a tie. Neither team could get any offense going. The Falcons won the shot department 12-11 but could not capitalize. The goalies for both teams remained solid as the game headed for overtime.

The Falcons stretch their no win streak to 3 games but hault their losing streak at 2. River Falls looks to add a win when St. Scholastica visits Hunt Arena Saturday night. The puck drops at 7:05 p.m.

St. Norbert dominated the first period and were able to jump out to a 2-0 lead. The Green Nights goals were scored by Conner Hughes a little over one minute into the period followed by a shorthanded goal from Spencer Carbery seven minutes later.

Before River Falls could make a comeback attempt, St. Norbert increased their lead to three with a power play goal by Lonny Forrester (4:06). River Falls scored a goal ten minutes later by Aaron Venasky which cut the Green Night lead to two. The third period ended with River Falls trailing and looking at a tough road ahead of them.

River Falls' Derek Hansberry was able to cut the lead to one early in the third with the Falcons second goal of the game. Hansberry's power play goal marked the end of the scoring for the Falcons as St. Norbert ran away with the victory. The Green Nights were able to tack on two more goals late as they coasted to victory. The St. Norbert goals came from Sheldon Wing (4:01) and Andrew Derton (14:07).

The Falcons jumped out to an early lead in the first with a goal by Derek Hansberry 9:55 in. Hansberry's fifth goal of the season was assisted by Dustin Norman and Pat Borgestad. River Falls was able to take a lot of shots on goal in the period and doubled Lake Forest in the department, 18-9.

The second came with Lake Forest making and early push to take the lead. The Foresters scored a goal via Matt Forsyth almost a minute into the period and then tacked on another goal two minutes later by Cory Wilson. Lake Forest's 2-1 lead did not last long as Pat Borgestad knocked in the game tying goal assisted by Dustin Norman and Mike Salmela (6:20). The second period came to a close with the score knotted at five as both teams looked hungry for the victory.

The Foresters scoring momentum carried into the third as they were able to get a goal from Graham Melbourne 3:03 into the period. Melbourne's goal proved to be the game winner. The Falcon's pulled their goalie with forty seconds left but were not able to capitalize.

The start of the game was pretty low key as neither team could get on the board. River Falls won in the shot departement by out shooting the Blugolds 11-9. None of the twenty total shots in the first period found the net.

The Falcon momentum did not shift as the third period began. Andy Scanlon was clutch in goal as he made many key saves to keep the Blugolds from any hope of a comeback. Eau Claire did add a early period goal from Sean Clark (6:09), but would give up two goals to the Falcons later on. Jim Henkemeyer increased the Falcon's lead to 6-2 with 9:56 remaining in the game. TJ Dahl pleased the crowd with his third goal of the game a little over a minute later. Dahl's goal was his seventh of the season and also increased the Falcon scoring output in the game to 7, giving the crowd in attendence ice cream for the third time this season. Dahl records his first hat trick of the season and is the second Falcon this year to complete the feat. The Blugolds made one last push with a goal by Steve Dus (12:48). Eau Claire was shutout the rest of the game as the Falcons won easily.

The start of the game was dominated by the Falcons as they were able to put the puck in the net first with a power play goal by TJ Dahl, 9:31 into the period. Dahl's goal is his fourth of the season which ties him for the team lead. Jared Sailer later added to the Falcons lead with a power play goal 15:20 into the first. The Falcons now had a healthy lead going into the second period, 2-0.

The second period brought more offense for the Falcons as Jim Henkemeyer increased the lead to three a little over halfway through the period (13:58). Henkemeyer's goal was his third of the season which was assisted by Dustin Norman and Wade Harstad. Steller defense and goaltending highlighted the rest of the period for River Falls and continued through the rest of the game.

The Pointers attempted to make a comeback early in the third with their first goal of the game scored by Sean Fish 3:54 in. River Falls then closed out regulation in a dominating fashion, not allowing Stevens Point to score again.

Stevens Point took 11 more shots on goal than the Falcons but were not able to capitalize. The Falcons scored on 2 of their 5 power play opportunites while the Pointers were held scoreless in 6 power play attempts.

The Falcons look to carry their victory momentum into Saturday night's game when Eau Claire visits Hunt Arena. The game will be the Falcons second conference game of the season and will start at 7:05 p.m.

The UW-River Falls Men's hockey team looked to better their tie against St. John's from Thursday night and succeeded by beating Augsburg College on Saturday, 7-4. Hunt Arena was not up to the normal capacity for Falcon games but the intensity was still there. The crowd in attendance was once again treated to ice cream for the second time this season.

The first period went very well for the Falcons as they were able to repeat Thursday's feat of scoring the first goal of the game. The River Falls goal was scored by Joe Adams (6:27). With the goal, Adams seperated himself as the leading goal scorer for the Falcons this season with 4. The second period went back and forth the rest of the way as the Falcons stayed in the lead with their one goal.

Senior Dan Meneghin made his first apearence in goal for the Falcons this season to prepare for upcoming conference games and was solid, tallying 29 saves. Meneghin picks up his first of hopefully many wins this season.

The Falcons entered Thursday night's game at nationaly ranked St. John's with a 2-1-1 record and left with a tie, 2-2. The game was played at the National Hockey Center in St. Cloud which threw a wrench in the game due to the rink being olympic size. This did not seem to bother the Falcons as they were able to spread out their lines and capitalize.

The first period started off well for the Falcons as they put the first goal on the board. The goal was scored by Derek Hansberry assisted by TJ Dahl (3:46). Dahl is now tied for the team lead in points with six. St. John's later answered the Hansberry goal with their first goal of the game coming from Scott Bjorklund's power play score (10:54).

Coming into the second period, the Falcons were dominating in the shot department 12-9. The shots resulted in another Falcon goal by Wade Harstad assisted by Dustin Norman (17:10). Harstad's goal is his third of the season which ties him for the team lead with Joe Adams. Norman's assist is his second of the season. The score remained at 2-1 through the remainder of the second period. The second period was highlighted by stellar defense and goaltending from the Falcons.

Shots on goal heading into the third period stood at 19-17 in favor of the Falcons. St. John's Aaron Getchell (3:19) scored to tie the game, 2-2. The Falcons were now dependent on coming up with another goal to gain the lead. The third period consisted of more great defense and goaltending for the Falcons. With 1:32 left in the third, Wade Harstad was charged with checking from behind and the Falcons were forced to play shorthanded for the rest of regulation. Regulation came to a close with a 2-2 tie.

The first period consisted of very little scoring and a large amount of penalties. The lone goal of the period was scored shorthanded by Gustavus Adolphus' Loren Havemeier (15:22). River Falls had the advantage in the first period in the shot department, 13-9, but wasn't able to capitalize on the opportunities.

The energy did not increase and Gustavus ran away with the game. The third period started with an early goal for Gustavus Adolphus by Steve Dusich (1:02). Jon Keseley added a fourth goal for Gustavus just over two minutes later which proved to be the game winner (3:25). Twenty seconds after Gustavus' second goal of the period River Falls cut the lead down to two with a score by Aaron Venasky (3:39). The lead was once again cut to one with another Falcon goal shortly after Venasky's by Pat Borgestad (3:56). The final sixteen minutes went scoreless and the Falcons came up short for the first time this season. The game seemed to sway in Gustavus' favor throughout as they dominated the puck.

After Eidsmo's goal, the game turned into a struggle that did not let up until the final horn of overtime. Neither team was able to add on a winning goal before the end of regulation. Overtime did not result in another score either and the teams stayed deadlocked at 5. For the Falcons, St. Olaf always is a struggle and they showed strong effort in their ability not to give up. The solid effort allowed the Falcons to recover from a 4-1 deficit and keep a goose egg in their losing column. The Falcons look to add on another win when Gustavus Adolphus visits Hunt Arena on Saturday night.

The Falcons left it all on the ice Saturday night and picked up their second win of the season over the Lawrence Vikings 8-0. Saturday night’s game was all River Falls from the start. The offense of the Falcons was flawlessly executed which resulted in multiple scoring opportunities.

Not only did this win represent an improved record, it also allowed the crowd to enjoy the game taste wise. Due to the Falcons scoring at least seven goals, fans were provided free ice cream coupons for the first time this season.

The second period did not disappoint either. The Falcons added two more goals to their lead by way of Dahl (5:53) and Derek Hansberry (11:11). Dahl tallied his second goal of the game and of the season. The second period came to a close with a comfortable lead for the Falcons along with a shutout for Andy Scanlon. The shots on goal were not even close with the Falcons ending the second period with 35 compared to 15 Lawrence shots.

Scanlon racked up a total of 21 saves and completed the shutout, his first of the season and sixth of his career. The ability of Scanlon to play so well has to make Coach Steve Freeman and company happy about the Falcons situation in goal. River Falls has three capable starters in Bucchino, Dan Meneghin, and Scanlon.

The third period brought a slowed down game as the Falcons defended their 7-0 lead. River Falls showed dominance for the second night in a row when it came to puck control. Lawrence could not seem to hold onto the puck for long periods of time. The intensity on the Lawrence side was turned up in the third but it was not enough to overcome their deficit. Adams added more to the Falcons lead with his third goal of the game. Adams’ hat trick is the first recorded by a Falcon player this season.

With the win the Falcons improve their record to 2-0 after the first weekend of the season. River Falls’ next game comes on Friday, at St. Olaf followed by a game at home on Saturday against Gustavus Adolphus.

The first goal was scored by the Falcons' Jared Sailer (5:03), assisted by Tyler Kostiuk. The ability to get the first goal of the game allowed River Falls to gain momentum right off the bat. Later in the first period, River Falls hit gold again with a shorthanded goal by Josh Hansen (11:42). Most notable throughout the game was the ability of the Falcons to keep the puck on Eau Claire's side of the line. Penalties were also consistant against River Falls. The positive side of those penalties was the Falcons being able to overcome Eau Claire's power play opportunities. Two times in the game River Falls was down to three players against a full Blugolds team without allowing a goal. The first period ended with a 2-0 Falcon advantage.

Eau Claire finally got on the box score with a goal by Chip Dunleavy in the second period (13:54). River Falls goaly AJ Bucchino argued the call but the goal stood up. After allowing the goal, Bucchino picked up where he left off and dominated the rest of the game. Bucchino ended the night with an impressive 34 saves.

Following the Eau Claire score, the Falcons responded two minutes later with another goal by Jared Sailer (15:12). With his second goal, Sailer represents the first Falcon to have a multiple scoring game. River Falls' third goal ended the scoring in the second period.

The start of the third period allowed the Falcons to at least smell the scent of a win coming. Wade Harstad tacked on a cushioning goal early in the third (4:26). The goal was followed by thirteen minutes of tough Falcon defense until Jim Henkemeyer cemented the game with a fifth River Falls goal (17:12).

Forward Jared Sailer (Jr., Fernie, B.C.)  helped the Falcons to a split in two games last weekend at Hunt Arena. In Saturday's 4-3 win over Lake Forest the 6-3, 220 pounder scored a goal and had an assist. He scored the team's third goal of the contest at 2:39 of the third period. His assist came on the game-winning goal at 18:06 of the third stanza. "Jared was coming off an injury and it was great for him to be able to get back into the groove of things right away. All his effort in the recovery process paid off," said Falcon Coach Steve Freeman. He has four goals and nine points for the Falcons this season.

Forward Pat Borgestad (So., St. Paul, Minn.) recorded two goals in a home 4-2 win over Hamline on Wednesday night. His first goal was scored late in the first period and that gave the Falcons a 2-0 lead. Borgestad's second goal, which proved to be the game winner, was scored early in the second period. Borgestad now has six goals on the season and a total of 15 points. "He's a great player," said Falcon Coach Steve Freeman. "He always makes the big play when we need it."

Three of the team's top six scorers are back and they all scored more than 20 points last year. The blue line corp lost some talented players, and some outstanding first year skaters will be looked at to fill the openings. In goal the Falcons are deep with experience, talent and skill.

There are three returning defensemen who experience consistent playing time in 2005.  "Our defensive corps took a significant hit from departures, but we're excited about our returnees and new players. We'll work hard with this group and we're confident that we will be strong in this phase of the game," said Freeman who has a 183-78-16 career record at UWRF.

The Falcons are in much better shape up front with several players back that have shown they can play well at both ends of the rink. "We have a pretty veteran group of forwards which we feel good about. We would like to create a little more offensive flair, while sticking to the fundamental beliefs of our program," said Freeman, who has been named the NCHA Coach of the Year in 1999 and 2003. TJ Dahl returns for his second year after finishing with 12 goals and 30 points as a freshman. Aaron Degerness is back for his senior season after scoring 12 goals and 25 points. Dahl was second and Degerness third in scoring in 2005.

Scanlon played hockey consistently throughout his childhood that led him to be successful in all levels he played. Scanlon went to high school in Apple Valley, Minn., and showed a lot of promise early. His favorite hockey memory took place in high school when his team won a tournament in Rochester.

In his spare time, Scanlon enjoys to simply relax and have fun. He enjoys playing sports and to beat friends in poker. "After college, being a professional poker player would be the ideal career," Scanlon said with a laugh.

When growing up in Apple Valley, Scanlon remembers the trips his family would take to their cabin and how enjoyable those times were. They were always fun due to having three other siblings. Scanlon has two brothers and a sister.  Hockey is a common bond that brings the whole family together.

This season started off great for Scanlon and the Falcons with an 8-0 win against Lawrence. Scanlon made 21 saves and recorded his first win of the season and his sixth career shutout. Scanlon's second start came in the Falcons first loss of the season against Gustavus Adolphus. Despite the loss, Scanlon recorded 29 saves.

"I have learned a lot about teamwork here at River Falls and that is what I am going to take away when I leave," said Scanlon. "I have learned a lot from both River Falls and Coach Freeman. Coach Freeman has taught me about how to work hard and how to play solid defense."

Meneghin spent his childhood around Surrey, BC., and took on hockey almost at birth. At age four Meneghin learned to skate and by age five he jumped right into hockey. "I watched a lot of hockey when I was younger and idolized Patrick Roy in the goal," said Meneghin. He spent a lot of time playing street hockey with his older brothers and they would only allow him to play goalie. This is where his fascination with playing between the pipes started.

He participated in one year of Junior B and four years of Junior A hockey. His team was the Barnaby Bulldogs where he was named the Most Valuable Player. Meneghin also played for the Victoria Salsa of the British Columbia Hockey League. "My favorite part about playing all that hockey was the simple idea of showing up to play."

After all his hockey experience Meneghin looked for a college where he wanted to play hockey. His choice ended up being UW-River Falls. "River Falls gave me the best opportunity to play right away and it had the studies I was looking for," said Meneghin, who is majoring in accounting. UW-River Falls is really happy about his choice.

His favorite memories of Falcon hockey are the playoff games he has participated in, especially the ones against St. Norbert, because they are so competitive. "When it comes to River Falls, I will remember the whole picture," Meneghin stated. "I will remember all the balancing required to be a successful student and hockey player."

Meneghin brings strong leadership to this young Falcons team and he is greatly respected. He will graduate this year. "Being on the ice and playing is the best part, and the part I will miss the most when I am done," Meneghin said.

After getting his feet wet at an early age, Salmela improved dramatically over the years as he broke onto the high school scene. In high school, Salmela played for Duluth East who had a very successful hockey program. In his senior season, East was able to make it all the way to state tournament where they eventually won the title.

Salmela capitalized on his high school success and went on to play three years of junior hockey. He laced his skates up for two seasons with Waterloo and one season with Rochester. Although he was a defenseman, Salmela was able to show his offensive skills by leading all Waterloo defensemen in goals scored in his first season. During juniors, then nationally ranked River Falls started to recruit Salmela which played a huge role in his decision to be a Falcon.

Salmela has had a successful career at River Falls both athletic and academic wise. He has earned Dean's List honors four times and has been named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll both seasons he has played.

He also stays busy with his job at the University of Minnesota doing neuroscience research. The research has steered Salmela into looking at neurology for a career choice. He will graduate this year with a degree in biology.

One of Hansen's favorite memories from his childhood was when he and his brothers would play late at night on their outdoor rink built by their Dad. They would have to pull a car up to the rink and turn the headlights on for light.

Hansen recording stellar stats at juniors and was recruited by UW-River Falls. He chose to become a Falcon because of the schools location and the history of the program. Hansen has played consistently since his debut in 2002.

Hansen has recorded 19 career points for River Falls and looks to improve on that number in his final season. He is not only dependable on the ice; Hansen is also great in the classroom. Hansen was named to the WIAC Honor Roll following the 2003 season.

"My favorite hockey memory from River Falls was when I scored the game winning goal in the NCAA quarterfinal game against St. John's my freshman year," said Hansen. That goal advanced the Falcons to the Frozen Four - a situation the Falcons would like to find themselves in again in 2006.

Hansen looks to graduate after next year with a major in history.  History has been his major throughout his stay in River Falls. After graduating River Falls Hansen wants to go to law school. He will miss hanging out with his teammates when he is done with hockey.

Influenced by his Dad, Venasky started playing hockey around the age of three and got into competitive hockey by the age of five. Venasky followed NHL great Wayne Gretzky as he grew up and tried to model his play after the star.

Following his great experience in juniors, River Falls was Venasky's next stop.  River Falls was his top choice of schools due to the quality and tradition of the program and how close it is to the Twin Cities.

Venasky feels that the big difference between his first year as a Falconand this season is the incredible depth River Falls has now. That depth makes up for the lack of experience on this year's team, according to the 6-0, 210 pounder.

When asked of his goal for the team Venasky responded, "I came here to win a National Championship and I'm hoping we can achieve that goal within my final two years here. The first goal for us as a team is to win the NCHA championship."

Tiberio is only able to go home over Christmas and Spring Break due to the long distance from River Falls. His family has been able to make it up for a few games to watch Tiberio play which has been a good experience.

While growing up, Tiberio's favorite memory from his childhood was when he was in squirt hockey and he got to play an exhibition game during a period break of a Phoenix Roadrunner hockey game.  Tiberio was the only one to score a goal in front of the capacity crowd.

While growing up in British Columbia, Kostiuk picked up the game of hockey early from battling it out with his two brothers. He was, in the true sense of the words, a "rink rat." He learned to make plays and see the ice from spending time on the ice.

While at Fernie, Kostiuk played with now Falcon teammate Jared Sailer and showed great promise. Kostiuk spent his first season learning the ropes and getting used to the pace of the game. Kostiuk would break out in his second season when he put the puck in the net 19 times and led the league in assists with 61.

Kostiuk's freshman season was a success as he tallied eight assists and six goals. Both the Falcon team and fans knew they had something to look forward to in the years to come out with Kostiuk o the ice.

Dahl grew up in Burnsville, Minn., and was a hockey success story from the very beginning. He attended Apple Valley High School where he led the team to a 25-1 record his senior season. Dahl also made the honorable mention all-conference list.

So far this season, his sophomore campaign, Dahl has continued his strong play. He has totaled nine goals and 17 assists. Dahl's 26 total points is second on the team to Derek Hansberry's 29. He is fourth in assists and ninth in scoring in the NCHA.

Platteville. For the week she pitched 15 innings and allowed only two runs, one was earned. She had a 0.47 ERA in five appearances. She allowed 10 hits and opponents hit .179 against her. She struck out 14 and walked only one. Overall she has a 2-4 record with three saves. The three saves is a school record for saves in a single season.

In that game she worked five and one-third innings and allowed six hits and three earned runs. She walked one and struck out four. In the two games she finished with a 1.47 ERA and opponents hit just .184 against her.

Right fielder Amanda Wojnowiak (Fr., Big Lake, Minn.) played an important role for the Falcons as the team finished with a 5-5 record at the Rebel Spring Games played in Kissimmee, Fla. She started every game and finished with a .471 batting average. She was 16-34 at the plate and led the Falcons with 10 runs scored. She had three doubles and a triple and led the Falcons with eight RBIs. She stole four bases and was not caught stealing. She was also perfect in the field making eight put outs without an error.

CC4C is a international campus ministry with a commitment to turning lost students into Christ-centered laborers.  River Falls hosts a community of believers, reaching out with discipleship, prayer, fellowship, evangelism and equipping students to live a Christ-centered life.

During the Untangle the rope activity, students needed to figure out how to untangle the rope without breaking the knot. Many different solutions were tried. The solution required required thinking outside the box.

The final activity was to duck tape three SSS students to the wall. The group acted as a team to safely put on enough tape to secure the students to the wall as Jay discussed how goals need to be public like the tape on the wall holding up the students.

As soon as you receive applications, read the instructions carefully. If you have questions, contact the funding agency. Before filling out any application forms, make extra copies in case you make mistakes. Proofread your application and have at least two other people review your essays. Check you finished product for stray marks, white out, stains, or wrinkles. Make a copy of the completed forms before mailing them. Consider sending your documents through certified mail or with a return receipt.

Ask for letter of recommendation well in advance of your deadline to gibe your contact(s) time to write a strong letter. Notify them of your deadlines and be prepared to contact them a couple of times as a reminder.

Wisely. Many applications require letters of recommendation from faculty. Ideally, you already know several faculty members who have taught you in class or worked with you on independent projects; they should be well-equipped to write informed and specific letters about you. A concrete, detailed letter from a faculty member who knows you well is usually worth more than three of four letters from people who don’t. Although it may be tempting to ask a dean or prominent faculty member for a recommendation, it is best to have your letters written by faculty who know you and your work. If you don’t feel any faculty knows you well enough, make an appointment with some of the professors or T.A.s whose courses you have taken. Even if you don’t know them personally, talk to them about your plans and see if they would be comfortable writing a letter for you.

Resources. Provide a copy of your resume, writing samples, or other documentation of you strengths. Some people ask you to fill out forms about yourself. Let the writer know the kind of information you would like the letter to convey. The more information given, the more likely the letter will be substantial and persuasive. Keep a copy of any vital records you submit to your referrals.

Be sure to answer the essay’s question(s)! Tailor your essay to its audience. An exceptional essay that fails to address the main points of the question will not succeed. When writing about an experience, highlight what you accomplished though specific details and examples. “I made a difference in people’s lives” communicates much less than “I helped rebuild six homes, and through out teamwork, families moved back just three months after the hurricane.” Be detailed yet concise in your writing without getting bogged down.

Employ clarity and structure in your essay/statement. Use paragraphs and transitions to signal a change in emphasis or ideas. Be judicious in your use of words “I” and “you.” Use proper punctuation and spelling. Avoid repetitious, trite, or meaningless phrases and unnecessary jargon. Make every word count toward overall clarity and impact! Several drafts may make a large difference in the quality of your essay.

Find at least one person to review your statement or essay, especially someone with experience reading or writing statements for scholarships. Leave time for revision and consulting. Proofread your essay. Then proofread it again. Visit the Writing Center if you need assistance.

Give concrete examples. If your answer to an essay question is abstract, support it with a concrete example that illustrates your point. The scholarship sponsor wants to see evidence that you satisfy their criteria, not just unsupported statements.

Identify the sponsor’s goals. Try to understand the sponsor’s motivation in offering the award. Do they want to promote interest in their field? Do they want to identify promising future researchers and business leaders?

You can give yourself a competitive advantage be reading the directions carefully. Provide everything that is required. But do not supply things that are not requested. You will not impress and you might be disqualified.

Make several photocopies of all the forms you receive. Use the copies as working drafts as you develop your application packet. It is always best to type the application. If you must print, do so neatly and legibly.

Write an accomplishments resume. Compile a list of all your accomplishments. This will help you identify your strengths and prepare a better application. Give a copy of the resume to the people who are writing letters of recommendation for you. They will be able to work some of the tidbits into their letters, make it seem like they know you better.

Impose a deadline for yourself that is at least two weeks before the stated deadline. Use this ‘buffer time’ to proofread your application before you send it off. YOU are responsible for making sure all parts of the application arrive on time. This includes supporting materials, such as letters of recommendation and transcripts. So make sure everyone who is contributing to your application has ample lead-time.

If worse comes to worst, call the scholarship provider in advance and ask if it is possible to receive an extension. Do not just send the materials in late; many committees will refuse late applications. But do not rely on extensions—very few scholarship providers allow them at all.

Take steps to make sure your application gets where it needs to be. Before sending the application, make a copy of the entire packet and keep it on file. If your application goes astray, you can always reproduce it quickly. Make sure your name (and social security number, if applicable) appears on all pages of the application. Pieces of your application may get lost unless they are clearly identified.

Remember—your scholarship application represents YOU! Your ability to submit a neat, timely, complete application reflects on you. If is the face you present to the sponsoring organization. Take pride in yourself by submitting the best application you can.

Along with resumes and cover letters that may focus on duties and responsibilities, a section should also be dedicated to accomplishments you have made and activities you were involved in. Many applicants have difficulty pinpointing their accomplishments. This worksheet will help you brainstorm ideas that will help summarize all the hard work you have achieved.

Consider the "so-what factor." For every accomplishment you list, ask yourself, "so what?" Does the item you've listed truly characterize your abilities and your potential for contributing to success?

Instructions: A series of brainstorming questions are asked below for your four most recent accomplishments or activity involvement. Respond to as many of the questions as you can for each one. You do not have to use all of your answers in the accomplishment resume, but select the best ones that will help you stand out or fully describe your experience.

In this activity, what special things did you do to set yourself apart? Did you take on any specific role (i.e. president of the club, representative of a dorm, part of an organizational committee); what were your specific tasks?

How did you solve one or more specific problems in the activity? What were the problems or challenges that you or the organization faced? What did you do to overcome the problems? What were the results of your efforts?

What made you join these activities? What made you continue to contribute to them? o What are your dreams of the future? When you look back on your life in thirty years, what would it take for you to consider your life successful?

After evaluating your essay topics with the above criteria and asking for opinions of your teachers or colleagues, and of your friends, you should have at least 1-2 interesting essay topics. Consider the following guidelines below.

If you are planning on writing an essay on how you survived poverty in Russia, your mother's suicide, your father's kidnapping, or your immigration to America from Asia, you should be careful that your main goal is to address your own personal qualities. Just because something sad or horrible has happened to you does not mean that you should win a scholarship. You don't want to be remembered as the pathetic applicant. You want to be remembered as the applicant who showed impressive qualities under difficult circumstances.

It is for this reason that essays relating to this topic are considered among the best. Unless you only use the horrible experience as a lens with which to magnify your own personal characteristics, you will not write a good essay.

"Diversity" is the biggest buzzword since the 1990's. For this reason, so many applicants are tempted to declare what makes them diverse. However, simply saying you are a black, lesbian female will not impress scholarship officers in the least. While an essay incorporating this information would probably be your best topic idea, you must finesse the issue by addressing your own personal qualities and how you overcame stigma, dealt with social ostracism, etc. If you are a rich student from Beverly Hills whose father is an engineer and whose mother is a lawyer, but you happen to be a minority, an essay about how you dealt with adversity would be unwise.

You must demonstrate vividly your personal qualities, interests, motivations, etc. Address specifically how your diversity will contribute to the realm of campus opinion, the academic environment, and the larger society.

Don't mention weaknesses unless you absolutely need to explain them away. You want to make a positive first impression, and telling a scholarship officer anything about drinking, drugs, partying, etc. undermines your goal. Scholarship reviewers have read more essays on ADD (Attention Deficit Disorder) than we would ever have imagined. Why admit to weakness when you can instead showcase your strengths?

Even seemingly boring topics can be made into exceptional scholarship essays with an innovative approach. In writing the essay you must bear in mind your two goals: to persuade the scholarship officer that you are extremely worthy of receiving college assistance and to make the officer aware that you are more than a GPA and a standardized score, that you are a real-life, intriguing personality.

Don't "Thesaurize" your Composition. For some reason, students continue to think big words make good essays. Big words are fine, but only if they are used in the appropriate contexts with complex styles.

Clear, Vivid Prose. If you are not adept with imagery, you can write an excellent essay without it, but it's not easy. The application essay lends itself to imagery since the entire essay requires your experiences as supporting details. Appeal to the five senses of the scholarship officers.

Time on Your Introduction. Expect scholarship officers to spend 1-2 minutes reading your essay. You must use your introduction to grab their interest from the beginning. Two Important Points: Don't Summarize in your Introduction. Create Mystery or Intrigue in your Introduction.

Many students fail to pursue scholarships because they believe that the competition is so fierce that only the most exceptional students receive awards. The truth is you do not have to be a super student to win scholarships. Many scholarships do consider academic talent and performance; however, the level of achievement required to win the scholarship is always relative to the other students in the applicant pool. Additionally, some scholarships are based on criteria other than academic performance: pursuit of a particular major, membership in particular groups, or financial need.

Despite the myths surrounding scholarships, students do need to put forth effort in the research and application process. One way to think about the time spend is to consider you are getting paid for the research. If you spend ten hours finding and applying for a scholarship and you receive a $300 stipend, you just made $30 an hour! Even if you don’t get awarded a scholarship, you will have refined your research and writing skills and will be more likely to succeed in similar future endeavors.

To hold an institution of higher education accountable for accommodating a disability, students must submit documentation that contains enough clinical information that a layman can accurately verify the disability exists, understand it, and know why and how it should be accommodated.

A description of the author’s credentials which indicates they are qualified to diagnosis the specific learning disability. b. Summaries of the presenting problem, and developmental history on health, academic, and social issues. c. A summary of adequate standardized testing that is relevant (pertains to the student as an adult), including: the student’s test scores for assessments of aptitude and cognitive abilities, information processing, academic achievement/skills; identification of statistical means and standard deviations for the tests; identification and explanation of any statistically significant scores and discrepancies. d. A description of the impairments the disability causes, and description of the way they limit the student’s functioning within the academic context. e. Assignment of a specific learning disability diagnosis using terminology conventional to the author’s field of expertise. f. Suggestions as to how the functionally limiting manifestations of the specific learning disability may be appropriately accommodated for academic pursuits.

Summary of a diagnostic interview, including: description of the presenting problem; synopsis of developmental history on health, academics and social functions; identification of existing symptoms; consideration of other diagnoses that may co-exist or better account for the ADHD appearing symptoms, and either ruling out the other diagnoses, or assigning the other diagnoses and explaining how their coexisting symptoms compound the ADHD. c. Assignment of a specific mental health diagnosis using terminology conventional to the author’s field of expertise. d. Identification of current impairments caused by the symptoms of the disability, how it substantially limits major areas of the student’s life, how it limits the student’s educational functioning. e. A multi-axial assessment summary, utilizing the format described in the DSM-IV-TR. f. Suggestions as to how the functionally limiting manifestations of ADHD may be appropriately accommodated.

A historical summary about the disability. c. An audiological evaluation and/or audiogram, no older than 3 years if loss is progressive. d. An assessment of the functional limitations of the hearing impairment for which accommodation is being requested, and whether the degree of limitation is mild, moderate, or substantial. e. Description of how the limiting aspects effect the student’s academic functioning. f. Description of how the limiting effect are expected to change over time. g. Suggestions as to how the functionally limiting manifestations of the hearing loss condition(s) may be appropriately accommodated.

A description of the author’s credentials which indicates their capacity as an expert about the medical condition. b. A historical summary about the condition. c. An outward diagnosis using terminology that is conventional to the author’s field of expertise, a description of symptoms that are present, and reference to the diagnostic tests performed to confirm the diagnosis and the results of those tests. d. A description of the functional impairments the condition creates for the student, and an indication of their magnitude. e. Descriptions of how the condition limits the student’s academic functioning. f. Descriptions of how the condition’s limiting affects may be expected to change over time. g. Suggestions as to how the limiting effects can be reasonably accommodated for the purpose of creating equal access and opportunity.

Documentation of a psychiatric disability must be relevant (timely) in terms of describing current conditions. The author must be a licensed doctor such as a clinical psychologist, psychiatrist, or a family physician who is qualified to diagnose the range of relevant psychiatric disorders.

A description of the author’s credentials which indicates their qualification to diagnosis psychiatric conditions. b. A clinical summary that includes: description of relevant symptoms, indicating their nature, frequency, duration; assignment of a specific DSM-IV-TR diagnosis; synopsis of the history of the diagnosed condition; appropriate consideration of other possible diagnosis that were either ruled out, or assigned as coexisting diagnoses, with a discussion of how any coexisting diagnosis may compound the disability being considered; and, a multi-axial assessment summary utilizing the format described in the DSM-IV-TR c. Descriptions of how current symptoms significantly limit functioning in major life activities. d. Description of how the symptoms impair the student’s academic functioning. e. Description of how the limiting effect are expected to change over time. f. Description of any necessary treatment plan, including medications and dosage schedule, the student has been recommended to follow. g. Suggestions as to how the functionally limiting manifestations of the psychiatric condition may be appropriately accommodated.

Awarded to two students who have demonstrated leadership in one of the following student organizations: African American Alliance, Asian American Student Association, Latino Student Association or Native American Council.

Recipients will be chosen from a group of incoming UW-RF Business students. Recipients must write a short essay, no longer than three pages, detailing reasons for studying business and potential future career goals.

Information on demand is now readily available and a weekly newsletter is no longer the timely source of information it once was. In recent years This Week has become a digest of all the faculty and staff emails, the calendar of events postings, and various news releases provided by the Public Affairs office. Most of the information included was available from other sources, and the focus was on pulling it together into one condensed document. Some people found this helpful, others were annoyed that most of the information was duplicated from what had been distributed electronically.

In order to eliminate redundancy and provide more timely information, This Week will no longer be published. Campus information will now be provided in the format of Falcon Daily, which will be delivered electronically on campus each morning at 9 a.m.

For those of you not on campus, you can subscribe to Falcon Daily by visiting http://www.uwrf.edu/falcon-daily/, where you will find a subscription link that will send Falcon Daily to your home email address.

Welcome to Falcon Daily, the newest and what we hope will be the most inclusive electronic communication about UW-River Falls that is compiled exclusively for faculty and staff. We intend to give you a single document that will tell you each day about what’s happening on campus, as well as a sampling of important news from Madison and around the state.

Each edition will carry campus announcements about upcoming events and human resources information that you need to know. We’ll also try to overcome our “Wisconsin media vacuum” by filling that void with useful links to other free information sources around the state that will tell you what Wisconsin’s decision-makers are saying about the UW System.

Each day we’ll highlight several key stories from Wisconsin media that will give you a flavor of the issues others in our state are discussing but that we often do not hear about through our regional media.

Yes, we’re open to suggestions on editorial content. Falcon Daily is an evolving publication. If you have an idea for a noteworthy event that you think should be highlighted; if you have an event to submit as a calendar notice; if we aren’t carrying certain kinds of notices that you think should be shared with everyone, then please send them to us. We’d like to hear from you.

Falcon Daily is a work in progress. Its purpose is to electronically broadcast information to faculty and staff that is of interest to ALL faculty and staff. As a result, Falcon Daily won’t carry information that’s of interest only to a narrow segment of our campus community.

You’ll find a submission form link on the left hand side of Falcon Daily each day. We encourage you to use it to submit items to us. However, please note that what you send to us will run only in Falcon Daily. You will still have to submit a calendar item, for example, to the Public Events Calendar at http://www.uwrf.edu/calendar/.

That’s because Falcon Daily will be edited for a brief, quick read by our campus community so faculty and staff can get basic information in a timely manner. Brevity will always be appreciated. Full details of an event are more appropriate for the Public Events Calendar.

Please note that we have added to our facilities, including sidewalks, streets and parking spaces. We have not, however, increased the resources available for winter maintenance. This will result in some areas not being cleared as quickly as in the past. Parking lots and lower priority areas will not be completed in as timely a manner. We ask that you be prepared for winter conditions that can become difficult and appreciate your patience when these situations occur.

If a major winter storm should occur on a holiday when the campus is officially closed, only emergency vehicle access and the main entry walks of occupied Residence Halls are cleared. A major winter storm is defined as an accumulation of snow/ice that prohibits vehicle and/or foot traffic in these areas.

My professors tell me that you can't be an English major without a healthy supply of socially alienating quirks. So, here you go...I'm extremely freaked out by the campus squirrels (I saw one fall out of a tree and break its leg!), I can't sleep unless my hair is covering my exposed ears(in case bugs try to crawl in my brain), and as a child I was terrified of walking over sewer grates because I thought the Ninja Turtles would grab my ankles and drag me down there. Also...I love green olives, Tracy Chapman, Mike Doughty, and "The Perks of Being a Wallflower. Stop by McMillan with your academic questions and I'd be happy to hear a few of your own defining qualities =).

River Falls gave me an outlet to grow and learn in a new environment. Currently, I am a junior studying Secondary Math/Education, minoring in Health and Human Performance/Education. I wanted to be teacher for as long as I can remember and being an Outreach Advisor gives me the first-hand experience of being a teacher and helping others.

Other than teaching and school I enjoy many other things as well. I enjoy playing sports like volleyball, and softball. I love to do puzzles (I guess that is where the math part of me comes out). I enjoy being with my family and my boyfriend, and just being in a social environment. I love to knit and sit around and watch TV, but as you probably know, college life leaves little time to just sit around.

I am the Outreach Advisor assigned to the lobby of both Stratton Hall and Prucha Hall. I am a junior here this year and I am currently an Accounting major with the hope to become a CPA (Certified Public Accountant) some day. I am also a member of the Cross Country team and the Track and Field team here at UWRF. Even with being in varsity athletics I also find time to get involved in the intramurals that are offered here, such as volleyball, broomball and dodgeball to name a few. I also love attending many of the events that are put on here at campus each year as well.

I am from Menomonie Wisconsin which is 40 miles east of River Falls on I-94. I like to run, as well do other sports; I also enjoy singing with the radio to reading it off sheets of music. I am also a huge Minnesota fan in every sport, even though I am from Wisconsin.

Discussion about what precipitated this merger issue. Outlined that at the 11/14 meeting that more discussion would follow along with a review of the proposed constitution. After a decision at the 11/14 meeting is made, reps will attend the 4 p.m. Faculty Senate meeting.

Adjuncts have to negotiate increases up front. The issue could be brought up with the departmental head. Issue led to the notion of having Jennifer Standaert attend our next meeting to address this, titling, pay ranges, layers within categories, communication with new employees, etc. Suggestion to create a brochure or website. Ronning expressed interest in possibly coordinating.

Currently, there are nine identified long-range goals. The two that were discussed include: increasing awareness of UWRF in the St. Croix Valley, and increasing/improving the feeling of community on our campus.

The UW System is still waiting to see how the gubernatorial change will affect any of the Board of Regents appointments. Although not necessarily all will be replaced, the System could possibly have 6 new Regents.

There is a discrepancy in pay scales between the UW System and our peer institutions outside the system. As a System, salaries are significantly below the averages seen at our competitors. For example, full professors at UW-RF are paid approximately $10,000 less than their peers at institutions outside the UW System. Also, our academic staff (category A) have salaries that are approximately 17% below market in comparison to salaries across the system (Madison and Milwaukee included in this figure). It may be realistic for academic staff members to expect a 3 percent increase in salary next year.

HR Issues  There is talk at system about pulling state HR resources into the system and having tuition money paid directly to the system. This would allow more control and discretion over where the money goes.

The UW System has one of the best health insurance programs in the country could possibly expect an increase in premiums A tuition increase would be the last attempt to improve the current budget situation. However, the increase would not be enough to cover the budget deficit - cuts would still be inevitable to other areas.

Linda Wymer said that there is definitely a pro-UW System sentiment among the public A Brochure (Citizens for Higher Education) has been created to help gain public support for the UW System. Also looking for additional volunteers to help support the organization.

Bargaining Agreement Update: Classified staff contracts have still not been settled. The unions and the state will return to the bargaining table for an agreement for the upcoming legislative session.

Human Resource Reforms: President Lyall has endorsed a number of reforms in the HR Department that would allow the UW system more efficient hiring practices. Among the proposed ideas: move non-represented professional employees to academic staff; allow UW system to go directly to JCOER with pay plan and eliminating the need to go through the DEF; and to install our own search and screen procedures for classified staff.

Academic Staff Professional Representatives Organization (ASPRO) is looking for someone from our campus to join. We are the only campus in the system that does not have a representative in this organization.

The Joint Finance Committee will be in River Falls for a meeting in the next month. It is important that faculty, staff, students, and community members attend. We need to spread the word about the impact these budget cuts would have on our campus and the UW System.

A draft of an issues statement for the Council of Academic Staff Representatives was included on the back of the orientation meeting outline that Emily provided to each of us. She encouraged us to review the draft and send her any suggested changes.

Currently, a position description is being drafted for the Vice Chancellor for Administration & Finance. Provost Coombs will be chairing the search, which will get under way soon. They hope to be interviewing by early spring.

The Chancellor has drafts of various differential tuition initiatives in progress. They are examining the possibility of charging more tuition for academic programs that cost more to fund. Many campuses around the nation are examining similar initiatives.

This program would allow children of alumni who live out of state to attend a UW System school for 25% less than regular out-of-state costs. This could be implemented by 04/05 and would be campus-specific (a student would only get the discount when attending the same school their parent attended).

The 25' radius smoking ban passed Student Senate and will be sent on to the Health and Wellness Committee. There have been forums and discussion on this topic and the initiative is expected to pass and be implemented.

Criteria are being reviewed/established for this honor. There were questions about whether or not academic and classified staff could ever receive this type of honor. There were also questions about obtaining complete lists of past emeriti.

There has been an HR consultant on campus, putting together a report of recommendations for when John Spielman leaves at the end of the calendar year. The report will be made public The library is also going to be hiring a consultant.

Staff Development Update: There was talk about applying for an institutional grant next year and perhaps coupling our efforts with those of the Classified staff. Possible topics include Neutral Facilitator (M. Kinder's previous suggestion), systems thinking, personal wellness initiatives, etc. Various marketing and promotional ideas were considered.

We will invite Category B staff members to the 11/19/03 meeting in hopes of hearing their concerns and learning how Academic Staff Council can support these employee, since there are currently no Category B staff on the Council.

The $925,000 that has to come from the UW-RF to offset financial aid has been billed to the appropriate University 128 accounts. We will need to strategize on ways to help the legislature understand that they cannot continue to raid these accounts.

Welcomed Jennifer Ninneman to answer any questions on Category B academic staff. Ninneman shared that there has been a lot of clarification over the last few years on the role of these positions on our campus.

Ronning suggested we consider setting a minimum number of category B representative positions on the Council. Kinders pointed out that would mean a change in our by-laws and would need approval by the Chancellor and the Board of Regents.

Motion made by Ronning to review the number of category B employees currently working on our campus in order to better determine if we want to change our committee structure to include a certain number of seats be filled with category B employees. Seconded by Link. Unanimous approval.

Motion made by G. Link: accept friendly amendment to replace #1 with the following statement: "Governance body communication requires timely distribution, is of interest to a substantial portion of the target audience and is required to conform to state or campus regulations." Seconded by S. Berkholder .

S. Walton presented the "Numerical Academic Staff Evaluation Form" that was created, according to M. Kinders, approximately 10-12 years ago. This process was used for only one year, and currently, there is no consistency in the evaluation of academic staff. S. Walton will coordinate a group of Category A Academic Staff, Category B Academic Staff, and administration to address this issue. A. Tubre and S. Egerstrom volunteered to assist. E. Ronning is contacting Academic Staff Representatives from other campuses to learn about their performance evaluation practices.

M. Kinders noted that the community forums regarding quality of life in the St. Croix Valley will begin soon. It is important for academic staff to attend to ensure that concerns of this group are represented.

To ensure that the privilege of using the Facstaf-notify list is being used appropriately for governance body communications, use of these emails may be reviewed during monthly shared governance meetings of the Chancellor, Faculty Senate Chair, Chair of Academic Staff Council, and the Student Senate President.

The nomination of academic staff from UW-River Falls or emeritus/emerita status resides with the chancellor. The process is initiated by an academic or administrative unit. The recommendation by the academic or administrative unit must be commented upon by the division head or dean and appropriate vice chancellor before being forwarded to the chancellor.

Criteria for this status include a minimum term of service of 15 years at UW-RF. Quality of service is an important factor. The individual must be retired from a full-time position at UW-River Falls . Exceptions to these criteria are possible if there is significant support or circumstances.

E. Ronning shared information she collected from Madison, Stout, Colleges, and Osh Kosh regarding performance evaluation practices. Chancellor Lydecker has suggested that we wait until the Vice Chancellor for Administration and Finance and possibly the Human Resources Director are hired to pursue any review of and/or changes to the performance evaluation practices for academic staff on our campus. S. Walton will contact former Academic Staff Council Chairs to gather historical information on this topic.

E. Ronning will create a list of Category B Academic Staff. K. Gould Speckman will draft a letter that will be sent to this group near the time of elections for the Academic Staff Council, asking them to identify any concerns they may have that could be addressed by this council.

The CASR discussed either inviting the academic staff members of the Search and Screen in to speak to the group, or drafting a position statement on what the members of the Search and Screen should seek for qualities of the new UW System President.

The Board of Regents will authorize our chancellor search and screen on May 7. We will need to submit the names of 4 academic staff members who are recommended by us to be on the committee, and 2 will be chosen. At this time, at least 15 academic staff members are interested in participating. We will hold a special meeting within the next few weeks to review materials submitted by those interested and chose our recommendations.

TABOR will be considered in an extraordinary session of the Assembly during the week of May 10. A new version of the bill has been introduced, and it is extremely complicated. The impact on the UW System is that it exempts some of our funding sources from being restricted by the rate of inflation (e.g., tuition, gifts/grants). In the revised bill, GPR funding will still be affected and would, in fact, be devastated. Several republicans in the Assembly are opposing this, and we need to continue to push them. The Senate is more moderate than the Assembly and its members are concerned about the implications of TABOR.

S. Walton will submit our proposal for funding for neutral facilitation training to the Academic Staff Professional Development grant committee. Only one proposal for these funds has been submitted at this time.

M. Kinders and the rest of the Public Affairs office will be moving from Ames to South Hall sometime this summer, after repairs are made to their South Hall space. M. Kinders will also be hiring 7 student interns in Public Affairs.

The teaching assistants at UW-Madison may strike over salary increases and premium contributions for health insurance benefits. 75% of the TA's elect a single coverage plan in Tier 1 in which the employee health insurance premium would be $9 per month. The UW System is concerned that if health insurance contributions are prospective (not retroactive to January) the precedent might cause our campuses to pick-up health insurance costs from base budgets.

One of the best features of this new system is the self-service component. Once the system is up and running, an employee may check on his or her payroll deductions, health care provider information, TSA account status or change addresses or other personal information.

The session is over and a number of bills still await the Governor's signature. University Relations will forward an end of session report after the final action by the Governor on pending legislation.

The TABOR (Taxpayer's Bill of Rights) proposal continues to be worked on in the Legislature. CASR members are encouraged to write to their legislators or to local newspapers and attend town meetings and forums to bring up higher education concerns with TABOR. TABOR negatively affected higher education in Colorado (and continues to do so) -- elected officials and the general public should be concerned about its effects in Wisconsin . Both the UW Board of regents and the Wisconsin Technical College System board have passed resolutions in opposition to TABOR.

The "Pain Project" is underway. Weimer shared photos of some of the poor conditions in which students are forced to learn. Weimer encouraged Academic Staff Representatives to forward the stories about how budget cuts are affecting the quality of education throughout the UW System.

CASR members indicated that it was difficult to get information from the Chancellors, who are not willing to provide it for fear of having bad news affect recruitment efforts. Weimer indicated that unless UW System shows pain, the Governor and Legislature will continue to cut the budget.

CASR invited the academic staff members of the Search and Screen in to speak to the group, and drafted a number of questions, qualities and characteristics that the members should consider when interviewing candidates for the UW System President position. The Council expressed to their colleagues on the committee to be mindful of all candidates' knowledge of, experience with and attitudes toward academic staff. The ASRC also let the committee members know that a briefing paper about UWS Academic Staff for the candidates is being prepared by the Council and will be made available soon.

The Governor's budget will be made public in mid-January, so the primary discussion was about the budget and its impact on the UW System. There is concern from academic staff that they will are more vulnerable to position cuts.

Follow-up training for the neutral facilitation workshop will most likely be held in late January or early February. We need to identify dates for the four-hour session and provide a list of topics to be covered. The original planning committee will meet in the next few weeks to finalize this event.

The academic staff emeriti status document that was created last year was never signed by Chancellor Lydecker. Kathy Schultz (HR) and Mary Halada (VC-Administration and Finance) have drafted a new document for our review. We will take a closer look at this item at the January meeting when more members are present.

Good progress is being made on the planning of the academic staff conference for July 14 and 15, 2005. C. Croonquist has booked our keynote speaker, Kevin Reilley will also be asked to deliver a message. ASPRO has agreed to do a reception and legislative update session. Mike Woolsey, Campus Web Developer, will create a web site for conference registrations. L. Bleskachek is requesting funding from system. The large planning committee will meet again on January 10.

Kimberly has agreed to serve as chair of academic staff council for the remainder of the semester. We will need to select a vice-chair to fill her position. There are also 2 additional vacancies on the council. An election was held in November, which resulted in L. Bleskachek joining the council. Three additional nominees were listed on the ballot. K. Gould-Speckman suggested we ask two of the nominees to serve instead of holding another campus-wide election. L. Bleskacheck made a motion that Cara Rubbis and Jason Nehaus be appointed to the Council. G. Link seconded. Motion unanimously approved.

Andrews began by describing some of the goals of her position: To increase Wisconsin's visibility in Washington, to build partnerships with the Wisconsin congressional delegation and to assist campuses so they can effectively engage in federal relations.

K. Gould-Speckman attended a dinner at the UW-System President's home to recognize academic staff. The chancellor and an academic staff representative from each campus attended, and academic staff award winners were recognized.

President Reilly and Cora Merritt have been invited to the Friday breakfast. Legislators will also be invited. K. Gould-Speckman will invite the Regents to the conference. Program proposals are due Friday. Registration will be available mid-May, and the fee will probably be around $40.

Marrett surveyed the Academic Staff Representatives on campus surveys that are underway and asked their thoughts on campus climate. Some representatives indicated that there were numerous surveys and warned not to over-survey the students and employees. Additionally, some representatives asked for clarification whether these were climate studies, attitudinal studies or satisfaction studies, due to the low morale on campuses due to staff cuts and budget reductions. Concerns were raised in regard to these studies from many institutions, including whether comparisons would or should be made between campuses, confusion over what to do with the results and whether there was enough commonality across campuses to merit a systemwide climate study.

The two main areas of recommendations proposed for examinations by the group fell naturally into academic and administrative divisions. Areas for study within those two divisions include the academic components of Program Review, Grants Management, and Faculty Development, and the administrative components of Operations Review and Audit; Procurement; Federal Relations; and Hiring Process and Procedures.

The campus budget reduction exercises that were due in to UW System have caused great concern on campuses. The comprehensive plans were due April 15 and Madison , Milwaukee , Colleges and Extension plans are due April 30.

S. Egerstrom and A. Tubr met with Chancellor Betz in regard to the Academic Staff on campus. Chancellor Betz is looking for more involvement from the Academic Staff Council and wants all Academic Staff to have a voice. Chancellor Betz is supportive of professional development and inquired about what Academic Staff would like to learn. S. Egerstrom and A. Tubr suggested the possibilities of an all Academic Staff meeting and a better Academic Staff orientation program.

A. Cosgrove and G. Link offered to assist with the update of the handbook. The handbook currently contains some vague language and some parts are missing. The goal is to have the handbook updated by midway through this academic year.

At the Faculty Senate meeting on October 5th , the motion to limit the academic staff position on the Academic Misconduct University Hearing Committee to instructional staff members failed unanimously. At this meeting, Jeremy Bonikowske (Student Senate) also stated that the senate does not support this motion.

The typical university website fails to convert visitors into students who apply for admission and fails to turn alumni and parents into donors who give regularly. The result means a potential fortune in lost opportunities. The key to Web success is compelling and useful information content, delivered in new and surprising ways.

In the upcoming audio conference Turning College Website Browsers into Students and Donors,  participants will learn the ten best practices for university website content. Each possesses the potential to benefit your institution, your Web site, and your larger goals and objectives.

Meet the Presenter: David Meerman Scott is a writer, consultant, contributing editor at EContent Magazine, conference speaker, and seminar leader. Scott's just published book Cashing In With Content: How Innovative Marketers Use Digital Information to Turn Browsers Into Buyers  is a riff on using Web content to drive revenue and other action from Web site visitors. Scott specializes in using online content to market and sell products and services to demanding customers worldwide.

This telephone-based program is moderated by iLinc Communications, a leading distance learning firm. The 90-minute program includes a presentation followed by a lively, interactive, real-time question-and-answer session.

Chancellor Betz's Inauguration will take place on Friday, April 28 th at the Knowles Center . There will be a full week of events prior to the ceremony. Academic Staff Council needs to decide on a gift that will be presented to Chancellor Betz at the Inauguration on behalf of all UWRF academic staff.

S. Egerstrom and other representatives from UWRF including a Faculty Senate, Student Senate, Classified, and Union representative meet with Tom Korpady, Bill Kox, and the Governor's Education Aid. At this meeting, the bidding process was discussed. Humana did not want to go down to a tier 1 rate, because of the lack of competition on the western side of the state. The group of UWRF representatives raised the question of how do we gain a competitive market if it is currently not? The answer they were given was that anyone can make a bid. ETF was hoping for UWRF employees to leave Humana so that Humana would decide to lower to a tier 1 rate in the future.

Chancellor Betz also presented the drafts for the campus mission, vision, and core values which are attached. The Chancellor added that the mission statement should be memorable and able to motivate. The vision statement should answer the question of what we hope to be. Chancellor Betz also noted that the mission, vision, and core values are still in the draft form and our input is welcomed.

We will be the learning nucleus of the St. Croix Valley acting in close collaboration with communities, institutions and private enterprise to create and sustain a dynamic economy and an optimum quality of life firmly rooted in unbounded inquiry and a cultivated sense of civility, public service and creative expression. We will be a highly accessible gateway to explore the full range of human potential. We will inspire and educate citizens and leaders who, guided by core values, will purposefully and ethically serve society. We will link our students and our communities to global opportunities and collaborative relationships in the St. Croix Valley, Wisconsin and beyond. We will be a life learning partner for all those who seek to discover themselves and the richness and complexity of our multifaceted world.

T. Tubr reported that a needs assessment is currently being conducted through the Psychological Foundations of Employee Training class. The assessment is focused on three levels: 1) people who are implementing the program, 2) potential mentors, and 3) recent new hires. The needs assessment will be derived from these interviews. The students conducting the needs assessment already have the questions developed. T. Tubr is currently looking for people to interview. The question still remains as to who would oversee the program - possibly through Nan Jordahl and the Faculty & Staff Development Board. The report from the needs assessment will be completed by the end of this semester, and over the summer, students will complete the Mentor Handbook.

Elections need to be held before the May meeting. There will be two openings. Watch for this information in the next month, nominate people in your areas, and encourage them to run for a seat. We need 4 people to run for 2 positions.

Where to house this program is still on hold; Human Resources makes sense to some people. The mentor survey is going well and the instructional interviews will be completed in the next 2-3 weeks. The final report will be created at that time. This will lead up to dates for training in the fall. It is unsure if grants will be available for this program, because it is practice-oriented, and not data collection like what is currently happening.

The library has ordered a sign from Facilities Management to be hung over the shelf. A framed sign will be hung on the wall next to the collection with a descriptive statement about why it was developed and by whom.

The announcement and presentation of these awards will be moved to the fall (instead of spring). This move will help separate these awards from all the student recognition awards and it allows these awards to be part of the Campus Opening Meeting.

Sheila Harsdorf. S. Harsdorf was previously undecided and now agrees that the TPA should not be in the Constitution. All three versions will come to the floor for a vote. Currently, things are looking positive for the campus.

Currently, there are 9 responses to the needs assessment survey. The survey closes on May 11th. After that date, data will be collected and a report will be developed. A grant was submitted for Continuing Professional Development opportunities.

Margaret Lewis will be at the UW-Stout Academic Staff Council meeting on May 9th to talk with them about how they can build better relations with the legislature. If anyone is interested, we are invited to attend.

Associate Vice President Ron Singer summarized the April Board of Regents meeting. UW-Green Bay, as host campus, had two major presentations. The first presentation was to the Education Committee on teacher education.

This presentation showed the importance of the Green Bay campus to the community and the need for the institution to grow in the future. Also included in the Education Committee was a presentation on Program Planning and Program Array, which showed that the program array has not increased over time. Other major items on the agenda included Charter School proposals, Minority and Disadvantaged Student Annual Report, and Sexual Assault Response and Prevention.

Bill Steffenhagen provided an update on ASPRO. ASPRO testified in the legislature against the collective bargaining bill because it separates faculty and academic staff pay plans. ASPRO is also trying to set up meetings with United Council to discuss common directions for the Budget and with Representative Kreibich regarding his bill which would provide guaranteed admission, move funds between campuses, and reward campuses for economic development. Bill also noted that there has been more positive press for the UW System of late and thanked President Reilly for his work in that area.

Regarding the Academic Staff Leadership Conference, the Council was informed that President Reilly is not available on the date chosen. Suggestions were made to have a Regent speaker such as Regent Crain and Executive VP Don Mash. Inviting legislators was discussed while noting the difficulty with their changing schedules and the need for balance.

Regarding AB1147, Margaret Lewis noted that this legislation was proposed to help us, and that a similar bill for K-12 institutions was vetoed by the Governor. It did not appear at this time that the bill would pass.

UW-Whitewater: President Reilly and Regents showcased the campus during the inauguration of the new Chancellor. The Chancellor also met with academic staff about multiple year contracts. The Governor, Lieutenant Governor, and Rep. Baldwin were on campus for Government Week.

Errors may be the result of changes to this Web site in August 2005 to better serve our current and prospective students, community and other lifelong learners. We are sorry for any inconvenience that this may cause you.

The convenience fee amount for MasterCard payments will be shown on this screen. Cancel your transaction before hitting Submit if you disagree with this charge and use a different payment method. UW-RF only accepts MasterCard credit cards and they are only accepted online.

During the Spring 1998 semester, over 280 UWRF faculty and staff members completed a survey assessing aspects of the University's organizational climate related to diversity issues for women, people of color, and gays, lesbians, and bi-sexuals. The survey assessed the University's overall climate, levels of institutional civility and support for actions designed to increase the awareness of gender, racial, ethnic, and sexual orientation-based issues and concerns. The survey gathered information on respondents': demographics; quality of working life; perception of the likelihood of discriminatory events; perceptions of faculty, staff, and student interactions across campus; actual experiences with discrimination; qualities of the UWRF climate and culture; evaluation of campus activities linked to diversity awareness.

Greater levels of satisfaction with overall work atmosphere, opportunities for professional development and growth, satisfaction with opportunities for access to decision making and with the extent to which supervisors share information with subordinates.

Significantly more women: Indicated the likelihood of a male faculty or staff member making demeaning remarks about a woman by referring to her body parts Women: Significantly higher likelihood of chance that women probationary faculty are held to a higher standard then men, as well as the chance that a woman left the University as the result of a work atmosphere that made her uncomfortable.

Lower ratings for questions: "Are academic staff and classified employees treated with the same respect as tenure-track faculty?" and "In meetings are both men and women less attentive to women and their ideas?"

Women: Less likely to agree with statements including the notions: Affirmative Action leads to hiring less qualified job seekers; both academic staff and classified employees are treated the same as tenure-track faculty; and fellow faculty and staff treat individuals with equal respect Significantly fewer women agree with statement "The success of women is due to luck or Affirmative Action."

Tenure-track: Significantly greater agreement with statements: "Academic staff are treated the same as tenure-track faculty;" "Classified employees are treated the same as faculty and academic staff;" and "My fellow faculty and staff treat me with the same respect as they do others."

Tenure-track + academic staff: Significantly lower levels of agreement than classified and LTE staff with statements: "Do you believe Affirmative Action leads to hiring less qualified individuals?" "Do you believe diversity tends to splinter and divide the University's workforce?" "Does the University place too much emphasis on race?" and "Are the ideas of males more highly valued than those of females?"

Classified + LTE employees: Significantly lower assessments for items: "Are classified staff treated the same as other faculty and staff?" and "My fellow faculty and staff treat me with the same respect as my colleagues."

The survey assessed the University's overall climate, levels of institutional civility and support for actions designed to increase the awareness of gender, racial, ethnic, and sexual orientation-based issues and concerns. The survey gathered information on respondents': demographics; feelings toward UWRF; perception of the likelihood of discriminatory behaviors by faculty, staff, or other students; perceptions of faculty, staff, and student interactions across campus; actual experiences with discrimination; and evaluation of campus activities linked to diversity awareness.

We do not, however, view these increases as any reason to diminish our recruitment efforts. The goals of "improved quality and diversity of student applicants leading to matriculation" and "fostering a diverse, inclusive and supportive climate" remain central to our long range plan.

Under Goal I of our Plan 2008 report, UW-River Falls presents several initiatives that encompass a range of age groups: middle school and high school students, college students, and adult learners. Since 1999, UW-River Falls has had a solid track record of pre-college programs to help middle and high school students of color experience campus life. The enrollment in those programs peaked in the summer of 2001; in 2002 enrollment declined when resource constraints limited the number of sessions offered. The program framework remains in place and efforts will be made to continue program growth. Additionally, we have linked with tribal councils and agencies to increase involvement of Native American students in pre-college programs.

Enrolling a diverse student body is an important UWRF goal. Our Admissions Office engages in several initiatives to increase student diversity including targeted mailings, based on PSAT and ACT data, to students of color. Additionally, the translation of Admissions materials and information from English into six different languages has been a significant and tangible demonstration of our recruiting commitment.

We also focus on adult learners and families. UWRF's Outreach and Graduate Studies and Admissions Offices have collaborated to share information about graduate programs and summer session offerings with adults in various cultural communities. Outreach efforts range from a narrowly targeted program of on-site learning for 20 paraprofessionals in the St. Paul Public Schools to UWRF Journalism Department collaboration with that same school system which reached over 800 people.

Adult learner populations have also been contacted through parent outreach programs on campus (approximately 1000 households served annually) and through contacts with Tribal Council Community Colleges and schools.

The collaborative theme continues with partnerships between UWRF and tribal organizations in Wisconsin . The newest of these initiatives is with the Vincent High School environmental studies project in Milwaukee. With funds from the Private Industry Council, a group of UW-River Falls faculty hosts a summer college experience on campus for Vincent High School students and their teachers. Throughout the school year, faculty and Admissions staff visit the school for classroom outreach initiatives.

Student retention is a very high priority goal at UW-River Falls. Our Academic Success Center manages a range of actions designed to connect students of color to the campus community. In addition to mentoring, formal and informal, through Multicultural Services, Career Services has made special efforts to engage students of color in career planning and preparation. UWRF's Title III grant and TRIO funding has helped support several academic assistance initiatives noted in the report that follows.

UW-River Falls recently has seen a decline in first to second year retention rates from a high of 77.1% in 1998 to 73.9% in Fall, 2002 (comparable rates for the UW System were 80.6% in '98 and 80.9% in 2002). The Provost is working intensively with faculty and staff to address the retention concerns, and they will attend closely to multicultural retention issues. We are currently gathering and assessing retention information on students of color, and advisors are engaging in more intrusive tracking and follow up with advisees at risk of not returning to campus.

UWRF is very proud of obtaining $209,800 annually over 4 years to fund the McNair Post Baccalaureate Achievement Program. This funding has supported low-income, first generation students, and students of color to engage in student-faculty research projects. It gives students financial support, clearly aids in student retention and educational achievement, and encourages students to attend graduate school. The implications of a more diverse graduate school population and future faculty are very positive.

We appreciate the support of a local business, First National Bank of River Falls , to offer summer employment and a scholarship to a student of color. UWRF will be working actively within our community and region for similar connections to other businesses for mutual benefit.

Goal V: Increase the number of faculty, academic staff, classified staff and administrators of color so that they are represented in the UW system workforce in proportion to their current availability in relevant job pools. In addition, work to increase their future availability as potential employees.

First, UWRF will continue to monitor our current faculty and staff diversity in hiring and retention and to assess campus climate regularly. The campus' annual Affirmative Action Plan identifies employment areas of under-utilization. The Equity and Affirmative Action Officer closely monitors campus hiring procedures, scrutinizing the diversity of applicant pools.

Through these and other methods, we continue to progress toward greater employee diversity. The biennial climate survey and accompanying feedback help alert us to areas needing development. A recently convened campus task force on reporting and compliance should help us maintain consistency and increase efficiency in gathering this key data.

The workplace opportunity action steps focus on developing English as a Second Language (ESL) training programs for non-native speakers. A collaborative effort among the College of Agriculture , Food, and Environmental Science; College of Arts and Sciences; Outreach and Graduate Studies; and Cooperative Extension provides ESL training for dairy workers. This program fulfills a need in our key state industry, increases employment options for people of color, and has expanded to serve other industries.

The 3-credit diversity course requirement has been an important element of our General Education program since 1988. We currently offer 58 courses that fulfill this requirement. General Education at UWRF is in the process of being assessed and revised; one of the stated goals of this program is for students to "examine social identities and behaviors with emphasis on the diversity within American society" and "to develop and appreciate the responsibilities of individuals to themselves, society and the world." Including future course and program components to achieve these goals will be integral to the curriculum.

A particular highlight this past year has been the success of the library staff in pursuing funds to enhance our holdings in Ethnic Studies. Continued growth of the library's diversity resources serve all students on campus as they study diversity issues in required and elective courses.

Increase the number of faculty, academic staff, classified staff and administrators of color so that they are represented in the UW System workforce in proportion to their current availability in relevant job pools. In addition, work to increase their future availability as potential employees.

In a further examination of administrators at the department chair level, 25.0% of department chairs are female and 3.6% are members of racial/ethnic minorities. Among heads of interdisciplinary academic units or programs, 57.1% are women; no racial/ethnic minorities administer these programs.

All positions from the workforce analysis are placed into job groups having similar content, wage rates and opportunities and ranked from lowest to highest paid job title. UW-River Falls' job groups are composed of classified staff, unclassified staff, non-instructional academic staff, instructional academic staff, and faculty.

The utilization analysis is prepared after availability rates for persons of color and women in each job group are established. The percentage of persons of color and women participating in each job group is compared with their availability in each job group. Any job group where the current participation rate is lower than the availability rate is identified as underutilized, indicated by "Y" on Table 1. The any difference rule is used.

UW-River Falls has conducted analyses of the workforce, job groups, availability, and utilization analysis. An annual placement rate goal for women and persons of color has been established for each Job Group that is underutilized for women and persons of color. The goal is equal to the availability rate for women and persons of color in the particular Job Group.

University continually monitors its progress toward the objectives of the Affirmative Action Plan as well as toward one of the institution's priority goals: to continue to foster a diverse, inclusive, and supportive campus community. The identification of goals is not a rationale or justification for giving a preference to any person, selecting a person, or adversely affecting a person's employment status on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, or national origin. By continuing to apply good faith efforts to implement the affirmative action program, the institution seeks to attain these goals.

Percentage goals for the following year, together with the current percent representation of women and persons of color by job group in which underutilization occurred, are listed on Table 2 and Table 3.

Considerable revision was done of the previously used job groups to reduce the number of groups having few incumbents. This work has resulted in a current and accurate depiction of the university's labor force and in job group incumbencies that provide a more valid basis for determining underutilization.

One category is currently underutilized for both women and minorities: Administrative Directors/Assistant Directors. Active training and development efforts to prepare faculty and staff to move into these mid-level administrative positions may help to address this issue.

On-going development and training of search committees and others with input into the hiring process is an avenue to address this issue, with special attention being paid to searches in the job groups noted above. In classified searches, job groups 003 (Clerical and Paraprofessional Support) and 005 (Labor and Support Services) also indicate potential for minority hires.

Classified staff hiring procedures remain somewhat restrictive as to recruitment area and establishing goals. The Office of State Employee Relations sets goals and timetables based only on Wisconsin data.

For purposes of determining under representation and establishing goals for classified employees, UW-River Falls is not considered a separate entity. Underutilization is determined by the Office of State Employee Relations, which controls expanded certification. According to federal census data River Falls is included in the Minneapolis/St. Paul Standard Metropolitan Area, which has a much higher concentration of ethnic and racial groups than does the area immediately surrounding UW-River Falls and within the state of Wisconsin . A recent change in regulations makes it permissible to recruit in Minnesota and Wisconsin for "border" areas but the difficulties remain to some degree.

Implementing Training for Search Committees, was sponsored and conducted by the Women in Science and Engineering Leadership Institute (WISELI). Although the title highlighted gender issues, the presenters, resource materials and day-long discussions addressed improving gender, racial and ethnic diversity. The workshop modeled training methods which could be used with campus search committees. The written materials were also available and adoptable for inclusion in UW-River Falls ' written search guidelines.

As a result, those guidelines were revised, including more material on diversity in hiring, perceptual barriers to diverse hiring, and strategies for search chairs to counteract those barriers. Updated guidelines are now posted on the Human Resources website and hard copies in binders were prepared and distributed to chairs of 2005-06 search committees for unclassified (faculty and academic staff) positions.

In September and October, 2005, two training sessions were held for search committee chairs and the program assistants supporting those searches to present the additional diversity information. Forty people attended those sessions.

A training video and accompanying workbooks from DIVERSITY WORKS, Inc. were purchased. This is a more comprehensive approach to examining university culture with respect to employee diversity. Based on impressionistic and anecdotal evidence, the KOF leadership group felt retention, as well as recruitment, was important.

The climate study initiative is engaging two other campus groups in addition to members of the KOF leadership team: the AA/EEO advisory committee and the Plan 2008* team focusing on employee diversity. The committees are meeting jointly to identify climate and job satisfaction dimensions for inclusion in a survey of all employees. The goal is to pilot a survey during the summer of 2006, and conduct the survey during Fall semester, 2006. Preliminary discussions with our internal Survey Research Center resulted in encumbering $1200 for the survey.

KOF leadership team sponsored participation in an October 25, 2005 video conference from Academic Impressions on " Best Practices In Recruiting And Retaining Diverse Faculty." The "virtual" presenter was Charmaine P. Clowney, J.D., Director of Diversity in the Pennsylvania State System of Higher Education and President, Clowney & Associates. Ten administrators and faculty participated in the two-hour session which focused on best practices in hiring. Of particular interest was the issue of mentoring programs; furthering discussion of faculty mentoring across all colleges is on the agenda for the coming year.

Equity and Affirmative Action on issues and concerns relevant to equal opportunity for all employees and applicants for employment To advise the University administration and Equity and Affirmative Action on programs designed to ensure equal opportunity to all employees and applicants for employment To communicate issues raised within Affirmative Action Committee meetings to the appropriate group(s), e.g., University administration, academic or administrative units, governance groups, the university community at large, etc.

Voluntary exit surveys are under revision with the plan to continue surveying all classified and unclassified employees who leave the University. Data that is collected from these surveys and interviews are used to determine if the university's nondiscrimination policies and procedures are being followed.

Equity and Affirmative Action and Human Resources have created new and more detailed spreadsheets to track the number of offers made, declined, and accepted for faculty and academic staff searches. Race/ethnicity and gender data of finalists for positions will continue to be noted. When available, reasons for declining an employment offer will be noted. This may give a better sense of how best to focus efforts to increase the acceptance of first offers and to enhance diversity of new hires.

Procedures for full-time academic staff and tenure track faculty recruitment and hiring are revised and updated on a continuing basis. Equity and Affirmative Action meets with each search and screen committee at the beginning of the search process to update them on procedures and discuss diversity issues in the context of hiring.

Position descriptions are reviewed to ensure that they accurately reflect position duties and responsibilities and that the minimum qualifications are job related and do not create artificial barriers to employment. The review continues at the time of recruitment for all vacancies.

Recruitment plans, or protocols, are developed and monitored by the College Deans and the Equity and Affirmative Action Officer to ensure comprehensive good faith efforts are made to attract qualified women and minority applicants at least approximately in proportion to their availability. As of Fall, 2003, advertisements for faculty and staff positions have been routinely placed in professional academic publications targeting a diverse audience: Diverse Issues in Higher Education, Hispanic Outlook and Women in Higher Education.

Interview lists are reviewed by the College Deans and the Equity and Affirmative Action Officer to ensure they reflect the composition of the pool of qualified applicants. In addition to reviewing the diversity within applicant pools, the Equity and Affirmative Action Officer also consults with departments and administrative units as they identify semi-finalists for telephone interviews.

Policies and procedures applicable to complaints of sexual harassment will be reviewed and updated to conform to Title VII and Title IX standards. The posting of these policies and procedures in relevant publications and on the Equity and Affirmative Action website are regularly updated.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls is committed to a policy of providing equal employment opportunity for all qualified individuals regardless of race, religion, creed, color, sex, national origin, ancestry, age, disability, marital status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, political affiliation, membership in the national guard, state defense force or any other reserve component of the military forces of the United States or the State of Wisconsin.

Equal employment opportunity applies to all faculty, academic staff, classified, limited term and project positions, and to all employment practices including, but not limited to: recruitment, hiring, certification, testing, transfers, promotions, tenure, training, compensation, benefits, layoffs, non-contract renewals, terminations, retention, and committee assignment. UW-River Falls is committed to making every good faith effort to achieve the goal of equal employment opportunity.

Affirmative Action policies and programs are tools whereby additional efforts are made to recruit, employ and promote qualified members of these formerly excluded groups. Unless affirmative action is undertaken to recruit and retain members of these underrepresented groups nondiscriminatory employment practices will perpetuate the present imbalanced situation. Through specific and result-oriented activities the University's goals are to ensure that every person is given full consideration through equal employment opportunity policies and practices and to achieve a representative workforce through its affirmative action efforts.

UW-River Falls ensures physical accessibility to work environments for persons with disabilities and provides reasonable accommodation to ensure equal access to employment and all benefits associated with employment. When requested, reasonable accommodations for religious observances and practices will be provided.

Falls periodically examines all employment policies for discrimination and if discrimination is found, takes remedial action to correct the problem. All management personnel share in the responsibility for monitoring all equal employment and affirmative action policies. Evaluation of management includes an assessment of performance effectiveness in assisting the University in achieving its employment goals.

Affirmative Action Officer and is responsible for monitoring the effectiveness of equal opportunity and where necessary, the implementation of affirmative action programs. Persons seeking to file a complaint of harassment or discrimination should first bring the situation to the attention of their immediate supervisor. However, the employee may bypass their immediate supervisor and directly contact the Assistant to the Chancellor for Equity and Affirmative Action.

Harassment by supervisors and/or co-workers on the basis of race, gender, sexual orientation, or other discriminatory bases are unlawful employment practices prohibited by state statutes, the Department of Employment Relations, and UW-River Falls and will not be tolerated. Harassment in any form will be prevented and addressed in a way that eliminates its occurrence. Retaliation against an employee who files a discrimination or harassment complaint, or against anyone who assists in the preparation of or testifies on behalf of an employee, is itself considered a form of discrimination and will be treated as such.

Action Plan, which includes an analysis of utilization and goals to increase the employment of underrepresented or underutilized protected groups of persons. The Equity and Affirmative Action website (www.uwrf.edu/oec) was updated and expanded during the summer of 2004.

Senior management and supervisory personnel are periodically updated through administrative meetings and/or in writing to explain and update the plan, the intent of the policy and individual responsibility for effective implementation.

"In meeting the University's commitment to affirmative action and equal opportunities in education and employment, it is the responsibility of each of the following administrative officers to provide leadership and guidance."

"In meeting the University's commitment to foster an environment of respect for the dignity and worth of all members of the University community, it is the responsibility of each of the following administrative officers to enforce the policy that sexual harassment of students and employees at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls is impermissible and unprofessional conduct which will not be tolerated and which is subject to disciplinary action."

Falls responsibility for recruitment and selection is delegated to the Provost/Vice Chancellor, Vice Chancellor for Administration and Finance, academic deans, department chairs, and faculty. The Equity and Affirmative Action Officer assists departments in the search and screen process and monitors the overall achievement of the University in meeting its goals and reports progress to the Chancellor.

The Provost and Vice Chancellor for Academic Affairs is the Chief Academic Officer of the University who oversees all undergraduate and graduate curricular programs, the hiring, development and evaluation of faculty and instructional staff, the Student Support Services Staff, International Programs, the Library and Grants and Contracts.

Other responsibilities of the position include: working closely with the Dean’s Council, which is comprised of deans from the four colleges, the Dean for Student Development and Campus Diversity, as well as the Director of Graduate Programs and the Director of Outreach Programs; budget planning and management; enrollment services; conducting program reviews; implementing and monitoring UW System mandates; facilitating, monitoring and approving externally funded research programs; facilitating faculty development activities; and providing oversight for student course evaluation for each academic program.

Chancellor for Administration & Finance's homepage. I invite you to tour this Web site and acquaint yourself with the departments and staff that comprise the Administrative Services of this University. We are proud of the professional and well-trained staff who strive to meet the needs of our students, faculty and visitors.

UW-River Falls regularly reviews its personnel processes to assure careful consideration of applicants who self-identify as persons with disabilities, disabled veterans, or Vietnam era veterans regardless of whether the job vacancy is to be filled by hiring or promotion.

Regarding veterans, only that portion of the military record, including discharge papers, relevant to the specific job qualifications for which the veteran is considered will be reviewed. UW-River Falls makes reasonable accommodation in modifying any personnel procedure necessary to provide equal opportunity to persons with disabilities, Vietnam era and disabled veterans.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls will provide reasonable accommodations for persons with disabilities (including veterans) to ensure equal access to employment unless it can be demonstrated that such an accommodation would impose undue hardship on the conduct of business.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls' nepotism policy precludes individuals from evaluating the work or academic performance of relatives, family members and/or spouses and from making hiring, salary or similar financial decisions concerning such persons (Chapter VII Faculty/Academic Staff Handbook 7.12).

It is the policy of the University of Wisconsin-River Falls not to discriminate against applicants or employees on the basis of religion or national origin. The University ensures applicants are employed, and employees are treated equally during employment without regard to their religion or national origin. Such action includes, but is not limited to the following: employment, promotion, demotion, transfer, recruitment, layoff or termination, rate of pay and selection for training.

Records are not maintained for purposes of determining religious affiliation, nor are they retrieved for purposes of determining national origin. Recruitment sources are notified of our equal employment opportunity policy. Grievance procedures are available for processing discrimination charges and are widely distributed. The employment of foreign nationals is dependent upon the issuance of permission to work through the appropriate visa.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls is committed to principles that enable educational and professional enhancement of all ethnic and racial groups. The University mission statement emphasizes the importance of student awareness and appreciation of diverse cultures within the United States and the world.

The present and future course of the University is designed to eliminate all policies and practices that work to the disadvantage of individuals on the basis of race, religion, color, creed, gender, disability, sexual orientation, national origin, age or ancestry.

The University will not tolerate conduct which is racist and discriminatory and which involves harassment based upon the race, gender, religion, color, creed, disability, national origin, sexual orientation, ancestry or age of any individual.

It is the intention of this University community and administration to work diligently to eliminate all forms of discrimination. Major attention will continue to be directed at those institutional and personal patterns that directly and indirectly feed the destructive forces of racism.

"Harassment and other discriminatory conduct" means intentional conduct, either verbal or physical, that explicitly demeans the age, ancestry, color, creed, disability, ethnicity, gender, national origin, race, religion, or sexual orientation of an individual or individuals, and (1) has the purpose or effect of interfering with the education, University-related work, or other University-authorized activity of a University student, employee, official or guest; or (2) creates an intimidating, hostile or demeaning environment for education, University-related work, or other University-authorized activity.

It is important to note that some acts may be construed as offensive and objectionable by an individual or groups but may not be harassing and discriminatory as defined by law. Harassing and discriminatory conduct will be decided on a case-by-case basis in accordance with federal and state laws and institutional guidelines.

Introduction: The Umbrella Policy for the University of Wisconsin-River Falls Codes of Conduct addresses all forms of discrimination and harassment. Sexual harassment is intended to be covered by this document. Informal and formal adjudication approaches are described.

The policy addressing sexual harassment includes all campus employees, students, guests, or officials. The formal complaint procedures are intended to be compatible with existing institutional policies, UW System codes, and collective bargaining agreements. Throughout the policy statement, the role of the Assistant to the Chancellor for Equity and Affirmative Action is emphasized as a resource in the conflict resolution and adjudication process.

Equally important is the implementation of a variety of educational programs designed to increase sensitivity to issues of sexual harassment. It is recognized by the authors of this policy that ignorance, insensitivity, and limited awareness regarding sexual harassment are often at the root of acts resulting in the degradation and humiliation of individuals. Thus, educational intervention is also emphasized as a preferred intervention in the resolution of complaints at the informal level.

Submission to or rejection of such conduct by an individual is used as the basis for employment or academic decisions affecting that individual; or Such conduct has the purpose and effect of unreasonably interfering with an individual's work or academic environment or performance by creating an intimidating, hostile, or offensive environment.

The degree of formality will be determined on a case-by-case basis in accordance with the expressed wishes of the victim(s), the Chancellor, the Assistant to the Chancellor for Equity and Affirmative Action, and the appropriate hearing body. (See Wisconsin Administrative Code, Student Handbook, and Collective Bargaining Agreement for Classified Staff.) It is emphasized that an informal process, based on interpersonal conflict resolution and education, is preferred to a formal process with predetermined criteria and formal penalties. However, it is also noted that the formal process will be utilized in those situations warranting this approach.

The investigative process in sexual harassment/discrimination allegations is considered the first phase in complaint resolution. It is important that both the victim and the accused be protected throughout this process.

Thus, it is imperative that anyone conducting the investigation be trained to understand all aspects of sexual harassment/discrimination, and that the investigation be conducted in an appropriate manner.

The person alleging sexual harassment or other discrimination discloses information about the incident to someone on campus (Assistant to the Chancellor for Equity and Affirmative Action, faculty, Dean of Students, Dean of College, Director of School, etc.).

The Assistant to the Chancellor for Equity and Affirmative Action is informed about the incident and the victim is encouraged to discuss it with him or her. If the person who is initially informed about the incident is someone other than the Assistant to the Chancellor for Equity and Affirmative Action, that individual may accompany the victim to  Equity and Affirmative Action.

Once a sexual harassment/discrimination complaint is received, the Assistant to the Chancellor for Equity and Affirmative Action will begin a preliminary fact-finding investigation to determine the validity of the complaint. This preliminary phase includes informing the accused that a complaint has been made and an investigation is occurring. The Dean/Director/Unit Head or department chair/immediate supervisor of the accused may also be informed if necessary.

In some cases, the Assistant to the Chancellor for Equity and Affirmative Action may act in the role of consultant and provide support and direction to a department chair, Dean, Director or administrator who elects to confront the accused person directly. In the case of students, the Dean of Students writes a letter to the accused student and schedules an appointment with him or her in order to discuss the complaint. The Assistant to the Chancellor for Equity and Affirmative Action is included in the meeting. The Assistant to the Chancellor for Equity and Affirmative Action is informed from the beginning and monitors the outcome of all cases handled without his or her direct involvement. Such cases are the exception rather than the rule, however, and most sexual harassment/discrimination incidents handled at the informal level involve the Assistant to the Chancellor for Equity and Affirmative Action in the resolution process.

The informal resolution of sexual harassment/discrimination involves several approaches. Every effort is made to enlighten the accused individual regarding the effect his or her conduct has had on the alleged victim. If the attitude on the part of the accused seems particularly resistant, then counseling is strongly recommended. The person filing the complaint may elect to be present during a meeting with the accused, but that is not required. If the accused denies the conduct and refuses to comply with recommendations, the alleged victim may choose to file a formal complaint. If the accused party does not dispute the accusation and agrees to cease the conduct and comply with recommendations, he or she is informed that any future incidents will be handled at the formal level. In those cases where a complainant decides not to reveal his or her name and chooses not to pursue the incident at either the formal or informal level, the accused individual is warned about the allegations without being told the identity of the accusing party. This is done to protect the rights of confidentiality of the accusing person while taking responsible institutional action and addressing the existence of the allegation. The accused person is informed that such an allegation has been made and that if true, all such conduct must stop immediately.

Informal resolution may involve a combination of educational strategies. The goal is to increase understanding and expand awareness of the effects of harassing or discriminatory conduct at a personal and social level. The goal is also to provide a "fair warning" regarding the seriousness of such acts and to inform the harassing individual that any future acts of this nature will be subject to formal sanctions. Basic to this approach is (1) the determination of the seriousness of the complaint; (2) the alleged victim's satisfaction with the resolution; and (3) emphasis on the education of the alleged harrasser.

Inform participants that once they have participated in an educational program as the result of committing an act of discrimination or sexual harassment, further acts of this nature will be considered "intentional" and subject to formal sanctions.

If anyone other than the Assistant to the Chancellor for Equity and Affirmative Action receives the complaint, the Assistant to the Chancellor for Equity and Affirmative Action is immediately informed.

The alleged victim of said acts concludes that the informal process is inadequate to address the serious nature of the sexual harassment/ discrimination conduct alleged to have occurred; and/or The person accused of sexual harassment/discrimination acts has been given previously warned demanding that such conduct must cease; and/or The accused individual desires adjudication at a formal level; and/or The sexual harassment/discrimination conduct falls within criminal codes covered under local, state or federal laws.

The University's process for resolution of complaints of discriminatory behavior includes allegations of discrimination based on disability, and applies to faculty, academic staff, students, classified staff, officials, and guests.

In a recent article in the Journal of College and University Law, Edward Stoner and John Lowery (2004) state that, “unlike society, our institutions are voluntary associations of scholars who demand and deserve a positive (and special) living/learning environment, as well as a special approach for enforcing the academic community’s standards.” It is with this philosophy in mind that the University of Wisconsin-River Falls designs and enforces the Campus Policies and Procedures for Students.

Compiled here are policies and procedures from not only our local UW-River Falls campus, but also those from State and federal sources which have high applicability to students. It is our goal that all members of the UW-River Falls community have an understanding of these policies and procedures. If you have any questions regarding the Campus Policies and Procedures for Students, please feel free to contact the Dean for Student Development and Campus Diversity.

The COST program is a program which allows University of Wisconsin -River Falls Student Teachers to student teach in foreign countries. The major objective of the program is to provide a student teacher with all the skills and knowledge that they will need when it comes to teaching within the classroom, while experiencing another culture and country.

If you are either in the College of Arts and Sciences or are in another program that requires liberal arts, try to leave as many slots in your liberal arts categories open as possible, especially the humanities and fine arts and social and behavioral sciences categories.

By choosing to participate in the ITC I agree to abide by University and Program guidelines, fulfill the requirements established in the ITC Handbook, and complete all tasks related to the Program. I understand that I must attend all orientation seminars, provide all requested documentation, maintain good academic standing (e.g., not be on academic probation), have a minimum cumulative grade point average of 2.25 at the end of the fall term preceding departure, and obtain a letter of recommendation from a University faculty or staff member who can address my ability to participate successfully in the ITC.

I understand that I am under absolutely no obligation unless I provide a deposit, but if I do provide a deposit it becomes non-refundable (unless the program is cancelled). I also agree that if I have not withdrawn in writing and have not received a written confirmation of my withdrawal by September preceding departure that I will be obligated to pay a second, non-refundable deposit of $350 and the Program Fee as part of my spring  tuition and fees (the Program fee covers the expenses of the program including, but not limited to, the following: airline tickets, some local transportation, costs of group-arranged accommodations, and so on).

At the time of application you must submit a recommendation form filled out by a University faculty or staff member who can address your ability to participate successfully in the ITC. The form is available here. You will also need to include a non-refundable deposit of $150 to reserve a slot in the program. Slots will be alloted on a first-come, first-served basis.

Talk with parents, significant others, etc., about the experience, showing them the letter from the 2007 group leader that can help answer questions they might have. Encourage them to call the ITC coordinator or group leader if they have questions.

When registering for fall 2006 courses, remember to ensure that you aren't taking courses that will fulfill requirements you can complete in spring 2007. Consult the course listing sheet, and contact the ITC coordinator if you have any questions or concerns.

Be sure to file for financial aid before the deadlines, even if you don't normally do so. The additional costs involved in studying abroad can be used to recalculate your financial need and that might makae you eligible for aid. In addition, there are some grant monies that require that you've submitted that you've submitted your financial aid application.

Be sure your passport application has been submitted. You cannot leave the country without it, so don't procrastinate and "miss the plane," literally, because you don't have your passport. General directions and a downloadable application can be found at the U.S. State Department site: http://travel.state.gov/passport_services.html. You can also obtain applications (and drop off completed ones) at the St. Croix County Clerk's office, at 1101 Carmichael Road, Hudson, Wisconsin (telephone: 715-386-4610). You'll need two identical photographs (as described in the application form), a certified copy of your birth certificate (if you don't have one of these you can obtain one from the clerk's office in the county where you were born), identification showing your address (such as a current driver's license), and your checkbook.

Submit an additional non-refundable deposit of $350 (this money will be used to pay program expenses, such as airline tickets for participants, and the check should be written to the University of Wisconsin - River Falls).

It is important to seek internships which will give you  experience IN YOUR FIELD. To assist in obtaining an internship, prospective interns are strongly encouraged to receive assistance from Career Services with developing skills like resume development and learning effective interviewing techniques.

The websites listed provide examples of public and private organizations interested in promoting the rights and interests of American women and examine the history of women's rights in the United States.

Agricultural Education prepares students for teaching positions in agricultural education/agribusiness. It is also a good preparation for jobs in agricultural business, sales, service, production, marketing, extension and research.

The majority of the classes taken by agricultural education majors are taken in agricultural economics, agricultural education, animal and food science, agricultural engineering technology and plant and earth science. Students also complete basic studies course work in English, mathematics, science, social science and humanities.

The Marketing Communications major is an interdisciplinary program offered jointly by the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences, the College of Arts and Sciences, and the College of Business and Economics. Students may place the major within any of the colleges.

A Marketing Communications major in the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences prepares you for a multidimensional career combining the areas of agriculture, advertising, public relations, promotion, and business. The ever-changing, technologically advanced, competitive agricultural business world needs enthusiastic people like you. You will meet the needs of the dynamic agricultural world by applying your expertise in Marketing Communications.

The Agricultural Education Society is an organization whose purpose is to promote agricultural education and FFA, give future agricultural educators experiences to better understand their role as a future agriculture teachers, and provide opportunities for all students to participate in a variety of activities and experiences such as parliamentary procedure workshops and judging, attendance at State and National FFA Convention, and assisting with the Agricultural Technology Contest.

Alpha Tau Alpha (ATA) is an honorary organization which promotes the highest ideals and standards of the agricultural education profession by enabling more intimate acquaintances and closer relationships with individuals who have chosen the profession of teaching agriculture.

Each year, ATA and Ag Ed Society organize a shadow day for future Agricultural Education majors at UW-RF. During the shadow day, students are able to attend classes with current Ag Ed majors and experience college life for themselves. During the spring of your senior year, all newly admitted ag ed majors will be contacted with information regarding this great experience.

Please print and sign the following questionnaire. This is a pdf form, you can type your information in the boxes before you print, but you cannot save this. Bring this completed form to your interview for Admission to Professional Standing in Agricultural Education.

If you are ready to fill out the application for Admission to Professional Standing in Agricultural Education, click on the following link. Be sure to fill in all data fields that apply. If data field does not apply to you simply leave it blank. Please print two copies of this form. Turn in all forms to the Ag Ed Department and schedule a time for your interview (324 AGS).

Word or Adobe Acrobat. To enter your personal data in the document, just simply click on the box and type your entry. For the documents without the boxes press the insert key. (This will allow you to type over the document without changing its format) . Acrobat files can then be printed, but not saved.

GPA - A "what-if" Calculator. Download and enter in all of your classes and grades and see what your GPA is/will be if you get the grades you are expecting. Follow the directions on the Excel Spreadsheet for optimal results.

Rich Text Format (have a .rtf after the file name) and can be opened with all standard word processing applications. Others are saved in Microsoft Word Format (followed by .doc) and can be opened with Microsoft Word and some versions of Wordpad.

All students planning to enroll in an initial professional education program in Wisconsin colleges or universities that leads to a license to teach in the state will be required to pass basic skills tests in reading, writing, and mathematics.

Education masters graduates is promising. With the rising demand in the agricultural industry, an Ag Ed masters is sure to provide excellent job opportunities, with competitive starting salaries, in promising and exciting careers The future of agricultural education is related to dynamic changes in all fields of agriculture, food and environmental sciences. These changes include a need for knowledgeable and quality leaders.

Students in the masters program have 3 "Plans" in 3 "Options" to choose from - a total of 9 different programs, providing maximum flexibility for students. We are in the process of developing additional online courses to make the programs even more accessible to working professionals.

Option I - Professional Development in Agricultural Education This option is designed for educators in both classroom and non-formal settings to continue their professional development. The degree includes 6 credits of Professional Education, 21-25 credits of Specialization, and 3 credits of Non-Specialization.

Thesis Plan (Plan A) - A minimum of 30 semester credits of graduate course work, including a master's thesis for which you may receive no more than 4 graduate credits, with an oral  comprehensive examination.

Research Paper Plan (Plan B) - A minimum of 30 semester credits of graduate course work, including a research paper approved and filed as part of the graduate program for which you may receive no more than 3 credits, with an oral comprehensive examination.

Formerly, called Broad Area Agriculture, the Agricultural Studies major is an interdisciplinary major requiring courses from each of the five departments in the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences.

Some students entering college find it difficult during the first semester to select a specialized major. In such case, the Agricultural Studies program can serve as a pre-major, allowing the student to take courses in agriculture prior to declaring a specialization later.

The College Scholarship Committee wants to remind all CAFES continuing  students that you may be eligible for a number of scholarships available to assist you in financing your education. Please note: your first major must be in CAFES.

CAFES/USDA Research Experience Recommendation Form -- Open the recommendation form and save it on the server. Complete the top half of the form, save it again. You can email it to the person who will be providing the recommendation. He or she will complete the bottom half of the application, print it out, sign it and return it to the Dean's Office.  Remember you need to have two recommendations to complete your application.

The on-going challenges and opportunities related to food, soil and crop sciences, production agriculture, agricultural education, geo-sciences, natural resources and  environmental sciences on  regional, national and global scales create a broad range of exciting career opportunities.

Additional special areas of emphasis include dairy science, horse science, meat animal science, agricultural business, horticulture, crop science, agricultural engineering technology, soil science, environmental science and management, land use planning, conservation and geology.

Errors may be the result of changes to this Web site in December 2005 to better serve our current and prospective students, community and other lifelong learners. We are sorry for any inconvenience that this may cause you.

Opportunities to positively affect our curricular programming due to the positive relationship established with theUW-RF and the departments in the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences.

Want to get involved? The Involvement Center will serve as a co-curricular resource center and will be a one-stop shop for introducing and including you in the campus community. It will be a space that will recognize the importance of out-of-class experiences and offer many opportunities and areas for students to be connected and engaged in campus life.

What's going on around here? Many student committees and organizations hold events on campus every week. From annual events like Unity in the Community, Homecoming, and Winter Carnival, to weekly entertainment by professional comedians, musicians, and speakers, you are sure to find something fun and interesting to do! Check out our calendar of campus events.

Find people like you! There are nearly 135 campus organizations and programs recognized and supported by the University that reflect the interest of students in politics, religion, athletics, recreation and wellness, service, professional affiliations, and other diverse activities. See the complete listing of our recognized student organizations.

Get out and get going! Recreation at UW-River Falls includes intramurals, sport clubs, the Body Shop, and KinniConnections. No matter what your interest, you will find many recreational opportunities on campus.

Leave your mark on the community and the world! Whether you are volunteering in River Falls or traveling to Mississippi to provide Hurricane Katrina relief, there are many ways to volunteer your time and make a difference.

Your opinion counts! Wisconsin is one of the few states in the nation to provide students with a statutory role in university governance. The Involvement Center will house three components of shared governance: Student Senate, the Leadership Development and Programming Board, and the Facilities and Fees Board.

Make a difference in your living community! Hall Councils are the programming and representative organizations for each residence hall on campus. Residence halls are a great place to be involved and offer leadership opportunities through Hall Councils, Area Councils, and National Residence Hall Honorary. Take a closer look at our residence halls on campus.

In a shopping mood? You'll discover a variety of retail services in University Center. Services will include Banking, Copy Center, Follett Bookstore, and everything from snacks and beverages to complete dinners.

Got questions? Information Desk staff will welcome all entering visitors to this exciting new facility, providing answers to questions and directions for navigating through the building. There will also be information kiosks to help you out.

Want to get involved? The Involvement Center, located on the second level, will be the new home for most Student Services and Programs offices. Make room reservations, arrange your dining and housing needs, plan for conferences, or learn about student organizations and activities ranging from governance and committees to intramurals and recreation.

Wouldn't it be great to have a latt while you check your e-mail? The Cyber Caf in University Center will be a great place to do just that. No more having to put up with signs saying "no food or beverages allowed" here. Come in, be at home, check your Facebook, and enjoy a beverage at the same time.

Are you looking for some fun? Picture yourself walking into a two level room with a stage, dance floor and sound/lighting technology. There is a slightly edgy, energetic feeling in the air. The main floor standard seating is round tables of 6 for 144 persons, or theater seating for 325. Walk up the stairs and past the game room and enjoy seating on the mezzanine level.

Looking for a comfy spot? Then come relax by the fireplace! University Center will have a number of spaces designed for lounging and meeting friends. If you want to stop by the Robert G. Sievert Fireplace Lounge, or just hang out in a cozy chair along the front porch, you will find ample areas to make yourself at home.

Imagine the people you will see. In addition to the eleven technology-enhanced meeting rooms, you could have many opportunities to attend events in the new ballroom. Special events serving up to 680 people can be accommodated. You also could attend a special guest speaker in the theater-style lecture hall, which seats 156 people. You can review the various meeting rooms in University Center as well as the Hagestad Student Center and Rodli Commons and request a reservation.

Needing some fresh air? University Center will incorporate native grasses and plantings around the building as it connects to the South Fork of the Kinnickinnic river. A detention pond will help alleviate water pollution problems from the 65 stall parking lot located on the southeast of the building. A large natural seating area with a fire pit and patio will be located on the west side of the building.

How did University Center project begin? In 1998, a group of students on the new student center committee recognized the need to build an addition onto the existing Hagestad Student Center. (read more...) There are many financial factors involved with building a student center. (read more...) Students recognized a need to build using environmentally sustainable methods...

What is happening and when? Construction is currently on schedule. Tours of the new building will be scheduled as soon as most of the heavy construction work is finished. Keep checking this site for details on how you can take a tour of the building.

The Hagestad Student Center first opened its doors in 1958 with anticipated student body of 2,500. In 1998, a group of students on the new student center committee recognized the need to build an addition onto the existing Hagestad Student Center. It was determined that the size of the building addition needed was too big to be added to the existing Student Center. The new student center committee further researched options as part of the Campus-Wide Master Planning process. Building a new facility that would combine the functions of both the Rodli Commons building and the Hagestad Student Center building into one location in the center of campus was a clean solution to the problem.

The Hagestad Student Center original structure was built in 1958. Due to growing enrollments and further demand on services, the ballroom section of the Hagestad Student Center was added in 1964. A major remodeling project in 1981 incorporated more space in what is now the Falcon's nest area and established the atrium section of the building. Brandy's nightclub was constructed in 1990. The Rodli Commons food service building was constructed in 1967 and was scheduled for a three million dollar renovation in 2006. Instead of spending the money to remodel Rodli Commons, Student Governance members chose to incorporate all dining services in the new building.

Did you know there used to be another building where University Center is being built? The Ames Teacher Education Center building served the University of Wisconsin-River Falls between 1962 and 2005. Front entrance supports that were part of the Ames Teacher Education building are incorporated into the art sculpture in University Center.

The term Segregated University Fee(s) describes charges in addition to instructional fees assessed to all students for services, programs and facilities that support the primary mission of the university. Segregated university fees may only be used to support student services activities as defined by the UW System Uniform Chart of Accounts and further limited by FAP - Student Services Funding (G15).

University Center is paid for and operated with segregated fees paid by previous, current, and future UWRF students. Some students ask if their segregated fees will increase as a result of the new building. Since 1998, the students serving on the new student center committee have continued to work on the budgetary considerations for University Center. Increasing segregated fees began in 1999 and continues today. Future increases of segregated fees will only be enacted through the shared governance process.

I'm graduating. How does this building help me? Each generation of alumni that leaves the University of Wisconsin-River Falls not only takes away a foundation of educational and social principles, but leaves behind their unique offerings to building a better community for each next generation of students to enjoy. University Center serves as a unifying force that honors each individual and values diversity. University Center fosters a sense of community that cultivates enduring loyalty to the university. The students in 1998 had a vision for "fostering" this sense of community in a new building. Those alumni — indeed all alumni — will also continue the legacy to the future.

Campus Information and Student Center calls will forward to University Center as of Monday, December 18.  While an interruption to the phone service is possible on Tuesday, December 19 while the new phones lines are established, any outages should be brief.

The Northeast portion of Hagestad Hall will be locked and blocked from public access by late January 2007.  Some hallways and offices in the south portion of the Hagestad Building, including the atrium, will remain open and accessible.

University Center anticipates opening in a limited capacity on Tuesday, December 26.  Visitors should be reminded that a great deal of transition and finishing work will continue during the J-term period.

Food and Environmental Sciences is housed in the Agricultural Sciences Building on the UW-River Falls campus. The College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences has provided training in the agricultural and related sciences since 1912. It has earned an outstanding reputation for high quality, student-oriented education  and service to the people of Wisconsin. Over 50 percent of the teachers of high school agriculture in the State of Wisconsin were trained at this university.

This includes management of the department office, supervision of an LTE and student work study personnel, maintaining department budgets, files, and office equipment and supplies. Also type class materials, reports, forms, memos and miscellaneous materials and perform many other varied general office tasks.

Coordinating outreach programs sponsored by the department with assistance in preparing brochures, updating mailing lists, coordinating facilities, hosting the registration table, and acting as liaison with Conference and Events Office.

The National Reining  Breeders Classic was established in late summer of 1997 as the National Reining  Breeders Cup. That name would be changed less than a year later to The National  Reining Breeders Classic to reflect the prominence and importance of the event.

Response to the program was  overwhelming from the beginning and the list of subscribed stallions reads like  a "Whos Who" in the reining industry. Board Chairman Tom McCutcheon  of Aubrey, Texas says, "By October first of 1997,  before the appearance of a single advertisement, word of mouth had resulted in  paid enrollment of 60 stallions."

Stallion owners donate a breeding(s) which the Sire & Dam Program then  sells to a mare owner for one half of the current year advertised fee. In  addition to the bargain on the breeding fee, the mare owner also receives a  substantial discount on entering the resulting foal in the NRHA Futurity and  NRHA Derby.

Now in  their fourth year of sales, the Solums are pleased to be bringing their  professional sales management services to River Falls,  having close ties to the area, as many of their friends and family still reside  here. Mid America Equine Sales is based out of Lamar Missouri, running sales  throughout the Midwest. A major advantage of working with Mid  America, in addition to their many years of experience, all foals consigned to  one of their sales are eligible for one of three Mid America Futurities. These major futurities are among the top 5  highest paying futurities, offering up to $70,000 in payout's. The entry fees are waived, as they are  covered in the consignment costs at the time of the sale. Also, only foals consigned to one of the  sales are eligible to enter these major futurities. By purchasing a colt from the Colts in  Training sale, you would have the opportunity to run at $70,000 in either a  reining, cutting or reined cowhorse futurity, with no entry fee cost, and a  very limited amount of competitors.

In addition to completing the requirements for the Sociology major, students are urged to take as many upper division courses as possible and to choose a minor appropriate to their future field. The professional orientation is designed to provide a broad basis of preparation for those going on to graduate programs in the professions. These programs include urban planning, law, social work, library science, social and public policy, environmental studies, counseling, international relations, journalism, criminal justice and police science, anthropology and archeology. Students with such interests are urged to talk them over with their advisor and to follow the advice given under "Graduate School Orientation."

Belize, a small Central American country nestled between Mexico, Guatemala, and the Caribbean sea, where wildlife outnumbers people, where 65% of the forest remains, and where the second largest barrier reef in the world is just off shore.

Participation in the Belize Study Tour requires an openness to adventure, challenge, and diversity. We are seeking students who have the desire to learn about Belize culture, history, wildlife, and the policy issues regarding conservation of Belize's natural resources. Students must be in a good state of health and fitness for activities require hiking, climbing and swimming.

The estimated cost for the Belize Study Tour is $2,420. Costs not included are stuition, international program fee, insurance, passport, medical and personal expenses, some meals, and optional activities. Students may qualify for financial aid, see Margaret Thorne, Office of Financial Assistance.

I recall an incident that occurred while we lived in the Denzer house. I don't know the exact year this happened, but at the time of the incident I didn't know the real value of a dollar. I would guess the year was about 1934 or I was home alone one afternoon and I spotted a silver dollar on the top of my folks dresser. I didn't know how much it was, but I knew it was valuable because it was so much bigger than a familiar nickel. Since there was no one around I decided to take it and buy some candy. I went downtown to Mueller's Corner Grocery Store. Then I proceeded to pick out some candy and handed old man Mueller the silver dollar. He said "wait a minute, you have some change coming." Well, my eyes nearly bugged out of my head when he kept putting change into my hand. There were quarters, nickels, dimes, and pennies. I only thought about how rich I was. Then it started to sink in that I had really gotten into more than I had bargained for. What to do with the big bag of candy, and what to do with all that change? I went down by the railroad tracks and hid it all under a big rock. After I got home no one had missed the dollar yet. Soon, however, a crisis swept over the family. My folks never accused anyone, but they never let up in their relentless search and discussion about it. This went on for several days. I was aware things were bad, but I didn't realize the scope of this. I never let on that I took it because by this time I was scared to death, and I didn't know how to confess...Instead of thinking that I had gotten away with the perfect crime, I realized from that time on what it meant to be honest.

The earliest images of downtown River Falls are filled with rows of wooden shops and horse drawn carriages traveling on rutted dirt streets. In 1886, after years of devastating fires, the River Falls Common Council passed a Fire Limit Ordinance requiring all new buildings to be constructed with brick or stone rather than wood. [See Pioneer Hook & Ladder Co. Exhibit] Main Street was paved in the early 1920's.

Before a city waterworks existed, townspeople engaged in experimental firefighting methods. "Bucket brigades" existed in the early days in which pails of water were passed from the banks of the Kinnickinnic River toward the fire, a method which proved difficult if the fire was a good distance from the river or in the winter months when the Kinnickinnic was frozen.

A Pioneer Hook firefighter remembers working with what was referred to as the "Old Soda Fountain," a chemical extinguisher that proved to be inadequate. "...we used to go to the nearest well, fill the tub with water, put in some acid and soda and watch the thing belch forth, sputter and spew; then we would fill her again and by that time the building had burned down. The boys said "no good" and sent it back."

By 1887, 500 feet of hose was purchased by the city which was enough to protect the commercial district although not the entire city. In 1888 the Common Council purchased 3 200 barrel cisterns to be placed in strategic areas but neither measure was enough to protect from another series of dangerous fires which destroyed AW Lunds Carriage store downtown and several other businesses in the commercial district. In May of 1893 a resolution was passed to establish a city waterworks, the most prominent reason being better citywide fire protection, and it was in place by 1894.

Like most towns of the era, wooden buildings constructed in close proximity to one another coupled with kerosene lamps and coal furnaces were a recipe for rapidly spreading fires in nineteenth century River Falls. In October 1875, a fire broke out in the new Metropolitan Hotel and burned eight surrounding businesses before it was brought under control. A few months later, another fire erupted which destroyed every building north of the post office on Main Street.

In April, 1878 a fire downtown in Cameron's Bakery burned an entire block including fourteen buildings to the ground before it could be extinguished. The River Falls Academy, Prairie Mill, the original Normal School building, and the Commercial Hotel, among many other structures, all fell victim to destructive blazes.

Challenger, Discovery, and Endeavor. He was involved in multiple onboard experiments and filmed Earth with a special IMAX camera for the film "The Blue Planet." Brandenstein often brought personal mementos with him to space including his parents' wedding rings, a Watertown medallion and municipal seal, and even some items from his alma mater including a Freddy the Falcon, UW-River Falls t-shirts and a River Falls pennant.

Flour milling was the boom industry of early River Falls but by 1900, as many of the mills were facing declining production or closing down altogether, it had become clear to farmers and businessmen that a single-crop economy could not be sustained. In the transition away from milling many new ventures were pursued including creameries, starch and brick manufacturing, and dairying. The dairy industry soon emerged as the most promising opportunity.

The Bartosh dairy operation, known as Park View Dairy, consisted of 40 cows. The milk was unpasteurized and delivered in glass bottles. In 1920-22, Bartosh started a milk route and by 1942 his route served 176 homes and one store in the city of River Falls that took 300 quarts of milk per day plus cream. Bartosh was the first to make used of motor vehicles for the trade and made daily deliveries to customers all throughout River Falls. During a severe heat wave in the 1930's, when pastures were dry and dairy production down, Bartosh even moved his herd to a far northern area of the state near a lake with plenty of lush pasture and trucked his dairy back down to his many customers in River Falls every morning and night. In the years before modern mechanization, he employed up to three hired men and one college student in addition to his two sons.

The Park View Dairy was operated until 1942, at which time it was discontinued due to delivery and labor problems caused by World War II. Relatives report that only two days went by during those 20 years when Bartosh or one of his sons did not go out with the milk truck.

Like cities all across the country, citizens of River Falls observed rationing protocol and collected paper (newspaper drive in River Falls elementary classes, 1917) and other items for the war effort. Local newspapers published a plethera of articles, advertisements and regular columns addressing war preparedness, personal responsibility and patriotism.  Read a 1918 River Falls Journal article on the United War Work Campaign Day for Wisconsin pupils.

Letters home to parents as well as guard and fatigue detail rule cards from Charlie Corcoran, River Falls resident, during his army training in Rockford, IL, and during military service overseas during WWI (River Falls Mss EP). Also included are pieces of correspondence that have been inspected and stamped by military censors as well as a handwritten letter from Windsor Castle by King George V of England, welcoming US soldiers to the battle in Europe.

Most people in River Falls learned that the US had entered into WWII while listening to a radio speech by President Roosevelt calling for a formal declaration of war in a joint session of Congress the day after the attack on Pearl Harbor. Students at the college, then known as the River Falls State Teachers College (RFSTC), listened over a special radio hook-up in an assembly at North Hall.

Leading up to that declaration, locals had already been preparing for the possibility of war. National Guard members from River Falls had already been called up for active duty. The Boy Scouts and Pierce County Defense Council held aluminum scrap metal drives. After war was officially declared, the local high school and the RFSTC began offering evening classes for farm youths to prepare them for anticipated machinery shortages.

In Front Line Nurse, Buckely provides vivid and harrowing recollections of war from being attacked by a Nazi dive bomber while separated from her unit to aiding wounded soldiers amid ramshackle conditions in Naples.

It was D plus three - Army parlance for the third day after the start of the invasion - that we moved into the Bay of Salerno. I could see the pinpoints of colorless flash flame from the muzzles of the German 88's...

Family Papers contain several diaries and personal papers detailing rural farm life in Wisconsin, particularly the Ono area of Union Township in Pierce County, during the late 1800's through the early 1900's. Authors of the diairies are a mother and daughter, Jennie P. Andrews and Edna J. Gerrish. The diaries tell of hardships as well as times of plenty, and provide details on farm chores, domestic responsibilities and other family affairs while living on the Wisconsin plains.

The 1960's was an exciting decade on the River Falls campus. It was the era of civil rights and Vietnam. The Student Senate adopted a guide supporting student rights to participate in peaceful campus demonstrations and "teach-ins." Unrest was not limited to issues of national interest. Students rallied for changes on campus including having more freedom in dormitories, banning the obligatory freshman "beanies," and allowing the sale of beer on campus.

"My first pep assembly--how I looked forward to it! The students all stood up to sing the Pledge Song. I stood up with them. My voice trembled, my knees shook and my hair stood on end. Suddenly I felt as though I belonged here and I began to sing with all my might. I had the College Spirit!"

Although intramural teams existed as early as 1887, the very first baseball game played at River Falls took place in May of 1896 against a local high school team. The college boys lost 12-11. A rematch took place the following week in which the college boys beat the high school team with a score of 16-11.

College football at River Falls began with a reputation as being brutal ruffian amusement, unfit for college men. The first interscholastic game was played in 1869 but even in 1894 when a real college team was established, the Normal Nockers (who made their own uniforms), many among the faculty and townspeople were apprehensive.

The very first HOMECOMING at River Falls took place on November 18, 1922. The celebration was citywide. Homes and businesses were decorated in school colors; almost every campus organization built a float for the parade in which hundreds of students, alumni and townspeople marched on their way to cheer on the team at Ramer Field. The 1920's also saw the emergence of the "Snake Dance," a tradition in which students left classes en mass to link arms and "snake" through town.

Tennis, which was played in freshman gym classes on campus as early as 1880, dropped off in popularity by 1895 due to long, lagging matches. After 1900 tennis regained respectability because President Theodore Roosevelt was a fan of the sport. By the 1920's, students as well as members of the faculty were competing in lively singles and doubles tennis tournaments on the courts outside of South Hall.

S. (Leavitt) Cairns, taught at the academy after moving to the area from Maine in 1857. At age 84, Abbie Cairns presided over the first reunion (and several thereafter) of the Pioneer Girls which was held in June of 1915 at the home of Mrs. Will Endress. She called the meeting to order by ringing the same small handheld school bell as she once had at the old academy, then read off a roll call to which many of her former pupils answered. Thirty five women were present, 65 absent, and 34 deceased. Click here to see an invitation and read an article about the first reunion.

Examples would include annual reports produced by a corporation, meeting minutes of an organization, publications produced by a state agency, personal diaries or narratives, etc. The term archives can also be used in the generic sense of a place where historical items, old documents and artifacts are stored. Archives generally have a geographic or thematic focus. For example, the National Archives and Records Administration, collects materials that document important events in American history. The Archives of African American Music and Culture collects and preserves oral histories, photographs, audio and video recordings, and other materials related to African American music culture.

For the convenience of researchers, WHS collections can be transferred between ARC’s though a courier system. University records do not circulate and can only be viewed at the UW-River Falls University Archives. Contact the Archivist for more information.

The cards in the index will contain the name of the person, the particular event or category, the name of the source in which to find it, the date the information appeared in the source and/or a page number in the source.

This series of books has gone under several different titles, such as the Legislative Manual for the State of Wisconsin, the Blue Book for the State of Wisconsin, etc. However, they are commonly referred to as the “Blue Books.” Issued for 2-year periods, the Blue Book lists the members of the Wisconsin legislature and the Wisconsin members of the U.S. Congress. It also gives a tremendous amount of information about the state, such as school enrollments, population statistics, county officials, county seats, descriptions of various state agencies, names of newspapers published in the state, voting statistics, etc. The River Falls center has almost a complete run of the series, going back to the mid-1800’s. Two biographical indexes have been published that help to track former legislators and state officials.

The first step when researching a business is to consult the manuscript collections to determine if the River Falls center has a collection from a particular enterprise. Local history books, Sanborn maps, tax rolls, the center’s vertical file, and centennial/special editions of a local newspaper where the business was located are also useful sources. If the founders or people with major involvement in the business can be named, using the biographical index to trace them as individuals often produces additional useful information about the business. Holdings records for manuscript collections and local histories at the River Falls ARC can be found online in the UW-River Falls Voyager library catalog. Sanborn maps, tax rolls, newspapers, the vertical file and biographical index must be viewed at the center.

Genealogical Society (SCVGS) completed an extensive project in the 1980’s to inventory tombstones in local cemeteries. The River Falls center holds the resulting tombstone transcriptions for most of the cemeteries in the counties of Pierce, Polk, and St. Croix as well as corresponding surname indexes for each county. In addition, the center also has church and cemetery records for the four-county area of Burnett, Pierce, Polk and St. Croix Counties that were microfilmed by the Genealogical Society of Utah (GSU) in the early 1980’s; tombstone transcriptions for a few cemeteries in Barron, Burnett, Dunn, and Washburn counties; as well as a few manuscript collections from area cemeteries which can include lists of burials.

Note: People interred after the SCVGS project was completed will not be listed; a few of the cemeteries were completed after the surname project was done so names will not be included in the surname index; names may have been missed—double check in the appropriate cemetery’s records if a surname does not appear on the index; tombstones deteriorate due to weather, vandals, etc. over the years, which may account for someone not being listed.

Church records vary greatly from one collection to the next. They can include such things as membership lists, sacramental records, financial records, burial permits, minute books, and building plans. The River Falls center holds microfilmed copies of local church records owned by the Genealogical Society of Utah (GSU) with a comprehensive index of GSU church record holdings for the entire Area Research Center (ARC) Network searchable by church name, location, or denomination. (This index is not available online but it can be viewed at other ARC’s throughout the state and can usually be obtained through Interlibrary Loan.) Several church records and related items can also be found in the manuscript collection and the River Falls center’s vertical file.

Additionally, the book collection should be checked to see if a church history was catalogued as a book. Search by church name, or denomination in the UW-River Falls Voyager library catalog (read more about Voyager below).

The most important precaution you can take is to keep your treasured items away from heat, moisture and light, all of which can quickly lead to deterioration. Two of the best sources for information on preservation can be found at the conservation departments of the U.

The River Falls center has several county history books for Wisconsin, particularly the Northwestern region of the state. The books will often give short histories of the cities and townships in the county as well as biographies of people in the county. In addition, the River Falls Area Research Center (ARC) houses indexes to several county histories housed at other ARC's throughout the state; these histories can be transferred for use at the River Falls center. Information about township and county names as well as boundary changes can be accessed in the archives reading room. Search the River Falls Voyager library catalog for local history books at the UW-River Falls ARC.

The River Falls center holds a variety of court records for the four-county region (Burnett, Pierce, Polk and St. Croix). The majority of court records include court calendars (which list what cases came to court at what time), judgment dockets (which list what the decision of the case was, including the monetary judgment imposed upon a person), minute books (which detail the proceedings of each case), and record books (which list the facts about the case). Until the early 1960's, naturalization records were produced by the courts. For St. Croix County and a small amount of Pierce County, the River Falls center also has the case files which contain court papers, testimony, and other important materials relating to the case.

This is the alumni magazine at UW-River Falls. It began in 1952 and contains feature stories, current campus events, and a section about alumni including news, deaths, births, and marriages. Falcon Features is indexed through the present issue in the River Falls center’s biographical index. Hardcopies of the publication can be found in the University Foundation records (UWRF Series 25).

A finding aid, also called a collection inventory or a register, is an instrument that gives information about the materials in a collection. A typical finding aid for a manuscript collection will give the title of the collection; the call number; information as to the background on the person, agency, or organization the collection is about/from; an abstract of what is contained in the collection; a scope note (brief synopsis) of what materials are in the collection; a detailed description by box and folder number of the contents of the collection; a noting of who donated the materials; and a noting of when the collection was donated.

Finding aids are particularly useful when using large collections stored in multiple boxes or locations. If a patron is interested in having a large collection transferred from another ARC for research, often times the holding ARC will send the patron a finding aid in advance so he or she can determine which boxes/volumes are most valuable to them.

The Genealogical Society of Utah is connected to the Mormon Church, known formally as the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter Day Saints. The Mormon religion has been instrumental to family history and promoting genealogy worldwide.

Mormon churches, throughout the world. There are several centers in the area including Oakdale, Crystal and Red Wing, MN. Navigate to http://www.familysearch.org/ and enter your location to find a center near your home. Non-Mormons, as well as Mormons, are welcome to do research at these facilities.

The center has many genealogies on file; some are extensive and published family lineages while others might be a single document, such as a diploma or an ancestral chart. Holding records for published genealogies and manuscripts containing genealogies can be found in the UW-River Falls Voyager library catalog. Single documents are located in the Miscellaneous Genealogical Documents collection in the archives reading room (check the biographical index under either the surname or the name of interest).

When researching a house history, an Abstract of Title for the property should be obtained from an abstract office or the Register of Deeds at the county courthouse where the property is located (visit the UWRF ARC’s Regional Contacts page for local courthouse contact information). The abstract will list every owner of the land the house sits on since it was homesteaded from the U.S. Government. Tax rolls held at the River Falls center are a good source of information, ownership, and valuation, regardless of whether the house is in the country or in a city/village. If the house is in a city or village, one could search local history books and information in the River Falls center’s vertical file (look under the name of the community-historic buildings or historic houses).

For River Falls, Hudson, and New Richmond, the center has copies of intensive historic surveys that were done in the 1980’s-1990’s, which include information on historic houses. For the city of River Falls, the center has property appraisal cards from the 1930’s-1940’s that contain specific information on many houses in the city (Pierce Series 56). If the house is in the country, plat maps can be used to track land ownership. Many of the plat maps will use a small black square to indicate the location of a house on a parcel of land. Another possibility in tracing the history of a house is to track the history of the first/early owners. Clues about the house can be found in obituaries, biographies, local history books, etc.

The River Falls Area Research Center (ARC) loans out certain items such as newspapers and census records on microfilm to other libraries and ARC’s requesting those materials. The center can also borrow items from other libraries and ARC's for patrons to use here. Some materials do not circulate and must be veiwed in the center's reading room. Contact the Archivist for more information.

A manuscript is a one-of-a-kind unique document with literary or historical value. Examples would include correspondence between two individuals, the diary of a farm wife on the plains, the records of a country store, a ledger from a church, and a membership book from an organization.

The River Falls center has a wide array of maps documenting the layout and history of northwestern Wisconsin such as plat maps, Sanborn Maps, and a host of others including railroad maps, historic location maps, atlases, geological maps and more. Plat maps record rural land ownership in townships within a county. In most cases, individual township plat maps are contained in what is commonly known as a plat book. Plat books were produced very sporadically until more modern times, so do not expect to find one for each year. The earliest plat books for the four-county area (Burnett, Pierce, Polk, and St.

If a building burned down, these maps would be consulted by insurance companies to research its physical structure. The maps were not issued on a regular basis and the company stopped making the fire insurance maps in 1961. The River Falls center has Sanborn Maps on microfilm for the entire state of Wisconsin, as well as paper copies of the maps for cities in the four-county area (Burnett, Pierce, Polk and St. Croix). The dates range from approximately the 1880’s to the 1920’s. The center also has several University maps and aerial photographs that show how the campus has grown over the years.

The Minnesota Historical Society, located in St. Paul, was established in 1849 (Minnesota became a territory in 1849 and a state in 1858). The society collects manuscripts and archival materials that document the history of the state as well as genealogical materials, books, maps, photographs, and a host of other materials. Additionally, the society has quite an extensive collection of railroad records. Various guides have been published regarding their holdings, of which the River Falls center has several, including a series of books highlighting many of their collections entitled Minnesota Historical Society Collections. The MHS website contains a wealth of valuable information including a video on preservation and an extensive online index to Minnesota birth and death records.

Archives and Records Administration (NARA) to reflect the growing importance of records management. NARA seeks to collect materials that document U.S. history. Before its official founding, most of the records were stored in the many federal office buildings in Washington, D.C., making both research and conservation difficult. The National Archives has 11 branches in the form of Regional Federal Archives and Records Centers across the U.S. The National Archives also administers the Presidential Libraries. The River Falls center has a guide to the holdings in some of these libraries, entitled, A Guide to Manuscripts in the Presidential Libraries.

Canada (LAC), previously known as the Public Archives of Canada and the National Archives of Canada, collects and documents materials pertinent to the history of Canada. The LAC mission statement emphasizes collecting and caring for materials of national importance; assisting federal and ministerial governments in records management; and making the records available to interested persons. Census microfilms can be ordered from LAC through interlibrary loan for patrons to use at the River Falls center.

The criteria for inclusion of a site/building in the National Register include pre-history significance, historic person significance, historic architectural style, or importance of the site/building to the history of the community. For more information, people should consult the website of the National Register of Historic Places, the website of the Wisconsin Historic Preservation Office, or request the “State Historical Society of Wisconsin #5” folder from the vertical file while at the River Falls center, which includes a listing of preserved properties in Wisconsin, more detailed information on the program, and contacts.

When doing research on Native Americans, it is important to keep in mind that the culture was based on oral tradition as opposed to written records. Therefore many of the primary sources that deal with Native Americans originate with those who worked with them, not from the Native Americans themselves.

A few places to look for materials at the River Falls center are the manuscript collection which includes the American Indian Reference Collection (River Falls Mss BL); books on the reading room shelves including How to Research American Indian Blood Lines as well as The Source which contains some great information on researching Native Americans and their genealogy; and the center's vertical file which contains materials about treaties and treaty disputes in the region, particularly regarding the Chippewa and Souix which were once the main tribes in Northwestern Wisconsin. Census records can also be a source of information as they often had a separate enumeration for Native Americans.

Be sure to check under a variety of subject headings when doing research including both “Native Americans” and “Indians” as well as “Archeology.” Many tribal burial mound areas are now being preserved under the law. The Mero Mounds in the Diamond Bluff area of southern Pierce County are such a site.

Historical Society has a wealth of online information on Native American History in Wisconsin including photographs, historical newspaper articles, treaty and effigy mound information, genealogy, lesson plans, and much more.

When people first came to the United States they had to go through a formal process to become a citizen. This was known as the naturalization process. Local, state, and federal courts were authorized to administer the process. Essentially there were three steps. The first step was to file a declaration of intention (first papers) to become a citizen (view samples below). Then there would be a waiting (residency) period, ranging usually from two to seven years. Third, the person would petition the court for citizenship (second papers).

In most cases the River Falls center has the paperwork documenting only the declaration and petition phases, though there are sometimes naturalization certificates and ancillary documents. The records are arranged by county, each of which is accompanied by an index. These indexes usually point to the petitions (second papers). Working backward is the most efficient method because if an individual is found in the index, their petition should indicate where and when they filed for declaration (first papers). Sometimes the declaration is even attached to their petition. If the individual is not listed in an index, then consult an index to the declarations or the individual declaration books themselves. This is an important step because people would often file the first papers then not complete the process (the declaration was all that was required to be a voting citizen in Wisconsin until 1908).

Basic Naturalization Act was passed. This provided for federal supervision of the naturalization process through the Immigration and Naturalization Services (INS). Forms became much more detailed and standardized.

Note: As a general rule, women and children were considered the property of the man that they came to the country with and did not file papers on their own until the 1920’s. They were automatically naturalized with the men.

Tips: If the naturalization date is unknown, consult the 1900, 1910, and 1920 census records. There are categories on these censuses regarding year of immigration to the U.S. and status of naturalization process (the abbreviation “Al” stood for alien, meaning no papers had been filed yet; the abbreviation “Pa” stood for papers, meaning a declaration of intention had been filed; and the abbreviation “Na” stood for naturalization, meaning the person had supposedly finished the process). Remember, the data from the censuses may not be always totally accurate, but it may provide some good clues. Another point to remember is that an individual may have filed his naturalization with a federal district court. If this is the case for someone from this area, then the person would have to contact the National Archives Great Lakes Region office in Chicago. The great majority of people who lived in this part of the state filed their naturalization papers through a county court, which means the River Falls center would have the records.

Local newspapers can be wonderful resources for biographical information, tracing local businesses, reading about historical events, and much more. The River Falls Area Research Center (ARC) has newspapers covering the four-county area (Burnett, Pierce, Polk and St. Croix) from the mid-1800’s up to the present, as well as newspapers from Washburn County (until the late 1990’s the River Falls ARC also covered Washburn County). The center has some scattered newspaper runs from a few different parts of the state and from different U.S. cities, as well as the Student Voice and other University publications. Most of the newspapers are on microfilm. Visit the Collections pages to view the newspaper holdings at the River Falls ARC. Newspaper holdings are also listed in the UW-River Falls Voyager library catalog. The River Falls center has a biographical index which contains births, deaths, marriages, graduations, and other important life events found primarily in newspapers but other sources as well.

Tips: December and January issues often include summaries of the major news and events of the past year. Anniversary or centennial issues provide detailed histories of local businesses, organizations, and people. The editorials and feature columns in newspapers are an excellent source for determining the prevailing attitudes in a city at a particular time. A very helpful source that is available in the archives reading room at the River Falls center is Newspapers in the State Historical Society of Wisconsin: A Bibliography with Holdings, which lists all of the newspapers held by the Wisconsin Historical Society (WHS) at Madison.

Network, the composition and arrangement of archival records make automation a slow and sometimes impossible process. The Wisconsin Historical Society already has a number of searchable databases and digitized collections such as the Roster of WI Volunteers-War of the Rebellion, 1861-65. Through volunteers at the US GenWeb Project, many historical and genealogical records for Wisconsin and other states can be found online at sites such as USGenWeb. As River Falls ARC and University Archives materials are converted into digital format they will be made available to our patrons online. In the absence of online records, collection finding aids are a valuable resource to identify archival materials.

Oral history came into being after World War II when the advent of tape recording technology merged with an increase of interest in social history (the history of the common person). Most oral histories fall into three categories: autobiographical, biographical, or topical.

The finished product will often include not only the audio recording itself, but also a transcription which provides greater access and ensures the preservation of the interview. The Oral History Association, a national organization, was established in 1967 to provide for the exchange of ideas and information for those in the field. Oral history interviews of local citizens can be an excellent source of data for students, scholars, local historians, etc.

Immigration Lists Index, which list names and where to obtain further information, as well as some books listing passengers of certain ethnic backgrounds, such as Danish and Irish. However, these books represent only a small portion of the immigrant record. Patrons may want to consult larger archival/genealogical repositories such as the Immigration History Research Center at the University of Minnesota, and repositories focusing on specific ethnic groups to have a better chance of finding their relatives. Online, the Ellis Island website has a searchable database of passenger arrival lists and ship manifests (free registration required). Also, consulting the National Archives can be helpful if the ship name and time period of immigration are unknown.

The River Falls center has a large collection of photographs that document the history of Northwestern Wisconsin, including the University of Wisconsin-River Falls. Photographs are arranged by subject and include portraits, aerials, tintypes, daguerreotypes, and slides.

Keep in mind that if the request is too broad we may suggest that you visit the center to view the records yourself. Please visit the UW-River Falls ARC and University Archives Collections pages before completing a request to determine if we hold sources that correspond to your request. Be very specific  with the information you provide on the form for better and faster results.

Some records are restricted as a matter of state statute or at the request of the donor and cannot be viewed by the public. Such records will contain a restricted usage note in the online record or on the item itself. The vast majority of collections are not restricted.

The River Falls center houses records for several schools in the four-county area (Burnett, Pierce, Polk, and St. Croix) but the majority of the records are from Pierce County and St. Croix County. Most fall into two broad categories. The first category is student information: names, grades, attendance records, and daily program of study. The other category is administrative: minutes of school board meetings, budgets, and teacher contracts. Many counties also published annual school directories listing teachers and major school district officials.

Census Records for the years 1918-1957 (Pierce Series 129), listing the names of pupils between the ages of 4 and 20 in each school district and whether or not they attended school. Since the records also give the birth date of each pupil and the name of a parent/guardian, they can be used by people as one form of proof for filing a delayed birth registration. For other counties, school census records are usually kept by the Register of Deeds Office at the county courthouse (visit the UWRF ARC’s Regional Contacts page for local courthouse contact information). Enrollment information can also be found in local newspapers, which will usually publish enrollment data in a September issue after the district figures have been tabulated. The River Falls center’s vertical file also holds some compiled enrollment data for community schools. For a school history, consult the center’s manuscript collection, vertical file, and book collection.

Security numbers. The SSDI generally contains names of those who died after 1962. Prior to 1962, the reporting of deaths to the Social Security Administration was not an automated process. The SSDI was initially created to provide local governing agencies, banks, insurance companies, and crediting agencies with information on deceased persons so that they could make adjustments to their records.

Charles Lawrence for use with Social Security matters. The Soundex system is a coded surname index based upon the way a name sounds, rather than the way it is spelled, enhancing the likelihood of successfully finding a surname that may have been recorded under different spellings.

The Source: A Guidebook of American Genealogy is often referred to as the bible of genealogical research. The Source contains a wealth of genealogical information such as how to find and use a variety of record types, strategies for tracking certain ethnic groups, learning efficient research technique and much more. The Source is available in the River Falls ARC reading room and many public libraries.

Tax rolls, much like assessment rolls, record parcels of property, who owns them, the assessed tax on the property, and who paid the tax. Each governmental unit within a county (township, city and village) produces a tax roll for each year. Tax rolls can be helpful in tracking who owned land during particular time periods. Tax rolls from the 20th century include a category called “improvements” which can be helpful in determining when a house, shed, or other structure was built on a piece of property. Some tax rolls have a section for personal property, which lists the value of the property owner’s personal belongings. When using tax rolls, it is necessary to know the property’s legal land description (eg: NE1/4 of the NE1/4 of Section 10, Township 24 North, Range 19 West). This information can be found on a tax statement or abstract of title. Sometimes old plat books contain maps of the cities within the county, providing some clues as to a legal description.

The River Falls center houses tax rolls for cities and townships within the four-county region (Burnett, Pierce, Polk and St. Croix). Holdings vary greatly from location to location because not every year has been saved.

Series 38) contains some good general information in the form of promotional brochures for the UW System. Additionally, the “University of Wisconsin System” folder in the River Falls center’s vertical file contains some articles about the UW System.

Series 93) and a large photograph collection dedicated to campus athletics (UWRF Series 26). For researching athletics in area high schools consult the River Falls center’s vertical file and community newspapers.

Printed histories of the university and building dedication programs for many structures on campus can be found in the Historical File (UWRF Series 43) and in the archives reading room. A publication entitled What’s In a Name contains histories on all of the named buildings and structures on campus and can be found at the River Falls center or online.

Faculty and Staff — To track someone who has taught at UW-River Falls first check the biographical index located in the archives reading room to look for citations to area newspapers or alumni publications, such as the Falcon Features.

Research Center's vertical file contains miscellaneous materials dealing with the history of Northwestern Wisconsin. The folders in the file are arranged alphabetically by subject heading or place name-subject heading. It is a good starting point to obtain quick answers to inquiries for general histories of cities and towns, promotional (Chamber of Commerce) materials for cities or waterways in the area, local legends, and a host of other topics. An index to the vertical file is available in the archives reading room.

Notes: A “D” or a “DX” in front of the reel number in the index entry indicates a delayed birth registration which is contained on separate reels of microfilm from the regular collection. Several mistakes were made when the statewide vital statistics index was compiled; view “problems sheet” before searching.

Tips: Try a wide variety of spellings when using the vital statistics index. Women may be filed under their husband’s name (Mrs. Alfred Dunner) or even under the M’s for Mrs. With prefix surnames, such as Van Eck, McKinley, etc., the prefix may or may not be included in the name. The space between the prefix and the rest of the surname will result in the name being listed first in the index (the Van Eck individuals will fall alphabetically before the VanEck individuals).

Voyager is the online library catalog of the Chalmer Davee Library at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls. The majority of River Falls Area Research Center and University Archives Collections can be identified using Voyager. For help using Voyager to search for archival materials, click here.

Society (WHS), previously known as the State Historical Society of Wisconsin, was established in 1846, two years before Wisconsin became a state. Located in the Wisconsin capital of Madison, the main goal of the society is to collect materials documenting the history of the state, including manuscripts; county and municipal materials; books; periodicals; sound and visual materials; and artifacts. The society has an extensive collection of genealogical materials, not only for Wisconsin, but for the entire United States. The society also has a national collection focus in the fields of mass communication, labor, and social action. The River Falls Area Research Center (ARC) is one of thirteen ARC’s affiliated with the WHS in a statewide network. Each ARC houses collections for a designated region of the state. Materials housed at ARC's throughout the entire statewide network including River Falls can be identified using ArCat, the online catalog of the Wisconsin Historical Society. Through the ARC network, most materials owned by the Wisconsin Historical Society or other ARC's can be transferred to and from the River Falls ARC.

An international educational consultant, public speaker, archaeologist, historian, researcher, teacher and writer, Dr. Derfler has been uncovering the histories of Ancient Civilizations for nearly 25 years. Tracing the development of western religions from their roots in the Middle east and Eastern Mediterranean countries, Dr. Derfler brings insight to current political and social events, bridging the past with the future to promote greater understanding between people from different faiths and walks of life.

Throughout his career, Dr. Derfler has worked aggressively to bring the community together for education and celebration of ethnic and cultural diversity. He has worked with many agencies, including the Councils of Churches, Moral Re-Armament Twin Cities, Catholic Conference, Minnesota Islamic center, and Bridges for Peace.

I am also the Co -Director with the Semester Abroad Program at the University of Wisconsin - River Falls.  This program is designed to combine the most significant aspects of foreign travel and directed research into a meaningful educational experience.

Since 1982, the University of Wisconsin System has offered courses and workshops in a wide range of disciplines in its idyllic woodland, lakeside setting at Pigeon Lake Field Station. Located in the Chequamegon National Forest just ten miles from Cable, Wisconsin, the 50.4 acre, fully equipped retreat center boasts lovely views, groomed nature trails, canoeing, fishing and swimming facilities. Facilities include comfortable cabins, well equipped classroom buildings and a lake view dining hall. The Pigeon Lake Field Station is an ideal setting for field studies in the natural sciences, and the beauty of the area facilitates the pursuit of activities in art, literature, humanities, social sciences and recreation-physical education.

I held responsibility for all on site aspects of this international studies project, including the administration of all academic programs, budget management, community relations, student advising, summer programs, and food service operations.

Falls is closely connected to the Twin Cites and offers our students access to one of the largest advertising markets in the nation. The Advertising Design class continues to be popular with students in Art and Marketing Communications.

Students learn to use and design in a number of different programs. Adobe PageMaker, Macromedia Freehand, Photoshop and Dreamweaver are examples of the progams students explore. Students learn how to transfer information to web pages work with digital cameras and flatbed scanners in developing their designs.

"There are a lot of opportunities to learn different programs", Sarah Ahmad, one of the students from the Ad Design 303 says. She has taken the introduction course and repeated the advanced studio three times. "This class allows you to create your work by hand through the design programs", she says.

This course covers an overview of the history, philosophical foundations and major theoretical trends in the field of art therapy: the use of art for non-verbal communication, the enhancement of well-being, and the remediation of dysfunctional behavior. Students will gain experience in the process of art therapy and its application to a variety of patient client populations.

The semester is divided into learning how to throw pots, and learning how to hand build pots. For throwing, you learn the basics about how to create cylinders and bowls. You will learn how to decorate them using class taught techniques and also, how to manipulate handles. You learn the value of making a project in pieces so you can make larger clay objects by stacking them.

The clay used by the into class is the Standard Shop Formula which is a High Temperature Stomer. It is a great all around clay that can be used for throwing and hand-building For the Into class, there are a couple different kilns used. The Electric kiln is used for low fire work like Bright Colored Earthenware. The gas fired kiln is typically run at 20,100 degrees F with Traditional High Fire Glazes. To get different colored glazes, you add different oxides to the mixture.

This class is made up of 4 or 5 projects, building on the skills that you already obtained in Introduction to Clay. You still use the basic skills of throwing and hand-building, but you add a conceptual twist to it. You are given the project and are allowed as much artistic freedom as possible in order to find your own style. You are also allowed to mix your own recipe of clay to maximize your creative potential with the color and firing options that different clay allows.

Studio is extensive and involves a broad range of materials, chemicals and equipment. The studio focuses on surface design and weaving, but also includes the areas of handmade felt, vessels and sculptural forms, spinning, hand-stitching, and garment design. As no other students are assigned to work in the fibers studios, the room is available to all registered fibers students 24 hours a day.

The surface design techniques involve printing and dyeing. The students work with reactive, acid and indigo dyes in order to print, paint, and set designs for (on average) 8' lengths of fabric. A student project often involves as many as 15 different techniques and 10 different chemical processes. Printers each have a 4 x 8 adjustable height work table of their own for the semester. The communal equipment includes industrial strength stoves, a steam cabinet for setting dyes, a wash-out area for screens, a dye exhaust booth and a washer and dryer.

The weaving techniques include tapestry, rug techniques, brocade, ikat, pile, and various experimental approaches, for example, combining surface design with weaving. The equipment is extensive and students have both floor and table looms as well as tapestry looms to work on. Weavers have a private or semi-private studio space to set up their projects for the semester.

Intro Fibers is an introduction to the techniques and materials used in fibers, including weaving, surface design, shibori, handmade felt, dyeing, spinning and sculptural forms. Historical and cultural perspectives that encourage personal expression are introduced.

Studio Fibers is an advanced investigation that combines traditional techniques with contemporary concepts: on and off-loom weaving, surface design, shibori, screen printing, dyeing, basketry, stitching, handmade felt, sculptural forms and installations.

The University of Wisconsin ~ River Falls has many unique opportunities for students, one of these is the opportunity to work with Jim Engebretson and hot/cold glass.Its all about the art- so choose which studio to enter by clicking on the picture below.

In the basement of Kleinpell Fine Arts Building on the University of Wisconsin River Falls Campus, there is a certain air of creativity that hangs about the place. In B107, the air tends to carry the fumes of printers ink, and the sounds of success.

An introductory exploration of creative possibilities in the basic materials and techniques used in several printmaking mediums: relief, intaglio, monotype, collograph. Lectures will explore historical and cultural perspectives related to printmaking. Materials fee is required.

Students will experience an individualized intermediate and advanced investigation in the printmaking processes of intaglio, lithography, relief and photo-printmaking techniques. An emphasis is placed on developing technical knowledge, strengthening a personal portfolio and developing aesthetic judgment. Prerequisites: ART 236 or consent of instructor.

In her introductory class, students have been working on cast projects and inlay soder projects. The inlay soder projects help students work with colors by using different metals such as copper, brass, and silver. Her introductory class is also working on a variety of different pieces for their open projects. Some have choosen to do enamel projects and sheet metal hammer projects, while some are even working with silver metal clay. This type of clay works like normal clay, but when heated in the kiln, the clay burns off and pure silver is left. The process takes about two hours. Using the silver metal clay is unique in that it allows students to create very intricate items.

Currently, there are two painting classes offered at UWRF, Intro to Painting and the Studio class. Intro is primarily acrylic painting and they cover all the basic "categories" of painting such as still life, landscape, and figure. The class is structured to work for interpretation; as the semester progresses so does the level of self-direction. Studio painting is a continuation of Intro, but it is more self-directed and includes other painting media like oil and watercolor. Studio painting classes may be repeated for additional experience.

This mosaic was a collaborative effort from students from the UWRF campus, overseen by Professor of Art Dr. Lynn M. Jermal. This project was designed and created to give a "breath of fresh air" as one descends the stairs on their way to the art studios in the basement of KFA. The mural provides motivation in inspiring creativity throughout the College of Arts and Sciences. A ceremony dedicating the mural in the honor of the contributions made by Dean, Gorden Hedahl and formally presenting the mural to the college was held on February 11, 2005.

Each year the Art Department present their Scholarship and Studio Awards to majors in a ceremony outside the art building. Scholarship funds are raised at our annual sale each December and the awards presentations are each May.

The installation installed from the ceiling of Kleinpell Fine Arts Center paid recognition to her leadership at the University of Wisconsin River Falls and was coordinated by Professor Morgan Clifford of our fibers department.

The Mural Project Mission was to create a public artwork that characterizes contemporary life, and celebrates the cultural diversity of the St. Croix Valley region. at the turn of the Millennium. This project was sponsored by the Chalmer Davee Library, the Department of Art's Art Education Program and Teen University.

Randy Johnston and kiln designer Donovan Palmquist. The first firing of the kiln is scheduled for the fall of this year. The project was sponsored by the office of Outreach and Graduate Studies and the College of arts and Sciences at the University of Wisconsin River Falls.

An undergraduate can earn a B.S. Broad Area Art degree with K-12 Certification in Art. This degree requires 54 credits in art and does not require a minor. The student will have a broad preparation in areas of the studio arts, art history and art education methodology and be prepared to teach art on the elementary, middle and secondary levels.

On the graduate level we have an Initial Certification Program- Art which prepares students who have an undergraduate or graduate degree in the visual arts to obtain their K-12 Certification to teach Art in the schools.

Some of the graduate credits earned in the certification process can be applied to pursuing our Post-Certification graduate degree in art education: Masters in Science of Education - Fine Arts (MSE-Fine Arts). This is a summer based program for certified teachers in the Arts which allows them to focus their studies on their content area (for example, studio art) as well as study new trends in art education while earning a Master's degree. Every summer a selection of graduate art and education courses are offered on campus and at our field campus, Pigeon Lake Link.

Students interested in learning more about these programs can explore the information at the drop menu "Art Education Plan Sheet" above on this website. The Art Department Art Education program is directed by Dr.Lynn Jermal, Professor of Art, who has taught at UWRF since 1985. She previously taught in elementary, middle and high school programs. She is the major instructor and advisor for art education, an exhibiting artist and is also particularly involved in facilitating collaborative community projects in the arts which often involve her art education students.

Alumna Moria Clinton, theatre and art major from River Falls, Wis., was one of three students in the country to be accepted into Yale’s theater design program. Iris O'Brien, a senior history major from Rhinelander, Wis., was one of four students in the country to be accepted into Yales’ stage management program.

The department encourages its students to discover their own processes of formulating design ideas and to develop a discriminating standard for their own endeavors. In general, the design department prepares students for creative and meaningful professional lives in the broad range of theater activities. The department fosters a sense of theater ras a collaborate art, and encourages design students to discover the joy in working with other people, especially directors, and realize the excitement of evolving a production through the process of collaboration.

The stage management department is designed to prepare students for professional employment. It also prepares students to recognize and fulfill their roles as artistic collaborators and effective organizational managers throughout the entire production process. While the program is structured to prepare the student for work in the commercial and regional theater, it also provides a strong basis for learning a variety of artistic skills and managerial tools essential for employment opportunities in many different entertainment areas such as touring, ballet, opera, event management and industrial films.

In the second year, each student os assigned assistant stage manager for at least one production. In the final year, providing that the student met the standards and qualifications, will be assigned the stage manager for a production.

In January, Moria, a graduating double Theatre/Art major, won the opportunity to attend the National Festival, when she took first place at the Region III American College Theatre Festival in Normal, Illinois. Students who enter the realized design category must have designed an American College Theatre Festival entry. Students must demonstrate their competence by presenting evidence of the research process, the rendered designs and finally must document the completed product. Moria created a presentation documenting all of these steps in a display 4 feet by 9 feet. She also displayed a wig she had re-worked and one of the bonnets she created.

Most students come from much larger theatre programs, and most are graduate students. Moria has been cited as particularly talented, because her designs are so true to the collaborative nature of the theatrical process. She is passionate about telling the whole story and about being a collaborative member of the production team. It is important to note that Moria has taken every opportunity to hone her skills in a number of areas, and while at UWRF has taken advantage of both the Wisconsin in Scotland and National Student Exchange programs. Nationally recognized designers have commented on her passion, skill and dedication to the theatrical process.

While at the National Festival, she was among eight other regional winners who attended master classes with Randy Mercer, the makeup designer for the Broadway productions of Fiddler on the Roof, Hairspray, La Bohme, The Producers and Cabaret and had her work exhibited at the Kennedy Center.

Her work was judged by Mercer, as well as representatives from Mehron and Makeup Designory. As winner, she received an honorarium and an all-expenses paid trip to New York City to tour the Mehron Factory and to see a Broadway production. She also received a tuition grant to attend a course at the Makeup Designory in Los Angeles, and will be highlighted in Mehron’s company publication.

After her May 15th graduation, Moria will be working at the Sante Fe Opera in New Mexico for the third year. She began as an apprentice in the costume shop, moved up to assistant in the dye shop in 2003 and will assist this year in the wig shop. Her plans for the future include graduate school, possibly at the University of Connecticut. Our congratulations and best wishes go out to Moria.

The following is a sample sequence of courses which fulfills the requirements for the BS degree in mathematics.  It includes required courses for the major, a 24 credit minor program, the general education program, a 13 credit liberal arts component and a three credit diversity course.  The total number of credits in this program is 120.

Here are the contents standards for all education courses in Biology. You will need the Adobe Acrobat Reader to access these pages. A link is provided below for the free download of the Acrobat Reader.

Here are the contents standards for all education courses in Chemistry. You will need the Adobe Acrobat Reader to access these pages. A link is provided below for the free download of the Acrobat Reader.

Here are the contents standards for all education courses in English. You will need the Adobe Acrobat Reader to access these pages. A link is provided below for the free download of the Acrobat Reader.

Here are the contents standards for all education courses in Geography. You will need the Adobe Acrobat Reader to access these pages. A link is provided below for the free download of the Acrobat Reader.

Here are the contents standards for all education courses in History. You will need the Adobe Acrobat Reader to access these pages. A link is provided below for the free download of the Acrobat Reader.

Here are the contents standards for all education courses in Journalism. You will need the Adobe Acrobat Reader to access these pages. A link is provided below for the free download of the Acrobat Reader.

Here are the contents standards for all education courses in Mathematics. You will need the Adobe Acrobat Reader to access these pages. A link is provided below for the free download of the Acrobat Reader.

Here are the contents standards for all education courses in Physics. You will need the Adobe Acrobat Reader to access these pages. A link is provided below for the free download of the Acrobat Reader.

Here are the contents standards for all education courses in Psychology. You will need the Adobe Acrobat Reader to access these pages. A link is provided below for the free download of the Acrobat Reader.

Here are the contents standards for all education courses in Speech Communications and Theater Arts. You will need the Adobe Acrobat Reader to access these pages. A link is provided below for the free download of the Acrobat Reader.

Here are the contents standards for all education courses in Sociology, Anthropology, and Criminal Justice. You will need the Adobe Acrobat Reader to access these pages. A link is provided below for the free download of the Acrobat Reader.

Creative Activities and for Excellence in Service. The awards are new—but faculty in Arts & Sciences have contributed significantly in these areas for a long time. It is important to note that a large number of our faculty contribute to the impact that UW-RF has on the community and region and in the disciplines and professions that we are affiliated with. These new awards are intended to celebrate and to help give recognition to the fact that scholarship and service are important activities and that the UW-RF faculty make contributions in a wide number of areas. The Awards are intended to recognize sustained achievement, rather than accomplishments in a single year. People are only eligible to receive an award in a specific category once in a ten year period.

Kevin Bertelsen of the Publications Office, Trick Communications manufactured and installed the 15-foot by 5-foot display using a variety of durable materials. The six formica panels (including the top banner) are adorned with adhesive-backed vinyl lettering, vinyl images produced on a large format printer, and laser-cut acrylic name plates. Campus photographer, Jens Gunelson, provided the photographs that are displayed on the wall .

It specializes in collateral and marketing pieces, primarily printed materials, for banks, colleges and a wide variety of businesses. Approximately 10 years ago it added signage to its product line, utilizing nearly any kind of material available in the natural world or fabricated by humans. The business provides full service design, manufacturing and installation.

A faculty member with 50 years of teaching service at UW-River Falls, and who is recognized as a pre-eminent scholar on Nazi Germany and the Russian Occupation of East Germany and Poland following World War II, has been selected as the Distinguished Teacher. History Professor Edward Peterson is the 2004 recipient of the award, which is the highest the University can bestow. Selection is through polling of graduating seniors and recent graduates. The selection of Peterson, who has not missed a day of teaching class since his arrival in 1954, drew accolades from students, faculty and staff. Said Chancellor Ann Lydecker in announcing the award, "Professor Peterson has touched literally thousands of lives during his five decades of teaching. I've heard our currently enrolled students, as well as undergraduate and graduate program alumni who span the generations, speak of how Dr. Peterson was their inspiration. "He inspired them to learn history, to develop the study skills that led to their successful completion of their degrees, to think more critically, to become better teachers, and to have a new appreciation of the United States within the world context. "They appreciate the fact that he viewed them as individuals and took an interest in them. Dr. Peterson is truly deserving of this prestigious award." Alumni who nominated Peterson praised the breadth of his knowledge and his commitment during the past 50 years to UW-RF students. Wrote one: "Not having Dr. Peterson as one of the "distinguished teachers" is like not listing Abe Lincoln as one of the greatest presidents. There is no more decent man or teacher at this university."

Added another, "Ed is a legend at UW-RF. His knowledge of history is beyond compare on the campus and his dedication to the profession of education speaks for itself. He deserves this award and he's earned it in every respect of the word." Peterson, who served as chairman of the social science and history departments from 1963 to 1991, teaches a range of undergraduate and graduate courses with a particular emphasis on 20th Century European history. Among those courses are Origins of One World (Europe since 1660), German history and Hitler, WWI and WWII history and a capstone course in social sciences. Dean Gorden Hedahl of the College of Arts & Sciences praised Peterson's contributions to UW-RF: "I think that it is possible that Ed Peterson created the mold for the phrase 'a gentleman and a scholar.' He is certainly the embodiment of that phrase.

Dr. Peterson is a gentle person who speaks quietly, calmly and compassionately, but he works with great purpose and an unwavering devotion to his students and to the betterment of the University and the community of River Falls.

The award was established in 2000 to an outstanding faculty advisor with nominations by graduating seniors and alumni. These nominations are then considered by the Faculty Senate Advising Committee, which makes the final selection.

He has taught 12 different courses, both undergraduate and graduate, for UW-RF on a regular basis. As an advisor, he assists 50-100 students each semester and serves as an independent study research advisor for all psychology majors and minors. He also serves on graduate students’ committees. He has mentored two McNair scholars has been involved in the all-campus minority student mentoring program. He has authored several successful grants for laboratory improvement and developed and administered surveys regarding collaboration efforts across the campus.

Brantley was hired in 1995 into a teaching academic staff position and has held the rank of assistant professor since 1999. In 2002 she won the College of Arts and Sciences Award for Outstanding Teacher in the Humanities. See related College site The UW-RF Distinguished Teaching Award has been presented annually based on the response to surveys of recent graduates. The recipient presents an address at the winter commencement and their likeness apprears on the Distinguished Teaching wall in the Wyman Education Building.

Reis has 26 years of service with the university. Since 1978, she has worked as a program assistant in the math department. She was nominated by a number of people in the Mathematics Department. See the article in the River Falls Journal.

The most important performance criterion will be effectiveness in teaching. Effectiveness in teaching will be assessed through peer evaluations, student evaluations, the faculty member's teaching portfolio, and any other appropriate means of evaluation as approved by a majority of the academic unit's (department's) teaching staff.

University, community, state, national, or international level in categories other than those identified above. Such activities include, but are not limited to, advising campus organizations; participating in faculty governance; sharing professional expertise with government, business or private non-profit entities; participation in non-academic local, regional, national, and international organizations whose aims parallel the professional interests of the faculty.

Please attach to this evaluation your narrative responses to Items 1-3.  Include documentation when it is appropriate.  Make use of your reading of the consensus of those faculty eligible to vote or of diverse perspectives if those exist among faculty eligible to vote.  If you know of any possible concerns that could affect this individual's progress toward tenure, they should be stated here.  Your evaluation should include both strengths and weaknesses.  Attach current resume/curriculum vitae.

The usual probationary period shall be seven years in a full-time or at least half-time position. Provisions shall be made at the time of hire for the appropriate counting of prior service at other institutions and at the institution. Tenure is not acquired solely because of years of service.

Recommendations for tenure shall be based on the criteria established in RF 3.21 and on such extension of those criteria as are enacted by each academic unit and filed with the Provost & Vice Chancellor. Tenure shall not be denied on the basis of impermissible factors as defined in RF 6.4 of the Faculty/Academic Staff Handbook (Seventeenth Edition). Faculty who appeal their denial of tenure on the basis of impermissible factors may follow the process and procedure of the appeal process described below. No member of the academic unit in which the appeal originated shall serve on any body involved in the appeal.

Your advisor is concerned about you as a student and a person. Your advisor will assist you with choosing classes and meeting requirements for your chosen degree/major/minor, adding/dropping classes, and other information regarding academics. Your advisor can assist you by referring you to other campus services based on your requests/needs.

You should meet with your advisor at least two times per year. Schedule an appointment prior to each registration, and discuss options for classes for the next semester and make plans for your subsequent semesters. Also, meet with your advisor to discuss any changes you are considering making in your major or minor, or serious academic problems you encounter.

Early in your college career it is in your best interest to plan ahead and develop with your advisor a course plan sheet of your own. This takes into account pre-requisites and course sequences for your chosen major/minor, and electives you choose to take. As many courses are offered on a rotating basis, it is essential that you consult regularly with your advisor to anticipate the courses you will need.

Errors may be the result of changes to this Web site in August 2005 to better serve our current and prospective students, community and other lifelong learners. We are sorry for any inconvenience that this may cause you.

You must pay your deposit of $100.00 prior to registration, have any other financial obligations on campus paid, and have any holds removed, or you will not be allowed access to the SOAR system to register for classes.

Registration for summer school may be accomplished by currently enrolled students by internet via the SOAR system or by mail-in registration using the form printed off at www.uwrf.edu/summer Registration for J-term (January term) may be accomplished by currently enrolled students by internet via the SOAR system or by mail-in registration using the form printed off at www.uwrf.edu/jterm Students who have not been admitted to UW-RF must apply to the Admissions Office prior to registering for J-term.

An add card is always required if a class is full when you register for the class if the instructor agrees to allow you in the class. An add card is required for you to add a class after the first five days of class for a particular term.

A drop card is required for you to drop a class after the first five days of the term. The procedure to drop a class is listed on the back of the add/drop/change of credit card. Instructor and advisor signatures are not required until the beginning of the second week of classes.

A credit change card is required when taking a course that has a variable credit component. You would submit this card if you want to change the number of credits after the first week of class or if the class is full.

Late Drop Card and Form  must be filled out and approved by the advisor, instructor and the Dean of the College that administers your major for a class/lab that is dropped after the 30th class date of the semester. If a "W" has previously been received for this course, a late drop request will not be approved.

Application for Undergraduate Re-entry Admission  a form for anyone desiring re-entry admission. This form must be filled out at least 60 days prior to desired entrance and must be accompanied by one official transcript of all colleges listed on the form. Transcripts must be mailed directly from the college attended.

"Deficiencies" is a term that refers to courses that some students have had as undergraduates, but that others may not have had. Graduate students usually take these courses required for licensure on the undergraduate level.

See your assigned advisor to fill out and sign this form. Forms are available from the Program Assistants in department and program offices. The form can be delivered or sent to the Graduate Office (North Hall 104).

See Graduate School Program Assistant Julie Persico (North Hall 104) to get an application for graduation form by the 4th week of the semester. You must apply to graduate whether or not you plan to participate in the ceremony. She will provide you with other needed forms.

A good discussion ensued about the use of videos in the classroom, including suggestions that titles of available videos should be circulated among faculty and that faculty should try to watch the video from a student’s eyes and perspective, recognizing that students have less background with the material than their instructor.

Students should be prepared for watching the videos ahead of time and encouraged to prepare for a subsequent discussion and/or to fill out answers to a list of questions for discussion. The subsequent discussion could take place in the class as a whole or in small groups, who then report to the entire class.

Students might also be encouraged to pay attention to the video if they will be required to write a reflective paper after viewing it or if they expect questions about the video on quizzes or exams. Since videos are often out-dated, instructors can show the video and then use it as a vehicle to discuss the contemporary aspects of the issues in the video. They or their students can check web sites that update some of the information.

There is an IGS supported group of videos on international development at UWRF, along with questions for discussion for students and faculty summaries/feedback. Information about this will be provided shortly.

There is strong interest in guest lecturers in classes across campus, both being the lecturer and inviting guests to the classroom. A simple sign-up process with faculty names and expertise could be used to facilitate this. Our faculty is also interested in utilizing visiting professors from other countries and/or with special knowledge of an international field.

Members of our group who are part of Macalester College’s list-serve (entitled “Africanists”) are enthusiastic about establishing a similar list-serve at UWRF. This would permit us to advertise the international development activities at UWRF and other regional institutions. This would create the opportunity for larger audiences at events and it would give some publicity to the UWRF Association for International Development (UWRF-AID). It was also suggested that at some point in the future, we offer a regional conference on international development.

Faculty time is tight. Many of us incorporate international development components into our classes, many of us are involved in or considering offering international tours, and many of us are so over-extended that it is difficult to become involved in new ventures. Certainly there should be some financial incentive or reward for professors to add international features to their curriculum. Internationalization must be supported at the college, university, and UW-System level.

The dialogue among workshop faculty and staff was extremely interesting and informative to participants. It provided excellent connections among faculty and generated very good comments from the group. It was amazing to see how many UWRF faculty members are involved in international development activities.

After introductions and announcements, participants were invited to give a brief overview of their particular project(s), research, or travel. For more information, please contact each individual speaker.

This project was funded primarily by the University of Wisconsin - System Institute for Global Studies at UW-Milwaukee (IGS), and partially by a University of Wisconsin - River Falls (UWRF) Institutional Enhancement Grant. The grants funded the purchase of 41 videos in the interdisciplinary area of international development (of Africa, Asia, and Latin America), as well as the preparation of curricular material to complement the videos. The List of Videos identifies each video by UWRF department, but most of the videos are appropriate for a variety of subject areas, including those listed as well as other disciplines such as philosophy, religion, area studies, and film.

A 34-credit program (minor required) designed for students who seek careers in which teaching certification is not mandatory, such as health promotion, cardiac rehabilitation, personal training or sport management. Students who plan to continue their education at the graduate level in areas such as exercise physiology, athletic training, sport psychology, or kinesiology, may also wish to choose this option.

A 34-credit program (minor and professional preparation classes required) designed to prepare students to teach Health Education in the school setting. Graduates will also be prepared to work in various allied health professions.

Physical Education majors only. It is not a "stand alone minor" for students from any other major. The minor consists of 15 credits of required course work plus 7 credits of directed electives. A certificate program in Adapted Physical Education is also available. Please contact Sue Tarr, 425-0626 for more information on the Adapted Physical Education program.

The environment in the dance program is cooperative rather than competitive. We strive to provide a community atmosphere that encourages faculty and students alike, to take creative risks and challenge ourselves to achieve levels of excellence in all of our artistic and academic endeavors.

The dance program offers a dance minor and a diverse number of classes, performances, and cultural experiences. Dance course offerings include: history/appreciation, world dance, composition, improvisation, repertory and production; various levels of ballet, jazz, maodern and social technique; teaching courses in children's creative movement, social and jazz dance; as well as independent study courses.

The UWRF Dance Theatre is the university's resident modern dance company and provides students with performance experiences, school residencies and opportunities to work with visiting guest artists. Membership to Dance Theatre is open to all students through auditions.

The Health Education Minor is a 23 credit minor which can lead to teacher certification if combined with a certifiable major. Non-education majors can minor in Health Education-Liberal Arts which would prepare a student to work in the area of health promotion and risk reduction.

The Outdoor Education Minor provides a series of challenging outdoor experiences that develop personal skills in outdoor adventure activities, prepares the student to teach these activities and develops the leadership skills to work with groups in outdoor adventure programs. Activities students participate in include wilderness backpacking, canoeing, kayaking, rock climbing, winter camping, cross-country and downhill skiing, snowboarding, snowshoeing, high ropes challenge courses, group initiative challenge activities, and orienteering.

Reader installed to view them. If you are unable to view them, you can follow the button link at the bottom of the page to download it from Adobe's website or, if you're a current student or staff member at UW-RF, visit this page using a browser in one of the several computer labs available on campus.

The Projected Schedule Planner is a form to help you plan your class schedules. Several courses have pre-requisites and not every course is offered each semester. It is critical that you plan for more than one semester at a time.

The checklist is a detailed list outlining everything that is required in your electronic portfolio to apply for departmental approval for admittance to TED. You must obtain departmental approval for admittance to TED before applying for admission into Teacher Education.

All requests to substitute a course for a required course must be submitted on a Course Substitution Request form. A current DARS must accompany the substitution request. All substitution requests must first be approved by the Department Assistant Chair.

Undergraduate Catalog that applied when you entered the university. You should be aware that licensure rules may change at any time, and may affect your program. You can learn about any changes through your instructors, your advisor, and the College website.

The first night it a written test for which you must be able to keep score for 4 games. If you pass the written portion on the second night you will go to Bud's Lanes Bowling Center to bowl. Females must score 125 and males must score 130.

You must pass a written test on rules, etiquette, playing situtaions and terminology. Chip a ball into a circle and hit a ball with a pitching wedge reasonably straight and with reasonably good swing mechanics.

University since 1997. There she coached the heptathlon, decathlon, and pole vault competitors. She also served as the camp director and the high school coaches clinic director. She worked as a meet director for the Games of Texas 2000 and as an assistant meet director for other large track events like the 2001 Big XII outdoor championships and the 2004 NCAA regional qualifying championships.

Iowa in 1997 where she mentored hurdlers, jumpers, throwers, and multi-event athletes. She was also the team’s strength and conditioning coordinator. In 1995 and 1996 she was a graduate assistant at Louisiana State University where she supervised ninth semester students, worked in compliance and assisted the senior women’s administrator. She also had responsibilities in the ticket office and event management.

Bill is currently in his fourth year at UW-RF. He brings over 40 years of aquatic experience to the department. Coach Henderson recently had the swim teams host the WIAC championships for the 1st time in 35 years. The meet, held at the University of Minnesota, aquatic center, was a highlight for the men's and women's teams.

His1996 team included a school high, twenty seniors. He has developed a highly disciplined and successful program with a predominance of small town student athletes. He recognizes the emphasis on a total collegiate experience with emphasis on accountability and academic performance.

State and Federal tax forms must be completed Fill out and sign pink time sheet in ink Use decimals for partial hours. Do not use fractions Write legibly Your supervisor must verify your hours by signing the pink time sheet.

Minutes for life is created for those individuals who want to start, maintain, or revive their commitment to physical activity. There is no fee or charge to use Minutes 4 Life, only dedication to be physcially active.

As you set your goal keep in mind that the Surgeon General's report on Physical Activity and Health recommends as a minimum that all adults accumulate 30 minutes of moderate intensity activity 5-7 days per week or engage in vigorous activity 20 minutes, 3 days per week. Yet, remember that ANY physical activity is better than no physical activity.

The UW-River Falls Kickers' and Long Snapper's Camp is the nation's first specialists camp. And the goal from the beginning has been to improve every punter and kicker by maximizing repetition and perfecting each individual style. This has been an extremely successful approach.

"Gary not only helped me with my technique, but my confidence. He's the best when it comes to training kickers," former Chicago Bears Kicker Kevin Butler said. The camp has had a number of campers throughout the years go on to great college and pro careers. We guarantee that camp will make you a more knowledgeable and improved kicker.

We are running the UW-River Falls Wishbone Camp on the same dates as the O & D Camp. This adds an extra day to the Wishbone Camp. The organization of this camp will be the same as it has been in the past. Both camps will be run independently in terms of offensive installation.

This is a camp for anyone in any offense or defense. We concentrate on fundamental skills that will apply to any high school football player at all positions. This has been an extremely popular camp because we try to give our campers the most realistic football experience possible without wearing lower body pads. Offensive players and defensive players are put into realistic situations against each other without the use of blocking dummies.

Wide receivers work quick, intermediate, and deep route techniques. Running backs learn handoff and running skills along with techniques in the passing game. Offensive linemen learn run blocking and pass protection skills.

They will also work pass rush technipues and will work live 1 on 1 vs. offensive linemen. Inside and outside linebackers will work all fundamental skills vs run and pass. Defensive backs will learn run support techniques, zone defensive skill and 1 on 1 coverage skills vs wide receivers and quarterbacks.

We have hired as many as 68 coaches to work this camp. Our coach to player ratio has been as good as 1 to 5! This is a physical and demanding camp. Our campers for years say it is the best and most realistic camp when comparing it to all others. We are not a big, Division I camp that is devoted to identifying whom we want to put on scholarship. Our goal is to make every camper who attends a better, more knowledgeable player! The camp is divided into halves. Each half consists of 5 practices.

The volleyball camps at River Falls are taking on a new look. Patti Ford brings a wealth of knowledge and expertise to the camp scene. Her approach to volleyball appeals to the athlete's senses, blending physical skills with the mental aspects of the game. The philosophy of these camps is fendamentals build a strong foundation. The camps are designed to introduce young and experienced players to the sport of power volleyball. Each camp will provide great teaching, exposure to competition, and skill enhancement.

This camp is designed to introduce young and experienced players to the sport of power volleyball. Each athlete will receive great teaching on individual skills, specialty positions, game concepts and scrimmages.

This camp is designed for you and your team. It is a unique combination of team instruction and competition in a camp setting. Teams will be trained together by a coach provided by UWRF. Concepts implemented will include 3-4 person serve reception, transition and free ball plays, hitter coverage, and rotational defense. Camp will be limited to 14 teams.

Important note: Biology majors with an interest in field biology are not required to have a Conservation minor. Other minors are available, including the Option B minor. The Option B is a flexible minor tailored to the needs of a particular student. See your advisor for details, or contact Mark Bergland at mark.s.bergland@uwrf.edu for more information.

This will allow you to see the entire page without difficulty. The bold, blue underlined words are linked to their definition in the glossary. If you need to clarify a word, click on it, and resume the course by clicking the back button.

There are several labels with these colored codes in the laboratory. These labels include the hazardous waste label, the National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) labels, and original labels on chemical containers. These labels detail the level of protection needed for a specific chemical or solution. These labels provide safety information on health (H), fire (F), reactivity (R), and personal protective equipment (PE) required to work with chemicals or solutions.

The personal protective equipment used in the laboratory is critical for your safety. Protective equipment usage differs and depends on what chemical or solution you are using. Protective equipment is one of the best defenses against injury or infection. You must understand what equipment to wear or use, how to use that equipment, and when you should use that equipment. There are five major ways to protect yourself in the laboratory: aprons, gloves, goggles, masks, and fume hoods.

They fit skin- tight to allow free movement and dexterity of fingers. It is recommended that you wear gloves whenever working in the laboratory, but it is required that you wear gloves when working with hazardous materials. Most of the gloves in the department are powder-free, vinyl gloves that are hypoallergenic. If you know you have a laytex allergy, pay close attention to the type of glove you use. Gloves are most directly involved with safety because hands are most directly involved with chemicals and solutions.

These are protective eyewear. Eyewear can also include eyeglasses, but it is recommended that you wear goggles over eyeglasses to prevent splash accidents. You are required to wear protective goggles when working in the laboratory for certain experiments. Eyewear protects against contamination from substances that injure or infect the eyeball and cause vision loss. Goggles also protect against absorption of materials into the body via the eyeball. Contact lens wearers BEWARE. Contact lenses make it difficult to wash away substances accidentally introduced to the eye.

Severe irritant at just a few ppm as well as a strong sensitizer leading to-- Skin rashes, Puffy eyes, Headaches, Respiratory problems. Allergenic properties are worse than its potential carcinogenic properties.

We also thank Torey Kauth for the professional scientific modeling which he eagerly volunteered for and Karen Klyczek for her assistance and support with WebCT. We thank E. Katherine Miller for mini-grant authorship and editorial contributions. Finally, we thank Amanda S. Holder for her fabulous and continued help in the UW-RF IDe3A Center.

Association (NFPA) -- organization that has developed a scale for rating the severity of fire, reactivity, and health hazards of substances. References to the ratings appear on chemical labeling and MSDS's.

The program shown exceeds the minimum requirements for admission to some veterinary colleges, including UW-Madison and the University of Minnesota. Based on the experiences of its many successful pre-veterinary students, the university recommends that students complete the full program in order to be better prepared for veterinary school.

Research Project:PAB binding proteins in Xenopus laevis embryos..Experience: Establishing an undergradate research laboratory for studying protein:protein interactions and mRNA regulation. Implementing a research based molecular biology laboratory course to prepare students for careers in biomedical research.

Research Project (PhD): Identification and regulation of trans acting factors responsible for cytoplasmic polyadenylation during Xenopus oocyte maturation. Experience: Recombinant DNA. Isolating and sequencing full-length cDNA. Protein biochemistry and immuno-detection. Isolation and analysis of endogenous and synthetic mRNA from frog oocytes.

My research centers on post-transcriptional mechanisms for controlling gene expression. Once viewed as an anomaly limited to special cell types or mRNAs, mRNA regulation has emerged as a ubiquitous method for controlling protein levels throughout life. I study mRNA control during development of the African clawed frog Xenopus laevis. Young frog embryos lack significant transcription and rely instead upon a dowry of maternal mRNA stored in the egg. I would like to understand the molecular mechanisms used to control where and when protein is made from this maternal mRNA pool. This regulation often involves sequence specific mRNA binding proteins that bind to and control individual mRNA. As a post-doc I demonstrated that several known mRNA regulatory proteins bind to the poly(A) binding protein (PAB). This suggested that PAB binding might be used as a tool to find new mRNA regulatory proteins. Students in my laboratory and molecular biology course at UWRF have been using a protein interaction screen in yeast to identify and characterize over 100 frog proteins that bind PAB. They use bioinformatic tools to determine whether or not the resulting cDNA sequences: (1) have already been reported, (2) are related to proteins in other organisms, (3) contain conserved functional domains, (4) possess known PAB binding motifs, and (5) have established biological functions. The results have been extremely promising. The majority of the proteins found are either known or predicted to bind RNA and several are known mRNA regulators with critical biological functions. We are currently focusing on three novel proteins that are predicted to bind RNA and which are related to human proteins that have been implicated in disease. In addition to the laboratory intensive molecular biology course referred to above, I teach a lecture course in genetics and an introductory lab course. The introductory lab course focuses on DNA analyses (typically paternity testing) in Alaskan husky sleddogs (my other passion).

Additionally, the following must be completed, or in progress for completion, during the semester preceding admission. Students may register prior to acceptance, but acceptance is required for attendance in CBE upper-level courses. Students with GPAs between 2.0 and 2.25 may petition to the respective department chair for consideration on a case-by-case basis.

My current research focuses on student performance in introductory courses and factors that affect student success and retention. These topics relate very well to my administrative roles as CBE Associate Dean and Director of the Center for Economic Education. My main duties as Associate Dean include working with department chairs on course scheduling and curriculum development, as well as monitoring student performance for admission to the College. I also have responsibility for the Orientation Seminar (CBE 100) that introduces new CBE students to university resources, degree programs in the College, and requirements for graduation.

My current research is in the areas of Taxation and Tax Policy Changes and their Implications, and Pedagogical issues in the teaching of Principles of Economics courses. In these studies , I have applied various statistical tools such as regression analysis and ANOVA.

My research is currently centered in two areas. I am finishing a statistical analysis of the academic effects of two different academic support programs. We have used freshmen cohorts and a freshman seminar to help students better adjust to college. These studies have applied various statistical tools to a large data base of the affected students. I have used ANOVA, Discriminant analysis, and Regression to identify the effect of the support programs. Applied statistical analysis is consistent with my teaching. My second area of research is monetary policy. In particular I am looking at the impact of the Fed's policy disclosure procedures on financial markets. The Fed's policy structure and financial markets supports my teaching in economics.

I have published a few articles on the application of financial derivatives in the crude oil market. Currently, I am working on a paper how to use futures markets to manage gas price risks. I am revising a book written on the valuation and privatization methods.

Dr. Rathburn’s management research focuses on managerial cognition, strategic leadership, executive succession and managers’ strategic decision-making. She is also an active scholar on teaching and learning issues, such as using technology to enhance learning and understanding, using course portfolios to design hybrid courses, as well as integrative learning in capstone courses. She has presented her work at many national and international conferences, including the Academy of Management, the American Association for Higher Education, the International Society for the Scholarship of Teaching and Learning, and the Association for Educational Technology and Communication, among others. Dr. Rathburn is also actively involved in the work of the University of Wisconsin System’s Leadership Site for the Scholarship of Teaching and Learning, as well as the UW System’s Office for Professional and Instructional Development.

Dr. Tabesh research interest and skills have been and continue to be in the areas of applied Macroeconomics and Microeconomics. Dr. Tabesh past research have focused on his areas of expertise which are Monetary Economics, Statistics and International Economics.

My research is in financial accounting and the theory of accounting regulation. In financial accounting, I have researched the effect of quality of earnings, the meaning of the term to various interest groups, and market reactions to various financial accounting factors. To test this, we have researched a balance sheet vs. an income statement approach to quality of earnings. We used ANOVA and chi-square to identify constituency groupings for the survey analysis, and regression analysis to identify the effects of factors identifying balance sheet vs. income statement measures as predicting stock price. In the theory of accounting regulation, we have researched various accounting theories and summarized them in several areas. These areas are very relevant to my teaching in accounting, as I teach the upper level Financial Accounting sequence of Intermediate Accounting I and Advanced Accounting.

My research involves the simulation of biological systems, specifically cellular electrophysiology. I use the tools of Mathematical Modeling, Numerical Methods for Differential Equations, and High-Performance Computing to address research problems in the area of Cellular Electrophysiology. With the help of numerous collaborators in academia and industry, I also use the techniques of Cell culture, Immunochemistry, and Molecular Biology: PCR, siRNA.

To achieve these purposes, there is no discrimination in individual membership or chapter affiliations because of race, religion, sex, age, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, marital status, or parental status.

Falls, is the current director of the Center for Economic Research (CER) at the College of Business & Economics (CBE). Hamid's research interest is in the area of applied economics and he actively participates in local, regional, national and international professional conferences. As the director of the CER, Hamid contributes to regional economic development conferences related to the St. Croix valley and the state of Wisconsin. The center provides a web-based outlet for faculty, staff and student research efforts. In addition, faculty, staff and students make presentations of their research in "Friday Seminar Series" sponsored by the center; these presentations are free and open to the public. For questions about the CER please contact Dr. Tabesh at the following address.

The mission of the Center for Economics Research is to assist and encourage research that supports economic development of the St Croix Valley and the mission of the College of Business and Economics and the University of Wisconsin - River Falls.

The UW-River Falls campus environmental audit will help create a more informed campus that is better able to implement environmentally friendly policies and practices. The intent of this audit is to provide resource consumption data and use it to educate student, faculty and staff about how they can make changes that will lead UW-River Falls down the road toward environmental sustainability and sustainable development. Being a pioneer in the University of Wisconsin system, UW-River Falls is the first university with a functional auditing system.

Shows resource usage from 1994-present in the areas of recycling, electricity, and water consumption. This section will be updated annually to better inform students and faculty about the campuses path toward being environmentally sustainable and provide a means to determine whether resource conservation measures are successful.

Provides the full report on the purpose of the project, the methodology for data collection, recommendations for future audits, analysis of the data, and a discussion and conclusion about what I learned while conducting this audit.

This section is for anyone with comments regarding making the campus more sustainable. Anyone who wants to request information or voice a concern about campus sustainability is welcome to do so. Please send all responses to Dr. Kelly Cain, Plant and Earth Science Department.

Questions asked to gain needed information to provide the necessary benchmarks for the campus to gear its progress toward environmental sustainability for years to come. This form will be sent annually to applicable campus faculty to obtain the previous years data. The data will be added to existing resource consumption charts or new charts will be created.

This section will answer some common questions people have when looking at an environmental audit. Such as, what is environmental sustainability, why should I be concerned, and what can individuals do to help.

When using the CVC machines to purchase Center points, please read directions carefully. Always print a receipt and keep it in case there is a problem. If funds are not applied properly, bring the receipt and ID card to the Carding Office located at 211 Hagestad Hall as soon as possible.

The scholarship(s) are to be awarded to students who have attained junior or senior status who are majoring in Biotechnology with minimum cumulative GPA of 3.2. Applicants must be enrolled in a research project in Biology, Chemistry, Plant & Earth Science or Animal & Food Science or have completed an undergraduate research project in Biotechnology or are participating/completed an internship in Biotechnology. Consideration given for demonstrated financial need.

The scholarships are to be awarded with preference given to students majoring in 1) Mathematics, 2) Physics and 3) Chemistry who have attained junior or senior status with a minimum GPA of 3.0 in their major field of study.

Awarded to a chemistry major of at least sophomore status with high academic standing and an interest in conducting research in chemistry. The recipient is expected to participate in a research project in chemistry under the direction of a member of the chemistry faculty during the year for which the award is made. The awardee will be chosen by the chair of the chemistry department in consultation with the faculty who teach the chemistry majors' organic chemistry laboratory.

Awarded to a sophomore (during the year of the award) majoring in chemistry who has demonstrated a high degree of excellence in the field of chemistry through academic performance and participation in extracurricular activities associated with chemistry.

Awarded to a student who has graduated from a Wisconsin High School, and who is pursuing course work in the pre-veterinary medicine curriculum and who has plans to enter the field of veterinary medicine. The student must show strong performance academically and demonstrate a financial need.

Presented to a student who has completed 90 credits toward the Pre-Medicine curriculum as established by the university, with a minimum overall GPA of 3.5, and has demonstrated potential for admission to medical school.

In the first series of 7-on-7s, only the Chiefs worked on the running game. Running back Larry Johnson  carried the ball three times and running back Dee Brown carried the ball twice under the quarterbacking of Trent Green. Quarterback Casey Printers  handed off the ball to running back Derrick Ross  four times, running back Quentin Griffin  three times and running back McKenzi Smith  twice.  When Printers took the reins, Green moved to the next field to work with the wide receivers on sideline patterns to the right.

In the final set of 7-on-7s, quarterback Trent Green still struggled. He connected with wide receiver Samie Parker and completed 3-5 passes to wide receiver Dante  Hall, tight end Kris Wilson  and tight end Tony Gonzalez. Quarterback Damon Huard completed 3-6 passes, one to wide receiver Eddie Kennison and two to wide receiver Nate Curry. One pass intended for tight end Robert Docherty  in the end zone was knocked down by the defense. Quarterback Casey Printers worked with wide receivers Craphonso Thorpe  and Kyle Brown  during his tenure on the field. He completed two passes to Thorpe and one to Brown, but was also intercepted once.

The defense came in to camp with a lot of hopes to improve; they seem to have made several strides for the better. Every position,  minus the defensive line, looks to be locked up and ready to go for the season.  The defensive line most likely will include ends Jared Allen and injured Tamba  Hali, while Ryan Sims and Lional Dalton look to plug the middle. Sims  and Dalton have  been looking over their shoulders throughout camp and seeing James Reed and Ron Edwards. Reed, along with rookie safety Bernard Pollard, has looked solid throughout the training camp  compared to most. The two of them will vie for a spot not only on the team, but  for a starting roll in the future.

Cornerback Patrick Surtain started  at left cornerback throughout camp, rarely missing a practice to rest. Right  cornerback Ty Law was granted  one-a-days towards the end of camp, practicing a majority of the time only in  the afternoon. Fans hope that getting Law was the transaction the Chiefs needed  to make a run at the Super Bowl. Law  and Surtain will give the Chiefs two lockdown corners to shut down opponents’  best two receivers. The question will be: who will cover which receiver.

A lot of optimism about the defense was carried through camp; the defense looks  to be one of the best the Chiefs have seen. Fans will get their first taste  when the Cincinnati Bengals come to Arrowhead on opening day.

"Well, it was the last practice at River Falls today, so they should be excited. And for the most part we learned a lot about each other. They learned a lot about me as a head coach and I learned a lot about them as a football team. From this, I can take away that we have some players that really want to do what they are asked to do as players, and we have some good character players on this football team. I think character is the thing that always keeps you steady and gives you the ability to get through the hard times."

The last day of practice was very spirited Edwards said. "Just like the last day in school. To say the least they are probably excited about going home to see their families and loved ones. I know I'm excited to see my wife and my little girl. So we'll put this one in the bank."

The Chiefs will play their second preseason game against the Giants on Thursday. About going back to New York, Edwards said, "Sometimes you're on the home side and sometimes you're on the visitor's side. I've been on both sides, but now I'm in different color."

Edwards said that the starters would play until the second quarter in the game, but is still unsure about the status of backup quarterback Damon Huard. "I don't want to put a quarterback in there with a bad foot because these guys bring a lot of pressure. A quarterback at least has to be mobile."

Martin Steede and Sam Collman traveled all the way  from Liverpool and Bristol, England to be at Chiefs camp. During high school, Steede was a foreign exchange student  in St. Paul.  The pair came back to visit old friends, do some sight-seeing and watch the  Chiefs. Steede is a huge football fan, with his favorite team being the New York Jets. Accordingly, the football fan  was excited to see Coach Herm Edwards, former Jets head coach, in person.  “I think he’ll motivate the team as a whole,” said Steede about Edwards.

Gerald Matteson of River Falls, brought his granddaughter Kinzy  Mohs to camp for the day. Matteson used to be an agriculture education  professor in town, at UW-River Falls. Although he only follows the Chiefs a  little bit throughout the season, he enjoys watching football and lives just  yards away from the Ramer Field Sports  Complex practice fields. Matteson said he can see the practices from his  deck. When asked what her favorite part of camp was, Mohs said she enjoys  watching football and likes getting out of the house.

Logan Baker, from Oakdale, Minn.,  was present at her very first Chiefs practice this afternoon. Baker, who is a UW-River Falls alum, enjoys watching  the team perform drills and practice right before the fans’ eyes. Some of  Baker’s favorite players include running back Larry Johnson and tight end Tony  Gonzalez. Baker was disappointed that it was the team’s last practice this  summer, but is hoping to see the Chiefs practice in River Falls again next year.

Cory Zentner traveled from Hudson, Wis., to watch the Chiefs in their final  practice today. Zentner was excited to see quarterback Trent Green and wide receiver Dante  Hall at practice this afternoon, but was disappointed that running back Priest Holmes was not present at camp.  Zentner liked meeting other Chiefs fans this summer. He is hoping for a great NFL season and that the team makes it  to the playoffs.

The players and 210 fans enjoyed wonderful weather at today’s  afternoon practice. It was partly sunny and 79 degrees with a refreshing wind  coming from the NW at 11 mph. There was a low humidity of 44 percent.

Kicker Lawrence  Tynes was perfect in all eight of his field goal attempts this afternoon,  his longest coming from 47 yards. Punter Dustin  Colquitt got a bit of a break today after punting six times in Saturday’s  tilt with the Houston Texans for a  whopping 47.7 average with a long of 69 yards.

In a drill designed to work on a running attack, running backs Larry Johnson, Dee Brown and Quentin Griffin each carried the ball three times. Running backs McKenzi Smith and Derrick Ross each received two opportunities to improve their running game. Quarterback Trent Green and Jeff Smoker  spilt the snaps evenly.

In the first segment of 11-on-11s, Green completed 4-5 passes. Gonzalez registered two receptions from Green and wide receiver Dante Hall snatched one of two intended passes. Running back Larry Johnson also was successful on a bootleg play to the right of the field. Quarterback Damon Huard took five snaps, completed 3-4 passes and got sacked once. In this drill Huard still couldn't connect with wide receiver Nate Curry, but he did complete passes to tight end Jason Dunn, running back McKenzi Smith and tight end Kris Wilson. Quarterback Jeff Smoker only took one snap, but the snap was flawed and sailed over Smoker's head.

Following an offensive walkthrough, the team commenced with the second half of 11-on-11s. Quarterback Trent Green recorded the majority of the snaps with 13. He completed 5-9 pass attempts to fullback Ronnie Cruz, wide receiver Dante Hall, tight end Tony Gonzalez, and two to wide receiver Samie Parker. Running back Larry Johnson carried the ball four times during this series. The offensive linemen that worked with Green's team included: left tackle Kyle Turley, left guard Chris Bober, center Casey Wiegmann, right guard Will Shields  and right tackle Kevin Sampson. No offensive plays with Green's unit resulted in a touchdown.

Practice went on as usual as the defense did not show any effects from  Saturday’s game. The defensive line  still looks to be the only question fazing the Chiefs before they play the Cincinnati Bengals on opening day.

Today’s practice was one of the stops on the way to Chicago for Tom, Kevin and Steve  Harkins, who are coming home from visiting relatives in North Dakota. This is their first time  in River Falls for training camp,  but Tom has been to a few of the Chicago  Bears’ camps in Kankakee, Ill. He said he hasn’t noticed any major differences in how the two teams (Chiefs  and Bears) run camp. The Harkins like being able to watch the players from such  a short distance.

Erik Hauser of Chicago is in River Falls with his two kids Zac, 10, and Elle, 8. This is their  first time at camp. Having lived in Kansas City previously, the Hausers are big Chiefs  fans. Erik is excited about new coach Herm  Edwards. “He’s always done great wherever he’s been. I think because he was  a player, people respect him more as a coach.” Erik also thinks Edwards will  help out with the defense. “The defense has needed some help, but [cornerback Ty] Law will help a lot.” Zac’s  favorite part of camp was when he got to catch the balls that the kicker was  sending through the goal posts.

Herman Suhr, a Field  Supervisor at Arrowhead Stadium for  23 years, came to training camp with  the team for 13 years to be a security guard at the practices. Today he was sitting behind  the fence as a fan, relaxing and simply taking in the ambiance that camp  has to offer. “I can’t say enough about the community,” said Suhr of River Falls, “Here and in Kansas    City: both  places have been so good to me.” He loves his job and said he is going to  continue with it until the Chiefs get sick of him, which will hopefully be a  long, long time.

Gerda Benedict, a  former UW-RF food service coordinator, was at practice today to see the  team she used to work with. Benedict, who worked with the Chiefs for 15 years  in River Falls, retired two years  ago. Some of Benedict’s duties included approving menus as well as handling  finances between Chartwells (the  University food service) and the Kansas City Chiefs. Benedict mentioned that  one of the team’s favorite menus was Seafood Extravaganza, which included  lobster, shrimp, crab legs, scallops and pasta dishes with seafood mixed in.  Another menu item that is still a favorite is Zarda's night, which is a popular Kansas City barbeque restaurant. Benedict said that she thoroughly enjoyed working for the  Chiefs and that it was nice to meet so many great people through the  experience.

Paula Feyereisen,  from River Falls, Wis., was present at practice today with  her two sons Mitchell, 7, and Adam, 5. Paula was also with her mom,  former camp coordinator for Food Services Gerda  Benedict. Paula has been enjoying camp and is looking forward to purchasing  some camp memorabilia to hopefully have signed by players for her sons. Christie Johnson from Seattle, Wash.,  who is Paula’s cousin, was also nearby with her daughter Celina, 8. Celina, who had her Barbie phone signed by players last  year, is hoping to get a lot of autographs after practice today to add to her  collection.

Dan Stork and his  son Casey, 13, made it to today’s  practice all the way from Coon Rapids, Iowa. They embarked on their almost six-hour road trip yesterday and made it to River  Falls last night. They were a bit disappointed to find out that this morning’s  practice was cancelled, but were pleased to be able to see the Chiefs this  afternoon. Dan has been a Chiefs fan since he was a kid because they were the  only team he could watch on TV, and also because he wanted to be different (most  fans in Iowa  are Minnesota Vikings fans). Casey’s  favorite player is running back Larry  Johnson; last year it was Priest  Holmes. It isn’t a surprise that his favorite position is running back. It  is the Storks' fourth year coming to River Falls for training camp, and they really enjoy the small town feel that it offers.  Dan hopes this year’s Chiefs can get back to being a strong defensive team like  the Marty Schottenheimer teams of  the 90’s.

Jim Fisk of Belvidere, Ill.,  arrived today just in time to catch this afternoon’s practice. He had hoped to  make it here last week but couldn’t because he had to maintain the greens at a  golf course he manages. Due to the severe heat in Illinois,  lately the course has been in very rough shape. Like many Chiefs fans, Fisk is  excited about the team’s dedication to building a strong defense. He got a good  look at the future of the defense, as rookie defensive end Tamba Hali was working out about five feet from Fisk.

There were two empty semi-trucks sitting in the back of the  parking lot at Ramer Field Sports  Complex this afternoon. The trucks are waiting for training camp’s end, so  they can be loaded up with Chiefs’ weight room equipment, sleds and other  miscellaneous items, and head back to Kansas City.

Some of the players signed autographs at the end of this  afternoon’s practice after several fans were disappointed to find out that  morning practice was cancelled, along with the autograph session. Lucky fans  were surprised to see defensive end Jared  Allen, cornerback Chris Johnson, running back Michael Bennett,  linebacker Boomer Grigsby, and  quarterback Brodie Croyle signing  autographs for the second-to-last practice of camp.

One of the activities featured during Kids’ Day was the duck pond, which UW-River Falls Sports Information Director Jim Thies was in charge of. Kids were delighted when they picked up the duck with the  winning numbers and received McDonalds gift cards or candy from an energetic and fun Thies.

One of the most popular attractions at Kids’ Day today was the face painting and temporary tattoo tables.  Kids left today with designs on their faces including everything from footballs  to Chiefs’ logos. Helping with the tattoos was Chiefs summer intern Kat Krtnick. Krtnick said that she  really enjoyed being with all the kids today and thought it was fun giving them  their tattoos. She also mentioned that this year was a huge turnout with a lot  of really great kids.

Green answered questions concerning Head Coach Herm Edwards  and his thoughts of the new coach so far.  Green replied, "Everything he's told us has been true. He gets us on and off the field and makes sure we get the proper time to recover for the next practice and the tempo of practice."

The 13-year veteran from Indiana  also mentioned some names he thought was stepping up at the receiver position. Green said that wide receiver Jeris McIntyre  probably has the edge for the fourth wide receiver spot because of his play and experience with the team. The quarterback also mentioned rookie wide receiver Dan Melendez  playing well and definitely making a push for making the team, or at least the practice squad.

The injuries to quarterbacks Damon Huard  and Brodie Croyle  will open up a large amount of playing time for quarterback Casey Printers  in the preseason game. Green talked about how he feels about the  Canadian Football League  star.

"Casey is going to get a lot of work and I hope he's ready. Maybe he has communicated down to his family in Texas to see if they can close the roof to help him with the climate control, keep it a little cooler for him. It's unfortunate that Brodie got hurt in practice and won't be playing in this game. Casey's been doing very well, he's been given a lot more reps than I think he ever would have anticipated coming into training camp."

The weather today was mostly cloudy, but there were enough  gaps in the clouds to provide adequate sunshine for all who attended this  afternoon’s practice. The temperature was 81 degrees with 58 percent humidity.  Winds were coming from the ENE at 7 mph.There were about 210 fans in the main field stands this afternoon.

The Chiefs performed an entire walk-through of a game this  afternoon, including practicing where they should stand for the National Anthem. Six members of the Chiefs’ staff were in the press box,  running the clock and recording the downs. Offensive coordinator Mike Solari was also in  the box, relaying play information to quarterback coach Terry Shea.

The starting defensive line starters look to be Eric Hicks and Jared Allen on the ends while Ryan Sims and Lional Dalton lock up the middle. James  Reed also could be plugged in as a starter, but there is no telling who  head Coach Herm Edwards will go  with. Hicks will most likely get the nod  over the injured rookie Tamba Hali. Hali might see some action, but most likely  will be rested to prevent farther injury.

Herm Edwards spoke after practice about the status at quarterback where they  only had two healthy players until today’s signing of Michigan State  alum Jeff Smoker. Smoker has NFL experience from his back-up  roll with the St. Louis Rams.

Shelly and Bruce Slivkin of Kansas City were early at practice today to watch the Chiefs on the main field at Ramer Field Sports Complex. This is  their second year at camp in River Falls.  The Slivkins return to camp each summer because they enjoy watching the team  closely and getting autographs. The Slivkins, who were present at Family Fun Night, have received 22  autographs at camp so far, including running backs Michael Bennett and Larry  Johnson.

Brian Brueke, from River Falls, came to his first practice today at camp this summer. Brueke has  been visiting camp for nine years and enjoys being able to see the NFL team up-close. Brueke, who is a Vikings fan, holds no animosity toward  the Chiefs, in fact, he thinks Coach Herm  Edwards is doing an excellent job working with the team and leading them  into the upcoming season.

Donna Jellum is  in River Falls for training camp with her daughter Joan and son-in-law Greg.  When she heard the Chiefs were in town, she made it a day trip to visit her granddaughter,  who lives in the area, and come to practice. Being a Vikings fan, Jellum thinks running back Michael Bennett will be a good addition to the team. Bennett is her  favorite player, and she will now enjoy watching him play for her favorite team  in the AFC: the Chiefs.

Today Paul and Veryl Knopps, from Beldenville, Wis.,  attended their second practice since camp opened. They love the atmosphere that  camp offers, and the chance to be able to see professional athletes so close to  their home is great. Coming to training camp practices gets the Knopps revved  up for the NFL season. Although the  Knopps enjoy watching the Chiefs, their hearts are with the Green Bay Packers.

A few times at this afternoon’s practice, coaches  would repeatedly yell “Jumbo.” Players would run out on the field with their  arms above their heads like they were flexing, chanting “Jumbo” in deep voices.

Jay Glazer, from Fox Sports, has been attending the last  couple of Chiefs afternoon practices. His focus today was rookie quarterback Brodie Croyle, with whom he shared a  few words as they walked off Ramer Field.

Hall of Famer Lenny  Dawson was on the sidelines again today; he is quite concerned with the  Chiefs quarterback situation going into Saturday’s pre-season tip-off with the Houston Texans. With hobbled  quarterbacks Brodie Croyle and Damon Huard on the shelf for Saturday’s  game, the Chiefs acquired quarterback Jeff Smoker to take some of the load off the Chiefs’ only healthy  quarterbacks, Trent Green and Casey Printers. Printers was the last  player to leave this afternoon’s practice; Dawson was waiting patiently to ask him some  questions about the heavy load he is expected to shoulder on Saturday. “If  another quarterback goes down on Saturday, you can expect to see a fast game with  a lot of running back hand-offs,” said Dawson.

There were 110 fans in attendance at this morning's practice. The temperature was a comfortable 73 degrees, but with a 78 percent humidity, making it feel more like 80 degrees. It was also partly cloudy today with a breeze from the ENE at 8 mph, which was a relief for fans and players.

Special teams coach Mike Priefer  was doing a lot of work with the hands team for on-side kicks, stressing for his players to get on it and to get down before the opposing team can create a turnover. Safety Bernard Pollard and wide receiver Jeris McIntyre  made some plays that earned praise from Priefer.

They also did work with recovering on-side kicks, with a few younger players making some spectacular plays. Tight end Kris Wilson leaped out of his shoes to make a spectacular recovery on an on-side kick by kicker Lawrence Tynes. Seconds later, running back De Arrius Howard  made a nice play of his own, recovering a perfectly placed on-side kick by Tynes.

Tynes and punter Dustin Colquitt  did a lot of kicking today with Priefer focusing primarily on players on the line of scrimmage and getting different eight and nine man fronts in the correct alignment.

Mike Priefer, special teams coach, was interviewed following practice. Priefer expressed his excitement about the potential of this special teams group. "I hope a lot of the young guys show me what I think they can do. I hope some of the veterans that play early on in the game show me what they can do and I'm excited about this group. They are a very hard working group and they are very fun to work with."

Providing competition for his players is important to Priefer. "I like competition. I love competition in every spot. I think its human nature to get a little anxiety in your belly and that you are concerned about performing every day. That's what makes you better.  Our roster is built that we don't have another punter, but we have two young guys that are working hard and continuing to improve."

Last year Priefer thought that this special teams unit was very well coached, but this year requires some change. "The thing we have different this year is new personnel. There are several guys that are not on this team anymore that are veteran guys that have played special teams. What I'm excited is seeing these young guys come, these linebackers, safeties, wide receivers and running backs, and to step up to show me what they can do. I have high expectations for these guys."

Peter  and Bettie Levinger  from Coon Rapids, Minn., brought their son Ryan, 11, to River Falls  for their first time at summer training camp. The Levingers have been enjoying their time in River Falls and are having a blast watching their favorite team practice each day. The family loves new Head Coach Herm Edwards for his determination and persistence. Ryan mentioned that he is excited to watch his favorite players today and hopes to get autographs from running back Larry Johnson  and quarterback Trent Green  at camp.

Glen Twedt  from Independence, Mo., is watching his favorite team practice at camp for the fifth year. Twedt prefers coming to camp the second week because he enjoys having fewer fans and media around while he watches practice. Twedt, who has been a season ticket holder at Arrowhead Stadium  for 15 years, says that he is really looking forward to the upcoming season and thinks that Head Coach Herm Edwards will lead the team to the playoffs and a successful NFL  season.

In an interview with linebacker Nick Reid  this morning, he said that everything is going well so far in camp. "Everybody is treating me good. I'm kind of getting to show what I can do a little bit." Special teams is the area where Reid believes he will have his opportunity. "Yea. It's definitely where I'm going to make my mark this season if I'm lucky enough to make the team. Special teams is all about heart and that's something that I have a lot of. " Coming into camp, Reid, the 2005 Big 12 Defensive Player of the Year, was asked if he came in with a chip on his shoulder. "I thought I did and now that I'm getting to live my dream, I'm just trying to do my best and show them what I got. "

Being at Summer Training Camp is more than Reid ever expected." It's so fun to be out here with Trent Green  and Tony Gonzalez  and just to be on the same field as them and practice with them. It's a dream come true." Throughout camp, Reid said that he has bonded with rookie quarterback Brodie Croyle . "It's actually kind of weird since he's on offense, but we've hit it off pretty well and I can see us being friends for awhile."

Reid is also very excited for the upcoming game against the Houston Texans. "I can't wait. I'm giddy like a little kid on Christmas right now. I'm excited to get out there and hit someone on another team."

After this morning's special teams practice, punter Dustin Colquitt  was practicing hiking the ball with tight end Adam Johnson  for 15 minutes before returning to Hunt Arena to join the rest of the team.

There were 235 fans in the stands and along the rail at this afternoon's practice. The clouds that loomed large throughout the morning and  early afternoon dispersed about halfway through  practice,  resulting in some hot weather for the players and fans. At the beginning of  practice it was 74 degrees, but with the 78 percent humidity it felt more like  80 degrees. There was a light wind from the SE at 3 mph.

The heat did not slow down players as they went back out on  the field with only shoulder pads. The practice seemed to be run at a higher  pace and intensity than the morning. Several players stood out.

No defensive player stood out more than rookie safety Jarrad Page. Page flew all over the field and made numerous plays  to raise his stock in the coaching staff’s eyes. Page’s biggest play of the day came on a  quarterback Trent Green toss to the  right flat where rookie out of UCLA was waiting to close on the interception. Head Coach Herm Edwards pointed out Page’s strong  efforts throughout practice, trying to get other guys to perform better.

Edwards has been known so far in camp to be hands-on, jumping in to teach  players at every opportunity. Today, Edwards showed Page a better drop-back  technique, and how to pivot to catch up with wide receivers in a more efficient  manor.

Most of the practice was spent running 7-on-7 and 11-on-11 drills. The  secondary mostly played in the nickel formation: there are three corners  instead of the usual two. The defensive backs seemed quicker than usual and did  not allow much past them.

Coach Herm Edwards said after the morning practice that veterans are going to get most of the  playing time during practice, while the young players will be saved for the pre-season  opener at Houston. Edwards said that the young  safeties, Jarrad Page and Bernard Pollard, would see a lot of  playing time to define where they fit on the team.

In the first team drill, quarterbacks Trent Green  and Casey Printers  did not portray their usual decision-making skills. Green took the first five snaps, only completing 1-5 passes. During the first play of the day, Green threw an interception and then followed with another substandard pass to wide receiver Samie Parker  that almost got picked off. Green made his only completion to running back Dee Brown  on a dump-off pass up the middle. Printers also threw an interception on his first play, but did complete his subsequent two passes to running back Quentin Griffin  and wide receiver Nate Curry.

In 7-on-7s, quarterback Trent Green  regained his composure and completed 7-10 passes, but he also threw another interception. Wide receiver Samie Parker  made a terrific catch, splitting two defenders and showing off his vertical jumping ability. Green made a 50-yard pass to wide receiver Kyle Brown  and a 40-yard pass to wide receiver Jeff Webb. Green also connected with fullback J.R. Niklos, wide receiver Dante Hall  and running back Dee Brown. Coach Herm Edwards  seemed to be impressed by some of the players when he said, "It is very evident that some guys are making plays, and some guys are not."

During the first segment of 11-on-11s, the offense once again worked on its running attack and various blocking schemes. Quarterback Trent Green  handed off the ball eight times--three times to running back Dee Brown, twice to running back Larry Johnson, and twice to running back McKenzi Smith. Quarterback Casey Printers  worked with running backs Quentin Griffin  and Derrick Ross. On one play, after the whistle was blown, Brown continued accelerating down the field carrying the ball in competition with cornerback Ty Law, who was chasing after him all the way to the end zone.

After a briefing of a red zone drill, the offense continued its second segment of 11-on-11s. Quarterback Trent Green  led the offense in the first six plays, connecting with wide receiver Eddie Kennison  and running back Dee Brown. Brown also carried the ball for some valuable yardage twice. Quarterback Casey Printers  took the majority of the snaps during this series. Printers was 2-2 on pass completions and handed off the ball to his running backs five times. Printers connected with wide receiver Nate Curry  and running back Derrick Ross. Running backs Quentin Griffin, McKenzi Smith  and Ross each tallied two carries. Printers' lack of NFL experience ended in him getting sacked three times in 10 plays, though.

Ed and Marie Sherman, from Olathe, Kan., are spending their second summer in River Falls for training camp. The Shermans love coming to River Falls each summer because,  as Marie mentioned, “The people are so kind and friendly to all of us Chiefs  fans!” The Shermans  also enjoy the cooler weather and watching the team closely, so they can see  new players and coaches such as cornerback Ty  Law and Head Coach Herm Edwards.  Being in River Falls not only makes the Shermans excited about the team, but  excited for the upcoming NFL season.

Tom and Linda Westfell, from Hudson, Wis., are actually Green Bay Packer fans, but enjoy  coming to camp for the NFL experience. The Westfells have been to camp three times now and say that they  appreciate Chiefs fans for their obvious dedication to the team. Tom said that  he likes new Head Coach Herm Edwards for his forwardness and ability to communicate with the team. The Westfells  wish the Chiefs a good upcoming season and the fans a safe trip home.

Each time Larry  Huessler, from Des   Moines, Iowa, comes to River Falls for the Chiefs training camp, he finds that the experience gets better. Huessler, who is originally from Kansas City,  has been coming to camp for over eight years. Huessler enjoys coming each  summer because, as he said, “It is a laid back, friendly atmosphere where you  can get close to the players and get autographs.” Huessler hopes that the team  will continue to practice in River Falls instead of Kansas City because it  draws a smaller crowd, making everything more accessible.

Larry Boykin and  his son Taylor arrived in River Falls yesterday from Kansas    City. This is their second year attending summer  training camp and they've enjoyed every moment they've spent in River Falls.  "The hospitality from people in the town has been great," said Larry.  They said they received some of the best service they've ever had at American Pie Restaurant and Bar on Main Street in River Falls.  They also had a great time going to Prescott, Wis., where they were able to get some great views of  the St. Croix River at a newly remodeled scenic  overlook. On the football side of things, the Boykin's like what they have seen  thus far from the new look Chiefs. "They look very motivated and fired up  this year with Herm Edwards as  coach," said Larry. Their favorite players are cornerback Ty Law and running back Larry Johnson. Taylor thinks the Chiefs may need a little  wide receiver help before the season starts. "Jerry Porter from the Oakland  Raiders would be nice, and we'd be hurting our division rival too,"  said Taylor.

Eric Lillvis of River Falls was at this afternoon's practice. He has been coming to Chiefs camp for five  years now and likes being able to see these great athletes perform so close to  his home. This is his sixth time coming to practice, and although he was not  originally a Chiefs fan, he has slowly become one after watching so many of  their practices. His favorite players are tight end Tony Gonzalez and guard Will  Shields. In years past, Lillvis loved coming to practice to watch mammoth  offensive lineman Willie Roaf, but  has been impressed so far with Roaf's replacement, tackle Kyle Turley. Lillvis believes Turley  will be a solid player for the Chiefs. He also thinks rookie safeties Jarrad Page and Bernard Pollard look great in practice; both intercepted a pass  this afternoon.

Twenty-six kids were on the Ramer  Field Sports Complex grass today goofing around running football drills.  They didn’t seem too into watching practice, so they thought they’d make a game  of their own off to the side of the fields.

Tackle Chris Bober  was interviewed following the afternoon practice today. Bober expressed his feelings about tackle Willie Roaf  not being at camp and guard Brian  Waters' injury. "I don't like to make predictions, so we have to go on without them."  Bober also complimented the play of tackle Kevin Sampson  and the other young guys that are stepping in. "They are all doing good and are on the right path." Bober says that all the young guys are extremely athletic and smart, but they need some game experience. "We have quality veteran backups and are all getting quality repetitions during camp," said Bober.

Having some laughs after practice were kicker Lawrence Tynes, punter Dustin Colquitt and snapper Kendall Gammon. They were shooting some  videos with Chiefs media personnel on Ramer  Field. The shoot was part of a series of videos that they call Scoreboard Features. The segment they  were shooting today is called Kendall  Gammon's I Had to Ask. The features will be aired on the scoreboard during  Chiefs home games at Arrowhead Stadium.

The sun was nowhere to be found this morning as clouds hung over the practice fields. It made for a very cool 70 degree morning with 76 percent humidity. Winds were coming from the SSE at 5 mph. Attendance was at an even lower number than yesterday with 105 fans.

Running back Dee  Brown tried multiple times to run up the middle, but the hole never opened,  as defenders crashed down. Defensive End Tamba  Hali was still sitting out. Veteran Eric  Hicks was in his place.

Defensive Coordinator Gunther Cunningham was the most animated he has been all camp; he took the defense aside and  yelled at his players. The defense has not looked up to par in recent days, at  least not up to what they looked like earlier in camp.

Following practice, Edwards addressed the absence of back-up quarterback Damon Huard: “Right now we have two quarterbacks that are alive. We  might have a new quarterback playing for us on Saturday.” Huard came down on  the bridge of his foot and sprained his ankle yesterday.

Punter Dustin Colquitt got a lot of work in during this morning's practice, punting the ball 15 times for a total of 749 yards, averaging 50 yards per punt. The Chiefs punt coverage team worked on blocking against eight and nine man fronts. Punt returners Dante Hall  and Nate Curry  were the recipients of all of Colquitt's punts. Curry had a bit of a rough day, fumbling the ball twice.  Twenty-five minutes of this morning's practice were spent on special teams drills.

Lydia and Louis Seve brought  their son Tom and grandson, Caleb, 13 to River Falls for training camp. When asked what  about practice he likes the most, Caleb replied, “All of it,” but that the  cornerbacks were probably his favorite. This is the Seves second time at  training camp; they miss tackle Willie  Roaf, but Louis commented, “It was his choice. Turley will fit in, but no  one can replace Roaf.” Tom said he prefers coming to training camp in River Falls, and hopes it doesn't move down to Kansas. He thinks there would be too many people, and it would be harder to get autographs.

Bob and Ruth Shipman, from Kansas City, came to the 8:45 a.m. practice today  for their fourth year at summer training camp in River Falls. The Shipmans arrived at camp Saturday  morning and attended Family Fun Night that evening. Ruth said that it was the best Family Fun Night ever because she  was able to get 12 autographs for her grandson, including running back Larry Johnson, cornerback Patrick Surtain and wide receiver Dante Hall. The Shipman’s favorite part  of camp is being close to the players and meeting up with fans from past years.

Sheri Colter from Independence, Mo.,  was watching practice for the first time on the first-field bleachers at Ramer Field Sports Complex. Colter, who  has been a Chiefs fan for years and is a season ticket holder, has been enjoying  her time at camp. She mentioned that she particularly likes seeing her favorite  players up-close, including quarterback Trent  Green and tight end Tony Gonzalez.

Some of trainers were handing out yellow bottles  of what appeared to be Gatorade after practice this morning. Some bottles were Gatorade, but some were lemonade.  After tasting the lemonade, then spitting it out, we found that they use salt  instead of sugar when mixing the lemonade; apparently it’s to help put the salt  back into the players’ bodies because they sweat so much.

Evan Larsen, a River Falls High School  and UW-Stout  graduate got a tryout with the Chiefs after this morning's practice. Larsen, a kicker, is third on UW-Stout's all-time scoring list. Apparently his dad was able to get in contact with Head Coach Herm Edwards  to set up the tryout. The Chiefs are very happy with kicker Lawrence Tynes  and weren't looking at Larsen as a replacement at the kicker position. They just wanted to give a local guy a chance to prove himself to NFL  coaches. Larsen attempted 13 field goals and made eight; his longest coming from 50 yards. After his field goal attempts, Larsen got a chance to show his leg strength on kickoffs. His first kickoff from the 35-yard line was a dandy, traveling to the 1-yard line. The rest of his five kickoffs weren't quite as good as the first, but they all landed on or inside the 20-yard line. Special teams coach Mike Priefer and Executive Vice President Denny Thum  were on hand to observe Larsen's tryout.

Signing autographs today were the rookies, headlined by defensive end Tamba Hali  and quarterback Brodie Croyle. Also getting a lot of attention were safeties Bernard Pollard  and Jarrod Page  and tight end and Wisconsin native Robert Docherty.

Attendance was at a camp low today of 215 fans. The sun was shining bright at this afternoon’s practice and  had a lot of fans looking for shade. The temperature was a modest 81 degrees,  but the 50 percent humidity made it feel closer to 90. There was also a very  nice breeze blowing in from the SE at 7 mph.

The starting interior defensive line was once again switched up, as Ryan Sims was plugged back in along  with James Reed. Reed has played  with the first team ever since the team’s scrimmage with the Minnesota Vikings and may have an edge  to start this season. There is no telling what defensive line coach Tim Krumrie will put together come  opening day; starters may become more clear after the pre-season game with the Houston Texans.

Outside linebacker Kendrell Bell has  started to play like he did in his Pittsburgh  Steeler years, and not only played the run, but defended the pass. Bell was able to  intercept a quarterback Trent Green pass attempt that was tipped by the intended receiver. Coach Edwards joked afterwards about Bell being a running back  in Pop Warner football.

The beginning of practice was spent going over the cover-2  defensive scheme, set to be implemented into the secondary game plan. Coach Edwards acted as if he was the  quarterback, as the secondary covered receivers on passing routes. The cover-2  scheme is designed to have one defender in front of the receiver, and have a  safety over the top to prevent the deep ball. Once a pass is completed,  defenders are instructed to fly to the ball to allow only a minimum gain. The  new scheme might aid the Chiefs to get within the top five in passing defense  after finishing seventh last season.

Two special teams units took the field to open practice  today. Fans were gleeful to see kick returner Dante Hall take the field and return some booming kicks from kicker Lawrence Tynes. Tynes looked impressive  today, as he was able to put 5-6 field goal attempts through the uprights. All  five of Tynes’ makes were from 45 yards or more.

The final drill of the afternoon was the two-minute drill.  Each quarterback had an opportunity to run the drill once. Quarterback Trent Green was very successful in his  session. During the first play, Green handed the ball off to running back Larry Johnson, and the second play  Green delivered the ball to wide receiver Eddie  Kennison for a short gain. For the next five plays, Green threw the ball to  tight end Tony Gonzalez each time, ending  the run in a quick touchdown.

Quarterback Damon  Huard also tried to score as quickly as Green’s unit, but did not complete  the task. Huard connected with running back Dee Brown on three passes and tight end Kris Wilson on two, but could not finish the run in time.

Kevin and Lynell O’Bryan, from Monroe City, Mo.,  are in their 10th year at River   Falls for summer  training camp. Kevin enjoys coming to camp each year to see what the team looks  like and to see the draft choices for the upcoming season. Kevin also likes getting  close to the players and prefers coming to River Falls for camp because it is  smaller and more relaxed than most NFL training camps. Some of the O’ Bryan’s favorite players include tight end Tony Gonzalez, running back Priest Holmes, running back Larry Johnson, wide receiver Dante Hall and safety Greg Wesley. Kevin is impressed with  Coach Herm Edwards’ skills and  thinks he will be a great asset to the team. However, Gunther Cunningham was Kevin’s favorite coach, whom he named his dog after.

Mark and Greta Hendricks, from Olathe, Kan., traveled to River Falls this summer for their third  year at training camp. The Hendricks love coming to camp each summer because  they enjoy seeing their favorite NFL team  up-close. They also enjoy seeing how the team will perform during the season.  The Hendricks have been paying close attention to Coach Herm Edwards and think he is doing a great job as a leader. They  also enjoy watching quarterback Trent  Green and wide receiver Dante Hall.

Jack and Barbara Jean Craft were at this  afternoon’s practice with their son, Scott.  They have been coming to the Chiefs summer training camp for five years now and  always enjoy their stay here. Jack, a former college football player for the University of Southern California, had  a lot to say about this years’ team. He especially likes what he has seen thus  far from free agent quarterback Casey  Printers. Jack feels that because he can throw very well and pass with  speed and accuracy, he is a very viable backup to starting quarterback Trent Green. Besides that, Jack is a  little skeptical of this year’s team. He thinks the team needs to run more in  practice to get in better game shape, they need harder-hitting safeties, and  also some bigger running backs. Coming to River Falls has always been a delightful vacation  for the Crafts. Being able to go for drives in the countryside, and see the  beautiful farms has been a treat for the family when they come here.

Tight end Tony  Gonzalez made a kid’s day today as he was exiting the practice fields. The youngster  kept yelling, “Tony, Tony,” from behind the rail, when Gonzalez turned around  and flagged the kid to come over. Bewildered, the kid looked at his parents  like he didn’t know what to do. The parents said to go out there. The kid,  without hesitation, went under the rail and dashed towards Gonzalez. He  received a hand shake and an autograph from the Pro Bowl tight end. Now he can go back home and brag to all of his  friends about who he got to meet.

Ramer Field Sports Complex seems to be the place to take your dog for a walk. During the two practices today there was a combined total of nine dogs, mostly puppies, that were seen by UW-River Falls Public Affair interns. A few of the breeds were Labradors, Brittanies, Cocker Spaniels, and Jack Russell Terriers.

There were 106 Senior Citizens in attendance for Seniors' Day this morning. The Seniors and other fans enjoyed a  cool 69 degrees; it did warm up to 77 degrees by the end of practice, though. The skies were mostly clear and humidity was at 42 percent.

Head Coach Herm Edwards was somewhat frustrated about  this morning’s practice: “A little bit disappointing in the situations we had  today. We’re going to have to get better at certain situations, especially in  four minutes, I preach that, I believe that. We’re going to have a mindset of  playing better football offensively with four minutes (to go) where we can’t  always rely on going back and throwing passes to make first downs.

Edwards also talked about the callowness of this four-minute drill:  “This is only the second time we’ve done it. So, it’s new and it’s a new  mentality, too. I understand that. They probably played the four-minute offense  maybe a little bit different than how I see us playing it.

Most of the veteran offensive players did not practice this  morning. Quarterback Trent Green, guard Will Shields, tight end Tony Gonzalez and fullback Ronnie Cruz were not dressed in pads. Also,  wide receiver Craphonso Thorpe, running back Michael Bennett, and quarterback Brodie Croyle were still nursing their  injuries.

During the initial offensive walk-through drill of the game,  the quarterbacks keyed in on the passing game. Quarterback Damon Huard completed  4-5 passes and quarterback Casey Printers connected with his receivers  on all six of his attempts. Wide receiver Jeff Webb was the intended target on  three plays, as were wide receiver Samie Parker and tight end Kris Wilson.

The first team offensive linemen were left tackle Kyle Turley, left guard Jordan  Black, center Casey Wiegmann, right guard Chris Bober and right tackle Kevin Sampson. They worked blocking  against pads.

Coach Herm Edwards then instructed the players to  run the “Four-minute drill.” On all six of quarterback Damon Huard’s tries, he handed off the ball to running back Larry Johnson. Quarterback Casey Printers took nine snaps in this  series. After Printers threw two incomplete passes to wide receiver Jeff Webb and running back Dee Brown, Coach Edwards yelled, “See if we can play football!” During the remainder  of the drill, Printers delivered the ball to his running backs. Running backs McKenzi Smith, Derrick Ross and Quentin  Griffin all carried the ball twice.

Practice went as usual for the Chiefs, except the intensity  was down. The defense looked rather sluggish, much like the rest of the team,  as the offense was able to pound the ball and throw deep to wide-open  receivers. Neither cornerback Ty Law or  defensive end Tamba Hali practiced  in the morning. Hali was absent due to his rib injury acquired yesterday and  Law had the morning off.

The defensive line was punished all day, as the offense kept  calling running plays. Running backs Larry  Johnson and Dee Brown did not  get far on their running endeavors but kept rushing up the middle.

Defensive tackles Ryan Sims and Lional Dalton still practiced with the  second team defense. Tackles Ron Edwards and James Reed were the hogs on the  first team drills. Reed, a signing from the New York Jets, has impressed since his arrival at camp because of  his huge motor and “never give-up” attitude.

Sergio Huff from Kansas    City was present at Senior’s Day with his two grandchildren. This is Huff’s second time  at training camp. He said that he enjoys it because he loves football and the  Kansas City Chiefs! Huff likes coming to River  Falls each summer because it is cooler and not as humid as it is back home.  Huff also likes watching the players practice and especially likes seeing  running back Larry Johnson.

Christopher Tenpenny of Platte City, Mo.,  and Brooks Gwin of Kearney, Mo., attended  this morning’s practice. They hoped to get autographs from Chiefs players after  practice, including running back Larry  Johnson. Gwin was able to get an autograph from defensive end Jared Allen on his jersey yesterday.  This is their second year coming to camp; they really enjoy being able to get  so close to the players. After practice today, the two get to enjoy the sun at Valleyfair amusement park in Shakopee, Minn.

Nancy Richey of Overland Park, Kan.,  and Ed Bledsoe of Olathe, Kan., made it to  their 13th consecutive Chiefs training camp this year. They arrived in River Falls on Thursday and plan on staying for a week. They have really enjoyed the  beautiful weather that Western Wisconsin has been getting since their arrival, much better than the extreme heat and humidity  they have endured back home. Their favorite Chiefs player is kick returner Dante Hall, whom they were able to  share a dinner table with at the Kansas City Sports Authority Dinner Banquet. Richey  has had season tickets to Arrowhead  Stadium in her family for 40 years, 25 years of which she has been  attending. Bledsoe is a distant relative of Dallas Cowboys quarterback Drew  Bledsoe. They love seeing the UW-River Falls campus and are very impressed by the improvements that have been made since  last summer. They also enjoy going to the Mall of America, Como Zoo, Minnesota  Zoo and Stillwater area when they are here for camp.

The defense seemed to play very well, except for some porous  secondary plays that allowed receiver Samie  Parker to break free and catch passes for huge gains. Cornerback Ty Law sat practice out and was  replaced by cornerback Benny Sapp.  Sapp played well and did not give up as many plays as Patrick Surtain. Safety Greg  Wesley had a great practice and was complimented with a pat on the butt  from secondary coach David Gibbs.

Hali compared it to a boxing match. “Somebody really  gets you in the ribs. Sometimes you feel like you get the wind knocked out of  you, but mine was more like pain.” Hali said it’s not a major injury, though.

One emphasis was defending the two-point conversion. The  defense seemed to hold up, stopping running back Larry Johnson for a loss and forcing most plays to the  outside. The defensive line was on a  mission to get to the quarterback.

The final set of 11-on-11s focused on the passing game.  Green completed 10-12 passes and didn’t throw any interceptions. He commenced  the series with a precise 30-yard pass to wide receiver Eddie Kennison and hit  target wide receiver Samie Parker on  another. Parker tallied one more reception in the series, but also dropped a  perfect pass. Other players that registered receptions with the first team  include fullback Ronnie Cruz, running back Larry Johnson, wide receiver Dante  Hall, tight end Tony Gonzalez and fullback J.R. Niklos.

Quarterback Casey  Printers only got in for four snaps. During the first two snaps he panicked  under pressure, running once and throwing out-of-bounds on the next play. On  the last two snaps, though, he completed passes to wide receiver Nate Curry and wide receiver Jeff  Webb.

Kicker Lawrence Tynes  got some work in today during the Chiefs special teams practice. Things didn't go very smoothly for the unit as twice the snap was fumbled, and Tynes missed two field goals. In total Tynes was 4-6; he missed from 44 and 49 yards. The longest field goal he made was from 47-yards. The first field goal he missed was a 44-yarder that hit the upright and received a huge groan from the crowd.

Nate Anderson of Marinette, Wis., is a first timer for Chiefs training  camp. The UW-River Falls running back has been a football fan since he can remember and a  Chiefs fan for the last couple of years. “It’s fun to see all the superstars,  and it’s nice to see them in person versus on TV,” said Anderson, about how close you can actually  get to the players. He’s excited that his favorite AFC team (Chiefs) has picked up a great new coach: “He’ll point  them in the right direction.” Anderson  also thinks that cornerback Ty Law is  a good acquisition for the team, and that he will do well in the upcoming  season.

Mike Fitch and  his sons Garrett, 15, and Jordan, 12, have been coming to camp  for the past five or six years. This year they brought first-timer Russ Ellison with them for the ride up  from Kansas City. Although they were hesitant to admit it, the group got a little  lost while in Iowa. Instead of ending up just past the Minnesota border, they found themselves in Iowa City, Iowa, which is about 200 miles off course.  The Fitchs and Ellison got back on track and arrived in what they call  “wonderful weather” on Friday. Mike thinks training camp practices have changed for the better with Coach Herm Edwards: "They are running the ball a lot more than with [Dick] Vermeil.   They do a lot more team stuff, too." For Garrett and Jordan, the best part of camp is  getting autographs. So far they’ve gotten most of the defensive ends including Tamba Hali and Jared Allen. The group has also met a lot of other people from Kansas City.

Rick Donaldsen from Wichita, Kan., is experiencing his fifth year at summer training camp in River Falls.  Donaldsen came this year with wife Sheila,  and their son Jed, 12. The  Donaldsens love coming to camp each summer because they enjoy seeing the Chiefs  practice right before their eyes. The family arrived in River Falls Saturday  morning so they could make it to the annual Family Fun Night event. Jed enjoyed seeing the team practice on the  main field at Ramer Field Sports Complex, and also enjoyed getting autographs from his favorite players including running  back Larry Johnson and wide receiver Dante Hall.

Melissa Knapp from Hudson, Wis.,  came to training camp this afternoon to see the Chiefs practice in their 16th  year in River Falls. Knapp, who has watched  the Chiefs practice several times, said that she enjoys seeing them up close  and seeing all of the fans that come each year. Knapp, who is a also a Vikings fan, mentioned that she thinks  the Chiefs have great, dedicated fans. She also likes Coach Herm Edwards because he is very  involved with the team during practice.

Lynn Dickey , former quarterback of the Green Bay Packers  from 1976-1985 was at this afternoon's practice. Sandwiched between Hall of Fame  quarterback Bart Starr  and soon to be Hall of Fame quarterback Brett Favre , Dickey was a great one himself. He is third behind Starr and Favre for most passing yards by a Packers quarterback in a season with 21,369 and holds the Packers records for most passing yards in a single season and also the most passing yards in a single game. He is a native of Kansas and closely follows the Kansas City Chiefs.

NFL Network reporters arrived today to conduct interviews with Chiefs Head Coach Herm Edwards, quarterback Trent Green  and linebacker Derrick Johnson. Tomorrow morning they will begin taping the practices for the Inside Training Camp  show set to air tomorrow at 7 p.m.

Carl Rumsky of River Falls stopped by this afternoon's practice to see for himself the product the Chiefs are putting on the field. He comes about once a year to see new players and to watch his favorite Chiefs player, quarterback Trent Green. He likes what the Chiefs and their fans do for the local economy and would hate to see them stop coming in the future.

Ryan Kelley  of Minneapolis, Minn., took a short road trip to River Falls  this afternoon to check on former Minnesota Vikings  running back Michael Bennett. He, along with many other Vikings hopefuls, thought Bennett was the team's future at the tailback position until injuries curtailed his career. Drafted by the Vikings in the first round of the 2001 NFL Draft out of University of Wisconsin, Bennett appeared to be the man to replace retired Vikings running back Robert Smith; it just never panned out. Kelley still wears his Vikings Bennett jersey and strongly believes the running back still has a chance to be something special in the NFL someday.

The  players and fans got to enjoy beautiful weather this morning. When practice  began the temperature was 72 degrees with 48 percent humidity. Winds were  blowing from the north at 7 mph and the skies were a clear blue.

The defense was much of the same except the rotation was mixed up a little more. Defensive tackles Lional Dalton  and Ryan Sims  played more with the second rotation while Ron Edwards  and James Reed  played with the starting lineup.

The Chiefs have experienced injuries at the tackle position with Dalton and Sims and to make up for it, they recently signed eight-year NFL veteran Shane Burton. Burton was on the Carolina Panther roster the last two years but did not see the playing field. He should provide solid depth at the position along with leadership from a back-up role.  For his career, Burton has tallied 18 sacks, 145 tackles, and three interceptions.

Away from the line, the linebackers and secondary had the same look. Cornerback Lenny Walls, expected to be back this week, was still sidelined with an injury. Cornerbacks Ty Law  and Patrick Surtain  have gotten all the repetitions with the first team and Benny Sapp  has been the nickel back. Upon the return of Walls, the cornerback position should not only be solid, but have capable back ups set in case of injuries to the front line.

Linebacker Derrick Johnson  continues to show why he was a top-10 draft choice a year ago and keeps playing like he has something to prove. Linebacker Boomer Grigsby  has also shown why he has held onto his Chiefs roster spot.

Though running back Michael Bennett  was in full pads today, he did not practice. Head Coach Herm Edwards  said in an interview following morning practice that Bennett would probably not start practicing until next week. Bennett might do some individual position drills, but Edwards wants to make sure that Bennett's hamstring is healed before he takes the field.

In a 9-on-7 drill, the offensive linemen worked on blocking schemes, while the running backs experimented with different pass patterns. Running back Larry Johnson  carried the ball the first four snaps, while running backs McKenzi Smith  and Quentin Griffin  each carried the ball twice.

During the first set of 11-on-11s, the offense primarily worked on its running attacks. Quarterback Damon Huard  took the first four snaps, handing off the ball to running back Larry Johnson  twice and running back Dee Brown  once. One pass, intended from tight end Jason Dunn,  was too low. Quarterback Casey Printers  handed off the ball to running backs Brown and McKenzi Smith. Quarterback Brodie Croyle  was back in the mix today, delivering the ball to running back Quentin Griffin  and running back Derrick Ross.

In an interview with Head Coach Herm Edwards  following morning practice, he commented on the pace of practice. "It was a little sluggish early which I anticipated when you give them a night off. But I thought the last couple of periods the tempo picked up.

"We're starting to move some young guys into the first group and I think that's important. I think they've earned the opportunity to go with the first group. Obviously, if you watched practice they're playing different positions. For the most part, there are some young guys that have been here who have an opportunity to play a lot of football for us, and I think what you have to do is put them in position to go with the first group at times to see if they can handle it. That's kind of how we'll handle it in the pre-season, too.

"Young guys will play. Veteran guys will play a certain amount of plays this week. I've always done it that way. Certain guys you're going to protect, but at the end of the day we'll make sure that our veteran guys who are going to start for us will have enough time in the pre-season so there will be ready for the opener."

Defensive tackle Ryan Sims  has been running with the second and third strings the past few days. Edwards explained his movement. "He's doing a good job of competing every day. He's realizing that he needs to be a consistent player for us. There are certain things we're asking these guys to do and if they don't do them obviously we're not getting to them and that's important to do.

"But for the most part, any coach is always looking for consistency from his players. I think Ryan is working on that, but he's not working with the first team as much as he was earlier in camp. But he hasn't quit working and that's probably the most important thing: don't quit working. There's no starting roster at this point. You have to understand that. That's what training camp is about: it's about competing."

When one of the media members asked why Sims isn't running with the first team, Edwards retorted. "For the defensive line -- probably at the end of the day when the season kicks off - there are going to be six guys that are running on the first team. You've got to understand that because we're going to rotate these guys. They're not going to play 60 plays. It's impossible for them given what we're asking them to do. We're asking our guys to run. Our defensive line is almost like linebackers. We're asking them to make plays if the ball is anywhere inside the numbers, they've got to go run and pursue and make the play. It's not like you take two steps if you're a defensive lineman and say, 'well you know what, I've done my job.'" That's not true in this defense and this being said, you're talking about 300 pound guys you want to sprint. They're not built to do that so there will be a rotation you'll see when the season starts including six guys and maybe seven."

Edwards assured that Sims play on the second string is not a demotion. "No there's no demotion. When you talk about starters - especially on our defense - you'll realize right away especially with the inside guys like the linemen and the interior guys that they are going to rotate. Now, on the program you've got to list 11 guys, but at the end of the day when you count the reps a lot of those guys will have an equal amount of reps. They're all going to play and that's why it's important for some of our starters to get in shape. We're getting them more reps in practice because in the pre-season games, as you know, they don't play a lot. And, if you don't play your starters a lot they're going to get out of shape."

The third quarterback spot is still in limbo. Regarding quarterback Casey Printers  play Edwards said, "He's doing OK. He practices well and now what he has to do is apply what we're asking him to do in practice on the field. In Minnesota he got a little out of whack but he's a talented guy, got a strong arm, is a knowledgeable kid and wants to learn. It's good to have and as the pre-season goes it'll be fun to watch him cause he's going to make a lot of plays."

The other quarterback vying for the spot is rookie third-round draft pick Brodie Croyle. But Croyle has had a sore shoulder the past week and hasn't practiced much. Edwards said that he's not ready to throw full out yet. "We'll just manage him day to day."

Running back Michael Bennett  still hasn't practiced, and Edwards said that he probably won't play this week still. "Probably next week he'll be in the fray. He'll probably do some individual stuff at most, but not a whole lot. A hamstring (strain) and we're going to baby it; we don't want the guy to come out and tear his hamstring and then it's a real problem."

Bennett is definitely the guy that the Chiefs were looking for in a back-up running back; having him will able the team to expand their playbook. Edwards said, "Yeah, because he's a speed guy who can break the big run. He's different than the guys that we have. We're going to have to put a package in him for when Larry needs a blow. That's understandable. But our main thing is to get our young players caught up right now with what we want to do. He's going to be a guy that's going to have to learn our offense. It's a big playbook."

Some of the key veteran players did not practice this morning. Some of the media questioned why Edwards would give them the morning off since the entire team had yesterday off. Edwards explained, "Because some of them are one-a-day. Some will come back this afternoon. We know who they are and we schedule it that way. We've talked about it. Turley had a (morning) off today but he'll come back this afternoon."

Wide receiver Craphonso Thorpe's  injury has been out of commission for most of Summer Training Camp so far. Edwards said, "He's got a shoulder; he's got to get well. I don't know him because I haven't been here long. He's been a little bit nicked. But Maxy's come back and Hodge, too. That's good and we signed Shane Burton  who was with me in New York at inside tackle. We were down on inside guys and he's got a chance."

One of the big enigmas at camp still is the status of tackle Willie Roaf. Edwards still has hope though. "I haven't talked to him. I know he's out of the country yet. I always say be patient. I was pretty patient with Ty Law  and it all sort of worked out."

As far as rookies go, Edwards has been impressed by a select few. "I think the safeties have kind of shown they've got something to them. I think Jeff Webb  has a lot of potential and some young linebackers who have done a good job. Our first pick will be a pretty good player. He's got a great motor. What we saw in college he shows he can do here, too. We'll see how the season goes.

Edwards also answered questions about the number of interior lineman on the roster. "You've got to create competition and that's how your players get better. I believe that and I think that's how your players get better and your football team gets better, too. They've got to compete; they've got to work every day. No one's making this team on default. I told them that. They're not going to make the team on default.

"At that position we've got some guys nicked. We went into Minnesota with only eight defensive linemen. In the preseason you can't have eight defensive linemen and survive it. We need more guys there and we have some guys who are nicked and that puts all the burden on the guys that are working. You wear those guys out. Our tempo is not going to slow down. And when those new DB's showed up today you had another pair of fresh legs. That's more reps for them and less for the others."

Defensive tackle John Browning  still wasn't at practice today. Edwards says that he will be out for at lest six weeks. Because of this injury, the Chiefs signed defensive tackle Shane Burton. Edwards described the role Burton will play: "Very, very tough guy, smart guy. Plays well with his hands. The year I was with him he had about six batted balls. It was kind of amazing. He does a great job of getting his hands up and knock balls down."

Left tackle Kyle Turley  is definitely making a name for himself. Though he has been out of the NFL for two years Edwards still sees that mean streak. "I don't think that left. When you're mean you're mean. You don't lose that. You got mean grandparents, they're old and they're still mean. I don't think he lost that. He's a tough guy and a mentally tough guy. For a guy who's been out for two years he's doing a good job of working his way back into shape. He's a guy we've got to watch, too, because he's a guy who won't rest and you've got to protect him a little bit."

Don Fowler is a  huge Chiefs fan and is at his second training camp. His wife Bette came along for the ride, from Kearney, Mo. The two arrived last night and since haven’t been able to stop thinking  about how nice the weather is in Wisconsin. When asked about tackle Willie Roaf, Don replied, “I’m  surprised he hasn’t retired before now.” He thinks tackle Kyle Turley is doing a fine job though. With all of the new players  this year, Don wonders how well the team is going to play together: “Look at  the winning teams like the Steelers and  the Patriots; they plug another  player into the lineup and keep on going. We can’t seem to do that.” Hopefully,  everyone will do well under new coach Herm  Edwards.

Chip Bothmann of St. Louis, Mo., is excited about the upcoming  football season. The Chiefs season ticket holder said about Coach Herm Edwards, “He’s awesome. I’m  looking forward to the way he runs practices and to the way he runs the team. I  think it’s going to be a good year.” Being from St. Louis, Bothmann is also a Rams fan. He’s enjoyed watching  previous Rams player tackle Kyle  Turley’s career thus far, and thinks he should be solid for the Chiefs.  Bothmann will be at camp until midweek, enjoying the cool Wisconsin weather.

Jude Davila  from Kansas City  was present at this morning's practice. Davila, who owns his own lifestyle management company called Prime Time Assistants, is currently working with 14 Chiefs players during summer training camp. This is his second season with the Chiefs and enjoys helping the players out by running errands so they can concentrate on football and performing well this season. Some of the duties Davila's company does include cleaning, limo services, hotels and other errands.

When visiting the concession stands during practice, you might find University of Wisconsin-River Falls  senior Erin Fransen. Fransen, who is majoring in field biology, works for Conference Services, which does concession for all of the University's summer camps. This is Fransen's first year working the stand and says that she really enjoys it and finds it fun to talk to fans and see where they are from. Fransen said she has met fans from everywhere including Iowa, Texas, and of course, Kansas City. Fransen also mentioned that business is often steady, but that it was extremely busy on Family Fun Night.

Robert Dewaide and Steve Horacek, from Abbotsford, Wis., attended this morning’s practice  primarily to see Chiefs star running back Larry  Johnson. It is their first time attending the Chiefs Summer Training Camp  and they were ecstatic about being able to see NFL players up so close. Dewaide is a defensive lineman, while Horacek  is a defensive back for the Abbottsford High School football team. Dewaide enjoyed watching the lively and explosive defensive end Tamba Hali go through drills this morning,  while Horacek had his eyes set on cornerback Ty Law.

Hall of Fame quarterback Len Dawson attended this  morning's practice. Dawson does reporting for KNBC, an ABC affiliate out of Kansas City.  He also has been doing the radio broadcasts for Chiefs games for the past 21  years. He arrived in River Falls on Saturday to watch the Family Fun Night practice, and plans on  staying with the team in River Falls until  they depart for Houston, Texas on Friday afternoon. He calls  quarterback Trent Green "a  great one" and has been impressed by what he has seen thus far in his  limited time at the camp. Dawson  refers to the players as "cattle," and doesn't really distinguish one  from the other too much. He wasn't able to see many of the premier players on  the team, as they sat out this morning's practice. "It is normal to see  that in training camp, because it isn't really meant for the big name players,  it is more meant for the guys fighting for a roster spot," said Dawson.

Following an autograph session, the players took Ramer Field, executing one-on-one and position drills to warm-up. After a  set of footwork drills, quarterback Trent Green bowed to a roaring of fans’  applause.

The first team drill of the night focused on using a run  attack in the red zone. Running backs Dee Brown, Derrick Ross, Quentin Griffin and McKenzi Smith all took turns trying to score a  touchdown, but their efforts were to no avail.

In 11-on-11s, the Chiefs once again showed their preference  for the running game. Quarterback Trent  Green led for the first four snaps, handing off the ball to running back Larry Johnson three times and running back Dee Brown once. The crowd applauded Johnson’s ability to break  through all the defenders. Quarterback Damon Huard also took four snaps, working  with Brown, running back Quentin Griffin and running back McKenzi Smith. When  quarterback Casey Printers entered the lineup, the focus  of the game changed. Printers hit wide receiver Jeff Webb on a pass, as  well as running back Derrick Ross for a short pass up the middle. Printers also overthrew a pass intended for  wide receiver Jeris McIntyre.

A day after their scrimmage with the Minnesota  Vikings, the team surprisingly had quite a bit of energy. The defense  seemed to be in better shape than they were before the scrimmage, and appeared  to be making strides for a successful year.

The team started out in individual drills, and then broke into 11-on-11s.  Although the practice was still light contact, safety Bernard Pollard always seemed to be around the ball to get a decent  hit on the receivers. Pollard has been one of the most impressive players in  camp, and looks to be the future starter at the safety position.

The defensive line made some changes and looked at many different player  combinations. Tackle Lional Dalton was back in action after missing the last couple of practices; he played most  of the day in the middle next to Ryan  Sims. The change came when back-up Eric  Hicks played defensive end instead of Tamba  Hali. Hali has had a great camp and is positioned to start at left  defensive end. The Chiefs defense just wanted to get a look at some different  combinations.

So far in camp, the secondary is what everyone is looking towards to be the biggest  improvement on the team. Improvement is definitely in the air, but the  youngsters looking to be back-ups this season are looking very impressive.  Along with Pollard, safety Jarrad Page seems to be wherever the ball is. Usually when there is a play to be made or a  fumble to be recovered, Page is there. Safeties Pollard and Page and cornerback Benny Sapp have been the most  impressive in camp. Sapp will be the Chiefs nickel back, and although he lacks  great size, he has ball-hawking skills, much like Pollard. After a successful  draft and the signing of cornerback Ty  Law, the defensive secondary looks to be one of the deepest units on the  team.

Linebackers Derrick Johnson, Kendrell Bell, and Kawika Mitchell made stops on just about every run play, not allowing  running backs Larry Johnson, Quentin Griffin, and Dee Brown much yardage. Most of the  day’s runs were stuffed up the middle and pushed to the outside where  linebackers were waiting. The great linebacker play should be something Chiefs  fans can be excited about.

Mellissa Dejarlais,  from Anoka, Minn.,  was present for her first Family Fun  Night experience tonight. Dejarlais, who has been a Chiefs fan for several  years now, said that the most exciting parts of the evening were getting to see  her favorite team practice and getting autographs from players such as running  back Larry Johnson and wide receiver Dante Hall. Dejarlais also mentioned  that she enjoyed seeing the skydivers from the Indianhead Sport Parachute Club and listening to speeches from Wisconsin Gov. Jim Doyle and Head Coach Herm Edwards.

Hersh and Ann Bennett traveled to River Falls from Olathe, Kan., for their second year at Family Fun Night. Their favorite part  of the evening was watching the Chiefs practice on the main field at Ramer Field Sports Complex. They  mentioned that they didn’t get any autographs because there were too many  people and too much commotion, but they did enjoy seeing players such as  quarterback Trent Green and wide  receiver Dante Hall.

Ryan Kratochvil from Edina, Minn.,  was excited to be at his very first Chiefs practice in River Falls for Family Fun  Night. Kratochvil enjoyed being able to watch the NFL team up-close and personal, and liked getting autographs from  players including running back Larry  Johnson, which is something that he has never been able to do before.

Jeff Peterson of Haxley, Iowa made his first trip to River Falls for training camp on Wednesday. He really enjoys the other things he gets to do  while he’s up here, including going to the Apple River, Crystal Cave and stuffing himself on cheese  curds from the Cady Cheese Factory.  Peterson made it to Mankato on  Friday to watch the Chiefs practice with the Vikings, and was impressed with what he saw. His favorite player has  always been running back Priest Holmes,  but he also really enjoys running back Larry  Johnson, who he feels has shown great appreciation for his fans since  stepping into the limelight.

Toni and Alex Kreicbergs arrived at Ramer Field Sports Complex on Saturday  at 1 p.m., in hopes of being the first in line to get autographs. They were a  bit disappointed when they found out that their early arrival didn’t really  help because of the Chiefs new autograph policy, which lets everyone onto the  track at the same time. They weren’t too concerned, however, and were in very  good spirits, looking forward to getting autographs from newly acquired  cornerback Ty Law and running back Michael Bennett. The Kreicbergs have  been coming to River Falls for three years and really enjoy going to the Mall of America to do some quilt shopping while they are here. They  have really been impressed with how first-year Head Coach Herm Edwards has run camp thus far; most notably how he randomly  throws situational drills at the team and doesn’t allow anyone to just stand  around.

John Velebir, of Minneapolis, Minn.,  came down to River   Falls with some very  old sports memorabilia to be autographed. Unlike most of the fans who come for  the current players, Velebir is here to get autographs from some former NFL stars and current Chiefs coaches:  wide receivers coach Charlie Joiner,  defensive line coach Tom Krumrie and  Head Coach Herm Edwards. Joiner  starred for a number of teams including the Houston Oilers and the San Diego Chargers. He was later inducted into  the Hall of Fame. Krumrie and was a Pro Bowler for the Cinncinati Bengals and Edwards was a standout with the Philadelphia Eagles. Velebir was able  to get autographs from Joiner on a vintage Oilers banner and was able to shake  Edwards’ hand and have him sign a vintage Eagles banner.

During summer training camp, the Minnesota Vikings call Mankato, Minn., their home. Friday night though, the  Vikings shared the spotlight with the Kansas City Chiefs and practiced in front  of a full-capacity Blakeslee Stadium crowd.

Both teams were seeing action against an opponent for the  first time since the end of the 2005 campaign. The crowd was filled with  emotion, as it was their first chance to see their favorite teams in action  since December.

The Chiefs entered the stadium to a chorus of boo’s, but stayed determined in  their goal of improving. The Viking fans dwelled on the west side bleachers and  the Chiefs’ faithful occupied the east seating.

Following individual team warm-ups, the Chiefs offense and Vikings defense took the practice field  at Minnesota State University-Mankato to work on 7-on-7s, 9-on-9s and position training. The ambience was very  relaxed throughout the entire practice, with players on opposing teams often  patting each other on the back and smiling. Overall the atmosphere was very  friendly and laid-back.

Initially, the team performed 9-on-9s on one end of the  field, while the wide receivers and cornerbacks competed in a position drill on  the other end of the field. Running back Dee Brown and running back McKenzi Smith ran with the first line under quarterback Trent Green. Running back Quentin Griffin and running back Derrick Ross took the majority of the runs under quarterbacks Damon Huard and Casey Printers.

In one-on-one drills wide receiver Dante Hall squared off  against the Vikings’ cornerback Fred Smoot. Smoot was pulling at Hall’s jersey and defending him too  closely, so Hall pivoted across the middle and pulled away for a touchdown.

In 7-on-7s the rookies and free agents seemed to be a little  nervous. Quarterback Trent Green took  the first four snaps completing two passes: one five-yard pass to fullback Ronnie Cruz, and another to wide receiver Samie Parker. Under  quarterback Damon Huard, some of the  rookies and free agents took the field, dropping three passes in a row. Wide  receiver Nate Curry, wide receiver Darrell Hill and Cruz all let passes slip  through their hands. Huard then completed passes to tight end Robert Docherty and Parker. Parker made two amazing catches in this  series, showing off his confidence and athleticism.

Quarterback Casey  Printers also displayed a show of nervousness throwing 1-7 in the first part  of 7-on-7s. He overthrew three passes to wide receiver Nate Curry and didn’t connect with wide receiver Darrell Hill on two plays, but finally  hit running back Quentin Griffin with a short pass up the left side.

In more 7-on-7 action, Green went 6-6 on pass completions.  Wide receiver Eddie Kennison, wide receiver Jeris McIntyre, running back Dee  Brown, running back McKenzi Smith and Parker all tallied completions. Parker made another spectacular catch  between three Vikings defenders.  Huard was 5-6 in this series. He threw a solid pass to fullback J.R. Niklos, who used his agility to  create a clear-out pattern between the defenders. Tight end Jason Dunn made one catch up the middle, but the tendency of the offense  seemed to be going toward the left side of the field. Tight end Kris Wilson and Curry also both connected with Huard.

After the horn sounded, the Chiefs offense and Vikings defense journeyed over to the  stadium to all-out play each other. Quarterback Damon Huard took eight snaps, but the main focus of the Chiefs  offense was on the running attack. Running back Dee Brown and running back McKenzi  Smith both ran the ball twice. Brown also registered two receptions, wide  receiver Samie Parker caught one  pass and fullback Ronnie Cruz caught  the other. No deep passes were thrown.

Quarterback Casey  Printers also took eight snaps during play. Running back Quentin Griffin led the running attack  with three carries, while running back Derrick Ross made one. Printers attempted two passes: one to fullback J.R. Niklos and one to wide receiver Kyle Brown, but neither was completed.  Printers experienced a lot of pressure from the Vikings defense; he had to run  the ball up the sideline once and also got sacked.

Before the practice got underway, the Chiefs’ coaches and players went to the  practice field to run individual drills, while the Vikings used the main field.  After a 45 minute session, the Chiefs defense went to the main field to play  against the Viking offense. The Chiefs offense stayed put, waiting for the  Vikings defense to join them on the practice field.

The Chief defense looked stellar on some plays and on others they would self  destruct. Their run defense was solid, as it was most of last year as the  speedy linebacker crew was able to break the line of scrimmage and tackle  Viking running backs for losses. Outside linebacker Derrick Johnson was once again impressive, proving that he was  worth the Chiefs first round draft choice in 2005. Johnson was able to scorch  his way to the sidelines, making stops on Viking running backs Mewelde Moore and Ciatrick Fason.

Surprisingly, the Achilles heal of the defense still appeared to be the  secondary. Speedy Viking receivers Koren  Robinson and Travis Taylor were  able to out-duel their Chief cornerback counterparts and break down the field  for huge gains. The acquisition of Ty Law to solidify the cornerback position did not appear to pay off this night. The  issue could be simply related to poor pressure by the defensive line and the  secondary still adjusting to a cover-2 scheme.

Recently injured defensive tackle Lional  Dalton was in uniform for the Chiefs, but saw limited action. Defensive  tackles Ryan Sims and James Reed occupied the middle of the  line, aided by ends Tamba Hali and Jared Allen. The defense went to the  sidelines after their first stint on the field.

Back-up veteran defensive end Eric Hicks called the doctor over to look at a cut in his mouth.  Following the diagnoses, Hicks took several swigs out of a Gatorade bottle and spit out several streams of watered down blood.  The problem seemed to be minor and Hicks got back out on the field.

Rookie safety Bernard  Pollard showed why he was the Chiefs’ second round pick, as he was not  afraid to run up on receivers and make plays. Several incomplete passes thrown  by the Viking quarterbacks could be blamed on the savvy ball-hawking skills of  the impressive Purdue alum.

Defenders from both teams looked antsy to make a big hit and  put a player into the ground, but that emotion was kept at bay. The biggest hit  of the day came from cornerback Jerald  Brown on a ball thrown to the flat. The hit was heard around the stadium  and highlighted a day of soft contact.

After a hard fought day at practice, both teams appeared to come out better and  injury free. With that in mind, the practice should be considered a successful  venture for the Super Bowl hopeful  Chiefs.

Susan Frary, from Waukesha, Wis.,  was present at the Chiefs/Vikings practice in Mankato, Minn. this evening.  This is her second year at camp. She enjoys it because she meets new people and  makes friends with fans. Frary thinks of all Chiefs fans as one big family  unit, and enjoys seeing them each year. Frary was excited to get her picture  taken with quarterback Trent Green in River Falls, and an autograph  from offensive lineman Will Shields.

Rachele Brownfield from Mankato, Minn.,  and her son Jeremiah, 3, are huge  Chiefs fans. This is their first time seeing the Chiefs at training camp, and  they are having fun meeting new people and making new friends with fellow  Chiefs fans.

Sean and Danielle Garneau traveled all the way  from Mechanic Falls, Maine, to see  their favorite NFL team at training  camp this summer. This is their second year at camp, and they are having a  great time meeting new people and making new friends. Danielle was excited to  mention that she had her photograph taken with defensive end Jarred Allen. She also mentioned that  it is neat to see the same fans return to River  Falls each summer for camp.

Michael Thede, 13,  who was wearing running back Priest  Holmes’ number, has been a Chiefs fan for the last few years. This may not  seem that uncommon at a Chiefs/Vikings practice,  but when you’re from Mankato, Minn., home of the Vikings training camp,  people expect you to be a Vikings fan. Thede’s friends give him a lot of flak  for his love of the Chiefs. He likes coming to the joint practice to see the  players up-close and try to get autographs. He is disappointed about not seeing  Holmes on the team, but likes that the Chiefs picked up running back Michael Bennett.

Joe Cahoj, from Olathe, Kan.,  made the trip to Mankato, Minn., from River Falls, where he has been watching the Chiefs  since last Tuesday. It is his first time coming to training camp in River Falls, and he’s having a splendid time. He  says that so far the Minnesota Vikings fans in Mankato  are being pretty respectful of the vastly outnumbered Chiefs devotees. He has  heard “Chiefs suck” a few times, but realizes its all part of being a football  fan on another teams’ home turf.

Mike Raynor, from Lake of the Ozarks, Mo., is  having a great time at the Chiefs/Vikings practice in Mankato, Minn. Proudly representing his Chiefs in the midst of an ocean of Vikings  fans, Raynor doesn’t mind and wouldn’t trade the moment for anything. He loves  the chance to go on vacation in the north woods for a week to watch his Chiefs  get ready for the big season. He hopes the Chiefs continue to make River  Falls their summer home for years to come.

Much like this morning’s practice, the skies were clear and  the sun was shining this afternoon. It was a bit hotter at 86 degrees, but the  humidity was low at 33 percent, which made it more comfortable. There was also  a nice breeze coming from the WNW at 8 mph. The 420 fans seemed much more  at ease than earlier this week with the 100 degree weather.

Croyle said that Green may have been annoyed by Croyle’s  many questions after practices, but now Green tutors him on the highlights and  the lowlights of Croyle’s performances and is teaching him the tricks of the  trade.

This afternoon at practice wide receiver Scott McCready was on the field with a sling on his right arm. Wide  receiver Eddie Kennison, tight end Tony Gonzalez and running back Larry Johnson did not practice, but were on the sidelines. Also, during  the middle of practice, wide receiver Chris Hannon had his groin wrapped by an  athletic trainer.

In 7-on-7s this afternoon, the squad concentrated on its  passing game. Only one running attack was executed. Quarterback Trent Green completed 6-7 pass attempts  and threw one interception to linebacker Kawika Mitchell. In this series, Green  connected with six different teammates for completions. Wide receiver Jeris McIntyre, wide receiver Dante Hall, wide receiver Samie Parker, tight end Jason Dunn, tight end Kris Wilson and running  back Dee Brown all registered receptions. Green’s lone interception was  intended for Wilson.

Quarterback Damon Huard completed an impressive 6-6  passes in 7-on-7s. Most of his passes were mid-range distance with a receiver  cutting up the middle. Huard also connected with six different receivers.  Initially, Huard hit wide receiver Darrell Hill and then followed with two  completions to wide receiver Kyle Brown and running back Derrick Ross. Also, Huard completed passes to running back Quentin Griffin, tight end Adam Johnson and wide receiver Jeris  McIntyre.

The majority of 11-on-11s focused on the running game.  Running back Dee Brown and running back McKenzi Smith spilt time in with the  first string, while running back Quentin Griffin and running back Derrick Ross  led the running attack for the second and third string units.

The highlight of the day was when quarterback Trent Green threw a pass in 11-on-11  drills that was intercepted in the end zone by middle linebacker Kawika Mitchell. Mitchell then took the  interception out of the end zone for a short gain. Head Coach Herm Edwards yelled in disgust and told  Mitchell to kneel on the ball next time.

Linebacker Boomer  Grigsby impressed the coaching staff with his strong effort and great speed  from sideline to sideline. Grigsby was able to make some hits to force short  gains and was praised verbally by the linebacker corp.

Defensive line coach Tim  Krumrie talked after practice about how he wants to mold the defensive  front. “I’m focusing straight on fundamentals, effort, and playing fast. The  more consistent they can be, playing fast to the ball, all that stuff will play  out,” said the coach.

Pat and Donna  Quinn of Pratt, Kan., are at camp for the first time. As Pat would put it, they are here to “see  something different, do something different and relax.” Pat wonders what the  offense is going to be like: tackle Willie Roaf’s shoes will be hard to fill.  He does, however, think that Coach Herm  Edwards brings energy and work ethics to the team, which will be sure to  get everyone going. Pat, who has been a Chiefs fan since birth, gives kudos to the River Falls community for making everyone feel welcome.

At the afternoon practice today were huge Chiefs fans Marc Barthel and Brent Moyor from Columbia, Mo., and Brad Rushton, from Lincoln, Neb., who are in  their fourth year of coming to training camp in River Falls. Barthel, Moyer and Rushton say they enjoy coming to  camp because they are season ticket holders and like to check out the team for  the upcoming season. They would also like to see an improvement in the defense,  and will be watching players including cornerback Ty Law and defensive end Tamba  Hali. They all like new Head Coach Herm  Edwards because he is involved with practices and has a high intensity.  They are looking forward to seeing Edwards coach tomorrow at practice with the Vikings in Mankato, Minn. This will be  their second year seeing the Chiefs in Mankato and are looking forward to Family Fun Night on Saturday.

Mona and Dave Dykhouse were at afternoon  practice today. The Dykhouses, who are from Brookings, S.D.,  are spending their 14th year at training camp. The Dykhouses enjoy coming to  camp to see players up-close and personal. They also like to see changes that  occur each year with the player lineup, coaches and the way the team practices.  The Dykhouses have been watching the defensive line this summer and are excited  to see safety Scott Connot, who  played at South Dakota State, on the  practice field.

Tom Lebeau, of Batesville, Ind.,  has been coming to Chiefs practices for about 12 years now. He is usually in  the Twin Cities area this time of  year for business, so when he gets a chance, he likes to stop by River Falls to see his favorite NFL team. His home is just a few hours  from Cincinnati and Indianapolis, so he gets a lot of opposing fans in his neighborhood. The first  football game he had ever seen was between Chicago and Kansas    City at Old  Municipal Stadium. Ever since he has been a dedicated fan of the Chiefs. He  likes Coach Herm Edwards’ great  leadership qualities, but questions his clock management skills. Lebeau  believes this year will come down to one word: tackles, both offensively and  defensively. Last year they had trouble tackling on defense and this year they  have problems on offense because of the retirement of left tackle Willie Roaf. Lebeau believes that if  the Chiefs can get past those hurdles they will have a good year and will wind  up in the playoffs.

Nate Rasmussen was at this afternoon’s practice with his son Aaron, 6. Not very big Chiefs fans, they come to the camp because  it is literally right in their backyard. They live right behind Ramer Field Sports Complex in River Falls, so it makes for some nice  evening entertainment, involving little or no effort on their part. The Rasmussens  like the fact that they can watch the Chiefs on national television later in  the year, then brag that the team practiced in their backyard.

Andrew Johnson, a Comcast employee, was working in the  neighborhood when he happened to drive by Ramer Field and notice the Chiefs  practicing. From Rice Lake, Wis., Johnson hasn’t been to the Chiefs  practice since he was a kid. He remembers that last time he came he got the  autograph of Hall of Fame quarterback Joe Montana.

Today's practice took place on the main field at Ramer Field Sports Complex. There were almost 450 fans in the stands as the players practiced under the hot sun. Today’s weather was the best River Falls has had since camp opened.  It was 75 degrees with 66 percent humidity and winds were coming from the WNW  at 4 mph. Not a cloud was in the sky; the fans loved it.

Today is the first time that Bennett has opened his  playbook, so he is uncertain of his role as of now. “Right now I don’t know. My  thing is just to come in here and get the offense. Again, it’s a lot of  different terminology that I haven’t heard, so I have to get used to it, and  just come in and give it all I’ve got. Wherever they feel my place is they will  put me.” It will take him about three to five days to just learn the basic  material.

In the initial team drill, the Chiefs set up in a 9-on-9 set  with no wide receivers or cornerbacks. The offense worked on the running  game, with running back Larry Johnson carrying the ball three times, and  running backs Dee Brown, Derrick Ross and McKenzi Smith all carrying the ball two times. Running back Quentin Griffin made one running attack.

Quarterback Trent Green only took snaps in 7-on-7s  this morning. Green was 9-11 on pass completions. His first completion was to  running back Larry Johnson up the  middle of field, and Green’s next two pass completions were caught by fullback Ronnie Cruz. Green connected with Johnson on two more shotgun passes, and  also hit wide receiver Dante Hall on the left side of the field.  Wide receiver Jeris McIntyre and fullback J.R. Niklos also tallied receptions. Green also threw a 20-yard pass to  tight end Tony Gonzalez in the red zone.

Also in 11-on-11s, quarterback Casey Printers was 0-3  in pass completions, throwing one interception. He threw one too deep for wide  receiver Jeff Webb and another too low for wide receiver Darrell Hill. The  majority of the drill was spent on the running game, though. Each running back  had an opportunity to carry the ball two times. Johnson had two explosive  attacks to the right side.

The offense left the main field to use a practice field while the defense stayed on the main field. Normal individual drills were run at high intensity as defensive coaches prepared the team for the practice against the Vikings on Friday.

The defensive line, still minus tackle Lional Dalton, ran drills with tackling dummies with Coach  Tim Krumrie. Krumrie would be waiting at the end of the tackling dummies and fumble the football for the players to recover. Most players did the drill no problem but some had issues on the recovery process. Krumrie often yelled, "Don't roll!" This would mean the players should jump onto the ball and not roll onto it.

Most of the 7-on-7 drills focused on the nickel formation - two linebackers and five defensive backs. Linebackers made stop after stop, not allowing receivers into the secondary. Linebacker Kendrell Bell  made quite a few tackles on passes thrown to the flats, showing his immense speed from the position.

Following practice, Head Coach Herm Edwards  talked about the upcoming practice with the Minnesota Vikings  and the scuffles that have happened in the past. "Players don't get graded on whether they push another guy or hit a guy late. Players are going to get graded on how they perform on both sides of the football. I'm sure (Viking Coach) Brad (Childress)  has told his team the same thing I am going to tell my team. Our conduct is very important. When we go compete, we still have to show good sportsmanship."

Jerry Bowman  and Marge Owens  traveled from Kansas City  to River Falls  to witness their first ever Chiefs' training camp. Bowman and Owens are having a great time watching their favorite players including wide receiver Dante Hall, quarterback Trent Green  and guard Will Shields. So far, Bowman and Owens like and respect new Head Coach Herm Edwards  and feel that he is more stern and strict than former Coach Dick Vermeil. Bowman and Owens are also looking forward to seeing the Chiefs make it to the playoffs this season.

Darla Beckmann, from Grantsber, Wis.,  and Karla Smith, from Grandsville, Wis., were watching the Chiefs practice today. They stood next to a fence to get a closer look. Beckmann and Smith have known each other since 1992, when they met at the Chiefs second year of camp in River Falls. They both enjoy watching the NFL  team practice and seeing the rookies, as well as taking photographs and getting autographs. Beckmann and Smith enjoy watching their favorite players including linebacker Boomer Grigsby, safety Greg Wesley, and quarterback Trent Green.

A beautiful afternoon brought attendance to a  camp high of 450 fans. The constant rain the last couple of days helped cool down  the horrendous heat wave that the camp has been enduring since it opened last  Friday. The clouds disappeared late this morning and the sun came out, making  for a very comfortable afternoon practice for players, coaches and fans. By  practice time it was mostly sunny and 80 degrees with a relatively low humidity  of 54 percent. There was also a very nice breeze coming from the NNE at 5 mph.

Tight end Tony Gonzalez spoke with the media after  today’s practice about his contract and the progress of some of his teammates.  When asked if he had negotiated contract terms yet, Gonzalez replied, “Is there  a smile on my face? No, not yet. We’ve talked about it, and I’m hoping to get it  done in a couple weeks.” Though Gonzalez is not worried about the contract  getting completed, he is thinking  about it.

Cornerback Julian  Battle had his share of good and bad plays throughout the day. The fourth  year corner out of Tennessee was  able to make a great break on a deep ball thrown by quarterback Damon Huard and nearly made an interception  along the sidelines. Later in practice defensive back coach David Gibbs yelled at Battle for not back-pedaling far enough.

Linebacker Keyaron  Fox got into a wrestling match with wide receiver Nate Curry over a ball following a reception by Curry. The two  rolled around on the ground until Fox finally gave Curry the victory.

Head Coach Herm Edwards spoke after  practice. The focus of questions was on the recent trade that brought Saints running back Michael Bennett to the Chiefs in  exchange for a fourth round draft pick.

Bennett, a graduate from the University  of Wisconsin-Madison, played several years for the Minnesota Vikings before being traded to the Saints this past  off-season. Bennett played solid for the Vikings, even making the Pro Bowl in 2002 after rushing for over  1,200 yards. Bennett was considered to be expendable by the Saints after they  signed first round pick running back Reggie  Bush. Bennett will reunite with his Viking teammates when the Chiefs visit  the Vikings in Mankato on Friday.

In a goal line drill, quarterback Trent Green was 0-1, just  missing tight end Tony Gonzalez in the end zone. In this series, running back  Larry Johnson carried twice, bringing one in for a touchdown.

Quarterback Trent  Green and offensive lineman Kyle  Turley were at the rail before practice got underway, signing autographs  and taking pictures with fans. One young fan yelled out, “Trent you’re my idol.” Green than gave the  kid a high five and took a picture with him.

Rob Vroman of Sioux Falls, S.D.,  made the trip to River Falls for his third straight year. He brought his son, Chris, 10 and his niece, Mallory  Wencil, 12. Chris brought his football to this afternoon’s practice, which  has been signed by over 20 Chiefs players. The only signature missing was Green’s. Even though no autograph  session was scheduled, Chris was smart enough to bring his ball and it sure  paid off. Green came over about 10 minutes before practice got underway and  started signing autographs. Chris was at the right place at the right time and  finally got the coveted signature. “It was awesome,” said Chris.

Rob, originally from Kansas City, is a season ticket holder at Arrowhead Stadium, and makes the 6-hour  trip from Sioux   Falls to Kansas City whenever the Chiefs play at home. He  says that he will miss the high-octane offense that Chiefs fans have become so  accustomed to in recent years, but he says he is a defensive guy at heart and  will sacrifice less points for more wins. You know what they say, high scoring  offenses are exciting but the defense wins championships.

Also in attendance was former UW-River Falls graduate and sports information employee John  Sortedahl. Sortedahl covered hockey, football and golf, but was unable to  cover the Chiefs because he graduated three years before the team began coming  to River Falls.

Patricia and Julie Gerstberger, from Rib Lake, Wis., arrived in River Falls on Sunday for their 14th  year at summer training camp. The Gerstbergers are huge Chiefs fans and enjoy  visiting River Falls each summer because they’ve found it  to be a really nice area. Julie mentioned that she enjoys seeing the players at  camp each year, especially her favorite player, quarterback Trent Green.

Ben Hansen, 7,  from Stillwater, Minn.,  and his cousin Alec McCrae, 7, from Vermont,  were having fun hiding in the shade on the main field bleachers during  afternoon practice today. Hansen and McCrae are huge Chiefs fans and are enjoying  their first time at training camp. Both Hansen and McCrae like watching the  team practice, and are excited to see their favorite players quarterback Trent Green and running back Larry Johnson.

Steve Hopkins of Kansas    City, likes  to get the bird’s-eye view by standing on top of the main field’s bleachers.  There is a nice breeze, you have a great view of the practice fields and it  isn’t crowded. Hopkins’  son, Nate, 16, enjoys standing  closer to the players so he can take pictures. Hopkins, a high school football coach and  history teacher, likes taking notes on how the staff run practice. He  commented, “I like seeing what drills they run and what individual and team  things they’re doing.” Hopkins also thinks it’s  great that there are such wonderful facilities on the UW-River Falls campus for the Chiefs to use.

Spasimir Bodurski is  a UW-River Falls student and football player who enjoys watching special teams the  most. Bodurski follows the Chiefs throughout the season as much as he can.  Being a kicker himself, his favorite player is kicker Lawrence Tynes. He is also very impressed by  punter Dustin Colquitt’s abilities.  Bodurski likes Coach Herm Edwards, and  said that he thinks practices are more intense this year because of Edwards’  energy.

After practice today, offensive tackles Jeremy Parquet, Jordan Black and Kevin Sampson were on the field practicing blocking and pass block techniques for 20 minutes  before heading into Hunt Arena with  the rest of the team.

Peterson said that Bennett will upgrade the quality and depth of the football team. "As a former No. 1 draft choice he brings quality and experience to the Chiefs and he is still a young running back. Michael has had a 1,000-yard rushing season and has been to a Pro Bowl. He will be utilized to back up Larry Johnson  and be involved in our group of running backs as soon as he arrives in camp."

Peterson said that running back Priest Holmes  is still on physically unable to perform list. Holmes visited the doctor last week and has still not been cleared for contact. If Holmes does recover from his injury in time for the season, Peterson said that Holmes will be welcomed back to the Chiefs.

Peterson also discussed the status of tackle Willie Roaf, whose retirement was announced on Saturday. Peterson said that he is scheduled to meet with Roaf's agent this week and he is leaving the door open for his return at any time.

It’s about time! Last night’s cool front made for a fresh 77  degree afternoon, although humidity levels were at 87 percent. The fields were  wet and some of the areas around the perimeter were flooded. There was a light  breeze coming from the WSW at 4mph. The sun peaked for about four minutes, but  the clouds prevailed, and will probably be present throughout the evening. Although it was raining, there were 280 fans in attendance.

The second drill of the day was 7-on-7's. Quarterback Trent Green  took the majority of the snaps, going 12-17 and throwing two interceptions. Wide receiver Dante Hall  caught a 10-yard pass from Green to commence the drill. Green then overshot a 50-yard pass to wide receiver Eddie Kennison  in the end zone. Wide receiver Jeris McIntyre  tallied a reception right before Green threw an interception by cornerback Benny Sapp. Green then redeemed himself. He completed two passes to wide receiver Sammie Parker  and two passes to tight end Kris Wilson; the last reception went for a touchdown. Green also connected with wide receiver Dante Hall  on a touchdown pass prior to being intercepted for the second time by safety Jarrad Page. Green completed two more passes to Hall, one to Parker and threw a touchdown to tight end Tony Gonzalez. Gonzalez made a diving catch in the end zone.

During the same drill, quarterback Damon Huard  was perfect, completing 7-7 pass attempts. He threw two touchdowns--one to tight end Tony Gonzalez  and one to wide receiver Nate Curry. Huard also connected with running back Dee Brown, running back Derrick Ross  and wide receiver Jeff Webb. Both of Curry's receptions showed off his athletic ability; during his first catch, he soared through the air and the second reception was a diving grab.

During a two minute drill, quarterback Trent Green  regained his composure and completed 4-5 passes. The lone incompletion to wide receiver Sammie Parker  slipped off of Parker's fingers and sailed out of bounds. Otherwise, Green connected with wide receiver Dante Hall  twice and Parker twice. Quarterback Damon Huard  was 1-1, but threw an interception by safety Jarrad Page. Quarterback Casey Printers  took the final snaps. Printers completed 3-4 passes. He connected with wide receiver Jeris McIntyre  and made a touchdown pass to wide receiver Kyle Brown. Brown snatched the ball in the middle of four defenders, and the crowd erupted in applause.

Coach Herm Edwards  discussed how effective the players were on the slick fields today. "We got a practice in and the field held up pretty good. The players didn't slip and slide around. It took us a while to get started early on, but then we got going. I thought it was pretty good work under the conditions of the field being slippery. We ran about 75-80 plays."

Edwards explained that the fifth day of practice usually warrants soreness for his players, so he didn't want to practice on slippery fields twice in one day, hoping to prevent any unnecessary injuries. Instead of practicing in the morning, the team had a special teams walk-thru session inside the Knowles Building and attended classroom instruction.

"I like inconvenience," said Edwards. "When you play road games it's all about inconvenience. You don't have the best of locker rooms, sometimes the plane might be a little bit late or the bus might forget to pick you up. When it's going too smooth I get nervous. I have to do something to create some inconvenience." Though playing in the rain is not always pleasant, Edwards said, "We are going to play outside. Most of our games are outside, so the conditions are going to be bad at times."

Coaches structure their schedule around practice times and field availability, but Edwards also builds his "practice schedules on how the players are practicing," so the rain didn't hinder his plans too much.

The practice with the Minnesota Vikings is coming up on Friday. Edwards was asked about the value of the upcoming practice. "For our young guys, they see a different color jersey. It will be interesting--especially for the rookies. Some of the simplest things they think they know, they forget. It creates a good mode of competition. I look at it as a road game for us. The main value is to create some inconvenience and to create some competition within our football team."

Because of his strength, tackle Will Svitek  has been moved to the right side. Edwards says that he wants his most powerful tackle on the right. "He's always giving the last shove, or a little push, he's always giving someone 'the business'."

Matt Nikolay,  a field representative of the US Sen. for Russ Feingold, D-Wis., was a special guest of UW-River Falls Chancellor Don Betz at this morning's indoor practice. Nikolay watched the special teams go  through a walk-through in their street clothes. He thought it was humorous that  one of the players was still wearing his backpack during the practice.

Larry Johnson Sr.,  the father of star running back Larry  Johnson, was at this afternoon’s practice and received a lot of attention  from both the media and the fans. As Johnson and a colleague were leaving the  fields, kids were yelling “LJ, LJ.” Johnson, the current defensive line coach  at Penn State University was kind enough to stop and sign some memorabilia for the youngsters.

Special teams coach Mike  Priefer has been giving punter Dustin Colquitt a lot of one-on-one  attention during practices this week. At just about every practice the two are  seen with long snapper Kendall Gammon, going through technique drills and trying to perfect the long-snapper to punter  exchange of the football.

Practice fields were left uncovered during Monday night’s  storm in order to give the dry grass a little refreshment. The strategy worked,  but the field was holding quite a bit of water come Tuesday morning.

The practices this season seem to be much more sporadic  compared to previous years. Edwards  tends to switch around the order periodically which allows players to stay  fresh. Most individual drills are ran  with no contact, when in previous seasons, under Coaches Marty Schottenheimer, Gunther  Cunningham, and Dick Vermeil, players  ran full contact drills.

Defensive end Carlos Hall was back  in pads after sitting out Monday. The majority of the time he played with the  second unit defensive line. Rookie left end Tamba Hali was still absent; end Eric Hicks was his replacement.

Green seemed a little aggravated for most of practice, as most of his throws  were batted down or intercepted. Cornerback Benny Sapp broke up one of Green’s intended passes to wide receiver Dante Hall in the end zone.

The defense looked impressive as they made quick stops on run plays and created  incomplete passes all over the field. Linebacker Rich Scanlon was able to get his paws on a Green pass attempt and  tip the ball to safety Jarrad Page for the interception.

After  practice, defensive end Clint Mitchell, defensive tackle James Reed and defensive tackle Arrion  Dixon were working with two coaches on pass drops. Regardless of the rain,  the players were practicing their footwork, to improve on pass protection, for  15 minutes.

Roger Hulne has  come to training camp for two years now. His son, Rocky, used to be an intern with the Public Affairs Office at UW-River  Falls, working for the Chiefs. Hulne’s interest in the football team began  then. He’s a big fan of football and enjoys watching many teams. Being from Prescott, Wis., it isn’t that long of a drive for  him. He thought he should stop by with his other son R.J., 11, and check the Chiefs out at least one day this summer.

Nick  Asmus, currently of River Falls, has been waiting for a nice day to  scope out the Chiefs. Although it was raining this afternoon, it wasn’t more than 90  degrees like it has been the last week. Asmus was present when the Chiefs  arrived in town last Thursday, but hasn’t been to camp before today. “It’s just fun  to see an NFL team up close. They  look better this year, as opposed to last,” said Asmus of the Chiefs. He plans on having his parents join him for a practice sometime soon.

Warren and Donna Levasseur, from Minnetonka, Minn., were present  at the afternoon practice. The Levasseurs, who are actually Vikings fans, came to camp to see what  the experience was like. While they are not big Chiefs fans, the Levasseurs  like Head Coach Herm Edwards, and  said that the team has great fans and an excellent offense. Warren also mentioned that he likes Arrowhead Stadium and can appreciate  that each game sells out.

Previous UW-River  Falls Chiefs summer camp intern Kevin  Thornton made it to the afternoon practice today. Thornton, from Hudson, Wis., was a marketing intern  for the Public Affairs office in  1996. Thornton  mentioned that when he interned, it was the first summer that the events Kids’ Day and Seniors’ Day occurred. There are a few differences, Thornton noticed, between  how practices are run now, and how they were run when he was an intern. Coach Herm Edwards has the players hitting  more, something that former Coach Marty  Schottenheimer did not do. Thornton  mentioned that when he interned he liked being creative, and coming up with new  ideas. He also said it was an excellent experience.

Frank Sheble and  his grandchildren were watching the Chiefs players perform footwork drills.  Sheble said to his grandson, “See, even in the NFL they practice footwork.” One thing about Head Coach Herm Edwards is that he stresses to his  players the basics of football; the fans have really taken notice of it and  like it.

Determining where in the stands you will see the most action  is tough for fans this year. Coach Herm Edwards’  drills are quick, and he has players constantly moving around the field, making  it tough for fans to stay in one spot. Just when you’re getting comfortable the  whistle blows and the players move to the other side. Dillon Magers of New Summit,  Mo., got a front row view of tight end Tony  Gonzalez’ spectacular end zone catch. With a full extension, Gonzalez was  able to stretch and jump over safety Greg  Wesley, and haul in quarterback Trent  Green’s perfectly placed pass for the end zone grab.

A much welcome cool front drove through the area overnight. The good news was that the temperature moderated and it was 81 degrees at 10:45 a.m., when the Chiefs started practice. The tough news was that with the rain, practice was moved indoors and fans and media were not allowed to watch the one hour workout that was held in the Robert P. Knowles Physical Education Building.

The temperature at the start of practice was at the magical 100 degree mark. The 195 fans in attendance were relieved by 18-30 mph winds from the SSW. It was clear bright skies this afternoon, while the humidity was at 38 percent and the dew point was a warm 70 degrees.

The temperature stayed high going into the afternoon  practice, and so did the players’ energy. Coach Herm Edwards did not make players wear full pads, which definitely aided  in the effort against dehydration.

Individual drills were ran the same as they were in the morning. Cornerback Lenny Walls was still sidelined, and end Tamba Hali was still in New Jersey squaring away his citizenship. End Carlos  Hall, who was not suited up, worked out with the physically unable to  perform group. Coach Herm Edwards was not available for comment after practice.

Full team drills and 7-on-7s finished out practice. The lone defensive highlight was a botched  handoff that was recovered by linebacker Nick  Reid. Reid has been a fan favorite  so far at camp because of his roots at the University of Kansas. He is also recognized for his hard work and  wavy blonde fro.

Receiving the least number of pass attempts in the  drill, quarterback Brodie Croyle completed 2-3. He connected with running back De Arrius Howard on a 10-yard pass, and with  tight end Adam Johnson on a play out of the shotgun. Croyle’s final attempt slipped  through the hands of wide receiver Kyle Brown.

Being a center for his 9th grade football team, Dylan Young, of Tonganoxie, Kan., likes to see how different the  practices are from the way his high school team does things. Dylan’s dad has  season tickets for the Chiefs, so he gets to make it to quite a few games each  year, but had never been to a training camp before today. “There are a lot of  news’ crews up here,” Young said of the many Kansas City media who come to camp.

Keith Young of Basehor, Kan., has come to the camp two year in a  row. After watching most of today’s practice, Young could already tell that  camp was much more intense. “They look like they’re working a little harder,  and it’s a bit more organized,” noted Young. He thinks Coach Herm Edwards is a good edition to the  staff.

Ron Thies, of Olatha, Kan., made the trip up to River Falls with his wife, Carol, last night.  They drove their Lincoln Navigator, which Ron likes to call “the beast,” and were ecstatic about making it here on  only one tank of gas. Ron said the trip was around 480 miles and they were able  to average 20 mpg with “the beast.” The couple has been coming to training camp  for 12 years, and this year they will be celebrating their 39th wedding anniversary during camp, on Aug. 6. Besides  going to two practices a day, the couple loves to drive around the St.Croix River Valley and go antique  shopping.

The most decked out Chiefs fan in  attendance was Howard McHenry, of Greenfield, Wis. Everything  from his hat and sunglasses to his shoes and socks were covered with the Chiefs’  logo. His most notable possession was a Chiefs jacket that had over 100 player’s  signatures on it. The first one to sign was former Chief, defensive back Kevin Ross, back in 1995. McHenry was  an expert on every current and former Chiefs player. “I know my team; this is  what I do,” said McHenry. He predicts an 11-5 season from the Chiefs and  believes that final scores of games will be much lower with Head Coach Herm Edwards’ emphasis on strong  defense. He calls Edwards the “x-factor” that Chiefs fans will learn to love,  and players will love because of the success they will enjoy under his  tutelage. McHenry sticks out like a sore thumb being a Chiefs fan in Green Bay Packers territory, but he  doesn’t mind, it just adds more fuel to his fire. To further his devotion to  the Chiefs, McHenry is a season ticket holder at Arrowhead Stadium, which makes for a lot of traveling from Greenfield to Kansas City. McHenry  doesn’t mind: anything for his beloved Chiefs.

Frank Sheble, from Basehor, Kan.,  is in River Falls this summer for  his second year at the Chiefs training camp. Sheble’s grandson, T.J., 14, from Olathe, Kan., came with to  experience his first time at camp. Frank, a lifelong fan of the Chiefs,  mentioned that the differences between this year’s camp and last year’s are  that the players are moving faster and are hitting, which they didn’t do last  year. Frank and T.J. like all of the players and do not have favorites. They  also really like the way new Head Coach Herm  Edwards is handling the team.

Dave and Kay Pierson traveled from Northern Kansas City to partake in the camp for their first time. The Piersons are having a great  time and are huge Chiefs fans. Some of their favorite players are running back Larry Johnson, defensive end Eric Hicks and cornerback Ty Law. The Piersons have found the  entire camp experience to be very interesting, and mentioned that they like  Coach Herm Edwards because of his discipline.

After the late practice fans received a brief  surprise autograph session by kicker Lawrence  Tynes and punter Dustin Colquitt.  This was unusual being that there was no scheduled autograph session, but fans  were elated to see the team’s punter and kicker up close for photos and  signatures.

"Probably the hardest part of practice for our defense is getting through individuals," said Head Coach Herm Edwards. "If you just take a look at the individual period, it's 20 minutes, if they can make it through that they can make it through practice."

Absent from practice today was rookie defensive end Tamba Hali. Hali was excused to fly back to the East Coast  to sign papers to become a United States  citizen. "He (Hali) had to go to New Jersey, he's going to be a citizen. He was excited about that," said Coach Herm Edwards  with a smile. "I just told him congratulations, enjoy it."

Cornerback Lenny Walls  was also still sitting out practice with a hamstring injury. Coach Herm Edwards  guessed that Walls would be back sometime next week. With Walls' injury, corner Benny Sapp  has been getting large amounts of playing time and is not wasting anytime impressing the coaching staff.

The team moved onto running drills where linemen were instructed to break through the offensive line to hit the ball carrier. Tackle James Reed  showed his motor by breaking through the line with ease on multiple occasions, gaining compliments from Coach Tim Krumrie the whole way.

Intensity was mounting as players began getting in each other's faces and showing emotion aside from their normal grunts. Defensive end Zach Ville  jawed and shoved rookie guard Tre Stallings  who immediately pushed back. The confrontation was quickly stopped.

Defensive tackle Lional Dalton  said that his conditioning is getting better. Hopefully it will be good enough so he can be a "true animal." To Dalton, a "true animal" entails being in top physical shape, so he can concentrate on making a play instead of "breathing." On defensive line coach Tim Krumrie , Dalton says, "He played 12 years in the league, so what else is there to say. He's a great coach, and he's intense. There is no slacking with him. He is going to be in your face and he's a great motivator too."

Coach Herm Edwards  said of practice, "I thought it was a good practice. I thought we would get a little bit of a lull because this is the fourth day consecutively that we have actually gone out in pads. I thought maybe they were going to feel a little sorry for themselves but they didn't do that. That tells me that the veterans are controlling the locker room and the mindset of this football team."

The first offensive team drill concentrated on the running game. Quarterback Trent Green  took the first several snaps. On the first play running back Larry Johnson  cut to the outside, avoiding all defenders. His speed and lateral movements received a loud applause from the crowd. Johnson also led a running attack up the middle two more times in the series. Running back McKenzi Smith  ran pass routes three times, while running back Quentin Griffin  and running back Derrick Ross  each ran pass routes twice. Running back Dee Brown  did not participate in the drill.

Ralph Deroy, of River Falls, loves having his grandson Connor, a camp volunteer, stay with him for a week during the  Chiefs Summer Training Camp. Deroy likes coming to practices because he meets a  lot of nice people. Last year, he and his wife met someone who had the inside  scoop on where some of the players dine at night. They followed the word to the Copper Kettle, where they saw five  or six Chiefs sitting on the patio. The Deroys were seated right next to their  table, and even got to help sing Happy Birthday to one of the players.

Corey Smith is a  producer/photographer for Metro Sports out  of Kansas City. Originally from Pittsburg, Pen., Smith has always wanted a job  in sports. Since he knew he wasn’t going to be a player, he though it would be  perfect to report what’s going on from the sidelines. Being a Chiefs fan, Smith  couldn’t be happier: “I love being on the road and working. I can concentrate  on what I do, and I get to watch  football.” He enjoys seeing players in their own element, and when they’re just  hanging out, instead of working.

Emily Halada,  daughter of former Camp   Coordinator Mary Halada, was at the morning practice today. Emily, who attends UW-Stout, is a volunteer/Guest Services Coordinator for the  training camp. She has been to all 16 training camps, and has been a volunteer  for two. Emily likes meeting new people throughout camp, and getting involved  with the kids who do other volunteer work. Emily mentioned that this year has  been especially exciting because she met quarterback Trent Green, and has met the new staff of Head Coach Herm Edwards.

Larrie are big Chiefs fans, and decided to make a stop in River Falls on their way back home from a family vacation. This is the first time  the Scotts have been to training camp. Colter, a football player himself,  mentioned that he has no real favorite Chiefs players, but really likes new Head Coach Herm Edwards.

Sarah and Colin Waters from Waukon, Iowa,  are in River Falls for the summer  training camp. Colin, 6, who has a very impressive football card collection,  has had a wonderful time watching the team train and practice. His favorite  player is quarterback Trent Green, and he is excited for Kids’ Day during tomorrow’s morning practice.

Brad Schroeder and Penny Morgan arrived in River Falls today from Springfield, Ill., to begin their five day vacation at  the Chiefs Summer Training Camp. Scroeder has been a DJ for 21 years, and  recently entertained at a party put on for linebacker Boomer Grigsby in the player’s hometown of Canton, Ill. Schroeder has done parties for high ranking officials  like governors and police chiefs, but said the party for Grigsby was one of the  best he’s been able to be a part of. Morgan and Schroeder think Grigsby is  quite the comedian, and they say he is a huge fan of 80’s music.

Even with the absence of his two favorite players, offensive  tackle Willie Roaf and fullback Tony Richardson, Frank Sheble made his annual trip up north from Kansas City with his grandchildren to watch his beloved Chiefs practice. Sheble felt that  Richardson and Roaf played a vital role in protecting quarterback Trent Green,  and fears that without them Green will be much more susceptible to taking blows  from outside pass rushers. “The team must stay healthy to make it to the  playoffs. They are not very deep beyond their starters,” said Sheble. Sheble  was also very impressed with how Head Coach Herm Edwards keeps his players busy doing different drills. He  remembers a lot of players standing around and doing nothing in previous years.  “He’s even got punters and kickers practicing tackles,” Sheble added.

Draped up in yellow and red adidas and a Derrick Johnson jersey, Harry Calandros was watching morning  practice very attentively. Calandros made the trip to River Falls from Massillon, Oh., with his family to watch the team that he has been an avid fan  of since the days of the great Chiefs’ quarterback Lenny Dawson. He has been coming to River Falls  since 2003, and has been attending Chiefs games at Arrowhead Stadium at least once a year since 1981. What Calandros  would love to see this year, is Chiefs owner Lamar Hunt lift the trophy that was named after him, and win the AFC Championship.

Calandros loves coach Herm  Edwards’ coaching style and calls him a mix of former Chiefs coaches Hank Stram and Dick Vermiel. Calandros has two daughters, Katrina and Kayleigh, whose initials are both K.C., very fitting since the girls love the K.C.  Chiefs. Their favorite player is kick returner Dante Hall, who in 2003 gave Katrina and Kayleigh a pair of signed  gloves and a football that he had used during practice that day. Ever since,  the family has made it a ritual to come to training camp every year to cheer on  Hall and the rest of the Chiefs.

In this afternoon’s press conference with quarterback Trent Green, he expressed the worry surrounding the retirement of guard Willie Roaf and how his retirement will affect the offense. Green said,  “There is obviously some worry when from last year’s offensive line three of  the five guys aren’t here right now. This is a great opportunity for some guys  to get experience, so hopefully they will take advantage of it and give us the  depth we’ve talked about it. We have to develop depth on the offensive side of  the ball because we are an older group.

Green also shared his thoughts on the development of some of  his teammates and coaches: wide receiver Sammie Parker, running back Larry Johnson, cornerback Ty Law and offensive coordinator Mike  Solari.

There is a heat advisory in effect until 8 p.m. for River Falls. A heat index of 110 degrees  was pushing fans away this afternoon, as attendance was down over 200 from what it was this morning. There was a cool breeze coming from the SSE at 9mph, but clear, sunny skies and humidity at 63 percent kept it hot.

Each summer on average, River Falls has 14 days where the temperature reaches over 90 degrees. According to Twin Cities Weather Service, today is the 19th day already this summer that has reached that level. In 2005, there were only three days recorded that were that hot. The record was in 1988, when there was a whopping 44 days where the temperature was over 90 degrees. Hopefully, this summer won't be the one to break it.

This afternoon’s practice featured a lot of punt and  kick-off coverage drills. Special Teams Coach Mike Priefer was bouncing around the field, yelling out plays and  giving his opinion on player performances when needed. “Catch the freaking  ball,” yelled Priefer when punt returner Kyle  Brown dropped a punt. Energetic and comedic defensive end Jared Allen brought a few laughs to the  steamy practice by scorching down the field on punt coverage drills, screaming  at the top of his lungs.

Getting looks at punt and kick returns today were Brown,  cornerback Chris Johnson, wide  receiver Nate Curry and running back McKenzi Smith. Pro Bowl kick returner Dante  Hall got the most work out of the group.

Punter Dustin  Colquitt looked fresh at today’s practice, punting the ball 20 times for a  whopping average of 55 yards. That number is a bit misleading considering there  were no returns today, but nonetheless he appeared to have a lively leg that  got good remarks from coach Priefer after practice: “Dustin looks more mature  and his leg seems to be getting much stronger.” Practice was highlighted by a  punt from Colquitt that traveled 102 yards.

After practice, Priefer spent a few moments fielding  questions from the media. Priefer strongly stated that he felt this will be the  year that Dante Hall returns to  being the Pro Bowl player he once was. Priefer said with a sigh of relief, “I’m  just happy I don’t have to worry about playing against him anymore, like last  year with the Giants.” Coaching with the New York Giants the last three years,  Priefer spent sleepless nights before games against the Chiefs, trying to  figure out how to the stop the speedy return man.

Safeties Bernard  Pollard and Jarrad Page, drafted  this year, appear to have Priefer’s confidence. “They like to hit, they’re  smart and most importantly they love to play football. Special teams players  have to love to play football.” If that opinion holds true, you can expect to  see both players get a lot of time on special teams.

Jared Brewster,  11, is excited to see defensive end Jared  Allen this year. They have the same name, play the same position and  Brewster is even willing to change his number to be more like Allen. Brewster  came to camp this year with dad Ellis, mom Denise, and sister Nikki, 7, who was decked out in Chiefs’  tattoos. They made the drive up from Liberty, Mo. Nikki and Jared’s favorite part of  camp is getting to meet the players and getting their autographs. The Brewsters  think they will be returning again next year because “River Falls has such a nice campus. Everyone is really friendly,”  stated Denise.

Deb Kittilson,  from Prescott, Wis.,  was present at today’s practice. Kittilson, who is in her fourth year as a  volunteer for Chiefs security, was fully decked out in her Chiefs gear. She has  been coming to the training camp as long as she’s been a volunteer, and enjoys  seeing the rookies, drills, plays, and the communication between the coach and  the team. Kittilson loves working security, and has become good friends with  other security staff. She was even invited to watch a home opener from the  field at Arrowhead Stadium last  year. Kittilson also enjoys working at Family  Fun Night, and is looking forward to the upcoming event this Saturday.

Today’s practice began at a cool 79 degrees, but the  humidity was extremely high at 83 percent. There was a fresh breeze coming from  the ESE at 5 mph. The high humidity made for a very sticky and uncomfortable  day but the cloud cover did give the 400 fans and the players a bit of relief from the  scorching sun, which should be out in its entirety at this afternoon’s  practice.

Coach Herm Edwards addressed the media following  today’s practice.“I thought it was a very, very intense practice.” Last night  he told the players to get in the mindset, “You can’t waste practices,  especially in pads.” The players responded to Edwards’ comments today by being  very physical in the 9-on-7.

Guard Brian Waters is out with an ankle injury for  a couple of days to a week, giving someone an opportunity to go in there and  play. Edwards says that the difficult part is that, “We need to have some type of  rhythm on offense, and it starts with the line.” Today he said that the  offensive linemen got off the ball and pass protected  well. Cornerback Lenny Walls and wide receiver Craphonso Thorpe both didn’t practice today.  Edwards said that Walls has hamstring issues and Thorpe has a bruised shoulder.  Neither of the injuries are long-term.

The intensity of practice was evident from the onset. Not  only was there constant discourse on the field among all the players and  coaches, but also the fans were highly engaged in the practice. During the  first offensive drill, quarterback Damon Huard took all the snaps, but only  handed off to the running backs. Running backs Larry Johnson, Quentin Griffin, Derrick Ross and McKenzi Smith all  participated.

Cornerback Benny Sapp highlighted  most of practice as he played the role of nickelback. Sapp made consistent stops, batted down  passes, and even recovered a fumble. The  fumble came when middle linebacker Kawika  Mitchell leveled running back Derrick  Ross.

Linebacker Kendrell Bell intercepted a quarterback Trent Green pass and  proceeded to take it the other way.  Unfortunately for Bell,  he coughed the ball up and gave it back to the offense thanks to center Casey Wiegmann’s recovery.

Running back Quentin  Griffin showed his athleticism most of practice. His skills did not help him though, when  linebacker Boomer Grigsby blew up  into the backfield and stopped Griffin  in his tracks for a loss.

Joe Gresback, 13,  of River Falls, has been coming to  camp since he can remember. Every day he rides his bike to Ramer Field Sports Complex to take in all that he can while the  Chiefs are here. Gresback helps volunteer also. Some of his duties include  working in the Information Gazebo and acting as a security guard, making sure  no one goes on the paths around the north side of the fields. He’s a little  disappointed that Priest Holmes isn’t  back this year for camp.

This is the third summer camp for Gina and Josh Cleveland and  family. Their sons, Jackson, 5, Samuel, 3, and Zachary, 1,  were having a good time chasing each other around in the grass. The Clevelands like coming to  camp because it means that football season is starting, which they are very  excited about. Being from River Falls, they love it when the Chiefs come  here every year. Gina thinks the community loves it too, “It’s just a great  experience for everyone.” When asked why he liked the Chiefs, Jackson piped up, “Because they’re good!”  Josh added that he thinks this year they definitely will be.

Craig Gillison from Independence, Mo., and Cheryl Hotchkiss from Grandview, Mo., are enjoying their  first time in River Falls for the  training camp. While they thought they would escape the heat in Missouri,  Gillison and Hotchkiss were surprised by the hot weather, but were glad to feel  a nice breeze at today’s practice. Both are looking forward to seeing the  Chiefs this season, and would like to see them enter the playoffs. Gillison  also mentioned that he really likes new Head Coach Herm Edwards and described him as a good communicator.

Beth Bass and Lorie Downing from Carthage, Mo., are spending  their third summer at camp. They enjoy coming to River Falls each summer because they like to watch rookies and get  autographs. Both Bass and Downing are excited for the new season and will be  closely watching players such as cornerback Ty Law, linebacker Boomer Grisgby, running back Larry Johnson, wide receiver Eddie Kennison, wide receiver Dante Hall and quarterback Trent Green.

In the stands for the morning practice today were longtime  Chiefs fans Francis and Brenda Fasching from Olathe, Kan. This is the  Fasching’s first time at the training camp. Although they thought that the  weather would be much cooler than it is back home, the Faschings are excited to  be in River Falls and are having a  great time.

Terri and Nicole Arnone came from Oak Gove,   Kan., to experience their third year at camp. Terri  enjoys coming to River Falls each summer because she likes to see  her husband and children enjoy the practice. Terri’s daughter, Nicole, has fun  watching her favorite players like wide receiver Dante Hall and running back Larry  Johnson.

Ronald Davis of Wichita, Kan., and his two  daughters have been at training camp since Friday, and have really been  impressed with how hard the players are practicing. Ronald has made the trip  from Wichita  three years and has never seen the players put forth so much effort. He was  happy to see cornerback Ty Law at  practice today, but noted, “It’s great to see him out there, but he can’t be  the only savior. Others are going to have to step up to get our defense back on  track.” Davis  would like to stay for the whole camp, but must leave tonight because his  daughters need to get back home for work.

Diana Wescott was  peacefully sitting in the shade reading the latest issue of Better Homes and Garden, while her  husband, Gary, a die-hard Chiefs fan, watched the morning  practice. Although not much of a football fan, Diana doesn’t mind coming with  her husband to attend the Chiefs’ practices. Originally from Kansas City and now  residing in Minnesota, the Wescotts hope to one day  return to their hometown.

Defensive linemen Ryan Sims and Tamba Hali looked like machines in drills today. Their intensity was very evident as time  after time they broke through the offensive line to get to the quarterback.  Defensive line coach Tim Krumrie was  very vocal during the drills, which really got the lineman fired up. It’s  surprising that these coaches still have a voice when practice is over with the  way they scream and shout out plays.

Today’s weather was a wearing 95 degrees with a 49 percent  humidity, which made it feel 10 degrees warmer. The dew point was at 73 and  winds were coming from the SW at 9 mph. The overcast that made this morning’s  practice so enjoyable was nowhere to be found this afternoon.

In an interview after practice, offensive coordinator Mike Solari  commented on the outlook of the offense and explained how the team is transitioning into the new coaching styles. Solari ensured that the team is "picking up where we left off" after last season, and that there is no need to "take a step back." He is excited about the progress of his young receivers, but did not provide any specific details as to which players were in competition for the fourth spot. Solari did indicate that wide receiver coach Charlie Joiner  will use training camp as an opportunity to "work with and develop all these young players."

Since the announcement of tackle Willie Roaf's  retirement, many have been wondering how potent this offensive line is going to be and who will replace Roaf. As of now, Solari positioned Kyle Turley  at left tackle and complimented the play of tackle Jordan Black  and tackle Will Svitek.

When questioned about the play of quarterback Trent Green, Solari boasted, "Trent Green is the Kansas City Chiefs offense. Not only does he know packages inside and out, but there is no one better in the huddle." Supplementing Green are some adept playmakers like tight end Tony Gonzalez, running back Larry Johnson, wide receivers Eddie Kennison  and Sammie Parker. Solari also talked about the progress of the back-up quarterbacks. "Brodie (Croyle) is coming along; Casey's (Printers) doing a good job of developing, and (Damon) Huard is working with No. 2 reps, so the more reps you get, the better football player you are going to be."

During practice, Coach Herm Edwards  directed a drill that focused on wide receiver patterns and cornerback coverage. Time and time again Edwards reminded the cornerbacks to "turn the other way" and to "use two shuffles and cut him off." Edwards also pulled cornerback Justin Perkins  to the side for some individual mentoring.

Following 11-on-11's, all the players ambled to the north sidelines and took off their shoulder pads. Practice continued with a modified 7-on-7 drill. The offensive linemen spilt from the group to work on more blocking drills, while some wide receivers worked on inside routes.

At Saturday afternoon’s practice the Chiefs busted out a new  look. The players were in full padding for the first time in camp, which  usually means there will be a more physical and demanding practice; this  afternoon was no exception.

In the midst of mid-90 degree weather, the defense was pushed to the max. Practice opened up with a low demanding  stretch and run before special teams and position drills. The defense took practice field one as usual and partook in their routine  drills.

Different from previous practices, linebackers went to the south end of field  one and ran one-on-one drills against the running backs to improve  pass-blocking skills. Second year outside linebacker Derrick Johnson showed his strengths as he nearly ran over every  running back that was put in front of him.

Keyaron Fox got  into some tough battles, including one with fullback Ronnie Cruz. Cruz didn’t give many of the linebackers much room to  work with. Fox later went against running back Larry Johnson and surprisingly got the best of the stud tailback. The  linebackers proved to be physical and definitely helped improve how the running  backs handle the pass rush.

After multiple plays were run, players went to the end zone  to take of their shoulder pads. The  defensive and offensive lineman went straight to the locker room to get out of  the heat for the day. Linebackers and positional players on offense remained  and ran through multiple sets.

When practice concluded it was easy to tell that players wanted to get into the  air conditioning. Tight end Robert  Docherty was very thankful for the assistants who passed out Gatorade as  the team left the field. “I love these guys,” said the undrafted rookie from UW-Oshkosh.

You may have seen the big RV in the Ramer Field Sports Complex parking lot, and wondered what it’s  doing there. Kenny Bradshaw and  friends drove it up from Kansas City with a golf cart toting trailer behind it. Bradshaw is just relaxing this  weekend, which is a change from his normal routine of being a ball boy for the  Chiefs at home games throughout the season. He is in charge of all of the  kicking balls for each game.

Chris and Dawn Grosdidier have come to over 10  training camps in the past 13 years. They now enjoy bringing their children, Claire, 9, and Zach, 4, to watch the Chiefs, and made it to River Falls just minutes before practice. The Grosdidiers drive up from Lenexa, Kan., to listen intently to what the  coaches and players have to say to each other when on the field. They also  enjoy going on day trips while in Wisconsin. They always make it to Stillwater, Minn., to have lunch and enjoy the scenery.  This year they are looking for somewhere new to go in the area.

Al King from Pleasant Hill, Mo., has been traveling to River Falls for the Chiefs Summer Training Camp for over six years now, and still enjoys  every minute of it. He is looking forward to seeing Head Coach Herm Edwards lead the team through the  season, and is anxious to see the offense and its running game. King is  disappointed about not seeing tackle Willie  Roaf at camp this summer, but does think the defense has improved.

Punt, Pass, and Kick was certainly a hit today, especially with fans Mary, Kayla and Brady Jansen. The Jansens, who traveled  to River Falls from Iowa, are huge Chiefs fans who enjoyed  today’s festivities for the first time. Brady, 7, showed off his impressive  football skills in the PPK competition today. He said that he had a lot of fun,  and was thrilled to have his picture taken with running back Larry Johnson earlier in the day.

Erin Kratochvil from Edina, Minn.,  and Nuong Ong from St. Louis Park, Minn., spent the  day experiencing their first time at camp. Kratochvil and Ong, who  volunteered to help with the Punt, Pass  and Kick competition today, have had a great time watching the Chiefs  practice. Kratochvil said that even though the weather is hot, she really  enjoys being able to see the players up-close and watching what they go through  during practice.

Mariah, Brittany and Elizabeth Moore from Parkersburg, Iowa,  were excited to see their favorite team practice today, regardless of the heat.  Sitting alongside them was friend and fellow Chiefs fan Valerie Weitzl, from Shanute, Kan., whom they met at a  previous training camp. This is the Moore’s 10th  year at camp in River Falls,  and Weitzl’s third. Weitzl is anxious to see if Head Coach Herm Edwards can help change the team and provide more consistency  throughout the upcoming season.

Dawson, a former high school and college coach, along with  being a teacher and principal, has been working diligently with other UW-River Falls alumni and employees in  hopes of getting a 3.5 million dollar renovation done at Ramer Fields Sports Complex.

Cory Leonard of River    Falls, Wis.,  had his eyes on a group of Chiefs players who were performing an exhausting  exercise put on by Chiefs’ Assistant Strength & Conditioning Coach Kaz Kazadi. The players had a giant  rubber band wrapped around their waists. Kazadi held one end while the  player ran until the rubber-band stretched to its limit, but instead of letting  the rubber band snap back, they had to slowly back up without it falling. It  was a gruesome exercise that had tight end Aaron  Golliday, cornerback Marcus Maxey and defensive tackle Ron Edwards,  looking like they had just stepped out of the shower.

Leonard didn’t feel sorry for the exhausted players, he felt  that their fat contracts make up for the grueling workouts they are put through  during camp. Besides the new workouts, Leonard noticed that contact drills were  happening a lot sooner than they had in previous years. Leonard is a Dallas Cowboys fan to the bone who  considers the Chiefs his favorite AFC team.

Free agent and former Kansas  player, Nick Reid, said today of the players he's now working with, "These are the best of the best out here." He feels privelaged for having the opportunity of being on the same field with players like quarterback Trent Green and tight end Tony Gonzalez. He was asked by reporters about how he can play with his bleach-blonde hair that measures 5-6 inches. His response was that it adds "a little extra cushion in the helmet so it doesn't hurt so bad" when he gets hit.

The Frozen Lemonade machine  in the southwest concession stand wasn’t working correctly today, which disappointed a lot of fans. The  combination of humidity and heat wouldn’t allow the machine to keep the  slushies frozen. Hopefully it will be fixed for tomorrow’s practice.

The Chiefs took the field at 8:45 a.m., opening with special  teams drills. The temperature read 78 degrees to open practice, much cooler  than the exhausting temperatures yesterday, mostly because of cloudy skies. The humidity was still high at 79  percent, with a dew point of 72 percent. The winds were coming from the ESE at  8 mph., which countered the high humidity a bit.

The entire offensive core gathered on field three with the brawny offensive linemen using their power to attack the sleds while another group ran routes and patterns. Offensive coordinator Mike Solari's  discontent with the hustle of the players could be easily overheard by the crowd when he assertively reminded the players: "Don't walk!"

Players absent from individual position work included tight ends Tony Gonzalez  and Jason Dunn  and guard Will Shields. All graced the field, but none practiced. The quarterbacks, punters and kickers worked on footwork and agility, while the wide receivers ran patterns to the left. Center Johnathan Ingram, guard Tyler Lenda, center Rudy Niswanger  and guard Steve Franklin  all coalesced to work on the sleds, while the rest of the offensive line practicing blocking schemes.

Quarterback coach Terry Shea  provided advice for long snapper/tight end Kendall Gammon  saying, "Split those defenders 83." Gammon showed off his catching skills today and his versatility at tight end with the absence of Gonzalez and Dunn.

During 11-on-11's quarterback Trent Green  took a high percentage of the snaps again. He connected with tight end Robert Docherty  and wide receiver Samie Parker on a number of throws. Running back Larry Johnson  was still finding the holes in the defense, proving that he will be the focus of the rushing attack once again this year. Kennison and Parker  assumed the two starting wide receiver spots for the greater part of the drill. Following the drills, Green, pleased with the rotation, gave Kennison and Johnson  high-fives.

Wide receiver Dante Hall  made an impressive run on a reverse at the end of an 11-on-11 drill. Just before that quarterback Trent Green  linked up with wide receiver Eddie Kennison  on an out pattern.

The level of energy on the field escalated since yesterday, but the productivity of the back-up quarterbacks was not as evident. Quarterback Damon Huard  was picked off by cornerback Julian Battle  and one of quarterback Casey Printer's  throws ended up the arms of safety Greg Wesley. Quarterback Brodie Croyle  had a pass blocked by defensive end Clint Mitchell  and had trouble finding his receivers.

The secondary practiced on the tackling dummy where they worked for about 10 minutes.  Cornerback Ty Law  was absent but is expected to be in camp and practicing tomorrow. Safety William Bartee  and corner Alphonso Hodge  were away from their secondary unit and were working without pads with strength and conditioning coach Jeff Hurd.

Defensive lineman worded on tackling dummies most of practice. They were also challenged by a unique drill ran by line coach Tim Krumrie. Krumrie slid protective pads over his arms as players took turns coming at him and batting at the sleeves.  End Tamba Hali  and tackle James Reed  showed immense efforts as they grunted their way through the drill. Reed has been a workhorse so far in camp.

In 11-on-11 drills the players seemed grittier than in the first practice. The offense opened with a hand-off to running back Larry Johnson  and safety Greg Wesley  made the stop. Wesley made his presence known shortly after when he intercepted quarterback Casey Printers'  throw. The ball was tipped by cornerback Lenny Walls.

Coffee must have been the drink of choice at breakfast this morning for both the players and coaches. The entire faction, fully caffeinated and energized, stepped up the intensity performing much more solidly than yesterday. Special teams coach Mike Priefer  jumpstarted his unit by commanding the players to "get off the block" and "compete a little bit." Formations and drills seemed to be a mirror image of yesterday's warm-up with the addition of three-point stances. Though air was cooler than yesterday, linebacker Boomer Grigsby  showed off this midriff during the entire special teams session.

"Guys we put on the sidelines today are the guys that are practicing in the afternoon," said Edwards.  "We have to protect the players, especially when they are older. I don't think I have to worry about guys like (guard) Will Shields  practicing."

Brian Reynolds has been coming to the Chiefs Summer Training Camp in River Falls for 14 years, and is carrying on the tradition by bringing sons Brandon, 11, and Nolan, 3, along for the experience. The Reynolds traveled from Lawrence, Kan., to see their favorite team in action  and to celebrate Nolan’s third birthday, which is today. Brandon and Nolan are  excited to see their favorite Chiefs players, which include running back Larry Johnson and wide receiver Dante Hall.

Tim Vandenhoy of Seymour, Wis., was at this  morning’s practice early to watch new Head Coach Herm Edwards work his players. Celebrating his 28th  wedding anniversary, Vandenhoy was able to escape his duties as a husband for a  short time to attend the second day of practice. Vandenhoy’s favorite player is  running back Priest Holmes, who he  was unable to see this morning because the Chiefs placed him on the PUP (Physically Unable to Perform) list  last night due to on-going injuries to his neck and back. Vandenhoy thinks that   Edwards will work wonders for the Chiefs’ defense, which has been sorely  lacking for the last few years. “Being a defensive-oriented head coach with a  high energy level, Herm will improve the defense a lot this year,” said  Vandenhoy.

Sandy and Mark Thorn, of Kansas City, stopped by the Chiefs’ practice this  morning on their way to the Upper  Peninsula of Michigan. It worked out perfect for the couple, as they were able to take a  break from their journey to stop and watch their hometown team practice. Their  eyes, along with many other fans’, were locked on speedy kick-returner Dante Hall as he ran around the field.  “Look at those legs on Dante. I didn’t even know we had those muscles in our legs,”  said Sandy.  Nicknamed “The Human Joystick,” Hall didn’t fail to impress fans this morning  with his lightning fast speed and innate ability to start and stop on a dime  and change direction. Much of that ability can be credited to his very strong  legs. “Like a thoroughbred,” said Mark.

Camp opened today at 3:45 p.m. with scorching temperatures  that topped out at 97 degrees with 47 percent humidity. The wind was coming  from the Southwest at 9mph, which helped cool things down a little bit.

Distractions of all sorts are prohibited from his practices; that means  everything from the proximity of the media to fields, to the avoidance of  certain questions during interviews. The subsequent topic at hand regarded Edwards’  feelings about the first day of camp.

During the individual position drills, Edwards assumed the  role of quarterback for the tight ends. Edwards, prone to jumping into drills  and actively mentoring his players, joked that he will function as the “fifth  quarterback” of the team if need be.

After the horn sounded, the players quickly transitioned  into full 11-on-11 formations. Quarterback Trent Green took the majority of the  snaps, but the focus of this drill was evidently on the running game.

The players then separated by specialty role and worked on  position-specific drills. Quarterbacks eased through agility and footwork drills,  while the running backs ran patterns without the ball, and the tight ends got  extra attention from the defense-minded Edwards. The offensive line worked on  blocking drills with pads and sleds.

The quarterbacks and wide receivers collaborated at practice  on some passing drills. Patterns that were being executed featured a shortened  passing game. Green, Damon Huard and Brodie Croyle took equal turns throwing to  each receiver. The receivers ran routes on the outside of the field. On the  other field, quarterback Casey Printers joined the running backs to  practice alternate paths and courses of action.

The entire offensive unit intermixed for a 7-on-7 drill  where Green threw most of the  passes. Wide receivers Sammie Parker, Craphonso Thorpe and Jeris McIntyre completed passes and tight end Tony Gonzalez made a few  catches as well. Wide receiver Eddie Kennison also connected with Green  on a few passes. Some of the offensive players sported bright green jerseys  serving as defensive stand-ins.

In the end of practice, during 11-on-11 drills, Printers  threw two interceptions: one was recovered by linebacker William Kershaw and the  other was snatched by cornerback Chris Johnson. The emphasis on the running  game was definitely prominent in these drills, though. Only one long-bomb pass  was attempted, and if the ball was thrown at all, the passes were typically  short distance. Green took most of the snaps with Larry Johnson garnering most  of the balls. When Green hit Gonzalez with a pass, safety Sammy Knight made an acrobatic  move, leaping on his back. Second-string quarterback Huard only got in for a  few plays, working with Quentin Griffin, Nate Curry, Jeff Webb, Darrell Hill and Jason Dunn. When Croyle  got in Webb, Scott McCready, Kyle Brown and Chris Hannon were his receivers, while Griffin once again served as his running  back.

The Chiefs started out with special teams where many defensive players were  involved. Starting right defensive end Jared Allen took the right offensive  guard position and proved how valuable he is to the Chiefs’ efforts.

The defensive linemen located in the northwest corner of practice field one and began running short sprints out of their  defensive positions. The first team included Allen at right defensive end, Lional Dalton at right defensive  tackle, Jimmy Wilkerson at left  defensive tackle, and rookie Tamba Hali at left defensive end in place of Eric  Hicks.

Linebackers took the opposite corner of the field and participated in running  and catching drills. Kendrell Bell and Keyaron Fox were complimented by the coaching staff the most for  their alertness and catching abilities. Second year veteran Derrick Johnson played behind the  scenes for the first day of practice, overshadowed by the play of Bell and the defensive  line. Bell and  Johnson can be penciled in as starters on the outside while Kawika Mitchell is handling the middle.

After individuals, the defense combined to play against a make-shift offense.  No balls were thrown as corners were instructed to drop back into coverage and  lineman to burst through an imaginary offensive line. During play, Cunningham  discussed assignments for when the football is thrown into the flats.

Cunningham vented his displeasure towards his troops by yelling, “Get your  heads out of your butts!” The cause for  the disgust was a play where running back Larry  Johnson burst through a hole and torched past the secondary.

When the Vikings played  the Chiefs in  Super Bowl III, Mark  Schlatter, of Cedar Falls, Iowa, got a lot of nasty looks from his friends for being the only person at the  party who was cheering at the result of the game. Schlatter, wife Shelley and seven other family members  and friends, drove up for the weekend to get a glimpse of the Chiefs up close. Schlatter  was baseball coach to center Casey  Wiegmann in 1987-1988, and now enjoys watching him succeed in football.  They catch up whenever they get the chance. The three boys that came along for  the ride, Ben and Gared Stockwell and Ryan Soldwisch, are avid Chiefs fans.  Ryan even wore a Chiefs T-shirt under his uniform at a Boy Scouts of America meeting. The group of nine will be leaving on  Sunday after the morning practice.

Brian Alwin, from Ellsworth, Wis., a Vikings  fan who considers the Chiefs his second favorite team, was on hand to see the  new-look defense. Alwin has attended the event since its inception and  remembers the time when he was able to share a refreshment with the  great Joe Montana. Alwin feels  strongly that the Chiefs have made the necessary improvements to their defense  to make them a legitimate contender for the Super Bowl this year.

Jerome “Roscoe”  Tilghman and his grandsons Joseph,  9 and Elijah, 1, were closely  watching the running backs at camp today. Tilghman has been an avid Chiefs fan  since their days in the AFL.  Tilghman’s knowledge of football is amazing, and his expertise in the running  back position was incredible. He believes Chiefs running back Larry Johnson has the ability and  toughness to go down as one of the “great ones” when all is said and done.  Tilghman also thinks coach Edwards is a great fit with the Chiefs and calls him  a “thinking man’s football coach.” He loves the way Edwards conducts his  practices, making them short and intense. On a steamer like today Tilghman  likes that trait about Edwards even more.

Sheila  Parker and Jo Jordan of Kansas City left home at 2 a.m today to embark on their seven-hour journey to River Falls  to watch their beloved Chiefs open training camp. They rushed to get here by  8:45 a.m. only to find out that they had been misinformed and practice didn’t  actually start until 3:45 p.m. They  could have used the extra sleep, but nonetheless they didn’t mind waiting to  see their favorite player, quarterback Trent Green, perform. They  are very excited about the Chiefs' off-season moves and are very optimistic  about the team’s chances this year.

Relaxing under their Chiefs umbrella at practice today were  fans Tom and Margaret Charrette from Knob  Noster, Mo., Tom and Margaret are huge  Chiefs fans and have been coming to training camp in River Falls  for the past eight years. They mentioned that they were excited for the  upcoming season and are waiting to see the direction brought forth by new head  coach Herm Edwards.

Excited fans Nancy and Henry Lauber from Independence, Mo., were present  at the Chiefs first practice today. They have been season ticket holders for 22  years and are entering their fifth summer  at camp. Henry, 7, was  practicing his skills earlier in the day with his older siblings for the Pass, Punt, and Kick competition being  held tomorrow afternoon. Nancy mentioned that she enjoys coming to River Falls  for the camp each summer because the people are friendly and there are more  fans present now than ever before.

Kris and Ryan Losson from St. Joseph, Mo., arrived  today for the Chiefs' first practice at camp. Kris and Ryan, accompanied by Ryan’s  cousin, Rachel Pauley, traveled to River Falls  to watch their favorite team live in action. This is the sixth year Kris and Ryan  have been to the training camp and Rachel’s first. They are looking forward to  the upcoming season to see if coach Herm  Edwards is a good change.

New head coach Herm  Edwards’ presence could be heard and felt right away as you entered the area  surrounding the practice fields. Edwards wasn’t on the sidelines taking notes  like many coaches; rather he was on the field with his players, taking the  hands-on and in-your-face approach that he has become so well known for. The  blazing heat didn’t appear to slow him down a bit, as his enthusiasm and energy  stole the show on opening day.

Debbie Wros enjoys everything about working in the concession stand at Ramer Field Sports Complex except the heat. “The fans help keep you  cool,” Wros said about the two fans that were propped up in the windows to help  circulate air. Wros works in the Student  Services office at UW-River Falls and  has been working with the University for 26 years now. She got recruited to  work the concession stand for the camp, but is happy about doing so. Today a  few people came in to buy Chiefs merchandise early because last year, by the  end of camp, they were all sold out of “the good stuff.". Wros said that the  Frozen Lemonade and drinks in general seemed to be the popular items for the  day, which seems fitting due to the weather.

The Chiefs arrived at UW-River  Falls today, at approximately 4:47 p.m. It was mostly clear skies over River Falls, with only the occasional cloud. The  temperature was a muggy 90 degrees with a southwest wind blowing at a measly 6  mph, not nearly enough to keep you cool with the 38 percent humidity and scorching  sun beating down.

Reporters, staff, and fans waited anxiously on the Rodli Commons lawn for Chiefs players  and staff. The  players, coaches and personnel arrived on five Laidlaw coach buses. The media swarmed the contingent as the buses unloaded, but most of the players ignored the attention and headed straight to McMillian Hall. The players filed into the dormitory in a single file line. President Carl Peterson and Head Coach Herm Edwards both addressed the media as soon as they stepped off, though. After the players received their room assignments, a handful conversed with the media about contracts and rookie-status.

Rookie quarterback Brodie Croyle also shared some thoughts  and was happy a deal got done. “It took a little longer than we had planned,” said Croyle.  “I am glad I am here, glad I am on time, and I am ready to get going.” The Chiefs will be looking towards Croyle to be the  future quarterback after Trent Green leaves, and Croyle hopes to learn a lot  from the savvy veteran.

Wide receiver Eddie Kennison unearthed new details about the terms of his contract shortly after unloading the bus. He challenged each of the media members to do the research and calculate the salaries that other players in his position acquire each year. "The numbers don't lie," Kennison said. When prompted if he was considering leaving Summer Training Camp if his contract terms weren't met, Kennison sincerely commented that, "I'm here and I'm a Kansas City Chief." Though the discussions between the Chiefs and him will remain confidential, he assured the media that talks about his contract have been developing since March, but now was the "right time" to disclose the situation.

Brett Moulin, age  seven, and his dad, Rick, were the  first training camp fans to arrive. They are from Bonner Springs, Kan., and this is their second year at the  camp, 2005 being their first. The Moulins arrived earlier today and are staying until Sunday. Brett’s favorite player is quarterback Trent Green and his favorite sport,  accordingly, is football. They watched interviews and Brett even got his picture taken with Coach Herm Edwards, President, GM and CEO Carl Peterson, rookie quarterback Brodie Croyle, wide receiver Eddie Kennison and first round  draft pick defensive end Tamba Hali. When asked how much he liked the Chiefs, Brett just got a big smile on his face that gave away his answer.

Nick Asmus, 22,  of Stillwater, Minn., rode his bike to Rodli  Commons and arrived just minutes before the Chiefs. Asmus is in his fifth year at UW-RF. He has been coming to training camp since he started his education at the  college four years ago. Usually friends and family attend practices with him,  and this year, he says, will be no different. He is looking forward to watching  the players in the few weeks to come.

Continuing in the tradition of the Chiefs Summer Training  Camp are the fans that travel to UW-River Falls to watch their favorite team in action. Two Chiefs fans, Rich and Lina Poste, traveled to Wisconsin from Olathe, Kan. yesterday and were on campus for the Chiefs arrival today. This is their second  year at the camp and they said that they enjoy the cooler weather and relaxing  atmosphere that River Falls has to offer. They are also looking forward to the upcoming season with Herm Edwards as the team’s new head  coach.

Ben Wilson of Kansas City, Mo. certainly had his timing down tonight. Wilson and 1,000 other bikers ended  their five-day, 300-mile trek across Minnesota as  part of the MS TRAM cycling  adventure, done to raise money for the National  Multiple Sclerosis Society. Being from Kansas City, it was very fitting that he was  able to get here in time to see his Chiefs arrive at their summer home. He will  relax tonight at Glen Park where he  and his group of cyclists will unwind and enjoy refreshments. The exhausting  trek has resulted in $750,000 in fundraising. To the west of Rodli  Commons there was a trailer of cars that were transported from Kansas City. As Wilson was taking  pictures of the players’ stylish rides, star running back Larry Johnson got off the bus and immediately came over to get his  Mercedes-Benz G-class off the trailer. Trying to escape the media while also  trying to get his belongings situated, Johnson seemed in a bit of a hurry. Once  the truck driver backed his ritzy Mercedes off the trailer, Johnson was quick  to get in, turn on his music and drive off.

The Route Inc., provides an alternate mode of transportation for the Chiefs players and coaches, but this year the stock of bikes is more elaborate than ever before. Instead of renting out standard mountain bikes as they have in the past, Adam Schmidt and his crew delivered 44 custom-made bikes. Each bicycle is single-speed, has a pedal brake, and is decorated with the Chiefs logo and colors. Also, a number on the rear of the machine can distinguish each bike. The Route Inc., charges $75 per bicycle and is available to service and repair the bikes if needed. Some players that were spied renting bikes were kicker Lawrence Tynes and linebacker Boomer Grigsby. Following camp, each of the bikes is auctioned off for charity.

Along with the arrival of the Chiefs today was a semi truck,  carrying hundreds of pieces of personal luggage for the team. The semi, which  arrived on campus shortly after the team entered McMillan dormitory, contained everything from suitcases, bedding  and blow-up mattresses to stereos, printers and dehumidifiers. Chiefs players,  including running back Larry Johnson,  defensive end Jared Allen and corner  back Benny Sapp, later came outside to retrieve their luggage and personal  belongings. With a red Gatorade bottle in one hand, tight end Jason Dunn retrieved two pieces of luggage from the unloading area.

First-year Chiefs  defensive tackle James Reed was  spotted outside Rodli Commons looking  for the weight room. Apparently he isn’t wasting any time trying to crack the  defensive line rotation. This is his first season with the Chiefs after  spending his first five seasons in the NFL with the New York Jets. He was also looking  for things to do in a town like River Falls,  which is much different than what he is used to in the Big Apple. Reed played his first five seasons for coach Herm Edwards and is looking forward to his opportunity to continue playing for  him for years to come.

A day before the Chiefs arrive in River Falls for training camp, the student and full-time staff in  charge of accommodating the Chiefs during their stay at UW-River Falls, took a break to bond over a sub sandwich lunch in  the Ramer Field Sports Complex pavilion.

After a brief orientation inside Hunt Arena and a tour of the locker room, camp employees and  interns ventured out into a hot and humid Wednesday afternoon to enjoy Blimpie's sub sandwiches and fountain  soda; one last day of semi-relaxation before the Kansas City Chiefs arrive on  campus for their 2006 summer training camp.

Overall the food was taken well and all involved left with a boost for the  weeks to come. The Chiefs should be well  taken care of as this year’s staff is ready and up for the challenge of aiding a  historic NFL team to a successful camp and season.

Today Head Strength and Conditioning Coordinator Jeff Hurd informed camp volunteers and  staff that the Chiefs bring most of their own equipment to use during the camp.  They bring two semi-trucks full of weights and machines to River Falls, which includes three-fourths of the weight room equipment from their facilities  in Kansas City.

Ranging  from free weights and sports tape to jerseys and cleats; the Chiefs are already  making their presence in River Falls felt. Steve Stocker, director of Hunt Arena, has been busy organizing the  training facilities for several weeks now, making sure that all of the Chiefs’  needs have been met as they prepare for Friday’s first practice.

Staying hydrated is imperative for football players who  practice in the sultry sun, so to keep their bodies in optimal shape, the  Chiefs brought in 23,323 bottles of Gatorade for Summer Training Camp.

Ground crews are busily working through the heat, getting  the fields into game-time shape. A wave of excitement can also be felt at Knowles Center today with last night’s  signing of five-time Pro Bowler, cornerback Ty Law. The three-time Super Bowl champion is expected to arrive in River Falls with the rest of the team on Thursday.

Senior citizens were welcomed with open arms to Tuesday morning's Chiefs Summer Training Camp. One hundred and six seniors with smiling faces had arrived by 9:30 a.m. to the Ramer Field Sports Complex. Although many younger fans didn't want to comply, there was a section of bleachers reserved for the seniors to sit during practice.

Each Senior was given a raffle ticket, a free camp journal and a pen which was donated by the UW-River Falls Alumni Foundation. The raffle tickets were read off at 10 o'clock; the prizes were a Kansas City Chiefs T-shirt from the concession stand and 10 McDonalds' coupons. The seniors also received complimentary coffee from the concession stand.

Fifty-two seniors on a tour bus from Kansas City attended. Seairlan World Tours brought a group up on a big coach bus for a tour around Wisconsin. They stayed in Rochester, Minn., on Monday night and Ramer Field Sports Complex was their first stop Tuesday morning. They are making six stops in all, to other locations around Wisconsin, including the Cranberry Bog, House on the Rock, Wisconsin Dells and Michigan Lake for a yacht tour.

The NFL Network was also present on Tuesday morning. Seniors enjoyed watching interviews with Chiefs President Carl Peterson, tackle Kyle Turley and tight end Tony Gonzalez. Peterson and quarterback Trent Green even managed to squeeze in a little autograph session with some of the seniors.

Everyone seemed to be very pleased with the results at the end of the day: seniors got to see their favorite NFL team up-close, enjoy hot coffee and free gifts and get autographs from some of the best players in the AFC.

With lots of game footage to review and a chance to see the rookies and free agents in action, Chiefs' Head Coach Herm Edwards  was extremely content with the outcome of the practice and proud of the sportsmanship that the players displayed. "I'm really proud of both teams, exhibiting good sportsmanship. I thought the contact was good. As a former player I know how it works: when you haven't faced a team in a practice everybody's trying to feel everybody out. When things got going, however, it was good competition. We kept it within the lines. We played football."

To begin the session, the Chiefs  offense practiced with the Vikings  defense on the practice fields, while the Chiefs  defense united with the Vikings  offense on the main field. Both fields carried out the exact same practice routine of 7-on-7 passing drills, one-on-one pass rush drills, shell drills and 9-on-7 drills.

In the defensive 9-on-7 drills, defensive tackle Ron Edwards  and defensive tackle James Reed  not only played with the first unit, but held their own against the Minnesota  offense. Defensive tackles Ryan Sims  and Lional Dalton, though demoted to the second team, still provided excellent coverage.

"They're a nice defensive line," complimented Vikings  center Matt Birk. "I've been here nine years; we've gone up against those guys a bunch of times. And I've always thought highly of their group. They're talented but it's obvious that they have a strong work ethic as well and they all have high motors."

Also on the defensive end of the ball, linebacker Derrick Johnson  continued to look impressive on outside. He has had a strong Summer Training Camp  thus far, and his maturity is definitely being noticed.

Rookie safety Jarrad Page  was making his presence known on the field. He was an eminent threat to the Vikings' offense, continually being a menace around the football and rushing the passer on the blitz.

The only slight confrontation of the night occurred in one-on-one drills when wide receiver Dante Hall  squared off against the Vikings'  cornerback Fred Smoot. Smoot  was pulling at Hall's  jersey and defending him a little too close, so Hall  used his speed and pivoted across the middle to pull away from Smoot  for a touchdown.

Once the teams collaborated on the stadium field, the Chiefs'  veteran offensive players did not grace the field. Quarterback Trent Green, running back Larry Johnson, guard Will Shields, center Casey Wiegmann, and newly acquired running back Michael Bennett  all observed from the sidelines.

Highlights of Chiefs'  offensive players include: running back Dee Brown  racked up some running yardage and revealed Edwards'  inclination towards staying on the ground; quarterback Damon Huard  stayed consistent throughout the practice completing 4-4 pass attempts; but the standout player in the offense was left tackle Kyle Turley. Turley  relentlessly overpowered Vikings' 2005 first-round draft pick defensive end Erasmus James  and provided excellent pass protection. Filling the other voids on the offensive line, Kevin Sampson  started at right tackle and Jordan Black  started at left guard.

Though the Chiefs'  defense struggled against the No. 1 Minnesota  offense in the scrimmage, it did produce two of the top plays of the night. Linebacker Kawika Mitchell  busted through the Vikings'  offensive line obstructing Vikings'  running back Mewelde Moore  from gaining any yards. Also, safety Sammy Knight  made a hit on Vikings'  fullback Steve Jackson , forcing him to lose control of the ball and step out-of-bounds.

Overall, the Chiefs  and the Vikings  both benefited from the opportunity to compete against different competition and test out the capabilities of the rookies and free agents. "It's always great to see another colored jersey out there," said Vikings' Head Coach Brad Childress. "And I appreciate Herm bringing his guys out here."

The past two times that the Chiefs and Vikings practiced together in 2003 and 2004, not only resulted in a chance for the players to display their talents, but also prompted the exchange of hostile words and skirmishes between opposing teams.

When the Chiefs venture to the home of Vikings Summer Training Camp to see how they measure up against their NFC North rival, they are missing one of most prominent players from last year's team--fullback Tony Richardson. Richardson, a two-time Pro-Bowler for the Chiefs and one of the most respected players to ever grace the franchise, left the Chiefs in free agency, taking a job as a Viking.

Richardson is not the only similarity between the two teams. Both teams have new players in key positions and many talented free agents. With only a week of practice under its belts, each team is hoping that this practice will shed light on some of the unanswered questions in the lineups.

Edwards  is looking to perpetuate the Chiefs' offensive trademark with the experience of veteran quarterback Trent Green, tight end Tony Gonzalez  and wide receiver Eddie Kennison. The remaining wide receiver roles are up for grabs with Sammie Parker, Dante Hall, Craphonso Thorpe  and Jeris McIntyre  all battling for time. Tight end Jason Dunn  has strong blocking abilities and will backup Gonzalez, while Ronnie Cruz  will take over for Richardson at fullback.

But Edwards has also promised that this offense will be all about ball control and utilizing the highly touted Pro-Bowl running back Larry Johnson; talk of a 2,000-yard season has been mounting since the end of his breakout season in 2005. With the probability of running back Priest Holmes  returning slim-to-none, Dee Brown  and Quentin Griffin  will contend for the backup running back position.

The Chiefs' offensive line has traditionally been one of the best in the entire NFL, but the unexpected retirement of guard Willie Roaf  suddenly jeopardizes the potency of line. Center Casey Wiegmann , guard Will Shields  and guard Brian Waters  all return as starters and will have to work on developing chemistry with potential candidates tackles Kyle Turley, Will Svitek  and Jordan Black. Waters, who was injured in practice on Sunday, may not be ready to practice against the Vikings.

So, the Vikings defense will face the daunting challenge of trying to stop one of the league's most dynamic offenses. At cornerback, Fred Smoot  and Antoine Winfield  are both back from last season. First-round draft pick Chad Greenway  is the probable starter in one of the linebacker positions, and another free agent that is expected to make waves in the defense is strong safety Tank Williams . Veterans Kevin Williams  and Pat Williams  will anchor the defensive line.

On the offensive side, Childress  will run a west-coast style offense this season, using horizontal passing schemes to get maximum production from starting quarterback Brad Johnson. With the departure of wide receiver Nate Burleson, wide receivers Koren Robinson  and Troy Williamson  are being counted on to step up their level of play.

Last season the Vikings ran a two tight end offense, exploiting the receiving abilities of both Jermanie Wiggins  and Jimmy Kleinsasser. Each will be vying for a single starting job this year, but both will contribute during the season.

Another ambiguity in the Vikings offense is who will obtain the No. 1 running back spot. Chester Taylor a free agent from Baltimore, is presumed to be the favorite, but where would that leave Mewelde Moore, the team's primary running threat from last season?

Center Matt Birk  returns to the offensive line after having to sit out last season because of injury and guard Steve Hutchinson, one of the most dominant guards in the league, will combine to be the catalysts for an effective protection force. Tackle Bryant McKinnie, tackle Marcus Johnson  and guard Artis Hicks  are anticipated to fill the other voids on the offensive line for the Vikings.

Edwards' defensive goals are to frustrate the Vikings' offense and to take away any big play opportunities. Standouts Ty Law, Patrick Surtain  and Lenny Walls  will compete for cornerback positions and cornerback Benny Sapp  will serve as the team's nickel back.

The Chiefs first-round draft pick in 2005, left outside linebacker Derrick Johnson , should be ready for an explosive season, and right outside linebacker Kendrell Bell  and middle linebacker Kawika Mitchell  should maintain their roles from last season.

The Chiefs have frequently utilized the close proximity of Vikings Summer Training Camp in the past as a chance for the players to compete against other league competition and for the coaches to see which guys are worthy in pads. With uncertainties in both the Chiefs' and the Vikings' lineups, Edwards and Childress will use this practice as a chance to see what players can perform and execute against some of the NFL's best.

The Punt, Pass, and Kick competition was blessed with fantastic weather and a good turn out. One hundred and eight hopeful NFL stars showed their stuff at the Ramer Field Sports Complex, giving it their best in hopes of obtaining the first-place trophy in their age group.

The awards ceremony got underway promptly after the last football was kicked. Chiefs Executive Vice President/Assistant General Manager  Dennis Thum greeted the audience and said a few words before handing out the trophies to the winners. "Youth football is the lifeline to the NFL, hopefully we'll see one of you in the league someday," said Thum.

Thum also had a few words to say about new Head Coach Herm Edwards. "You will see a big change in the intensity of the players with Edwards as head coach," said Thum. The intensity he is referring to has been quite evident at this year's training camp; almost never do you see Edwards taking a breather, even with the heat and humidity that has been hanging over western Wisconsin.

While at Wisconsin, Krumrie was named to the All-Big Ten team three times as a defensive tackle. Krumrie would later be enshrined in the Wisconsin Athletic Hall of Fame in 1999. A stellar performer on the field, Krumrie still holds the mark for career solo tackles at 276.

The NFL and the Cincinnati Bengals called in 1983 and took Krumrie with their 10 th round draft pick. Krumrie proved to be much more valuable than the 10 th round and made the Pro Bowl twice and appeared in Super Bowl XXIII. His toughness was not more obvious when he severely injured his leg in the game, only to return to full form the following year.

Following his NFL playing career, Krumrie joined the coaching ranks. He first coached the Cincinnati defensive line before going to Buffalo from 2003-05. Krumrie was then brought over to the Chiefs to mold the defensive line into a force.

Krumrie is an instrumental part of the Chiefs getting the best out of their line that has under-performed in the past couple seasons. He shows a tremendous love and appreciation for the came. His intensity in practice shows and will definitely translate into better play from the defensive line.

"I'm focusing straight up on fundamentals and effort," said Krumrie after an afternoon practice. "Fundamentals, effort and playing fast. The more consistent they can be, playing fast, running to the ball, all that stuff will play out."

There are many things that take place in the residence halls daily, such as cleaning rooms, checking guests in and out, doing laundry and other odds and ends. They all seem to just magically be done by the time players and staff get back to their rooms. Just shy of putting mints on pillows, the residence hall workers are the ones who make it all happen.

Emilee Driscoll is the Housing Coordinator for the duration of the Kansas City Chiefs Summer Training Camp. What that means exactly is that she helps manage Grimm, McMillan, and Parker residence halls on campus. These are the halls in which the Chiefs players, coaches, family and guests, staff and media reside throughout camp. Driscoll basically acts as a liaison between UW-River Falls and the Kansas City Chiefs organization. She describes her position as being kind of like a hotel management job.

Driscoll, a UW-RF student, is here two weeks before camp begins, getting things ready for everyone who will stay. She is also on campus almost a week after camp concludes, making sure things are in ship shape for the 2006-07 school year.

During camp, Driscoll doesn't know the definition of nine-to-five. Her typical day is about 12 hours long with occasional breaks. She starts off the morning by being in the office at 6 a.m. She mainly runs reports during this time: looks at daily logs, makes sure all requests have been appeased and goes over any problems with rooms/guests.

She then speaks with Chiefs administration, the mail staff and takes care of all new requests that guests might have. Anytime anyone new checks into the halls, like players' families and friends, Driscoll needs to be there. The rest of her day is spent doing pretty much whatever the Chiefs staff needs her to do. Sometimes she makes it out to Ramer Field Sports Complex to take in a practice. Driscoll is usually working in the residence halls until about 6 p.m.

After being the housing coordinator last summer, Driscoll loved it so much she decided to apply for the position again. The favorite part of her job is getting to be around the Chiefs staff, who she said are very nice. "We're like a little family," said Driscoll, who lives on the same floor as the Chiefs female administrative staff, "We all leave everything in the bathroom: make-up, hairspray, toothbrushes. It's a very trusting environment."

The only thing that has changed about Driscoll's position from last year, is that people recognize her more: "People know you so they ask you for more things. You have more tasks to do and more responsibilities, but it's nice that they feel confident that you can help. And they trust me, which makes me feel helpful."

Besides Driscoll, there is a staff of 23 students, headed by Paul Stratton, who make everything happen in the residence halls. They clean, make beds, do laundry and set up rooms so they are ready each day for everyone already staying, and for new guests that arrive. They also accommodate to every request that any player, coach or media person has.

Behind the scenes, all of the residence hall workers work extremely hard at what they do, and are part of the reason that training camp goes off without a hitch. They are enthusiastic, dedicated and to most, they are indispensable.

The Kansas City Chiefs will kickoff their preseason schedule with a Saturday evening tilt with the Houston Texans at Reliant Stadium. Chiefs Head Coach Herm Edwards and Houston Texans Head Coach Gary Kubiak will make their sideline debuts with their new teams.

Hiring offensive guru Kubiak should help an offensive unit that struggled under Capers, who specialized in defense. Kubiak, like Edwards, enjoyed a long and productive playing career in the NFL. He played quarterback for the Broncos from 1983-1991 and then became the team's offensive coordinator in 1995 and remained in that position until leaving this off-season to head the Texans. His offensive knowledge should help a very young and talented offensive group that includes quarterback David Carr, wide receiver Andre Johnson and running back Domanick Davis.

The team struggled mightily on both sides of the football, but it was apparent at the end of the 2005 season that the lines, both offensive and defensive, needed a complete makeover. In the draft and in free agency the Texans were able to do just that.

With the first pick in this year's NFL draft the Texans selected defensive lineman Mario Williams out of North Carolina State. The move was a bit of a surprise to many because the team passed on running back Reggie Bush, the heavy favorite to be selected with the first pick. The Texans heavily felt they needed to build a strong defensive line and by selecting Williams they took a huge step in doing that. Another reason the Texans chose not to select Bush is because they are very high on fourth-year running back Davis, who has amassed 3,000 yards in just three seasons for the Texans.

In an off-season trade with the Buffalo Bills the Texans were able to bring in veteran wide receiver Eric Moulds, who should not only ease the load off of young wide out Andre Johnson but also serve as his mentor.

Former Packers center Mike Flanagan was brought in as a free agent and tackles Eric Winston and Charles Spencer were taken in the draft to help shore up the offensive line. The new-built line should receive a heavy dose from the suddenly very strong Chiefs defensive front.

By getting Williams in the draft and adding former Baltimore Raven defensive end Anthony Weaver through free agency, the Texans now have a pair of solid bookends on the defensive line to go with their new 4-3 alignment. They should prove a good test for the Chiefs offensive tackles on Saturday night.

Kick returner Jerome Mathis, the Texans version of Dante Hall is expected out until mid-October. Last year as a rookie the speedy Mathis was second in the league with a 28.6 kick return average and had two games in which he accumulated 266 return yards. The Texans have a handful of players vying for the vacated position.

This off-season has brought both huge smiles and disheartening subtractions to the Chiefs faithful. Edwards takes the helm looking to instill a tough and tenacious defense and to infuse a no quit, hard work attitude on the team as a whole. On Saturday, that attitude should be on full display.

Bringing in three-time Super Bowl champion, cornerback Ty Law and drafting defensive end Tamba Hali in the first round of the draft, displayed the Chiefs newfound devotion to building a stellar defense.

Also drafted this year were hard-hitting safeties Bernard Pollard and Jarrod Page. Expected to back up starting safeties Sammy Knight and Greg Wesley, these two young and athletic defensive backs are expected to play a large role on defense and special teams this season.

Cornerback Patrick Surtain and the newly acquired Law give the Chiefs one of the most feared cornerback tandems in the league. Nickel back Benny Sapp has looked impressive in camp and should receive an abundance of playing time this season. It should be fun watching the Texans receivers battling with the Chiefs secondary on Saturday.

The Chiefs linebacker corps appears to be as strong as it's been in years. Middle linebacker Kawika Mitchell has been a jaw-dropper thus far in camp. Right-side linebacker Kendrell Bell is hoping to live up to high expectations he received last season after coming over a high profile free agent acquisition from the Pittsburgh Steelers. The second-year left-side linebacker is showing a lot of promise after being selected by the Chiefs in the first-round of the NFL draft last year.

Hali and right defensive end Jared Allen give the Chiefs a pair of solid bookends themselves. Defensive tackle Ryan Sims appears to have a fire under him at camp this year. Defensive line coach Tom Krumrie has really gotten the most out of Sims and defensive tackle Lional Dalton. They, along with the rest of the Chiefs rebuilt defense should be a treat to watch on Saturday.

While the defense has taken some very significant steps forward, the offense has taken a few steps backwards. The retirements of some huge bodies on the offensive line, losing fullback Tony Richardson to free agency and the uncertainty of running back Priest Holmes' health has left new offensive coordinator Mike Solari with a few hoops to jump through.

On the bright side, hopes are sky-high for Chiefs running back Larry Johnson, after coming off an incredible 2005 campaign in which he rushed for a Chiefs single-season record of 1750 yards in just nine starts. With Holmes' future in doubt, Johnson has stepped in and taken a lead role with both his teammates and with the fans. He has shown incredible hustle and work ethic in drills and has also shown excellent appreciation for his fans. He has become the new face of the Chiefs offense. Johnson should pose as a great test for Texans rookie Williams in Saturday's preseason game.

Running back Michael Bennett was added a few days into camp in a trade with the New Orleans Saints. With Holmes' on the mend, Bennett provides the team with a good change of pace back to help ease the workload Johnson is expected to endure.

Trent Green has been a great leader in camp and doesn't appear to be too fazed by some key off-season subtractions from their offense. Rookie quarterbacks Casey Printers and Brodie Croyle have looked god in camp and should get a long look in Saturday's preseason tip-off against the Texans.

The tackle position is a bit of a question mark heading into the season with the retirements of both of last year's starting tackles; John Welbourn and Willie Roaf. Kyle Turley has impressed coaches and fans alike and appears to be penciled in at left tackle. The right tackle position battle appears to be a battle between tackles Kevin Sampson, Will Svitek and Jordan Black.

Fullback Ronnie Cruz seems to have gelled right into his role as a replacement for the departed Richardson. Tight end Tony Gonzalez hopes to get familiar with the end zone on Saturday. After only recording two touchdown passes last season, Gonzalez is set to get back to being the tight end that caught 50 touchdown passes on five seasons for the Chiefs.

The Texans will have their work cut out for themselves trying to contain speedy kick returner Dante Hall. He, like Gonzalez is hoping to rebound from a sub-par season in which his stats weren't quite as gaudy as they've been in years past.

With losses come opportunities, and for many Chiefs players Saturday will serve as the beginning of their chance to prove to the coaches that they're ready to step up and take on the vacated seat and help alleviate the loss of some key players.

This year's event brought in a total of 2,543 fans at Ramer Field Sports Complex, with fans arriving as early as 3 p.m. The overall setting of Family Fun Night included several concession stands with everything from beverages to brats and hotdogs. There were also face painting tents and a Chiefs Experience, which enabled fans to test their football skills with an obstacle course, a precision course, as well as a field goal chip shot and catching station.

The evening begun with skydivers from the Indianhead Sport Parachute Club making an exciting and accurate entrance on Ramer Field at 5:20 p.m. Fans cheered and applauded as the skydivers descended from the clear sky onto the field right before them.

After the skydivers opened the night, fans were welcomed to speeches from Representative Mark Pettis, Chancellor Don Betz, Wisconsin Gov. Jim Doyle, Head Coach Herm Edwards and Executive Vice President Denny Thum. Fans were excited to see Governor Doyle and cheered when he said, "The Chiefs are important to the entire state of Wisconsin and a favorite team in the ASC." Doyle also went on to say that Wisconsin is proud to host the Chiefs for the past 16 years and consider Chiefs fans to be a great part of River Falls. The biggest applause came when Edwards spoke. Edwards thanked fans and ensured them of a strong upcoming season. Edwards said, "The Chiefs play with passion and will not embarrass Kansas City, we promise you that!"

The autograph session was organized that players and coaches would be signing for 20 minutes and fans were able to walk around the track to receive the signatures. Among the most popular autographs to receive were Edwards, quarterback Trent Green, wide receiver Dante Hall and running back Larry Johnson. Patient fans waiting orderly to get their favorite coaches and players autographs while the 20 minutes counted down on the clock.

Once the autograph session was completed, excited fans retired off the track and practice began. Fans were thrilled to see the Chiefs' offensive and defensive units practice from 7-8:30 p.m. Once practice was completed, lucky Punt, Pass, and Kick winners had their trophies presented to them by Edwards. The winners each had their photographs taken with Edwards before a final group photo completed the event.

Following the Punt, Pass, and Kick event was a beautiful fireworks show provided by Rolf Halverson Fireworks. The fireworks display then topped off the memorable evening. When asked about the firework show, Chiefs fans Roy and Cheryl Bartow from Olathe, Kan., said, "The fireworks were beautiful and a great way to end a fun evening, and our kids really liked them!" The Bartows also commented that the entire evening was fun for their family and that they only hope next year can top off the beautiful weather.

Docherty signed with the Kansas City Chiefs following the NFL draft and was penciled in fifth on the depth chart. The Chiefs already have All-Pro tight end Tony Gonzalez a solid veteran back-up in Jason Dunn which makes Docherty's goal that much harder.

So far at camp, Docherty has gotten substantial playing time due to Tony Gonzalez and Jason Dunn sitting out a practice. Not only has the Oshkosh graduate seen action at tight end, he also has been playing on special teams.

Edwards named Mike Priefer as special teams coach after he  had served as an assistant coach with the New York Giants the past three  seasons. Under Priefer’s tutelage kicker Jay Feely enjoyed his best season as a  pro in 2005 when he led all kickers with 148 points and  David Tyree became the first Giants player since 1990 to earn an invite to the  Pro Bowl as a special teams player.

Hall returns for his seventh season with the Chiefs. He is only  the second player in Chiefs history to receive a Pro Bowl selection as a return  specialist. He also owns a franchise-record 10 kick/punt returns for  touchdowns, four of them coming in 2003 during a span in which he became the  first player ever to return a kick return for a touchdown in four consecutive  games. Besides his standout special team play, Hall continues to become a  big-play performer in the passing game as a third receiver. His 2,283 combined  net yards in 2005 were the third-highest single season total on Chiefs history.  His 65 kickoff returns and 1,560 kickoff return yards each ranked as the  second-best season in Chiefs history. Hall hopes to get to the end zone more  often in 2006 after only returning one kick for a touchdown last year.

Handling the punting duties this year will be Dustin  Colquitt who is in his second season with the team. In the 2005 draft the  Chiefs spent their third-round selection on the left-footed Colquitt. It was  the highest pick the Chiefs have ever spent on a punter. Colquitt possesses a  knack for getting good hang-time on his punts that allows the coverage units to  get downfield. The unusual spin that he puts on the ball also makes it very  difficult for return men to catch. Last year he punted 65 times with a net  average of 35.2 yards. He had 27 land inside the 20-yard line and had five  touchbacks.

The coverage units will be led by returning standouts Rich  Scanlon and Boomer Grigsby. Scanlon led Chiefs with 29 special teams tackles  last year, Grigsby added 19. Edwards believes in having a very fast and  physical defense, so it is likely you will see that kind of play on special  teams as well.

This off-season the Chiefs brought in a lot of young and  athletic players to help contribute on special teams. One of those players  contributing should be 2006 second-round draft pick Bernard Pollard. A safety  and special teams ace, Pollard reeked havoc on opposing kickers, blocking three  punts and five field goals in his college career at Purdue.

Since day one of his inauguration into the Chiefs’  franchise, Coach Herm Edwards has been brazenly committed to replenishing the  faction of the team that has long been lacking in production and execution: the  defense.

An aberration from the Vermeil era and his adamant emphasis  on offense, all of a sudden, one of the most potent offenses in the league may  be abdicated from the limelight and replaced by its defensive counterpart.

But offensive-minded Chiefs’ fans and Fantasy Football gurus  should not be at all rattled by Edwards’ objective to push the defense to the  forefront. This newly imposed significance on defense will not only improve the  tactics of the veteran offensive stars, but will ensure that the Chiefs’  offensive unit continues its legacy in the NFL.

The three quarterbacks in Green’s wings are the seasoned  Damon Huard, the third-round draft pick Brodie Croyle, and the acquired free  agent Casey Printers. Huard has served as one of Green’s back-ups since 2004  and has the experience to direct the offense if age or injury gets the best of  Green. Croyle, a callow addition to the Chiefs, has proved in OTAs that he can  make quick decisions in the pocket but will need a few seasons of mentoring  before he can take the reins. The emergent CFL quarterback, Printers, is also  competing for a back-up spot. His physical presence and his ability to adapt to  the offensive scheme exhibit much promise.

The offense was ranked No. 1 in total yards for the second  straight year in 2005. Much of the credit can be allotted to standout running  back Larry Johnson, who after taking over for injured Priest Holmes, rushed 336  times for a team single-season record 1,750 yards with 20 touchdowns. To add to  this list of accomplishments, Johnson was a first-time Pro Bowl selection last  season and is expected to be the catalyst of this offense once again, but  questions still remain as to whether he can be as productive as he was last  year and if he is physically and mentally prepared to be a 16-game starter.

If legendary running back Holmes recovers from his spinal  injury in time for the season, the Chiefs could have the most daunting running  back tandem in the NFL. If Holmes remains on the injured list, though, Dee  Brown and Quentin Griffin will compete to be Johnson’s back-up. The retirement  of Holmes would not only pose a vacancy at the running back position, but more  importantly the team would lose one of their most respected leaders and  performers.

Renowned names and faces deluge the offensive roster, but  perhaps the most standout feature of the Chiefs is its offensive line. No other  offensive line in the 21st century can match the achievements and  permanence of tackle Willie Roaf, left guard Brian Waters, center Casey  Wiegmann and right guard Will Shields. Combined, these veterans have acquired  10 Pro Bowl slots in the past four years, a statistic that no other team in the  league can match.

The unexpected retirement of right tackle John Welbourn has  left a vacancy on the offensive line. Jordan Black, Kevin Sampson and Kyle  Turley will all battle for this starting position in hopes of collaborating  with the Fearless Foursome.

The offensive headliners do not stop there. Tight end Tony  Gonzalez is a leading man both on and off the field. He may appear as an  esteemed guest in many television spots and commercials, but his celebrity  status actually emanates from his performances on the football field. Gonzalez  received Pro Bowl honors for the seventh consecutive season in 2005, leading  the team with 78 receptions for 905 yards.

Jason Dunn will once again serve as the second tight end. Of  strapping strength and stature, he is one of the most powerful blocking tight  ends in the game and is sure to supplement the success of his lauded running  backs.

With two-time Pro Bowler Tony Richardson’s emigration to the  Minnesota Vikings, Ronnie Cruz will most likely inherit the fullback position  this season. The coaches were impressed with his industriousness and activeness  in mini-camp and expect him to make great strides in training camp.

The biggest enigma in the offense is who will solidify the  four wide receiver spots. Eddie Kennison and Dante Hall are the obvious  favorites for two of the leading roles, but with no off-season acquisitions at  this position, Edwards is hoping that guys like Craphonso Thorpe, Sammie Parker  and Jeris McIntyre will step up to the challenge.

Along with the institution of a fresh defensive attitude,  Edwards ensures that his offense will primarily focus on the running game. To  direct this task he named Mike Solari, former Chiefs’ offensive line coach, as  the new offensive coordinator. This is Solari’s first offensive coordinator  position, and some skeptics have doubts that he can live up to the offensive  accomplishments of the highly-venerated Al Saunders.

While  Edwards focuses on defense, he is expecting Solari to carry on the tradition of  the Chiefs’ unprecedented offense—lime lighting all the star talent and setting  league records like never before.

The Kansas City Chiefs come into the 2006 season with not  only a new look roster, but a new man in charge. Herm Edwards joins the Kansas  City Chiefs after several years coaching the Jets with hopes of turning around  a franchise that has fallen short in recent years.

Before head coaching, Edwards was most known for sculpting  the Tampa Bay defensive secondary to fit the  cover-2 defensive scheme. While with the Buccaneers, Tampa Bay’s  defense was always ranked in the top five and often was the Bucs only reason  for winning. Edwards can be thanked for how well the secondary panned out and  how well he prepared them for the Super Bowl they would appear in three years  after Edwards took the Jet job.

Edwards was fundamental in getting Jet teams pumped up with  his fiery attitude and his love for the game. Last season Edwards coached the  Jets to a 5-12 record. The poor results could be attributed to the loss of his  starting quarterback and an aging running back.

Kansas City has something  Edwards never experienced in New York,  consistency and a loving fan base. Edwards inherits a team that has a stud  running back for years to come in Larry Johnson, an aging but solid quarterback  in Trent Green, and a huge pool of young talent. Edwards just might be the  player’s coach that Kansas City  has been looking for.

This  is Edwards’ second stint with the Chiefs as he was a cornerback coach and scout  for the team from 1990-95. Edwards replaces Dick Vermeil who was Edwards’ head  coach in his playing days for the Philadelphia Eagles. With Edwards comes a new  hope for the Kansas City  fanatics that the Chiefs will come out of the gate with a fierier attitude this  season and a will to make the playoffs. Chief fans have been patient and  Edwards hopefully will bring the Chiefs to the next plateau of the NFL.

Hali is a native of Liberia, an African nation ravaged  by constant civil war during his childhood. He fled the country when he was  10-years-old, leaving behind his mother, whom he has not seen since. He does  remain in contact with her and hopes to reunite in the near future. His life  story is one of perseverance and success even when placed in the worst of  situations.

Hali should form a potent pass-rushing duo with talented  left defensive end Jared Allen for years to come for the Chiefs. His ability to  make plays in the backfield should also help in a division which is stacked  with a stable of very good running backs.

In the second round the Chiefs drafted hard-hitting safety  Bernard Pollard. He comes to training camp looking to provide the Chiefs with  an option at strong safety and as an ace on the special teams unit. In his  collegiate career Pollard blocked three punts and five field goals.

With Trent Green not getting any younger the Chiefs decided  to draft a quarterback in the third round, selecting Alabama’s Brodie Croyle. He holds Crimson  Tide career records for pass completions, yards passing and touchdown passes.  In camp he will compete with Damon Huard and newly acquired quarterback Casey  Printers for the second and third-string quarterback jobs.

With starting right tackle John Welbourn retiring the Chiefs  signed tackle Kyle Turley, who has been out of football for two years. He was  once considered one of the best tackles in football when he was with the New  Orleans Saints and St. Louis Rams.

Another new face is defensive  tackle James Reed, who should battle for playing time in the Chiefs rotation,  while providing the team with another experienced performer. He is entering his  sixth season in the NFL and has proven his durability by not missing any games.  Edwards is very familiar with Reed, having coached him the last five years with  the New York Jets.

The Chiefs also signed defensive  tackle Ron Edwards to compete for time in the line. Edwards, who has battled injuries  the last few years, comes to the Chiefs looking for a fresh start after  spending his first five seasons with the Buffalo Bills.

Overall this off-season through the draft and free agency the Chiefs  were able to add some good, young talent to compliment some of their seasoned  veterans on the defensive side of the ball. The Chiefs have shown their  dedication to building a strong defense by drafting a defensive player in the  first round for the second year in a row. Without making a splash in the free  agent market, the Chiefs were able to acquire some talented players who still  have something to prove in their NFL careers.

Improvement is a word that the Kansas City Chiefs defense  must add into their vocabulary. The 25th ranked defense in the NFL last season  must come together in the 2006 campaign if they have any hope of reaching the  playoffs.

The defensive line is anchored by Eric Hicks, a nine-year  veteran of the NFL and an always-steady threat from the left defensive end  position. Hicks finished the 2005 season with 44 tackles and four sacks and  must greatly improve on those numbers for the defense to succeed.

Ryan Sims and Lionel Dalton stack up the middle and will  play a vital role in run stuffing. Sims, a top 10 draft pick in 2002, has yet to show flashes of what NFL scouts saw him do as a senior at North Carolina. This may be his last year in the holding tank before Chief executives decide to give up on him. The Chiefs must hope this added pressure will force Sims to break out of his shell and be a force. Dalton plays at the other tackle position and uses his 315-pound frame to plug holes and force runs to the sidelines. He has been a steady contributor for the Chiefs who like his size more than his athleticism.

Opposite of Hicks is right end Jared Allen. Allen has been  pushed in recent seasons by the coaching staff to be a standout defensive  player and 2005 saw glimpses of that. Allen polished off a great season by  recording 11 sacks and 55 tackles. If Allen or Hicks slip up, Carlos Hall will  be waiting in the wings to gain back a starting job that he once held with the  Tennessee Titans.

Defensive end Tamba Hali, a first round pick out of Penn State,  will provide speed that the Chiefs have lacked on the outside. That will allow  Defensive Coordinator Gunther Cunningham to get creative with pass rush  schemes.

A young linebacker crew situates themselves behind the  defensive line, led by second year outside linebacker Derrick Johnson. After  holding out through most of last year’s training camp, the defensive stud from Texas looks to make a  huge impact early. Johnson recorded 95 tackles and two sacks in his rookie  campaign that was a good sign for what is coming.

Seasoned veteran Kendrell Bell plays on the right side and  brings leadership and Pro Bowl experience to a young group. Bell was acquired from the Pittsburgh  Steelers last season and put up descent numbers in his first stint with the  Chiefs. Bell  made 41 stops and 1.5 sacks while missing three games due to injury.

Kawika Mitchell started last season in the middle and put up  admirable, but not great, numbers. Look for the Chiefs to plug different  players in throughout camp to come up with the best athlete to aid Bell and Johnson. Keyaron  Fox will back-up both outside positions and may get substantial playing time  with the first unit. Kris Griffin and Rich Scanlon look to find back-up rolls  to fill out the depth chart.

Surtain and Ty Law. Surtain has been a Pro Bowl cover corner throughout his career and will always lineup against opponent's best receiver. Surtain is joined by fellow Pro Bowler Ty Law who signed just days before training camp opened. Law, a long time New England Patriot and New York Jet, has been considered to be a top five corner in the league. The 5'11" defensive back joins the Chiefs after playing under Chief Head Coach Herm Edwards last season in New York. Law brings much needed leadership and Super Bowl experience.

Denver to hopefully aid in the nickel and dime roles. Throughout Walls' career, there has been hope that he would turn into the ideal corner due to his immense size and athleticism but that has yet to pan out. Tutoring from Law and Surtain might be what Walls needs. If the Walls experiment falls through, there is not much left behind him. The Chiefs released long time corner Eric Warfield after last season and might be forced to rely on the undersized Benny Sapp. Sapp is in his third year with the Chiefs and ideally would fill the nickel back or dime position.

At safety the fort is held down by veterans Sammy Knight and  Greg Wesley. Neither looks to lose their starting jobs as competition is weak.  The Chiefs hope that rookie Bernard Pollard from Purdue can come in and make a  push for the job but most likely his job will end up being on special teams.

The Chiefs will be forced to rely on veterans being consistent and youngsters stepping up their level of play. With an improved defense, the Chiefs might be able to make a run at the playoffs and maybe even go deep.

The Kansas City Chiefs Summer Training Camp is made possible  each year by many hundreds of people. However, some go rather unnoticed, such  as corporate sponsors, who provide much needed goods and services, and back the  camp financially.

Some of the services provided by the businesses in, and  around River Falls include phone services,  transportation around town, ice for practices, refreshments for coaches’  meetings, and cash donations, among others.

Jeffrey Schwab of Midwest Wireless in River  Falls said that the Chiefs, “bring a  lot of ties into Wisconsin.”  The Wisconsin marketing manager said his  company is involved in the summer training camp because of the abundance of  support it brings for the community. Midwest Wireless has been a camp sponsor  for six years. They provide wireless phones for the coaching staff and owners,  and this year, will be providing high-speed wireless internet at the field. “We  enjoy it and have a great time when they’re (Chiefs) up here,” Schwab stated.

Bob Moody Jr., agrees, “You meet lots of great people.” His  business, Moody’s Chevrolet, has also been a camp sponsor since the camp began  in 1991. With the large quantity of people that come each year to visit the  training camp comes a large quantity of business for local businesses.

At the Kansas  City Chiefs’ School   of Football it is  definitely time for a change. Herm Edwards recently took over as the new  superintendent and was determined to find the most knowledgeable teachers and  distinguished mentors for his students. Resumes were received, reviewed and  interviews were conducted. Educators were selected based on their credentials  and their willingness to coalesce with Edwards’ lesson plans.

Michael Ketchum-- With the constant upgrade and  enhancement of technology and computers, the Chiefs need an intellect to  utilize all these state-of-the-art operating systems to track opponents,  calculate statistical tendencies and to fashion efficient diagrams for the  offensive playbook. Michael Ketchum, a first-year NFL coach, assumes this  crucial role for the Chiefs this season as the offensive assistant/quality  control manager. Previous experience with Iowa,  Vanderbilt and Cumberland  adeptly primed Ketchum for this specialized mission.

Offensive Staff Returnees-- Anchoring the offense with their  knowledge of the Chiefs’ systems and personnel are returning wide receiver  coach Charlie Joiner, running back trainer James Saxon and quarterback mentor  Terry Shea.

Defensive Staff Returnees-- To function properly, Edwards’  invigorating defensive disposition mandates a balance of time-honored coaching,  fire and fresh blood. Thus, Gunther  Cunningham will remain as the defensive coordinator and Darvin Wallis will  continue as the defensive assistant/quality control coach, but otherwise a new  batch of erudite coaches have been instituted to help augment the team’s  defensive drive and attitude.

David Gibbs-- Defensive back coach David Gibbs  enters his fifth season as a NFL coach and is well-prepared to revive the  defensive component of Chiefs’ football. Last season he served as Auburn’s defensive  coordinator/secondary coach, but is no foreigner to the AFC West. A former  Denver Broncos defensive backs coach for four seasons, Gibbs is well aware of  the competitiveness and rivalry between teams in the division. Before embarking  on his NFL coaching journey, he was integral to the defensive metamorphosis at  the University of   Minnesota, becoming the  youngest defensive coordinator in NCAA DI-A. The Gophers were ranked last in  defense in the Big Ten before Gibbs revamped the system, helping the Gophers  finish fourth.

Mike Priefer-- Another novel accrual for the Chiefs’  staff is special teams coach Mike Priefer. A Naval Academy  graduate and helicopter pilot, Priefer knows what it takes to thrive on  pressure and realizes the importance of quick decision-making-- especially in  producing an efficacious special teams force.

The past three  seasons he served as the assistant special teams coach with the N.Y. Giants and  then held the same position for Jacksonville  in 2002. Beforehand, he coached the defensive tackles and special teams at  Northern Illinois, the inside linebackers and special teams at Virginia  Military Institute and the tackles, tight ends, and special teams at Youngstown  State.

Edwards was named the team's 10th head coach on Jan. 9. "We selected Herm Edwards because he is without question one of the most qualified head football coaches in the NFL today," Chiefs President Carl Peterson commented. "Herm knows what the National Football League is all about. He coaches all aspects of the game and he coaches them well. He is a man of integrity, family and great passion for the game of football."

The popular Punt, Pass & Kick competition for boys and girls age 8-13 will be on Saturday, July 29. Registration is free, and on site will start at 11 a.m. with competition starting at noon. The event is sponsored by FedEx Ground and FedEx Home Delivery. Everyone who participates receives a ribbon and the top three place winners in each category receives a trophy. Edwards will present the trophies to the winners after the Family Fun Night practice on Aug. 5. To register on-line go to: www.uwrf.edu/chiefs/ppkform.htm .

Players and coaches are offered four meals on most days: breakfast, lunch, dinner, and an evening snack. Each meal consists of a wide array of choices. There are many standing offerings for each meal in salad and sandwich bars. In addition, each meal offers a hot food serving line with a variety of choices.

Servings are unlimited. The Chiefs estimate that the average player, particularly linemen, burn 3,500 calories per day in camp. For most players, the meals are a particularly welcome relief during the regimen of camp. The day starts early with breakfast, specialty meetings, practice, weight training, lunch, a brief rest period, specialty meetings, afternoon practice, dinner, specialty meetings, team meeting, a brief release time on River Falls (Bo's N Mine is a favorite gathering place), followed by a snack and 11 p.m. curfew. Coaches often will continue late into the night reviewing the day's video and preparing for the next day's practice. Snacks are a staple for those meetings, too.

For Chiefs fans who are seeking some memorabilia of previous summer camps at UW-River Falls, click on the 15th Anniversary Book link to the right to see some sample pages and to learn how to order your copy. With features on top players, coaches and over 100 photos of camp dating to1991, it's a great collector's item.

A highlight of training camp was the Knowles Building addition ribbon-cutting ceremony was held on Monday, Aug. 1, with the Chiefs signing a contract to return to River Falls in 2006. Read all about it here.

Everyone who participates receives a ribbon and the top three place winners in each category receives a trophy. Chiefs Coach Dick Vermeil will present the trophies to the winners after the Family Fun Night practice on Aug. 6.

This family favorite  will be held on Aug. 6. The Chiefs practice under the lights, and food, music and games will be available, as well as photo and autograph opportunities with players and coaches. A new addition to the evening will be the Chiefs Experience. Join in some interactive games that will challenge everyone's football skills. A speed and obstacle course, a football throw and a field goal kicking station will be part of the fun. The Experience is open to everyone. The Indianhead Sport Parachute Club kicks off the festivities, and a fireworks display caps off the fun. Admission is $6 for adults and free to those under 18.

When the gates opened fans had a chance to participate in the Chiefs Experience. An obstacle course and precision course, as well as field goal chip shot and catching stations were part of the fun. Participants received a report card rating their performance.

"We are so pleased to have hosted the Kansas City Chiefs for the last 15 years. I would like to thank the Chiefs for being such wonderful guests. The entire organization has been wonderful to work with. We look forward to another 15 years and another successful season," said Halada.

Vermeil wrapped things up before the autograph session started. "I'd like to say thank you to the University of Wisconsin-River Falls for doing a fine job of hosting us and doing everything they've done to make the facilities better for us and giving us no excuses for practicing poorly. Everything here is first class and we appreciate it very much. The team you'll watch tonight is a little banged and bruised, a little tired and sore, and not the team you'll see on Sept. 11. But it's the best football team that I've been with since I've been here, and it's going to be a real good football team."

When Vermeil finished, the players and coaches approached the south fence and signed autographs for the next half hour for eager fans, both young and old. The Chiefs then headed to the main field and practiced until about 9 p.m.

Tim Rick, his wife Rebecca and his brother David were the first in line for Family Fun Night. They came from Coon Rapids, Minn., because Rebecca  "has a thing for Dante Hall " and she wanted to get his autograph. This is the second year that Rebecca has come to camp and the 10th year for Rick and David. "It's fun because there are a lot of good kids and it's so family oriented," said Rebecca. "It really gives kids a chance to be a part of something cool."

Todd and Lisa Hammer are attending Summer Training Camp for the second time. Along with them are sons Brady and Ryen. Brady is a Priest Holmes fan and Ryen is a Tony Gonzalez fan. Since the family is from Peoria, Ill., they are also huge Boomer Grigsby fans. They followed the rookie all throughout his collegiate career. The family has been to six Chiefs games in their lifetime and predicts that the team will go 11-5 this season.

The fans were treated to passing and running drills by the Chiefs during practice. Running back Priest Holmes had a very good practice under the lights. In the first series of 11-on-11's, Holmes took a hand off from quarterback Trent Green and rambled 25-yards to the end zone. In 9-on-9's, Holmes took another hand off from Green to complete an outside run of 35-yards into the end zone. After each play the crowd went wild with excitement.

The Chiefs' revamped defense had another string practice. Vermeil stated that the "defense is trying really hard to get better," and they proved it tonight. The intensity of the defense was sky high, led by rookie Derrick Johnson. Johnson showed his presence on the field by smashing into fullback Tony Richardson during 1-on-1 drills, and the fans cheered enthusiastically.

As the Chiefs exited the field, after practice another group of athletes were entering. The winners of the Punt, Pass & Kick competition patiently waited for their turn to meet Vermeil and have a photograph taken with him. Their names were announced for everyone to hear and they received their trophies as fans cheered them on. Fed Ex Ground and Fed Ex Home Delivery are sponsors of the Punt, Pass & Kick competition. The night was capped off with fireworks display by Rolf Halverson Fireworks.

Family Fun Night is a special way for the Kansas City Chiefs to say "thank you" to all of their fans, the community, and the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, who help support them while they make their summer three-week home on campus.

Under the scorching sun, 140 participants graced Ramer Field  for the 2005 Punt, Pass and Kick competition. Through sweat and sunburn, the kids put on a spectacular athletic performance for the fans.  Kids ranging in age from 8-to-13 had an opportunity to showcase their football skills. Each received one punt, one pass and one kick.

Even though the sun was sizzling, a record amount of kids took part in the fun. Parents and friends cheers and applauded from the sidelines, all hoping that their kid had a ''hot" arm and leg for the competition.

When it was time for the awards ceremony, Chiefs'  Executive Vice President/Assistant General Manager Dennis Thum greeted and congratulated all the athletes: "This is a special day for the boys and girls participating. While Summer Training Camp  is our [Chiefs ] foundation, this event is your foundation for a bright future."

Trophies were awarded to the first, second and third place finishers of each age division, and all the participants received ribbons for their effort and hard work. Thum  concluded the presentation by emphasizing that, "Everyone here is a winner."

For the benefit of fans attending training camp, organized autograph sessions will take place for a minimum of 15 minutes after 12 morning practice sessions. A selected position group of players is scheduled to sign at each of these sessions. In addition, the entire team is scheduled to sign autographs on Family Fun Night (Aug. 6). This provides fans 13 different structured opportunities to obtain autographs at training camp.

There will be a designated autograph area at the practice fields. This is the ONLY area at camp where players are permitted to sign autographs. For the safety of our fans and players, no autographs are permitted in parking lots or any other area of campus other than the designated autograph area at the practice fields.

UW-RF Chancellor Betz commenced the program by stressing the importance of "teamwork as the essence to success." This 15-year journey has ultimately been built on a growing partnership between organizations: "As we celebrate the 15 th year of successful training camp, we're really celebrating a relationship," Betz said.

Former Camp Coordinator and Vice Chancellor of Administration and Finance Mary Halada emphasized how the state-of-the-art facilities blend both the University needs with the Kansas City Chiefs' needs to create a "win-win situation."

The effects of an NFL team on the UW-RF institution have benefited each party- especially the students. Student Senate President Nick Cluppert highlighted the many opportunities that the Chiefs organization bestows onto the students. Not only does the presence of the Chiefs generate many internships and jobs, it also "saves the college students money." This affiliation with the Chiefs also lures in many prospective students and shows the University's commitment to "improving our education."

After sharing an anecdote of a past Chiefs/Packers game at Lambeau Field, Doyle concluded the ceremony with underlining the myriad advantages of this bond. "This partnership between the Kansas City Chiefs and University of Wisconsin-River Falls has yielded benefits on the state's side, and I'm pleased to hear from the Chiefs of the benefits that you've received."

He continued on to show the state's appreciation of the team and reassure them that they are an integral part of the "Wisconsin family." Doyle enthusiastically commented on the new building addition for the Chiefs, but also accentuated the real reason the facility was constructed. "While the Kansas City Chiefs were a major impetus for this great project, the fact is that this is here for the students of the University of Wisconsin-River Falls."

The abilities and motives of UW-RF to produce this high-quality addition was summed up best by Betz. "I think I understand some of the ingredients of success of the Chiefs' organization: confidence, incredible experience, ability to motivate other people and always having your eye on the prize."

The beautiful $2.4 million facilities enticed the Kansas City Chiefs to return to River Falls for future Summer Training Camps. The new addition to the Robert P. Knowles Physical Education and Recreation Building provides 12,300 square feet of space for locker rooms, showers, restrooms, training rooms, workrooms and air-conditioning. "We're pleased to say that we have a well-designed and solidly constructed facility that was ready for the Chiefs to move into 10 days ago," said Halada.

The Chiefs organization and players are impressed by the promptness of the construction and the contemporary features that it provides. Linebacker Shawn Barber said, "If we compare these to our facilities back in Kansas City, we should almost move our team here."

The modern locker rooms come equipped with an overhead projection screen for watching film, a state-of-the-art stereo system, access to the internet, spacious lockers, new lavatories and showers, and even red and black carpeting. Many believe that this locker room is one of the best in the entire NFL.

A new training room was also added. The players are grateful for the added training tables and the seven water tubs. This helps the players utilize their rehabilitation and taping time efficiently. Quarterback Trent Green said, "These facilities provide us with an opportunity to get our bodies in better shape."

Although all of these new attributes are greatly appreciated, Chiefs wide receiver Eddie Kennison is partial to the much-needed air conditioning: "It's been a pleasure to come in from out on the field into an air-conditioned facility." The players used to have to stand in front of fans to cool down their bodies, but now are refreshed as soon as they enter the building.

This addition was funded through a through a special building enumeration project approved by the State Building Commission and passed by the Legislature in February/March 2004. The architect of the project was Ayers Associates of Eau Claire, while the contractor was Ross & Associates of River Falls.

Doyle, Betz, Peterson, Green, Barber, Kennison and Cluppert were all a part of the ribbon cutting ceremony. Public affairs interns Katlyn Kaiser and Jenna Campbell held the ribbon and were able to take a piece of it home with them.

Sample the Chiefs' cuisine in the team dining room of Rodli Commons, while learning about the team's 2004 prospectus from a Chiefs representative. Chef Angel Alcantar prepares all of the Chiefs meals and he will bring out the best for this event.

Olson and UWRF biology professor Clarke Garry will also discuss the types of insects that are found in local rivers and streams. "We will take the class to the stream and determine what insects are currently present and what flies would work to catch fish under current conditions." Garry will lead an in depth discussion on stream entomology. He will net insects currently living in the south fork of the Kinni to show participants what fish are feeding upon.

Photos from the previous day's camp will be uploaded, if available, before 10:00 a.m. CDT Monday through Friday while camp is in progress. Photos taken during the weekend will appear on the following Monday morning.

Family Fun Night is a special way for the Chiefs to say "thank you" to all their fans, the University of Wisconsin-River Falls and the River Falls community who help support them while they make their summer home on campus.

Fans will have an opportunity to get up close and personal with their favorite players. Take pictures of the team and the coaching staff and be sure to bring football cards, pennants, footballs, jerseys, t-shirts and other memorabilia for the players to sign.

Thum presented the trophies to the first, second and third place winners. The River Falls High School football team helped to measure each effort as the kids gave each punt, pass and kick a good NFL try. The boys and girls thoroughly enjoyed the event, and parents loved cheering their kids on from the sidelines. Right before the awards ceremony, the clouds darkened and a light rain fell for a brief five minutes. This didn't bother the kids, however. They still enjoyed receiving their ribbons and trophies. Everyone who participated in the event received a ribbon.

Eye-popping graphics lead the avid Chiefs fan though weekly game reports and the latest news and stats. Vote on the latest poll or follow your favorite players' public appearences  this site has everything.

This year's Senior Citizens Day will take place on Thursday, July 24. The event, which is free of charge, invites seniors to watch the Chiefs morning practice from 8:05 to 9:55 a.m. at the Ramer Field Sports Complex. Full accessible tours of the training facilities and gounds are available and meals may be purchased that include a souvenir cup. Merchandise will also be available to purchase at a discounted price. For more information or special needs contact Cindy Dipprey at 715/425-3771. The practice facilities are fully accessible.

Former River Falls Wildcat football Coach Bill Forester and members of the Wildcat football team were also on hand helping out with measurements or each punt, pass and kick. He told the young athletes that, "eight or nine of the players out there won an event just like this, and if you want to succeed you must work at it, just like in the classroom if you want to succeed there." This year's winner in the nine-year-old division, Augustine Pupungatoa, brought a smile to Vermeil's face. Vermeil said, "that's a handle" when handing Pupungatoa his award. Pupungatoa is a past winner of this event, winning last year's eight-year-old division title. Vermeil was also impressed with some of this year's winners and how far they traveled to attend camp. Taking second place in the eight-year-old division was Matthew Grounds from Jamestown, N.D. First pace winner in the 12-year-old division was Max Brandt from Waldport, Ore. After the awards ceremony Vermeil took a group photograph with all of this year's winners. Afterwards, Vermeil stated that, "you will have a great football team here in a couple of years," while sizing up some of the winners. Vermeil then took some time to sign autographs for this year's winners.

The Chiefs Club is a Kansas City based non-profit organization, dedicated to the fans of the Kansas City Chiefs. The focus is to keep fans informed of the current status of the chiefs. The Club allows opportunitiesfor the fans and players to interact.

The new musical based on the smash-hit movie unfolds live on the Davis Theatre stage July 31-Aug. 12 with several additional, new songs, dazzling production numbers and all the familiar characters from the film version. The film soundtrack was the best-selling album of 2006.

A wacky quintet of singer/musicians gather daily in her parlor, turn on the transmitter, and set hearts thumping and toes tapping with songs, homely chatter and plugs for a rejuvenating tonic that owes its kick to the still out back.

Season tickets can be exchanged should personal scheduling conflicts arise. exchanges are subject to availability and the original ticket must be exchanged 48 hours prior to the returned ticket's performance. After one free exchange a $1.00 service fee will be charged.

Since 1966, the SCVST has provided quality summer entertainment to thousands of theater goers in the community and region. With fare ranging from matchless Broadway musicals such as "My Fair Lady" and "Oliver!" to delightful Neil Simon comedies and popular dramas, the company strives to present the very best of live theatre in a five-week season in July and early August.

SCVST actors, directors, designers and technicians are working professionals, undergraduate and graduate students and community members chosen through rigorous auditions and interviews. Many past company members have gone on to rewarding careers in professional theatre, film, and television.

Falls. Extensive scene and costume shops, sophisticated computerized light and sound systems, a digital audio studio, well-equipped rehearsal rooms and a studio theatre complement the summer theatre's operations.

Handicapped Parking is available in all University lots and on the West side of the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building. There are also handicapped parking places on 4th Street by the Luther Memorial Church.

The University Preschool is a component of the College of Education & Professional Studies at the University of Wisconsin - River Falls. The preschool program is licensed by the state of Wisconsin and serves 4 and 5 year old children. The half-day schedule provides educational services for the child, the parent, the university, and the community.

In our classroom we provide the least restrictive environment that allows children with special needs to be educated with typically developing children. Our philosophy of "learning through play" enables us to meet the needs of children on an individual basis.

Through positive interactions with children of various environments, cultures, and abilities we often become more sensitive to the needs of others. We learn to accept individual differences at an early age.

Enrollment in the University Preschool shall be granted without discrimination in regard to sex, race, color or creed. Classroom size is limited to 21 and the average ratio of teachers to children is 1:6.

The core staff at The University Preschool includes a director/lead teacher with a master's degree in early childhood education. Our inclusive program employs a lead teacher who is dual certified and trained to provide education to children in regular and special education.

She holds a master's degree in education. A teacher's aide and student teachers are also important contributors to our program. Professional university faculty from various departments collaborate with our two lead teachers to enhance the services of our program.

Our preschool is a model program supported by the University, the River Falls School District, and the Department of Public Instruction as an innovative co-teaching classroom that provides services to preschool children in a least restrictive environment.

The purpose of the HPER Club is to promote health, physical education, recreation, and athletics on campus; foster positive relations between students and instructors in the Department of Health and Human Performance; involve HPER Club members in activities which will enhance the professionalism in their field.

Disorders. We were organized to provide a forum for sharing information and for forming friendships within the discipline. Annually, we host picnics, put on a Fall Festival in our clinic for clients and the university preschool students, collect food for local food shelves biannually, have in-house cohesive activities to provide camaraderie within the major and participate in Unity in the Community.

The new Walker D. Wyman Education Building is home to the College. Its heart is a large, open Educational Technology Center, surrounded by twelve glass-walled technology enhanced classrooms. With the resources from a PT3 Grant (Preparing Tomorrow’s Teachers to Use Technology), the college has incorporated best practices in the use of technology in its programs.

The Teacher Education programs are recognized for their emphasis on field based instruction, the creation and maintenance of partnerships with the PK-12 schools, and the use of technology. These programs are accredited by the National Council for the Accreditation of Teacher Education (NCATE). The College hosts a Human Development Center that contains a Speech, Language and Hearing Clinic and is home to the Western Wisconsin Partnership, which provides professional development for child welfare workers.

Social Work and the Counseling and School Psychology programs are highly respected as a source of quality professionals in the Metro Area. The College is home to 18 intercollegiate varsity athletic teams that compete in the Wisconsin Intercollegiate Athletic Conference, one of the top NCAA Division -III Conferences in the country. The College reaches out to the community by assisting local schools with hearing screenings and sponsoring events such as the University Health Fair, the Turkey Trot 5K run/walk, and Dance Theatre performances. The college is home to the University Preschool, the Child Care Center and the Upward Bound Program. All departments and programs have student organizations.We value our relationships with our students, staff, alumni and community members. I encourage you to visit our campus in person.

We believe in and value diversity: socioeconomic, cultural and ethnic. We believe that scholarship, intellectual pursuits and education provide the individual and society the means for growth and self-fulfillment.

Section 207 of Title II of the Higher Education Act mandates that the Department of Education collect data on state assessments, other requirements, and standards for teacher certification and licensure, as well as data on the performance of teacher preparation programs.

The undergraduate program in the Department of Communicative Disorders is designed to prepare students for graduate study in the field of speech-language pathology or audiology. The undergraduate curriculum includes coursework in (1) the principles of biological sciences, physical sciences, mathematics and social behavioral sciences, (2) basic human communication processes, and (3) the nature of speech, language, swallowing, and hearing disorders. Students may enroll in either the College of Education and Professional Studies or the College of Arts and Sciences.

As an alumni you gain many benefits by staying in touch with the University and the CSIS department. In addition to professional and social activities, you can participate in life-long learning programs and build networks to advance your career. Through involvement in our programs and events, you will also have the opportunity to meet, recruit, or mentor our new graduates and current students.

This option has a technical and theoretical emphasis providing students with a comprehensive understanding of software engineering, computing techniques and the underlying theories. Graduates will develop skills relevant to the analysis, design and implementation of sophisticated software/hardware systems and communication networks.

The analysis and design of information systems with an emphasis on managing, storing, transmitting and providing ready access to information is the key to the CIS option. Graduates will develop skills relevant to the analysis, design and implementation of sophisticated information systems.

The Computer Science / Information Systems internship program is designed to help students gain practical work experience in computer-related positions (between 2-6 months) . It's an excellent way for our students to acquire practical work experience, job-hunting and interviewing skills,  and professional communication skills. It will also help the students fatten their resumes, build industry contacts, and earn some money. Internships are a very critical part of our students' education and is designed to help them earn academic credit while working in a professional setting.

The goal of the internship program is to help you apply the skills you have learned at the university in an industrial setting. The internship will also provide you the opportunity to learn more about the local industry. You will learn about the corporate world and its culture, gain experience with variety of software products and their applications and have the opportunity to work with experts in your filed. The internship program is designed to maximize your learning and help you gain a practical view of the corporate world. Your progress will be monitored by the sponsoring company and  by a faculty member. As an intern, you will be representing UWRF and the Computer Science/Information Systems department in a professional and courteous manner. You will apply your skills and knowledge to develop new abilities and you will participate in and contribute to the company's efforts.

Registering for the course - you must sign for at least 3 credits. A maximum of 12 credits may be taken but only 3 credits apply to the major/minor; the remaining credits will be counted as general electives.

Supervision - The Employer will provide the Intern with supervision appropriate for any skilled, but inexperienced worker.Site Visit - Approximately two-thirds of the way through the student's employment, the Employer will accept a visit from the Director. The purpose of this visit is to verify the Intern's employment status, observe the progress of the Intern's work and interview the Intern's Supervisor.

Site Visit - Approximately two-thirds of the way through the student's employment, the Employer will accept a visit from the Director. The purpose of this visit is to verify the Intern's employment status, observe the progress of the Intern's work and interview the Intern's Supervisor.

Release of Supporting Materials - The Employer will coordinate with the Intern and Director the release of materials that document the Intern's work. These materials typically include documents such as functional specifications, design documents, program listings, test plans, etc. The Employer may impose a variety of constraints on these materials due to their propriety nature or for security reasons.

Salary - Internships should be a paid work experience. Salaries should be fair, competitive and commensurate with wages paid full-time employees for similar assignments with consideration for training and experience. Additional benefits are also determined by the employer.

The Department is responsible for the actions or materials listed below. The Department will provide a Director of Interns, who will be responsible for acting on behalf of the department in all items listed below.

Federal law allows the UW System to request and use your social security number. While you are not legally required to provide your social security number on this form, you are strongly encouraged to do so. You will be required to provide your social security number when you apply for financial aid or the new educational tax benefits.

If you intend to apply for financial aid, the social security number is required. As applied to financial aid, it may be used for a number of purposes, including verification of identity of the borrower or recipient and as an account number throughout the life of a loan; determination of program eligibility; certification of enrollment and student status; determination of eligibility for deferment, cancellation or repayment by third parties; determination of eligibility for disability or death claims; and, in case of delinquent or defaulted loans, for tracing the borrower and collecting.

Offers recent statistics of college consumption, rape, illicit drugs & eating disorders.  Links to other resources. Programs & events page. Information on opportunities for student leadership. Also offers affiliation information.

House Foundation website - non-profit substance abuse treatment & prevention agency. Statistics, tips, assessments, resources regarding alcohol. Information on the relationship between alcohol & sex.  Test your knowledge of alcohol with an interactive quiz.

Counseling or therapy is a process by which people who are wrestling with some aspects of their lives enter into a working relationship with a trained professional to gain greater insight into themselves and their situation, and to develop more effective, healthy ways of responding to life experiences.

Counseling or therapy is the process by which the student and the professional discuss that difficulty so the student can mobilize his/her own resources to resolve it. The Counselor will be able to tell you, after a period of initial assessment, how the sessions should be structured and how long they will last.

Services takes every reasonable precaution to protect your privacy. The identity of those using our services, along with personally identifiable disclosures made in the course of the counseling relationship, will be regarded as confidential.

Confidential information will not be shared with parties outside the Counseling Services staff without your express, written consent, unless there is a clear and imminent danger to an individual or to society. Records of visits to Counseling Services are not part of a student's academic records.

If you feel that the sessions are not helpful, the first thing to do is to discuss this with the personal counselor. He/she will openly work with you to examine your concerns. You may request a consultation with another counselor within Counseling Services.

Couseling Services provides confidential consultations to parents on how to help a student in distress, how to refer a student to counseling, and how to locate appropriate treatment or mental health care for your student; as well as other issues that come up in the course of being a concerned parent.

You may access Counseling Services by contacting the office at (715) 425-3884, and ask to speak with a counselor regarding your particular concerns. Please be aware that Counseling Services is prevented by law from sharing (even with a concerned parent) any information about a student's contact with Counseling Services without a student's permission.

Our staff recognizes that this may be difficult in many situations; you are welcome to share your own concerns with a counselor, and ask the counselor any question you may have about the nature and limits of confidentiality, or the services we might provide for your student.

Information about mental health and human development can be found in the online resources section of this site, as well as in our self-help library of brochures, located in the waiting area of Counseling Services.

As a faculty or staff member interacting daily with students, you may be in a position to recognize behaviors that characterize an emotionally troubled student. Your ability to identify signs of emotional distress and your willingness to acknowledge your concerns directly with the student can be a pivotal factor in problem resolution.

If you think that a referral for counseling is appropriate, you can be most helpful by clearly and concisely telling the student why you think counseling is needed. You may want to inform the student that all services provided by UWRF Counseling Services are free to registered students. Counseling is provided Monday through Friday from 8:00 AM to 4:30 PM. All discussions are confidential except when the student presents a danger to self, others, or when certain kinds of abuse are involved.

If no counselor is immediately available, the program assistant will take your name and someone will return your call as soon as possible. When in doubt or simply to discuss general concerns about a student, call Blake Fry, Dean for Student Development and Campus Diversity at his office (715) 425-3711. The Dean for Student Development and Campus Diversity Office will work with you to quickly provide assistance to the student.

Counselors are under ethical and legal obligations not to release confidential information. They cannot tell faculty or staff members when a student is receiving counseling services. Counselors may listen to information you want to share with them about a student, but may only provide you with information about him or her with the student's written permission. The only exception is when the student presents a danger to self or others.

If you refer a student to a UWRF personal counselor, you will be notified that the student did attend an initial appointment only if the student gives written permission to do so. If you would like more information about a student's contact with Counseling Services, you can directly ask the student. The student can then make a decision about how much to reveal to you.

It is best to call in advance for appointments. Having the student make the call, perhaps from your office, increases the likelihood that he or she will follow through on their appointment. However, there may be times, especially if the student is in crisis, when it may be better for you to call for the appointment in the presence of the student. Just identify yourself as a faculty or staff member and indicate the urgency of the need. We will schedule the student to meet with a counselor as quickly as possible. Emergency appointments are arranged within the day; usually within the hour. Non-emergency appointments are usually scheduled within a week.

Counseling is a process whereby an individual is as aided in discovering, appreciating and actualizing their unique selves in their relations with others and with the environment in which they live. Counseling is founded on the assumption of the worth, dignity and developmental potential of all individuals. It is further based on the proposition that people can grow and change and that this growth takes place through facilitative experiences, and that individuals are basically responsible for themselves and their behavior. The counseling process of understanding, accepting, and adapting may be facilitated by a variety of methods and strategies including individual and group counseling, advocacy, and systems change. Counseling is conducted by a personally and professionally competent counselor. The objectives that follow serve as the foundation for our counselor education program.

It is the responsibility of the applicant to ensure a complete file by the two deadlines: February 1st of November 1st. Students should check the status of their application files by contacting the Graduate Studies Office prior to November 1st or February 1st. Only completed files will be considered for admission.

A. You must complete 600 hours of practicum in the schools during the regular times that K-12 schools are in session. Evening and summer practicum hours are not possible. Hence, you cannot expect to work full time and complete practicum during a single semester. You may work part-time and complete your practicum hours over as many as three semesters. Consult your advisor for details.

Student Documented Evidence of Meeting all Standards for School Counseling Following is a list of standards which must be met to become a school counselor. You will be expected to document evidence of meeting these standards upon graduation.

All scholarship deadlines are set for early in the spring of each year (2/3/06). Please refer to the scholarship information web page at http://www.uwrf.edu/financial-assistance/scholarships/scholarships.htm for the name, description and application process for each scholarship. Applications are available on-line (see above link) or from the Office of Financial Assistance at 315 North Hall. Late applications will not be accepted; there are no exceptions.

Awarded to a student enrolled at UW-RF in a graduate program for Counseling or School Psychology. The student must have a cumulative GPA of 3.0 or higher and exhibit leadership qualities through involvement in professional or other organizations.

Students are encouraged to engage in reflective practice utilizing a problem-solving approach from a child advocacy perspective, to engage in preventive as well as remedial practices, and to work with a broad cross-section of the student population, including regular education students.

Our program is open to any and all applicants, but we are particularly appealing to working adults. Although work reduction, sabbaticals, or leaves of absence are recommended during the practicum and internship years (3 rd & 4 th years), many current students work part-time or even full time during the first two years of the program, in addition to their completion of course work. How can this be done? First, virtually all of our courses are offered in the evenings, most starting at 4:00 or 4:30. Additionally, the standard sequence of courses at River Falls was designed to be four years in length, as opposed to the more traditional three-year time line that most specialist level school psychology programs utilize. While the evening based courses and the four years of training are not for everyone, many working adults find the pace to be a critical part of their success, allowing them to maintain employment and/or time for other obligations as needed.

The training program at UW-RF is organized in a sequential manner. During their first year in the program, students typically take introductory course in several areas. These areas include Introduction to School Psychology, Introduction to Guidance and Counseling, and Introduction to Learning Disability. Students also take support courses that are designed to provide a foundation in education and issues such as special populations. Support courses include The Exceptional Child, and courses in elementary or secondary education curriculum.

In their second year in the program, students are expected to take core courses in School Psychology. Core course primarily involve assessment and intervention courses, where students are trained to administer tests of intelligence, achievement, motor skills, and other domains, to elementary, high school age, and preschool age children. Students are also expected to learn to develop interventions for various learning and behavioral problems.

The requirements for the third year include a twenty (20) hour per week practicum in a school setting. The practicum is a 600 hour supervised experience for an entire school year. In addition to their practicum responsibilities, students complete their final courses. During the fall of their third year, or during the spring of the third year, students take the national exam in school psychology. The national exam in school psychology is administered by the National Testing Service (NTS). A score of 660 on the national exam is necessary for the students to complete their training requirements at UWRF.

Students complete their Internship in School Psychology in their fourth year. Internship can be completed in conjunction with a student's first year of employment as a school psychologist. Completion of an internship year, in addition to successfully passing the national exam in school psychology, allows a student to become eligible for national certification as school psychologist. Completion of Internship and a passing score on the national exam are also necessary for students to receive the Education Specialist degree (Ed.S.).

I have a provisional license as a school psychologist, but I was trained in counseling or clinical psychology. If I already have an advanced degree and training in counseling or clinical psychology, can I receive a degree from UWRF after submitting my transcripts to the university?

Even though a student may have an advanced degree in clinical or counseling psychology, it is still difficult to complete the program in less than three years. Many students lack specific education curriculum courses, which are taught in the first year. Other students require specific courses in assessment, offered in the second year. The practicum in school psychology is required by all students and can not be waived. The practicum in school psychology occurs in the student's third year. A student with an advanced degree may have credits to transfer into the program, but the time to completion of the program can not be shortened.

Only a graduate course can be submitted for transfer credits, and the transfer course is accepted only if it matches a UWRF School Psychology course, Consult with your advisor or program director about transfer credits.

I have experience working with special populations, such as working with children with an emotional or behavioral disorder. Can I get credit for life experience and waive the expectations of a class in this area?

The School Psychology Program at UWRF does not give credit for work or life experience to fulfill a class requirement. Class requirements can only be waived through credits documented on a transcript.

Typically, a full-time course load is eight credits. If you are seeking financial aid, consult with your loan provider for credit expectations. It may be necessary to carry eight credits per semester. Students should plan on an average of eight credits per semester to complete the program in four years.  A typical graduate level course at UWRF is three credits.

In addition to the time that a student spends in class, students should assume that for every credit of a graduate course, three hours of work outside of class is typical each week. For example, for a three credit graduate course, the student can expect to spend nine hours outside of class performing tasks to meet the course expectations. The time spent outside of class involves reading course materials, conducting research, producing assignments, and with the assessment and intervention courses, evaluating children or interviewing parents.

Classes meet Monday through Thursday from September through May. Most graduate level classes will begin at 4:00 p.m. or later. Students in the School Psychology training program can expect to take classes either two or three evenings per week. A limited number of courses are offered during the summer. Summer courses are currently scheduled early morning through mid-day. Students should plan to take courses over two summers to complete their program.

The practicum students are placed in cooperating school districts in western Wisconsin, and districts in the twin cities areas of St. Paul and Minneapolis. Students are expected to complete 600 hours of field based work. This is equivalent to 20 hours per week in a school setting for an entire school year. Students are expected to make practicum a priority. If necessary, students may need to plan for a sabbatical from work in order to complete their field experience and final year of course-work.

The practicum experience can not be completed during the summer. Registration for practicum only occurs during fall and spring semester, as students are expected to attend and participate in individual university supervision, and group supervision. These aspects of training are not available during the summer and are an important part of the practicum experience. Students are placed in a school setting for an academic year from fall through spring, averaging 20 hours per week. There, it is hoped that students will provide a variety of direct services to children, teachers, parents, and administrators.

The course is designed for sociology majors or minors and anthropology minors who wish to pursue an anthropological topic of special interest. Students must complete an application and receive departmental approval before registering.

This course introduces students to the diversity of North American society and to the ways in which diversity is socially and culturally constructed and maintained. The course offers components on Native Americans, African-Americans, Hispanic-Americans, Asian-Americans, religious minorities, and women, exploring the history and diversity within each group and the relations among them.

This course covers the position of children and adolescents across the world, contrasting various societies in industrial and developing regions, including indigenous populations. Major topics covered are children and poverty, street children, child mortality rates, the health and disease status of children and adolescents, children in war, refugee camps, sex trade, child and adolescent pregnancy, and the education, and well-being of children. An analysis of the cultural and social forces which influence children will be emphasized, including cultural definitions of children's rights. Co-listed as ANTH 211. Prerequisite SOCI 100 or ANTH 100 or GEOG 120.

The course provides an analysis of sport and leisure in the United States and from the standpoint of its socioeconomic impact and relevance, contemporary social organization, social psychological processes, and issues such as violence, inequality, sports and education, and social values. Prerequisites: SOCI 100, PSYC 101, or consent of instructor.

This course examines the relationships within and among the six crucial factors of social ecology: population, social organization, human values, environment, resources, and technology. An historical analysis of these relationships is followed by a holistic study of present conditions and the roles of humans in their communities and societies both now and in the future. Questions of an ethical and policy nature are raised regarding the above factors and the human condition. Prerequisite: SOCI 100 or ANTH 100 or ESM105.

This course analyzes the various social, cultural, and social-psychological processes which are related to gender role identity and gender differentiated behavior. The course also explores the relationships between gender stratification and the options and life-chances of men and women in the United States and across the world. Prerequisites: SOCI 100 or ANTH 100. Co-listed as WMST 326.

Emphasis is placed on organizational processes such as differentiation, integration and the allocation of power within modern bureaucracy. Consideration is also given to the work attitudes of job satisfaction and organizational commitment as well as the changing nature of occupations in modern industrial society.

The course explores the relationships between lifestyle, health, and disease, emphasizing the importance of culture and social structure. Global and national social epidemiology (the study of disease and health in various populations), re-emergent and emergent infectious disease problems such as tuberculosis, influenza, cholera, and bovine spongiform encephalopathy, ebola, and HIV, respectively; and indigenous healing, and health care delivery systems are a major focus of this course. Co-listed as ANTH 338. Prerequisite: SOCI 100 or ANTH 100.

The study of major changes in rural life especially the changing demographic profiles in the United States and the developing world. Analysis of the impact of change on the family and other social institutions and sources of cohesion and conflict in the rural community. Rural development intervention will be studied. Prerequisite: SOCI 100 or ANTH 100.

The course is designed for majors and minors in sociology or criminal justice who desire some special experience and background relating to sociology or criminal justice. Students must complete an application and receive departmental approval before registering. Students are limited to 2 credits per semester and a total of 4 credits. Prerequisites: 18 credits of sociology/ criminal justice and major in sociology or minor in sociology or criminal justice.

This course is an examination of the social determinants of individual behavior with emphasis on theories of socialization and social learning, processes of social influence, interpersonal attraction, aggression, conformity, attitude and behavior change, and altruism. A variety of theoretical perspectives are presented for evaluation. Prerequisites: SOCI 200 or PSYC 101, 15 total credits of sociology or psychology or consent of instructor, and junior/senior standing.

This course examines the historical and present-day relationships within and among six crucial factors of social ecology: population, social organization, human values, environment, resources, and technology. Questions of an ethical and policy nature are raised regarding the above factors and the human condition.

This course examines the central concepts, history, theoretical arguments and contemporary determinants of social inequality in the United States and the world, seeking to answer the question, "who gets what, and why?"

Three options exist for students who select the Crop and Soil Science major: 1) Crop Science, 2) Soil Science, and 3) Sustainable Agriculture. The Crop Science option is designed for students who wish to focus their studies on plants and the use of plants for food, feed and fiber. Students learn about crop management, biotechnology, crop physiology, crop quality, as well as genetics and plant breeding. The Soil Science option is designed for those whose interests include the basic components and properties of soils, soil conservation, soil fertility, soil hydrology, and the management of soils to produce crops in a sustainable way. The Sustainable Agriculture option is the study of economically viable production systems that promote land productivity, energy efficiency, environmental stewardship, and rural community viability.

New, first-year students who are candidates for the bachelor's degree and who have matriculated after September 1, 2005, must fulfill the new General Education program regulations as set forth in the Addendum to the Undergraduate Catalog.

Students must complete a three-credit course related to American Cultural Diversity (the University "D" requirement), as well as a three-credit course related to Global Perspectives (the University "G" requirement).

"I can say that my experiences and training were remarkable. From traveling with the Crops and Soils Club to the hands on training in the field from soil judging and courses, I loved every moment of it and feel it was the best possible training I could have received."

Mr. Marius Andahazy is currently in his ninth year of teaching both sessions of Ballet classes at UW-RF. Mr. Andahazy has over 20 years of professional experience in Classical Ballet and is the Artistic Director of the Andahazy Ballet Company of St. Paul, Minnesota. Among his many experiences, Marius was a student with the School of American Ballet and the American Ballet Theatre of New York as well as the Bolshoi Ballet. He also toured Scandinavia and Europe as a member of the Royal Swedish Ballet, was appointed official U.S. representative of the St. Petersburg Ballet Master Classes and has been a guest lecturer and performer national and internationally. The list for the master teacher, dancer, choreographer and lecturer goes on and on.

Dance. Torrion is also assistant coach for the UW-RF Track Team. Through the years, he has studied jazz and tap but his heart has always been in street dancing, the urban dances of break dancing and the evolution of "Hip-Hop."

Torrion is a native of Phoenix, Arizona who eventually migrated to Minnesota where he taught at Metcalf Junior High School. It was at Metcalf that he met four talented musical artists and formed the group "Nubian Men." This group performs throughout Minnesota and Wisconsin. He writes, directs and choreographs for Black History Month programs in Minnesota. Torrion is the advisor for the UW-RF Dance Team, 2003 conference champions.

Student choreographers Nakati Kakosso and Ruby Lanoux will feature styles ranging from African dance to contemporary lyrical styles. Dance Theatre will also feature Lanoux in a solo piece. Mari Kline will conclude the concert with a large group piece performed by the 32 members of Dance Theatre.

An introductory course in the theory and practice of classical ballet with emphasis of alignment, strength coordination and flexibility. Class will include barre work, center work and across the floor combinations.

An intermediate level study of the theory and practice of ballet with an emphasis on increased strength, coordination and flexibility. Allegro and adagio work will be an integral part of each class. Prerequisite: Danc 224 or consent of instructor. May be repeated for a total of three credits.

This course provides an opportunity for in-depth study of contemporary issues, programs or practices in dance and dance education. Depending upon the specific topic of study, the content of the course may focus on research findings, theoretical advances, practical applications, and theory as they affect dance as an art form or dance education with in the schools. Because of its focus on contemporary issues the course may be appropriate for arts/dance education students in training and experienced teachers who desire in-depth training in a specific area.

This course will explore other world and cultures through dance. This course will explore traditional and social dance from various cultures; i.e., Africa, Caribbean, American Indian, Eastern Indian, European and Pacific Islands. The course will provide participants with experiences in dance of these cultures, opportunities to view traditional dances within their cultural context and discussions of the cultural characteristics inherent in those dance forms. The course will also explore teaching methodologies for integration of cultural dance forms into existing curricular material and an overview of the national standards for Dance Education. No previous dance experience required.

UW-RF Dance Theatre enjoys hearing from dance theatre alumni. Please let us know what you have been up to! If you choose to make your email address and/or message public, it will be posted on the Alumni page.

Please fill in the following information. In order to prevent non-alumni (like spammers) from joining the list, we ask for some information in addition to your email address. After we have verified you should receive an email welcoming you to the list.

I was convinced to join during dance comp class movie night at the Theta Chi house. I'm really glad to have the opportunity to be here and share the beauty of dance with so many others who share my passion.

Responsible for total processing of cheese and ice cream products to meet campus food service needs, quality control of products, storage and delivery of products, coordination and training of student workers, plant and equipment maintenance, retail sales and customer service, prepare quarterly and annual reports. Assist in classroom demonstrations, teaching responsibilities in dairy manufacturing and plant management, provide tours and demonstrations to the general public, advising of students and clubs are also part of the dairy plant manager's responsibilities.

Resposible for total precessing of meat products to meet the needs of educational demands, campus food service needs, quality control of products, storage and delivery, coordination and training of employees, plant and equipment maintenance, retail sales, financial records and reporting.

Errors may be the result of changes to this Web site in April 2006 to better serve our current and prospective students, community and other lifelong learners. We are sorry for any inconvenience that this may cause you.

Mission Statement: We strive to offer our volunteers meaningful opportunities to assist and/or work with youth. Through our on-going support (training and supervision) we hope the experience not only touches hearts, but provides an opportunity to grow professionally and personally.

Mission Statement: Volunteers provide support to those over the age of 60 for the purpose of helping them remain living in the community. Services provided include transportation to and from medical appointments and errands, caring companionship, chore service such as light housekeeping, meal preparation or home delivery of meals, snowshoveling or lawn mowing, laundry, and respite care.

Information on Position: People who are sensitive to the aging, able to befriend a senior and listen, respect confidentiality, promote dignity and self-esteem and have some time. Tasks vary depending on the need of the senior.

Volunteer Descriptions: Assisting with recreational activities, assisting on outings, visiting residents one-on-one, assisting residents with independent activities, serving as a mealtime host/hostess, clerical assistance, outdoor garden care, and indoor bird aviary care.

Distance From Campus: Weekly meetings at Ezekiel Lutheran Church, 2 blocks from campus Volunteer Descriptions: Civic projects in parks, highway clean-up, youth recreation and reading programs, fund-raising events, working for polio eradication and other global health and peace efforts.

Although most LARGE organizations now accept online applications and resumes on their web sites, some may ask you to mail a hardcopy version of your resume. Chances are growing that a human resources individual from a large organization who receives your resume in hardcopy will not preview your resume - rather, they may use an "Electronic Tracking System" to view multiple resumes and download those resumes into a database where they may search for qualified candidates using keywords. Organizations who use such tracking systems will request that you send them a "scannable resume" when you apply.

A scannable resume is specially FORMATTED and has CONTENT designed to maximize a computer's or  scanner's ability to interpret your resume so that an employer may easily find your resume when they search for candidate resumes using keywords.

Why May I Need A Scannable Resume? Due to the sheer volume of resumes that organizations receive, hiring recruiters at organizations who have an "electronic tracking system" typically do not review a resume unless it is found while searching their database of applicants using keywords. To receive an interview at such companies, it is critical that you have a scanner-friendly resume that is easily interpreted by an electronic tracking system, and can be easily found by recruiters using keywords.

How Does The Scanning Process Work? Organizations with electronic tracking systems will request that applicants submit a hardcopy "scannable resume" while applying. The organization uses document imaging technology (an industrial scanner) to scan paper resumes in bulk into their computer as an image. OCR (Optical Character Recognition) software then looks at the image line-by-line to distinguish each letter and number on your paper resume and creates a text file for your resume. The software then reads the text and extracts important information about you, such as your name, address, phone number, work history, years of experience, education, and skills.

Employers search their resume tracking systems using keywords related to specific open positions that they have. It is important to have as many keywords as possible related to your field scattered throughout your resume so that your resume is found during those employer keyword searches. For clues on keywords you should use, view job postings for positions in your field that you are seeking.

Describe your experience with concrete words rather than vague descriptions. For example, it's better to use "managed a team of software engineers" than "responsible for managing and training employees".

Plain text resumes (also called "ASCII Resumes") are generally used by job seekers to... a) Post their resume to an online job site b) Send their resume to an employer within the text box of an email message by copying and pasting.

Plain Text resumes are typically not viewed by employers; rather, they are imported directly into databases which employers use to search for potential employees using keywords. Since employers are using keywords to search for Plain Text resumes, Plain Text resumes should have a KEYWORD section which contains industry words that an employer may use while searching, or should have those keywords spread throughout the resume.

Layout & Formatting Problems: It is tempting for a job seeker to merely copy & paste their resume from a word processing program into the text box of an email, or into the text box of an online job site's form. Yet, it is important that the resume which is copied-and-pasted is formatted first as Plain Text to ensure that its layout and content of the resume remains intact.

A resume that is copied & pasted directly from a word processing program into an online form or email will lose its layout and will appear as paragraphs bumped together and jumbled...also, many characters (such as commas, quote marks, or special characters) will often not paste properly and may appear as gibberish.

Carefully make all adjustments to your resume within this program by realigning any misaligned paragraphs and fixing items which may have been misinterpreted while you were saving your resume to Plain Text i.e. (special characters, quote marks, hyphens, apostrophes, etc...).

Include a list of keywords before, after, or in place of your objective. These should be industry-specific nouns that an employer may type while searching for potential employees. A journalist may use keywords "Journalist,"

Cover Letters: If you are emailing a resume directly to an employer, the employer may request that you submit a cover letter. If you are posting your resume at a job site, do not include a cover letter unless it is requested.

PDF Resumes may be emailed to employers or linked to a web site for employer viewing and printing. .PDF resumes are viewed on all computers exactly as they were created by the job seeker, as fonts and elements of the .PDF resume are embedded into the .PDF document itself and cannot be altered.

Many employers only hire employees who already have years of experience in their field. Employers seeking employees at the below job boards are seeking recent grads, or individuals who have little on-the-job experience but can be trained.

The birth of her daughter, Flora, in 2005 has brought home the importance of environmental health and the urgency to leave a healthy planet for the next generation. She hopes to meet, teach, and learn with others at UWRF who are concerned about writing and acting for environmental health and justice.

In addition to teaching, Vladimir Pavlov's professional experience includes his work as lexicographer (co-author of The Systemic Dictionary of English), senior linguist in a software development company, consultant and interpreter for the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe and the United Nations missions to Ukraine. Research and educational projects have taken him to over 15 countries on 4 continents: Europe, Asia, Africa, and North America.

A second period course in British literature may replace one of the British survey courses, or a second period course in American literature may replace one of the American survey courses. At least three survey courses must be taken.

The TESOL Majors and Minors  are English Department programs designed for both native and nonnative speakers of English. Graduates are prepared for employment in teaching English to speakers of other languages in the United States and in other countries. Students will take courses in language acquisition, theory and practice of teaching English as a second or foreign language, pedagogical grammar, linguistics, and cultural studies. Some of these programs enable students to acquire certification in teaching English as a second language in grade K-12.

Many members work on the annual student publication Prologue. Sigma Tau Delta-Kappa Sigma has raised money for a local charity and for a subscription to Studies in the Novel, a literary journal previously not carried by UW-River Falls, Chalmer Davee Library.

Associate membership  is available to currently enrolled students, undergraduates and graduates, who have the requisite academic background, but who are not majoring or minoring in English. Faculty are also eligible for Associate membership.

Literary Society's focus is to provide a release from academic stress and pressures through activities, bring together students who have similar interests, provide moral support, and learn about opportunities in the English field. And we are always ready to have a good time.

Members typically meet to set up activities twice a month in the 2nd floor student lounge. At other times, members can be found studying, engaging in deep conversation, or sleeping on the sofas in the lounge. Literary Society members often leave messages on the lounge chalkboard for fellow students; many Literary Society members joke that they live in the lounge more than at their homes.

The series is an opportunity for UW-River Falls students, faculty and staff to read their original poetry, fiction, and creative nonfiction to fellow students, faculty, and staff. All students, regardless of their majors, are welcome and encouraged to participate.

The Reading Series began in the fall of 1996, as an outlet for students to share their passion for writing with their peers and teachers. Professor Jenny Brantley is the advisor to the series. Student and Faculty readings usually feature four to five readers, each of whom have up to fifteen minutes of reading time. An open mike follows the readings, allowing other students to read.

Richard Terrill, English professor at the University of Minnesota at Mankato, read from his collection of poetry entitled Coming Late to Rachmaninoff. Terrill concluded his reading with passages about learning to dance from Saturday Night in Baoding: A China Memoir, which is based on his experiences as a Fulbright Scholar in China and which won the prestigious AWP Award.

Playwrite and humorist Kevin Kling entertained the audience with stories from his past. The Denver Post writes "Kling's stories fall somewhere between David Lynch's perversity and Garrison Keillor's home-spun humor. . . " Kling's works can be heard on NPR and his play 21A, about the bus line that crosses St. Paul and Minneapolis, has been performed locally, nationaly and in Europe.

I have been "teaching" for many years, beginning in public schools, continuing for a number of years as a geology teaching assistant, and lecturer, and in a different context as a mentor for junior staff at environmental consulting companies. After joining the faculty at UW-River Falls, my teaching has evolved and matured. Developing my own teaching style has involved experimentation and pushing myself "outside of my comfort zone."

UWRF has been a wonderful setting for exploring new methods and teaching approaches. I benefit from the years of experience of my colleagues and their encouragement. My department, and this institution as a whole, is focused on high-quality education of our students.

That education involves many components: teaching, advising, evaluating students, working with students on special projects and research, taking students to scientific conferences, class and professional field trips, clubs and activities, and helping prepare and guide students towards internships, jobs, and careers. We develop personal relationships with our advisees and the students in our classes.

I strive to engage students with concepts and ideas. For example, even in my large lecture Geology 101 classes (80-110 students), I learn all my students' names, and utilize active and group learning techniques. These include slide observation exercises and "mini-labs" with rock samples, because I believe it's imperative that students actually observe, evaluate, touch, smell, etc., geologic formations and materials.

Hydrogeology), I expose students to field techniques and instrumentation using field trips, lab exercises, and applied projects. I continue to integrate more computer techniques into these courses, utilizing Excel for data tabulation, analysis, and plotting, and the Internet for downloading data sets for analysis.

I have participated in specialized faculty training in active learning and inquiry-based methods of science instruction. I have successfully incorporated inquiry-based methods into my courses. These are projects where students use their innate curiosity to ask questions about real geologic and hydrologic processes, then design and conduct their own research.

My experience in environmental consulting has also had a definite influence on my teaching philosophy. I see my role as helping students to develop a broad, but solid foundation to be successful in the private or public sector. That means encouraging and guiding students to develop more responsibility, flexibility, problem solving skills, teamwork skills, leadership abilities, verbal and written communication skills, and to be self learners. This ultimately is one of the most challenging, but rewarding aspects of teaching.

Finally, what I've been learning about my teaching, is that it involves a tremendous amount of learning on my part. There will always be new methods to try, better ways of reaching students. I sincerely appreciate all the lessons I've learned from my relationships with colleagues, friends, and family.

Hydrogeologic evaluations at landfills, hydrocarbon contamination and remediation sites in Minnesota; groundwater/surface water interaction studies to evaluate impacts of pipeline construction and gravel mining on a shallow aquifer, pesticide research studies, and groundwater modeling.

Alternative courses of study can be developed. There is flexibility in the selection of general studies classes, courses in the major, the order in which courses are taken, and in the choices of electives.

Courses listed below are referred to by title or by category, if there is a choice within a category. Some classes such as internships and general studies classes may be taken in the summer, allowing for completion of the program in less than four years.

The Conservation major is designed to meet the academic needs of students interested in a career dealing with the management of our natural environment. The major has the flexibility to accommodate interests in general natural resource management, soil and water conservation, environmental education, forest or wildlife management, environmental regulations or law enforcement, and the like, depending on the students course selection of directed and general electives.

The land use planning major is designed for those students wishing to pursue a career in public or private planning, zoning, administration/management and sustainable development. The curriculum provides instruction in foundational planning principles and practices, as well as hands-on technical training. The course content focuses on planning issues at the rural/urban interface. It is an excellent major to combine with a wide variety of minors (e.g., cartography/GIS, business administration, political science, etc.) to develop a unique professional niche.

Mission Statement:  "To deliver an enriched student information system through an upgrade of the software to the latest version available from Oracle and continue to provide access to and improve on the level of services for the entire university community."

Instructors indicate online any student who is not, based upon their judgment, currently attending their class and are asked to give a last known date of class attendance for those students who are not attending if possible.

The report is reviewed for those students with federal and state aid whom are assumed to have unofficially withdrawn from the University. The last date of attendance as reported by any of the instructors is determined and used in the Return of Title IV Funds calculation.

Latino Americans, and Native Americans. In examining these groups, the program provides curriculum that explores the intersection between race, ethnicity, gender, and class in the context of U.S. institutions. In addition, the program provides curriculum that compares race, ethnicity, gender, and class between the U.S. and international contexts.

We encourage students to consider a Double Minor in Ethnic Studies and Women's Studies. The double minor provides an in depth exploration of issues surrounding race, ethnicity, and gender. Also, it is practical as students can complete the double minor with minimal additional credits.

To find out more about the Ethnic Studies minor, feel free to explore the links indicated at the left of this page. Also, if you have questions, please contact our coordinator, Dr. Cyndi Kernahan at cynthia.kernahan@uwrf.edu.

Mural team:  Eighteen people - made up of St. Croix Valley middle school students, artists and citizens who are interested in public art, with a like-minded delegation of faculty, staff and students from the University of Wisconsin- River Falls.

One of the elements of Native American spiritualism, the hoop, has been handed down from generation to generation for hundreds of years.  Many Native Americans hold the hoop in high regard as it symbolizes strength and unity.  Some native traditions associate the hoop with their traditional cosmology, where the earth is a circle, with a circle of sky beneath it.

Many tangible native symbols also revolve around the hoop, and one of these is the dream catcher, with its power center.  The legend of the dream catcher varies in its details from people to people, but the principle is the same: It filters out bad forces, helping its owner stay on the right path in life.  Traditionally made by grandmothers, dream catchers are presented to the mothers of newborn babies to be hung on their cradleboards, and often to newlyweds to be hung in their tipis or lodges.

Early dream catchers were crafted with a supple wood such as willow for the ring, with webbing fabricated from plant material or sinew. Often a prayer or chant was performed while it was being created.  Each part of a dream catcher has symbolic meaning, and there is no "wrong" dream catcher. Some dream catchers have six colored beads at the sides that symbolize the six directions - heaven, earth, north, south, east and west. To Native Americans, dreams were messages sent by sacred spirits. According to legend, the hole in the center of a dream catcher web allows good dreams to reach the sleeper, contributing a positive force to ones destiny or future.

Of course, the web itself serves to trap the bad dreams until they disappear with the first light of morning.  Decorating a dream-catcher with feathers, shells, and anything gathered from nature makes it more personally safeguard its owner and lets only good dreams come forth.

Grandmother spider, who sang the universe into existence, was saddened by the bad dreams of her human children, so she decided to do something about it. First, she went to the willow tree and asked him for some of his beautiful branches. She then went to the eagle and asked him for one of his powerful feathers. She bent the branches of the willow tree into a circle connecting all the people of the world. She spun her web of wisdom around the willow branches to catch her children's bad dreams, making sure to leave a small hole in the middle to allow good dreams to escape. When morning came, grandfather sun's rays burnt away the bad dreams tangled in the web, and any bad dreams that were left were turned into the morning dew. These dreams trickled down the length of the eagle feather and were given to the earth.

Long ago when the world was young, an old man sat on a high mountain and had a vision. In his vision, Iktomi, the great trickster and teacher of wisdom, appeared in the form of a spider. Iktomi spoke to him in a sacred language that only the old man could understand. As he spoke, Iktomi the spider took the elder's willow hoop, which had feathers, horsehairs, beads and offerings on it and began to spin a web. He spoke to the elder about the cycles of life.... how we begin our lives as infants and we move on to childhood, and then to adulthood. Finally, we go to old age where we must be taken care of as infants, completing the cycle.

Iktomi said, "In each time of life there are many forces and different directions that can help or interfere with the harmony of nature, and also with the Great Spirit and all of his wonderful teachings." Iktomi gave the web to the Lakota elder and said, "See, the web is a perfect circle but there is a hole in the center of the circle. If you believe in the Great Spirit, the web will catch your good dreams and ideas - - and the bad ones will go through the hole. Use the web to help yourself and your people to reach your goals and make good use of your people's ideas, dreams and visions."

We invite you to consider the importance your environment and imagine your own dream catcher as you examine the wall.  It is our hope that you will discover your "good dreams" both in our mural and at UW - River Falls.

In the center, one sees a circle that includes twelve images that signify the twelve months in 2001, the first year of the new millennium.   Arranged like the numbers of a clock, you will see a Native American dream-catcher placed at the top.  This honors the area's native people, the Chippewa and Sioux Indians.  The center of the circle has the colors of the spectrum, which represent the circle of life.

Wisconsin System.  The leaves signify the fall and spring semesters.   The branches reach for the sky, signifying the importance of higher education to ones future. The trees roots acknowledge that Wisconsin had the first schools for training rural teachers and represent the strong educational foundation Wisconsin citizens receive from our primary and secondary teachers.  It is also significant that America's first kindergarten originated in Wisconsin.

Outside the circle, you will see vibrant blue streams, symbolizing the area's rivers -- the St. Croix, the Kinnickinnic, the Willow, etc.  The coursing waters imply the importance of clean water to the area.

Additionally, the waterways recognize one of the Indian meanings for the name Wisconsin - which is "gathering of waters".  Inside the circle, the river turns into shades of peach, brown and tan.  Here it implies a "gathering of peoples", as well as a "gathering of waters", signifying the interconnectedness of the region's varied cultures at the dawn of a new century.  Finally, the river serves as a metaphoric link to the future, greeting St. Croix Valley inhabitants of the twenty-second century.

This three-paneled story cloth depicts the Hmong people, their struggles and their journey to the United States. Many Hmong textiles serve a storytelling function, a way of preserving oral traditions on fabric for future generations. Hmong works often feature intricate geometric design patterns. Usually the men draw the outlines for the design and the women stitch the cloth.

The story of the Hmong begins in China. Long ago, the Hmong were inhabitants of China, where they lived and farmed peacefully. They raised animals and held celebrations where such things as courting or bullfights took place. They lived happy, fulfilling lives within community.

Then Chinese soldiers invaded the Hmong villages and attempted to drive the Hmong out of China. The Hmong tried fighting for their peace, freedom and equality but were unsuccessful. Due to persecution, the Hmong traveled south to Laos where they hoped to rebuild their lives.

After successfully rebuilding their lives in Laos, the Hmong were drawn into the Vietnamese Conflict which lasted from 1945-1975. The Hmong were again tragically persecuted and forced out of their villages. This story cloth shows the American soldiers supplying weapons to the Hmong men while the Hmong women were at home taking care of their families and working in the fields. Pursued by the Vietnamese, villages were burned and the population killed. After the communists won the war in 1975, the Hmong fled west toward Thailand. But in order to reach Thailand, the Hmong had to build rafts or swim to get across the broad and treacherous Mekong River as shown in the story cloth. There, they would be safe in non-communist Thailand.

In Thailand, refugee camps like Ban Vinai were established. After a short period of settlement in Thailand, many Hmong received opportunities to come to the United States. In order to do so, some Hmong people had to leave many of their loved ones behind to resettle in Phanatnikhom (a city near Bangkok, the capital of Thailand). This city is depicted on the story cloth because of its significance. It was where many Hmong were educated and given medical attention.  In Phanatnikhom, they began their journey to the United States on the "dav hlau" (da lao) or the "big metal bird".

Using traditional techniques she learned from her mother, Roberta, Antoinette Silas, of the Kachina and Parrot Clan, incorporates designs she inherited from her mother and designs she developed herself.

A series of three interlocking ellipsoid shapes created with a suspended stainless steel cable network and embellished with small dichroic glass components with an "ocular" in the center. The dichroic glass elements reflect color patterns from the metal halide downlights located in the ceiling, above the ocular.

Each ellipsoid wire frame is made of 3mm / 1/8" stainless steel cable draped in the form of a cantenary arch, looped at each end and suspended from anchors in the drywall ceiling.  Small dichroic glass elements are attached to this cable lattice at intersecting joints with cable gripping bolts.

The Chalmer Davee Library provides a venue for individuals who are interested in advertising a special event, or putting up informational or artistic displays. Library exhibit spaces are high profile, well-traveled areas and are open to the university community, local artists and members of the general public.

The Chalmer Davee Library adheres to the American Library Association's policy on exhibit spaces which states: The American Library Association affirms that all libraries are forums of information and ideas. Libraries should make exhibit spaces available to the public they serve and should make such facilities available on an equitable basis, regardless of the beliefs or affirmations of individuals or groups requesting their use. -Adopted January 23, 1980 - ALA Council.

If you are interested in putting up a display, send an email to the Exhibits Committee or call  the committee chairperson at 715/425-3874 to make the necessary arrangements. Exhibits must be scheduled in advance.

If the exhibitor would like insurance coverage, please contact the Exhibits Committee for paperwork. Forms need to be completed and returned prior to the time the exhibit is set up.  No insurance coverage is provided after the display date has passed.

Exhibits must be set up during regular library hours. Receptions may be held in the Iibrary lobby during regular library hours. Contact the Exhibits Committee chair for more information about receptions.

Exhibit areas must be booked in advance. Exhibit areas include the Harriet Barry Gallery, two recessed wall cases, two glass table cases, and two oak cases. Installation art exhibits may be placed in open areas of the library if the space is approved by the Exhibits Committee.

Across the campuses of America there are hundreds of academic buildings, student centers, residence halls, libraries and other structures, all bearing names that had meaning at the time of the dedication, but with the years, memory of the reason for the original name has faded.

Such is the case at UW-River Falls.  There are 20 buildings, several rooms and Ramer Field carrying the names of regents, faculty and students who in some way contributed to this University's reputation as a place where teaching has always been important.  Only a few campus buildings carry names such as Centennial Hall or South Hall.

Last winter Chancellor Gary Thibodeau wrote one of the authors calling attention to the need for information of where the campus buidings' names orginated.  He said that there are many faculty who have no knowledge of who "Hathorn" of Hathorn Hall was and a host of students who may spend four years in May or McMillan Halls or go to the Blanche Davis Theatre in the Kleinpell Fine Arts building and never know just who Kleinpell or May or McMillan or Davis were or what they did to make this institution what it offers students today.

The authors have been members of the University faculty for many years and are now retired.  Dr. Wolfe was professor of journalism and Assistant Chancellor and Dr. Wyman was professor of history and Honorary Folklorist for Wisconsin for many years.  They have known a number of the people whose names appear on buildings and rooms, and readily accepted Chancellor Thibodeau's suggestion to answer "What's in a Name?".

The Faculty Senate Library Committee facilitates communication between the faculty and the library, and provides a mechanism for input regarding the library's collections, services, policies, faculty and student needs, etc. Members of the committee welcome your comments and ideas.

Commercial plums from California now have a hardy Midwestern cousin. University of Wisconsin-River Falls plant breeder Dr. Brian R. Smith has developed a plum cultivar that stands up to Wisconsin's winters and produces fruit to rival its sun-kissed kin. Smith, a professor of horticulture at UW-River Falls and a state commercial fruit specialist with UW-Extension, created the new cultivar by crossing a plum variety adapted to Wisconsin's frigid winters with a Japanese dessert plum. The new hybrid yields fruit as large and tasty as any California-grown plum from the grocery store, he says, but also withstands subzero temperatures and sports a more easily managed semi-dwarf growth habit.

"Commercial plum production is almost non-existent in the state right now primarily because most of your higher quality plums aren't winter hardy, bloom too early in the spring, and require long growing seasons," says Smith. "The goal of my breeding program has been to develop commercial plum cultivars for growing in this climate."

UW-River Falls also hosts the only plum breeding project in a 24-state surrounding area. Yet when Smith launched the endeavor in 1991, no one had bred plums in the Midwest for over 55 years. To find a source of winter-hardy genetic stock to blend with conventional California-grown varieties, Smith therefore looked to cultivars developed 100 years ago by pioneering plum breeders and planted by homesteaders on family farms. Other sources of germplasm came from wild plum varieties.

To develop new cultivars, Smith has at his disposal a collection of 350 potted plum trees he maintains at UW-River Falls. After selecting the trees he wants to interbreed, he collects and stores pollen from each male parent tree, transferring it eventually by hand to the flowers of each female parent to achieve the desired hybridizations. If a plant bears fruit as a result of his efforts, he collects its seeds and stores them under conditions that simulate winter, a process called stratification.

If a tree performs well, he propagates it by budding or some other asexual cloning method. If these cloned plants continue to do well, he finally considers the tree as a candidate for cultivar status and possible commercial production.

Eventually plum trees could be grown commercially in several areas of the state, Smith says, especially in more temperate places such as the Door County peninsula where cherries are now grown, or on high bluffs, less prone to frost, where farmers currently plant apple trees. "Although, as we develop more frost resistance into these varieties, site selection will become less of an issue," he adds.

Only time will tell if Smith's breeding experiments bear fruit for the Midwest's farm economy, but that is the ultimate goal. "My research is a long-term investment in the health of Wisconsin's and the Midwest's ag sectors," he says. "My hope is that plums will someday be a crop that helps farmers diversify their operations, improve their profitability and stay competitive."

Smith, who is also an Extension Commercial Fruit Specialist, is known nationally as a plum and raspberry geneticist. Smith runs the only fruit research facility in the 26-campus UW-System that is dedicated primarily toward fruit breeding.

Secretary Nilsestuen was on campus Aug. 2 to present a $10,000 agricultural development grant to Smith to develop new varieties of raspberries for Wisconsin commercial fruit growers. The grant was one of 18 Agricultural Development and Diversification grants totaling $380,000 announced by Governor Jim Doyle and Smith's third from the agency. The Governor and 13 members of his cabinet toured western Wisconsin last week to talk about the Grow Wisconsin initiatives.

Nilsestuen said the raspberry research project strengthens the state's standing as a leader nationally in diversification of agricultural products, and the research is strongly supported by the Wisconsin Berry Growers Association as a way to extend the growing season.

"Wisconsin is not only America's Dairyland; we are also America's 'Berryland,'" he said, citing the state's ranking in cranberries, blueberries, and strawberries, as well as raspberries. Raspberries as a high-end product have the potential of putting more profits in the hands of Wisconsin farmers and more dollars into rural communities.

About 120 students per year gain direct hands-on experience in the program, and four students are full-time employees of the facility this summer, says Smith. The College also hosts numerous field days and training sessions for growers and master gardeners. In 2002, the campus hosted the Wisconsin Berry Field Day, which drew a record number of participants from three states.

Smith's research program focuses on developing winter-hardy varieties of strawberries, raspberries and plums that result in high quality, good yield fruit with superior pest/disease resistance for Midwestern commercial growers. Such varieties help make growers more competitive, profitable and diverse in their fruit operations as well as respond to changing governmental regulations regarding pesticide use.

"We make vital recommendations to growers on which cultivars to grow based on results from our extensive trials," says Smith. "New fruit cultivars more adapted to the Wisconsin climate will allow growers to remain competitive and operate more profitable businesses."

Smith, who holds a M.S. and Ph.D. in horticulture with a minor in plant breeding from the University of Minnesota, has collaborated in the revision of several Extension publications on strawberries and raspberries and presented widely on the topic of commercial fruit production. Smith also represents Wisconsin at the NCR-22 meeting, national meetings for all small fruit researchers and extension agents from North America discuss their recent research in the field.

Errors may be the result of changes to this Web site in May 2005 to better serve our current and prospective students, community and other lifelong learners. We are sorry for any inconvenience that this may cause you.

The Your Town program is a series of 3 day participatory workshops held in different locations around the country. Each year 4 workshops are funded by the National Endowment for the Arts through the National Trust for Historic Preservation. The University of Wisconsin Cooperative Extension is pleased to be hosting one of the workshops this year. Your Town focuses on an important aspect of community spirit and integrity: the process of design. The aim is to introduce decision-makers (those who can affect change but are not design professionals) to the role of design in comprehensive planning. Our focus will be on Wisconsin's rural landscape.

The course material addresses a range of issues, including community mapping, natural and cultural resources and community design, and public participation. Materials are presented in a highly visual format, through slide presentations, group discussions, case-study presentations, and group problem-solving. Check out some photos from the 2003 workshop.

We are extremely pleased to announce our keynote speaker, Parris Glendening, Former Governor of Maryland. Former Governor Glendening is passionate about protecting, preserving, and restoring the environment for future generations. As Governor he positioned Maryland as a national leader in this effort with his Smart Growth-Anti Sprawl Initiative. While in office he served on the National Governors' Association Natural Resources Committee. For his conservation efforts and committment to the environment he has received numerous awards. Click here for a tentative schedule for the workshop.

Submit a letter including a brief (one paragraph) biographical sketch, a description of what you would like to gain from the workshop, and your contact information.  Email your letter of application to: yourtownwisconsin@uwrf.edu  . Thirty people will be selected to attend.

It contains guidelines and application forms for those programs funded through on-campus processes and information on the structure and organization of the UWRF Faculty and Academic Staff Development Board.

Academic Staff Development Board that was begun as part of the "Reach for the Future" initiative. The primary objectives in establishing the Board were to promote and support faculty and academic staff development, to improve the organization and coordination of development efforts and to provide a system for a fair and equitable allocation of available resources.

I would like to thank all of the members of the Board for the time and energy that they devoted to professional development activities and for the spirit of non-partisan collegiality they displayed throughout the year. Special thanks go to Tracey Gladstone-Sovell for developing the world wide web site. I would also like to thank the UWRF administration, especially Provost and Vice Chancellor Robert Milam, for their continued support of faculty and academic staff development. Linda Nowak and Mary Ann Brubaker have frequently gone beyond the call of duty in providing expert assistance to the Board.

Lastly I want to extend very special thanks to Nan Jordahl, the person most responsible for the successful establishment and operation of the Faculty and Academic Staff Development Board. None of it could have been accomplished without Nan's leadership, vision, energy and unfailing good humor. Her courage and commitment have inspired us all.

It is the mission of the Faculty and Academic Staff Development Board (FASDB) at UWRF to directly promote the effectiveness of faculty and academic staff with respect to teaching, professional development, and research. This involves the provision of adequate funding and time to faculty and academic staff to pursue activities related to instructional and organizational development, community, and societal service as well as basic and applied research endeavors.

Key issues regarding funding, identifying new resources and maintaining existing ones, selecting and evaluating faculty and academic staff initiated projects and providing ongoing support and mentoring will be within the scope of the FASDB. In this manner the FASDB seeks to identify and coordinate previously separate programs and resources for faculty and academic staff development into a single comprehensive effort. At the same time the FASDB seeks to maintain the variety of opportunities for faculty and academic staff development.

Day to day operations of the board will be conducted by the Operations Committee, consisting of the Director of Faculty and Student Academic Support Programs, the chair of the FASDB, and two other board members. At least two of the four members of the Operations Committee must hold faculty status.

Makes decisions regarding the allocation of the faculty and academic staff professional development awards and informs Faculty Senate, Academic Staff Council and Provost/Vice Chancellor of those decisions.

Most funds will be awarded through a competitive grants process. These awards will be made solely on the basis of the merits of the proposals, not on the departmental or collegiate homes of the proposers.

Other considerations of the committee will be: To what extent does the plan address a clearly identified individual, professional or program quality need? Is the plan realistic? Are the details well described?

The standard required cover page is is available here as a "fill in" MS Word form. You must use this form to apply for funds. Download the form, fill in the gray boxes with the relevant information, print the form and submit seven copies of your application to the Director of Faculty and Student Academic Support Programs, 104 North Hall. to this document.

In this context, research means all sorts of scholarly activity, including laboratory research, qualitative research, and creative projects. That is, student faculty-teams in theatre, agricultural economics, elementary education, and English are as eligible for awards as those in chemistry, horticulture, and physics.

MS Word form. You must use this form to apply for funds. Download the form, fill in the gray boxes with the relevant information, print the form and submit seven copies of your application to the Director of Faculty and Student Academic Support Programs, 104 North Hall.

Priority will be given to those proposals which show clear indication that a research project, paper, or professional presentation has been or will be made by the applicant in conjunction with the travel request.

The application form is available here as a "fill in" MS Word form. You must use this form to apply for funds. Failure to do so will mean that your proposal will not be considered.** Download the form, fill in the gray boxes with the relevant information, save the form and email it, as an attachment  to the board at this address: FASDB@uwrf.edu Please include your last name in the name of the file that is sent.

Any proposed research or grant project that involves human or animal subjects must be reviewed and certified by either the "Human Subjects Review Board" or the "Animal Care Committee" prior to the collection of data.

Research Grant must present the results of their projects, either through a poster displayed during UW-RF's Research and Scholarly Activity Day or a final report submitted to the Provost & Vice Chancellor. The poster or report must be presented during the academic year following the grant year. Faculty receiving research grants must submit either a poster or a final report in order to be considered for future faculty research grants.

Submit one copy of the cover page and page 1 and seven copies of the abstract, narrative, and budget to the Office of Faculty and Academic Development, 104 North Hall. The narrative portion must not exceed 10 double-spaced pages, with a minimum of 10 pt. type. (Note: committee members will not read past page 10 of the narrative.) Please remember that your audience consists of your colleagues from other departments; they may not understand the jargon of your field. Consequently you should write as if you are addressing educated laypersons from a field other than your own.

The Foundation Grants Committee reviews each proposal based on the stated guidelines. At a final committee meeting, proposal finalists are reviewed and funding recommendations are completed for presentation to the UW-River Falls Foundation Board for approval at the April Board meeting. Funded and unfunded proposals are notified the first week of May.

The cover sheet is available here as a "fill in" MS Word form. Please use this form to apply for funds. Download the form, fill in the gray boxes with the relevant information (the boxes will expand as needed,) print the form. Two (2) copies of the proposal must be submitted to the Foundation Office, 310 South Hall by the deadline date.

The proposal must be limited to four (4) pages plus the cover page. Two (2) copies of the proposal must be submitted to the Foundation Office, 310 South Hall by the deadline date. Please remember that your proposal will be reviewed and judged by a committee of the UW-River Falls Foundation Board who represent a cross-section of the community. It would be in your best interest to write your proposal in language easily understood by people who are not in your field.

The UWRF Foundation believes that students learn best when they are actively engaged. One of the most powerful ways to engage students is to involve them in projects where they can apply the analytical and creative tools they have learned in their courses to a genuine problem, design a way to answer it, and defend the answer they reach before their peers and faculty.

RSCA Stipends-$2,500 to support intensive, significant research projects which UWRF undergraduates complete under the supervision of faculty. In this context, research means all sorts of scholarly activity, including laboratory research, qualitative research, and creative projects. That is, students in theatre, agricultural economics, elementary education, and English are as eligible for awards as those in chemistry, horticulture, and physics.

These stipends are intended to support projects undertaken during summer; the funds will defray some of the awardee's lost summer earnings. However, unusual circumstances, the Foundation may pay stipends during the academic year.

Word form. You must use this form to apply for funds. Download the form, fill in the gray boxes with the relevant information, print it, and attach a narrative (five pages, maximum, following the outline provided). Sign the cover sheet, obtain the signature of the faculty member you will be working with, and submit seven copies of the entire application to the Director of Faculty and Student Academic Support Programs, 104 North Hall.

Director of Faculty and Student Academic Support Programs' office indicating the way in which instruction was improved as a result of the funding. Past recipients of this grant program will not be considered for funding if a final report was not submitted.

Incentive grants are meant to encourage faculty and staff to write and submit proposals for large grants. Writing proposals for large grants is time consuming and labor intensive. Incentive grants can be used, for example, to hire replacement faculty for one course, thereby releasing the proposer to spend one quarter of his/her time on the proposal during one semester. Or, for smaller proposals, they might be used to pay for some time during the summer. They are not meant to provide overload payments during the academic year.

Research. He can provide several kinds of assistance: obtaining application materials for the large grant to be applied for; helping to outline the grant proposal; estimating the amount of time it will take to write the proposal; and writing the incentive grant request. He will also present the incentive grant request to the Research Subcommittee of the FASDB for approval.

Incentive grant proposals will be submitted to the Director, Grants & Research. We encourage proposers to consult with the Director before submission about the funding opportunity and the amount of time it will take to prepare the proposal.

Incentive grant proposals will consist of a completed Incentive Grant Cover Sheet (see next page); a copy of the Request for Proposals (RFP) or equivalent description of the funding opportunity; an outline or brief description of the projected grant proposal, including staffing patterns and budget summary; and a timeline for completion of the proposal.

The UWRF Institutional Enhancement Grant process is dedicated to the concept of all-University cooperative endeavors. Priority is given to those projects which will affect a large proportion of our UWRF learning community. This is a competitive grant process for individuals, committees, departments, units, or colleges to develop programmatic workshops or conferences, thematic curricular initiatives, utilize external consultants, or a variety of other options for faculty and staff development.

Now that most faculty are equipped with networked computers and we have some technology enhanced classrooms with more to be installed in the near future, faculty need time to adapt their pedagogy to electronic communications and develop curricular materials.

Education Center which is devoted to faculty use for the development or adaptation of technology-dependent curricular materials, especially materials to be used in technology enhanced classrooms. The IDe3A Center contains (or will soon contain) networked PC and Macintosh computers, scanners, printers, digital camera, a projection system, and appropriate software.

To further promote the use of instructional technology at UW-RF, the FASDB will award up to four $1,000 mini-grants for use during summer school. We intend these mini-grants to pay faculty as they develop the actual curricular materials they will use in a course to be taught during the next academic year. The funds are to be used only for summer salaries, not for equipment or software.

Recipients of mini-grants must agree to mentor, on an informal basis, other faculty using the IDeA Center during the mini-grant period. Recipients must also be willing to demonstrate their projects during fall faculty development days.

Retraining & Renewal Grant Program is dedicated to the maintenance of academic excellence. In keeping with the conditions and intent of the legislation that supports this program, "the purpose of this comprehensive program is to increase the flexibility and effective use of existing faculty personnel in the University of Wisconsin System."

Development of scholarly resources of faculty members in fields of study allied to those in which they have their primary academic preparation in order to increase the ability of their institutions and units to adapt to changing curricular, student, and societal needs and to contribute to the continued professional growth of faculty.

Continued development and renewal of the expertise of faculty members in their fields of primary academic preparation in order to increase the ability of their institutions and units to adapt to changing curricular, student and societal needs.

The program is limited to ranked faculty (instructor, assistant professor, associate professor or full professor). Because the faculty retraining/renewal program is viewed as an important tool in developing institutional instructional flexibility, tenured faculty will normally receive preference over probationary faculty. Programmatic and institutional need/goal considerations may override this preference, however.

A faculty member may also request support to pay for registration fees, participation fees, etc., at professional workshops, seminars, institutes, etc. Proposals may request funds to buy course related books and supplies.

Supplies and equipment funds may be requested, if necessary for the successful completion of the project. Ordinarily, capital equipment purchases and purchase of equipment that should be supported by the department are not eligible for funding under this program.

Funds for travel may be requested if it can be demonstrated that such travel is critical to the retraining/renewal project. If the faculty member is within commuting distance, a reasonable amount to cover commuting expenses may be requested.

If the location of the program is beyond commuting distance, a faculty member may request one round trip to the location during the period of the project. Other trips must be paid for by the participant.

If the retraining/renewal program takes place at a location beyond commuting distance from the faculty member's home, living expenses may be requested. However, institutional policies may limit the amount granted if the faculty member is also receiving a salary.

Support for travel to and attendance at professional meetings may be requested, if it can be shown that such participation is a critical part of the individual's retraining/renewal program. Retraining/renewal funds ordinarily will not be used in place of institutional travel money for attendance at professional meetings.

Robert Knowles believed that cross-cultural exchange, making new friends and understanding different cultures, is one of the strongest elements in preserving and promoting world peace. It is fitting, therefore, that his contribution to education not only in Wisconsin, but throughout the world, should be honored by a program to support students and faculty who desire to learn more about the world.

Partial and full scholarships for study abroad will be made available to academically deserving students. Funds in this category may also be used to assist foreign students who are burdened with extraordinary and unexpected expenses.

Grants will be made to UW-RF faculty for short-term research and teaching abroad; to supplement longer international study; or to attend internationally related conferences. Funds may also be used to defray the expenses of visiting international scholars.

The application form for students is available here as a "fill in" MS Word form. You must use this form to apply for funds. Download the form, fill in the gray boxes with the relevant information, print the form and submit seven copies of your application to the Director of Faculty and Student Academic Support Programs, 104 North Hall.

Download the form, fill in the gray boxes with the relevant information, print the form and submit seven copies of your application to the Director of Faculty and Student Academic Support Programs, 104 North Hall.

Sabbatical program is to enable recipients to be engaged in intensive study in order to become more effective teachers and scholars and to enhance their service to the University. The Sabbatical program should also be understood as recognition of past and continuing academic contributions of the recipients in keeping with the Select Mission of UWRF.

B. A faculty member may take a sabbatical leave for one semester of the academic year and receive from the institution financial support at any level up to a maximum of his/her full compensation for that period.

The anticipated contribution of the proposed sabbatical program to the enhancement of teaching and/or course and curriculum development at UWRF which may or may not include the relationship of the sabbatical program to the research interests of the applicant.

A copy of the personal vita which must include evidence of excellence in teaching and of the academic contributions made by the individual. If possible submit an electronic version of your CV to FASDB@uwrf.edu. If your proposal is approved, an electronic CV will be required.

In the administration of faculty sabbaticals, creditable service for retirement purposes will vary, depending on the length of the sabbatical and level of compensation. A faculty member considering a sabbatical leave request should consult with the institutional fringe benefit coordinator prior to submitting a formal request.

A faculty member may receive supplementary grants or other awards while on sabbatical leave, but such compensation, when combined with the amount of institutional compensation, shall not exceed the full compensation normally received from the UW System for that period.

Such additional grants or awards may be received by a faculty member only if the conditions for accepting the additional resources do not interfere with the stated purpose of a faculty member's sabbatical program.

A faculty member may seek additional grants specifically for travel or unusual living expenses incident to the sabbatical program without restriction by the full-compensation maximum (see condition 2).

A faculty member may not use the sabbatical period to accept other paid employment during the period of the leave, unless stipulated as a condition of the leave. If so stipulated, condition 2 is operative.

A faculty member must agree to return to UWRF for at least one academic year of service after the termination of the sabbatical or repay any compensation (salary plus the University's share of fringe benefits) received from the UW System during the sabbatical.

A faculty member must submit to the Provost & Vice Chancellor a written report outlining his/her accomplishments during the leave. This report should be submitted within three months after the faculty member's return to full-time employment.

The Provost & Vice Chancellor shall notify the faculty of the availability of sabbatical leave each March and shall call for applications for the leave period beginning 18 months hence. The Provost & Vice Chancellor shall make explicit in the call that funds for sabbaticals are limited.

In addition, any financial exigencies which might indicate preference for year-long as opposed to semester-long sabbatical must be announced with the call. If no such exigencies are announced then all proposals must be evaluated, and sabbaticals awarded, without preference to one period over another.

The transmittal form is available here . The Sabbatical Proposal form is available here. Both are "fill in" MS Word forms. You must use these forms to apply for funds. Download the forms, fill in the gray boxes with the relevant information, print the forms and submit seven copies of your application to the Director of Faculty and Student Academic Support Programs, 104 North Hall.

Office of Professional & Instructional Development, serves as a statewide faculty development resource for University of Wisconsin System institutions. Established in 1977 as the Undergraduate Teaching Improvement Council, it was first led by a council of campus representatives who focused primarily on teaching improvement. As the newly named OPID, it has expanded its emphases to meet the broader professional needs of faculty and academic staff with programming on topics such as student learning, the scholarship of teaching, career stages, and faculty roles and rewards. OPID's Council remains essential to its operation, both as an advisory board and as a liaison between System and its campuses.

Note: Please do not submit your event notice earlier than 10 working days before the event. A registration deadline is considered  a separate event than the actual event. Submit a separate notice for both and apply the 10 working day rule.

Cheesemaking can produce very predictable results when the process goes according to plan. In this conference, we will examine the most important steps in the cheese making process. Making small manipulations at critical times in the process can result in a unique cheese. A better understanding of these manipulations can also help you come up with a solution to a problem you have wrestled with but did not know how to solve.

Demystify the “aura” of artisanal Cheese Show participants how to use their existing equipment to convert milk into an artisinal masterpiece Empower participants to take control of the make process Provide you with specific tools and resources for artisanal cheesemaking.

HOW TO ENROLL: Mail registration form with check or money order payable to UW-RF. Provide complete information for each registrant. Use separate forms or copies for additional persons. Please advise us at time of registration if you are handicapped and desire special accommodations. Requests will be kept confidential.

Upon completion of this refresher course a challenge exam will be given. Successful completion of the exam will meet ATCP 80.40, Wisconsin Administrative Code for trained pasteurizer operator personnel.

If you have to cancel, you must notify the UW-RF to receive a refund. As this is a limited enrollment conference, your prompt notification may allow another person to register. Substitutions may be made at any time at no charge; please advise us in advance. If you cancel, we will refund your prepaid fee minus a $20 cancellation fee and $30 for the registration packet if it has already been mailed to you. If you do not attend the short course and fail to cancel your registration, no refund will be granted.

Transportation from Minneapolis/St. Paul airport and lodging is not included in the registration fee. Lodging is available at several area motels close to the UW-River Falls campus. Please make your reservations directly.

This four-day short course is designed for farmstead cheesemakers as well as apprentice cheesemakers from industry. Sessions focus on the basic steps in cheese manufacture and provide opportunities to gain "hands-on"experience in the cheesemaking process.

If you cancel up to April 6th, we will refund the full prepaid fee. After April 6, cancellation fee of $45 will be deducted from your refund. If you do not attend the conference and fail to cancel your registration, no refund will be granted.

Artisan and specialty cheese production in Wisconsin has increased since 1999, to just over 10 percent of the total cheese currently produced in Wisconsin. Farmstead-produced bottled milks, yogurts, and ice creams have also increased impressively. To put it succinctly, the dairy industry in Wisconsin is changing rapidly on a number of fronts.

By offering a more convenient educational format for small producers, this Web-based interactive program will strengthen the Wisconsin Dairy Artisan Network. As you become involved, you will become a resource for others and others for you, for sharing new ideas and methods that lead to new products and improvements in the quality of your current products. As a small producer, you are less capable of surviving the kinds of lawsuits that can result from an outbreak of food-borne illness associated with your product. In addition, the negative publicity of such an incident would bring harm to the entire artisan industry just as it is emerging as a significant segment of the dairy industry.

The Wisconsin Milk Marketing Board is an enthusiastic supporter of the artisan industry. They have generously provided the funds needed to develop this course. Without their continued support, the educational format for small producers would be severely diminished.

As the instructor of this course, I personally would like to welcome you to the world of sanitation. It is my intent that you will receive the technical material needed to make informed decisions about your processing facility. Let us explore the world of sanitation and all that it has to offer over the next several weeks.

Treatment of food-borne illness is no longer a realistic option. Today, prevention is the preferred method for maintaining human health. This priority is met by the creation of a sanitation program ensuring the continuance of good health.

Manual cleaning and sanitation used by farmstead operations creates unique challenges that may be met through a proper understanding of the science of sanitation. Sanitation in large facilities also presents challenges: more employees are involved with the day-to-day operations, so that accountability becomes a key factor.

This short course is designed to help participants understand the uniqueness of their food processing establishment with regard to sanitation to help ensure that proper sanitation programs are conducted in their establishment.

The course will consist of six weeks, starting Feb. 5th and ending March 16, 2007. Assignments vary from lesson to lesson, to include discussion board questions and assignments based on the readings. These assignments will be used to complete the sanitation standard operating procedures (SSOP).

Our online classes cover the same information as the face to face versions. One big difference is that the online class is self-paced over an extended period of time (usually 2-4 weeks). Each lesson and activity is designed to take an average of 10-20 minutes. You may take lessons, submit activities and ask questions anytime between the class dates. You will need an Internet connection, a web browser, and an email address. On the first day of a class, class members will receive, via email, a web address (URL) for the class, a username and a password to access the class materials. Classes are limited to 15 students so space is given on a first come first serve basis( by postmark).

The student will learn and perform all functions within the television studio, including directing, switching, audio, graphics, camera and related functions. Television writing techniques and formats, elementary engineering terminology and theory will be discussed. The role and function of each member of the production team will be discussed. Each student will write, direct and produce his/her own video production. Prerequisite: JOUR 101. Co-listed as SCTA 160.

This course allows an exploration of a particular area of Film Studies from examining film as an art form or industry, to the cultural popularity of this influential communication medium. Prerequisites: Student must be a Film Studies Minor and obtain consent of the program coordinator for the Film Studies minor.

Completed applications MUST be submitted at registration. New and transfer student applications received after June 19th will only be accepted by appeal. All appeals will be reviewed after the lottery for incoming freshmen is complete. All appeals must be made via the appeal form on the Parking website.

Occasionally communication will be sent from the Parking Office via email to all students UWRF email address. These messages will be sent via the all student email address. Please watch your email for important information.

Permit applications must be received by June 19th and must include full payment in the form of cash or check only. Please make check payable to: UWRF Parking. Applicants with permits not granted will receive a full refund.

These newsletters have been produced by Paper-Clip Communications; a company that specializes in Higher Education resources. The articles in the newsletter address issues that many first-year students experience.

Center on the First-Year Experience: Information on first-year seminars, summer reading programs, capstone courses, learning communities, service learning, and various other higher education initiatives and professional organizations.

If you will be staying at one of the motels in River Falls, they are all located along Main Street. As you come into town, the Country Inn is to your right, behind the McDonald’s along the frontage road. The Super 8 is a little further down on Main St., also on the right-hand side, behind the Wisconsin Credit Union Building. The Best Western is a bit further along Main Street but on the left side.

As we enter a new era of providing continuing education for food industry professional, and others interested in the safety of our food, we would like to invite your company to support and participate in the 26th University of Wisconsin - River Falls Food Microbiology Symposium and Rapid and Automated Methods Workshop on October 14-17, 2006.      As always, this program provides an excellent opportunity for your company to showcase the latest technology for the detection, isolation and characterization of foodborne micoorganisms and their toxins to food industry professionals in a personalized setting. Previous participants liked....

We look forward to your company's participation in the 26th UW-River Falls Food Microbiology Symposium and Rapid and Automated Methods Workshop and support this valued program. Presentations and workshop times are limited so we recommend reserving a slot as soon as possible.

Keynote speakers for the 25th Annual Food Microbiology Symposium are selected by invitation only. If you were chosen for this prestigious position there is some information that you may want to be aware of to better prepare your presentation.

Transportation will be made available for you from Hudson, WI, if necessary or prefered. For specific information you can see the Shuttle section on our Travel page. Our staff will stay in correspondance with you to ensure that we are aware of your specific travel arrangements, dates and times. Our staff will also request the location of your lodgings and a means to contact you.

There will be a laptop computer and projector available for your use. This computer may not support all media types and may not be compatible with your data type.  it is highly recommended that you prepare your presentation on Powerpoint and write it to a CD for best results on our medium.  Please send CD ahead so it can be pre-loaded.

Again, our staff will be in continuous correspondance with all speakers to ensure that we have all the information above. This page serves as a guideline for what to expect, and for speakers to begin planning their presentations and travel. We will work together to provide the smoothest possible environment for presentations during the symposium.

The Sponsorship Program gives organizations an opportunity to participate directly in the 25th Annual UW-River Falls Food Microbiology Symposium and Rapid and Automated Methods Workshop. The Sponsorship Program is designed to provide a continuing education opportunity for food industry professionals, government regulators and others interested in food and water microbiology and methods for detection, quantification, and characterization of pathogens, spoilage organisms, and toxins.

The Sponsorship Program provides an excellent opportunity for organizations to showcase the latest technology in the detection, isolation and characterization of foodborne microorganisms and their toxins. Attendance at last year's symposium was the highest ever and included a diverse group of professionals from the food processing industry, regulatory agencies, and academia, including several international participants. We hope to attract even more attendees this year. The program is designed to provide an opportunity for company representatives to interact with the participants.

In the past, contributions from companies helped defray the expenses for speakers, visiting fellows, and hospitality, etc. I would like to invite organizations to support this proven Sponsorship Program by participating as a Contributing Sponsor (minimum contribution $500). Each Contributing Sponsor will be recognized at the conference and invited to participate in the program. Contributing Sponsors may choose to make a 15 minute presentation on their instrumentation or services, demonstrate a test or instrument at the workshop, and/or prepare a technical poster on an application involving the company's products. Company literature will also be included in our conference manual. Presentation and workshop times are limited so we recommend reserving a slot as early as possible.

If an organization wishes to participate in the 25th Annual UW-River Falls Food Microbiology Symposium and Rapid and Automated Methods Workshop and support this worthy program, please complete and return the enclosed form by March 31, 2005. Presentation and workshop times are limited so we recommend reserving a slot by returning this form as soon as possible. We will contact the person you indicate on the form with additional details on the symposium.

University of Freiburg, Germany. At UWRF Monika teaches German and French language and phonetics. Her special interests are language acquisistion, linguistics and the political and cultural developments of 20th century France and Germany. She travels on a regular basis to Europe.

Yiddish, and between German and English. English, in part, developed out of the Saxon language of northern Germany (today's Low German). Schiller, Brecht, Duerrenmatt and Frisch are his favorite dramatists. Peter also follows political, social, and economic developments in the newly constituted European Union. Peter keeps up to date with European and pedagogical issues by contacting colleagues on the internet and attending regional and national foreign language conferences. He serves as a consultant to D. C. Heath publishing. Dr. Johansson traveled to Germany four times in the past eight years for professional development. Peter serves as German Club advisor and the German Scholarship fund-raising coordinator.

Although Professor Mannetter is a Wisconsin native, he graduated from high school in Phoenix, Arizona. He holds a B.A. with a double major in Philosophy and Spanish from UW-Stevens Point, and an M.A. and Ph.D. in Spanish from UW-Madison. His fields of specialization are Hispanic Philology, Medieval and Golden Age Spanish Literature, Peninsular Dialectology, Modern Spanish Linguistics, and Portuguese Literature and Linguistics. He also studied Classical Latin and Classical Arabic. His dissertation was the production of a new computer-assisted edition of the Leyes del estilo, a 14th-century Spanish legal code. The new edition of the code included semi-paleographic transcriptions of all available handwritten manuscripts of the text, along with an analysis of all variant forms of the text he chose as his base text.

While he was a graduate student at Madison, he worked as a Teaching Assistant and Lecturer in the Department of Spanish and Portuguese. He was also awarded a Research Assistantship in the Seminary of Medieval Spanish Studies at Madison under the directorship of Professors John Nitti and the late Professor Lloyd Kasten. At the Seminary he received extensive training in paleography, lexicography, and the application of the latest computer software technology to the main project of the Seminary: the Dictionary of the Old Spanish Language . This massive lexicographic project, which is now centered at the Hispanic Society of America in New York City, is an ongoing effort to document over 500 years of Old Spanish linguistic development, and has been underway since the 1930's. Among the many innovative features of this project is the inclusion of citation blocks for each vocabulary item included in the Dictionary, which provides the dictionary user with a sample of the authentic Old Spanish context of each item.

Since receiving his Ph.D. in 1991, he has been appointed Chief Editor of a new dictionary project developed in conduction with the Madison Seminary, the Dictionary of the Complete Works of Juan Manuel. This project will document a statistical sampling of the complete narrative works of the Spanish nobleman and author Juan Manuel (1282-1348), the nephew of Alphonso X the Wise (king of Spain from 1252-1284). The methodology utilized for this project generally parallels that of the DOSL project and takes advantage of sophisticated computer software developed at the Madison Seminary during the past two decades. The narrative texts of Juan Manuel to be included in the dictionary include: Libro del caballero y del escudero, Libro de las tres razones o de las armas, Libro infinido, Libro de los estados, Libro del conde Lucanor, Tratado de la asuncion, Libro de la caza, and Cronica abreviada.

German and Spanish options. These programs lead to a B.A. or B.S. degree in liberal arts or a B.S. degree in secondary education. Minors are offered in French, German and Spanish. Two years of Chinese and Japanese are also available.

Modern Language Placement Test, offered in spring Regional Testing and during all registration periods. Students may test out of up to fourteen credits. Test-out credits are not granted until the student completes the next level course with the grade of B or better.

"I'm in Northern California through the National Student Exchange program, still pursuing a double major in French and English. I got to take an African Storytelling class that focused mainly on Senegal and have made friends with several International French students out here. My current French teacher is an International faculty member from Morocco! She doesn't speak any English so my French must improve rapidly.

Assistant in Northeast France. The lycee where I teach has about 800 students aged 15-18 who come from the surrounding villages to attend school in the booming metropolis of Toul, pop. 8,000. I live in neighboring Nancy, a more lively university town of about 100,000 where the majority of people walking around town seem to be under 25. Of course, this has been a huge advantage for me as I have had a relatively easy time meeting French people and forming relationships. I also live with two French roommates, something that I would highly reccommend to anyone moving abroad as it has been invaluable to have a support system (and dishes and furniture) already installed in my apartment. The past six months have been wonderful, terrifying, fun, frustrating and, overall, definitely worth the hassle it was to move to France!"

Caen and its surrounding communities have a population of about 250,000 people, so the city is large enough to have everything one needs but is not too big. The experience of conversing with French-speakers is wonderful, and I think I might be learning more in chatting with my peers than in class! A few weeks ago, I went with friends to London for the weekend and just this past Saturday I went to Paris for the day. In three weeks I'll be travelling to Tours to see some chateaux of the Loire Valley and I am considering spending some time in Ireland and/or eastern Europe for spring break. The website of the city is http://www.ville-caen.fr/ and has many pictures of the area."

"I started looking for a job that allowed me to use my French and ended up finding that there are a lot of opportunities if you do a little research. Honestly the majority of the opportunities I found were in the fashion/beauty industry since Paris is one of the fashion capitals of the world. If students are interested in this industry then there is no better place in the US to go than New York. This is where all of the headquarters are and the most job opportunities for people interested in using their French.

During my job hunt I also found job postings for positions at wine/champagne companies in addition to translation companies. Mostly I would type the word "French" into job searches and a ton of different things would pop up. I usually searched for jobs through career builder and craigslist.com. However, I got the job I have now through networking. If anyone wants to learn more about my company they are more than welcome to call/email me at 651-353-0615 or christineduellman@yahoo.com.

One agency I went through was EuroMonde Inc. This agency placed people with a second (European) language in temp and permanent jobs. They were very helpful and called me with job opportunity (however I was already employed by then:). Next to networking I think this method of job hunting is the most effective because they usually do the networking for you.

I work with quite a few people that are from France and the subject of my work depends entirely on the decisions made by the headquarters in Paris. I can say without a doubt that the reason I was hired for this job was because I had a French degree."

"I graduated in December of 2003 with a degree in Elementary Education and a minor in Spanish. However, I decided to go ahead and take the extra classes to get certified to teach middle school Spanish. The following fall I received a job as a middle and high school Spanish teacher under emergency liscensure. I have just completed my major in Spanish and am offically certified to continue to teach high school Spanish. I was able to visit my family in Costa Rica to take the final courses I needed to graduate. I recommend a study abroad experience for anyone majoring or minoring in a foreign language. It is the best way to learn/master a language. Aside from teaching there are plenty of opportunities here in Wisconsin to get a job as a translator; either for local businesses who employ Spanish speakers or for hosipitals or government establishments that provide services to Spanish speakers."

The forms required to submit course proposals for General Education Designation are available below. Information regarding each goal is available by selecting the goal. Before completing the form, familiarize yourself with the goal your course is designed to fulfill.

Specific proposal forms are available under the appropriate goal and sub category for your course. Download the form and fill in the gray boxes (they will expand as needed). You will not be able to change anything else about the form. Save the form so that you are able to work on it and have a copy of what you have done.

This course is designed to provide students with a hands-on experience using lab and field instruments and techniques about which they are learning in Geography 110. This lab is a requirement of geography majors and minors, optional for other students. The lab need not be taken concurrently with the Geography 110 lecture course. Prerequisite or co-requisite: GEOG 110.

A global investigation of the distribution and geographic characteristics of plants and animals, and the factors influencing these distributions including human intervention, migration, and diffusion.

Contemporary patterns of the physical environment, population, settlement patterns, agriculture, resources, industry and environmental issues will be examined. Emphasis is on regional differences and interrelationships.

The map-making process from data collection to final map reproduction is explored. This course covers collecting and processing cartographic data, map symbolization, map design and map production using computers.

This course deals with analyzing and processing data for thematic maps; the creation of graduated symbol, dot, isoline and choropleth maps, and multivariate data maps; and cartographic problems posing special challenges when employing these mapping strategies. A section on graphs is included.

The course describes and analyzes the distribution of cities and their interaction, the spatial patterns of residential and nonresidential land uses, and the characteristics of urban populations. Field study project in the Twin Cities is required. Prerequisite: GEOG 120 or consent of instructor.

This course explores Europe in two ways. Using a country approach, the various environmental and cultural elements which give the major European states their unique regional character and provide their inhabitants with a sense of national identity are examined. Using an integrative European community approach, strategies which European nations have developed in concert to strengthen their collective position in world affairs are examined.

This course provides a regional survey of physical, cultural, and economic patterns of Middle and South America. Topics include distribution of population, landforms and climates, impacts of colonization, cultural and agricultural systems, urban and economic development and current ecological issues.

An introduction to statistical measures and models commonly used to describe spatial variation in one or more phenomena. Topics include descriptive statistics, probability distributions, sampling, correlation and regression.

This course is designed for advanced geography students who wish to work independently on a project. A paper describing the research or a finished cartographic product is required. Prerequisite: consent of Department Chair and instructor.

Department initiated a local chapter of Gamma Theta Upsilon (GTU), the international geography honor society. Membership is open to qualified students and recognizes superior scholastic achievement in geography coursework.

Ice mechanics - processes that influence the deformation of ice and the flow of  glaciers including field investigations on the Barnes Ice Cap, Baffin Island, Canada and laboratory studies in a cold laboratory at UWRF.

Dynamics and instability of glaciers and ice sheets - field studies of basal till deformation on glaciers in Sweden and laboratory studies of sediment deformation at the University of Minnesota (with Neal Iverson).

On my page you can find out about: courses I teach Senior research experience geology career information oceanography career information geology links  you may find fun to explore a  mineralogy of Wisconsin  data base. my credentials Pierce County, WI Geology tour C.D.

Photo at the top of the page is of me at Morecki boulders in New Zealand. The large rock is a concretion.  The lower photo shows my wife Jan and I in the Altai Mountains along the China- Mongolia border.

Ian is a Professor of Geology at the University of Wisconsin - River Falls, specializing in geophysics and structural geology.  On occasion he also teaches planetary geology and environmental geology.  Below are links to pages for each of his courses.

I'm there, I am usually happy to talk to you. Generally, I try hard to be in my office during my office hours, but occasionally unforeseen committee work might take me away. Leave me a message if your visit is important.

"Geology 101 - Exam File".  I do require you know the definitions of all the terms and understand the concepts listed on the "keyword" sheet. Please sit with at least one vacant seat between you and your neighbor. Cell phones, lap tops and MP3 players cannot be used during the exam.  Please switch them off and stow them away. The quizzes are surprises and will not be announced.  Your grade on the quizzes will be the sum of your best five efforts  (i.e. your worst quiz score will be ignored).  Each quiz is worth ten points.  Missed quizzes count zero, unless you have a good reason for being absent, in which case you will be eligible to take a makeup quiz at the end of the semester.  This makeup quiz is not a direct replacement of the one you missed, but a generic quiz based on any subject within the scope of the class.

Geology 101- Intro. to Geology is a three credit course taught every semester. It counts toward the general education requirement in science. It introduces, at a layman level, the study of earth materials, the the dynamic processes that have shaped and are now shaping its surface and interior, and the influence of these on human beings.

Oceanography is a three credit course (2 lectures and one lab per week) taught every Spring semester. It introduces, at a layman level, the physical, geological, chemical and bioliogical make-up of the world oceans. It also discusses the oceans as a source of food, energy and other natural resources. Oceanography  is accepted as an SL course in the UWRF general education program. It can also be currently used toward the liberal arts requirement in science and is  a  required course for earth science minors and some broad area science majors.

Mineralogy is a Fall semester class taught every year. It covers, in detail, the identification, formation and interpretation of minerals. It is required of Geology majors and minors and also in certain broad area science programs. It's also a neat course for those local rockhounds who really want to sharpen their I.D. skills.

Petrology is a Spring semester class taught every year. It covers, in detail, the identification, formation and interpretation of igneous and metamorphic rocks. It also reviews in great detail the use of the polarized light (or petrographic) microscope in mineral I.D. and rock interpretation. It is required of Geology majors. Mineralogy (Geology 230) is a FIRM prerequisite for this course.

You will be required to locate a recent article on some aspect of environmental geology(e.g. a new mineral resume, lake pollultion disaster or an earthquake), and write a 1000 word summary and commentary (i.e. briefly state what the article is about and then give your comments upon the subject) (about 3 - 4 pages, typed, double spaced) which will be due at the last class before thanksgiving. Your article must be less than two years old and cannot be one that was chosen by a student from a previous class. When you have located an article, consult with me before proceeding with your summary. As an appendix, attach a Xeroxed copy of the article. List the article in correct bibliographical format* at the end of your paper.

Articles that have significant plagiarism will receive zero credit. (n.b. If you wish to use two or three short articles, or other supplementary material, you may do so.) I also suggest that you team up with someone else in the class and exchange draft versions of your papers in early Novemeber. That way you can read each other's work and provide critical advise.

Imagery of planets and satellites, taken along with other data, will allow students to identify geological features and lead to a discussion of the processes of their formation and the development of these bodies.  Special empasis is given to tectonic, impact, volcanic and geomorphological features and theories concerning the internal structure of the planets.

Presentations:	Each member of the class will locate an intereisting web site (pertaining to the material of the class) and spend five minutes during class explaining its significance.  In addition, please give me a brif description of the site, along with its URL and a reference to any other material you used to prepare your presentation.  Presentations start after the second midterm.  Let me know your URL by the first midterm so as we can avoid duplicate presentations.

Equipment : Sharp, hard pencils; scale (with metric); protractor; triangles; eraser; colored pencils; stereo nets (available in bookstore); tracing paper; black & colored fine point felt pens or mapping pens; calculator.

This is a one credit regional geology field trip course taught in rotation with our other great regional field trips.  It consists of a 12 -14 day trip centered around parts of Lake Superior, run just after the Spring Semester final exam period. We stay in college dorms (no camping) . We have lots of fun and see outstanding geological features that illustrate what the Canadian Shield (the old geological core of the North American Continent) is like. We will do a variety of activities each day, with the prime focus being mini-geological field problems to solve on the outcrop. This will sharpen the student's observational skills and show the application of classroom topics and the scientific method to geology in the field. We will visit, among other things, the Mesabi iron range, copper mines of upper Michigan, amethyst mines near Thunder Bay, Ouimet Canyon and Sibley  Provincial Park. Our textbook will be Gene LaBerge's "Geology of the Lake Superior Region". The cost is expected to be $300 per student, covering lodging, most meals, transportation, entry and other activity fees.

Our course text, Lillie, although not particularly extensive, covers most of the subjects that we shall talk about in class.  There are many other useful texts in the library, some of which I have put on reserve.  I also own many others which you can use, but only in or near my office (I don't want to loose track of them).  The texts listed above are the source for most of the readings, but there is also a file of papers that you can read.  Since we will not strictly follow the material in one book, the lectures are critical in directing your studies.

Presentation :  Please make your sure your homework is neat (if I cannot interpret them - my judgment - then it is wrong).  Use plenty of room on the paper.  All appropriate steps in any derivation must be shown.  Drawings must be clean and precise.  Use ink for both writing and drawing.  Quote, in the appropriate fashion, all references used (including textbooks).  Explain what you have done and why.  Draw attention to your final answer in some manner.

These are special localitions in the state that have produced excellent mineral specimens, and are important parts of the state's mineralogical heritage. Many are "mineralogical rain forests" where many rare mineral species are found together within a small area due to some unique combination of geological processes.

A small amount of calcite was found at the Flambeau Copper Mine, near Ladysmith. Most of it was not fluorescent, but some had zones that fluoresced red. One vug had calcite that fluoresced orange under short wave U.V. and yellow under long wave U.V.

Dolomite - Much dolomite in the Prairie du Chien formation fluoresces and phosphoresces a dull bluish to yellowish in short wave U.V. light. This forms an interesting part of the fluorescent mineral display part of the tour in Crystal Cave, near Spring Valley, Wisconsin.

K Feldspar - The K feldspar in the "rotten granite" and other granite quarries in Marathon and Wood counties will often fluoresce deep red in short wave U.V. K feldspar with epidote from the dumps of Jackson County Iron Mine near Black River Falls also fluoresces red.

Quartz - Drusy to coarse quartz crystals, some with phantoms, were found in dolomite in a road cut on Hanley road, Hudson, St. Croix County. These fluoresce pale yellow in short wave U.V. Associated calcite and aragonite which fluoresce and phosphoresce blue in short wave and long wave U.V. Thus some samples will give 2 or 3 different fluorescent colors.

Appendix E. Grant Productivity by College, 2004-2005. (PDF) This report compares the grant productivity of each college/school by dividing the number of full time equivalent faculty in each college by the number of proposals submitted; it also measures the number of faculty per grant awarded.

Appendix E. Grant Productivity by College, 2003-2004. (PDF) This report compares the grant productivity of each college/school by dividing the number of full time equivalent faculty in each college by the number of proposals submitted; it also measures the number of faculty per grant awarded.

The College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences has a long rich history of international involvement. As early as the 1960's faculty was in the Soviet Union, Vietnam and Africa sharing their expertise in various agricultural areas. Early tragedies did not deter succeeding faculty from continuing to travel the globe. Of the faculty in the College in 2006, nearly 50% have organized and/or participated in international workshops, training sessions, or exchange programs.

Through a USDA Challenge Grant, tissue culture, Cedrus germination, and propagation of new plant material was researched at Longwood Gardens in Pennsylvania . Field trips to study the management structures of local gardens with the Longwood Graduate Fellows and Graduate Director Dr. Robert Lyons complemented the research activities.

Glycogen Branching Enzyme Deficiency results in the death of fetal and neonatal Paint and Quarter Horse foals at or before 8 weeks of age. This experiment was designed to test if the heterozygous genotype increased risk of death and to define the frequency of GBED as a cause of death.

This research estimates the financial performance of different feed procurement/crop production enterprise types on select Wisconsin dairy farms in 2003. The farms that grew both grain and forages had poorer performing feed procurement/crop production enterprises than the farms that grew only forage and those that purchased all of their feed.

This research estimates the financial feasibility of cash grain farms utilizing dairy manure as fertilizer. Results show that it is financially feasible for cash grain farmers to utilize dairy manure as fertilizer on fields up to 6 miles away from the dairy farm source.

This research compares the financial performance of Wisconsin Agriculture Financial Advisor free- and tie- stall dairy farms. Tie-stall farms were competitive with free-stall farms from a basic financial efficiency perspective. Nevertheless, once returns to unpaid labor and capital were considered, the free stall farms were more financially efficient.

This research examines producer perceptions concerning the acceptance of diverse work forces on select Wisconsin dairy farms and their farming communities. Results show that cultural acceptance and adaptation is occurring on the farms and in the farming communities, especially where it is mutually beneficial for both employee and employer.

